GenesisChapter 11:1 In the beginning God created the heaven and the earth.1:2 And the earth was without form and void; and darkness was upon the face of the deep.  And the Spirit of God moved upon the face of the waters.1:3 And God said, Let there be light.  And there was light.1:4 And God saw the light, that it was good.  And God divided the light from the darkness.1:5 And God called the light Day, and the darkness he called Night.  And there was evening and there was morning, one day.1:6 And God said, Let there be a firmament in the midst of the waters, and let it divide the waters from the waters.1:7 And God made the firmament, and divided the waters which were under the firmament from the waters which were above the firmament.  And it was so.1:8 And God called the firmament Heaven.  And there was evening and there was morning, a second day.1:9 And God said, Let the waters under the heaven be gathered together to one place, and let the dry land appear.  And it was so.1:10 And God called the dry land Earth; and the gathering together of the waters he called Seas.  And God saw that it was good.1:11 And God said, Let the earth put forth grass, herbs yielding seed, and fruit trees bearing fruit after their kind, with its seed in itself, upon the earth: and it was so.1:12 And the earth brought forth grass, herbs yielding seed after their kind, and trees bearing fruit, with its seed in itself, after their kind: and God saw that it was good.1:13 And there was evening and there was morning, a third day.1:14 And God said, Let there be lights in the firmament of heaven to divide the day from the night; and let them be for signs, and for seasons, and for days and years:1:15 and let them be for lights in the firmament of heaven to give light upon the earth.  And it was so.1:16 And God made the two great lights; the greater light to rule the day, and the lesser light to rule the night.  He made also the stars.1:17 And God set them in the firmament of heaven to give light upon the earth,1:18 and to rule over the day and over the night, and to divide the light from the darkness.  And God saw that it was good.1:19 And there was evening and there was morning, a fourth day.1:20 And God said, Let the waters swarm with swarms of living creatures, and let birds fly above the earth in the open firmament of heaven.1:21 And God created the great sea-monsters, and every living creature that moves, with which the waters swarmed, after their kind, and every winged bird after its kind: and God saw that it was good.1:22 And God blessed them, saying, Be fruitful, and multiply, and fill the waters in the seas, and let birds multiply upon the earth.1:23 And there was evening and there was morning, a fifth day.1:24 And God said, Let the earth bring forth living creatures after their kind, cattle, and creeping things, and beasts of the earth after their kind.  And it was so.1:25 And God made the beasts of the earth after their kind, and the cattle after their kind, and everything that creeps upon the ground after its kind.  And God saw that it was good.1:26 And God said, Let us make man in our image, after our likeness: and let them have dominion over the fish of the sea, and over the birds of the heaven, and over the cattle, and over all the earth, and over every creeping thing that creeps upon the earth.1:27 And God created man in his own image; in the image of God he created him.  Male and female he created them.1:28 And God blessed them: and God said to them, Be fruitful, and multiply, and replenish the earth, and subdue it; and have dominion over the fish of the sea, and over the birds of the heaven, and over every living thing that moves upon the earth.1:29 And God said, Behold, I have given you every herb yielding seed, which is upon the face of all the earth, and every tree, in which is the fruit of a tree yielding seed.  To you it shall be for food:1:30 and to every beast of the earth, and to every bird of the heaven, and to everything that creeps upon the earth, in which there is life, I have given every green herb for food.  And it was so.1:31 And God saw everything that he had made, and, behold, it was very good.  And there was evening and there was morning, the sixth day.Chapter 22:1 And the heaven and the earth were finished, and all the host of them.2:2 And on the seventh day God finished his work which he had made; and he rested on the seventh day from all his work which he had done.2:3 And God blessed the seventh day, and hallowed it; because in it he had ceased from all the work of creating which God had done.2:4 These are the generations of the heaven and of the earth when they were created, in the day that Yahweh God made earth and heaven.2:5 And no plant of the field was yet in the earth, and no herb of the field had yet sprung up; for Yahweh God had not caused it to rain upon the earth: and there was not a man to till the ground;2:6 but there went up a mist from the earth, and watered the whole face of the ground.2:7 And Yahweh God formed man of the dust of the ground, and breathed into his nostrils the breath of life; and man became a living soul.2:8 And Yahweh God planted a garden eastward, in Eden; and there he put the man whom he had formed.2:9 And out of the ground Yahweh God made to grow every tree that is pleasant to the sight, and good for food; the tree of life also in the midst of the garden, and the tree of the knowledge of good and evil.2:10 And a river went out of Eden to water the garden; and from there it was parted, and became four heads.2:11 The name of the first is Pishon: that is the one which compasses the whole land of Havilah, where there is gold;2:12 and the gold of that land is good: there is bdellium and the onyx stone.2:13 And the name of the second river is Gihon: the same is it that compasses the whole land of Cush.2:14 And the name of the third river is Hiddekel: that is the one which goes in front of Assyria.  And the fourth river is the Euphrates.2:15 And Yahweh God took the man, and put him into the garden of Eden to dress it and to keep it.2:16 And Yahweh God commanded the man, saying, Of every tree of the garden you may freely eat:2:17 but of the tree of the knowledge of good and evil, you shall not eat of it: for in the day that you eat of it you shall surely die.2:18 And Yahweh God said, It is not good that the man should be alone; I will make him a helper suitable to him.2:19 And out of the ground Yahweh God formed every beast of the field, and every bird of the heaven; and brought them to the man to see what he would call them: and whatsoever the man called every living creature, that was the name of it.2:20 And the man gave names to all cattle, and to the birds of the heaven, and to every beast of the field.  But for man there was not found a helper suited to him.2:21 And Yahweh God caused a deep sleep to fall upon the man, and he slept; and he took one of his ribs, and closed up the flesh in the place of it.2:22 And the rib, which Yahweh God had taken from the man, he made into a woman, and brought her to the man.2:23 And the man said, This is now bone of my bones, and flesh of my flesh: she shall be called Woman, because she was taken out of Man.2:24 Therefore shall a man leave his father and his mother, and shall cleave to his woman: and they shall be one flesh.2:25 And they were both naked, the man and his wife, and were not ashamed.Chapter 33:1 Now the serpent was more subtle than any beast of the field which Yahweh God had made.  And he said to the woman, Has God really said, You shall not eat of any tree of the garden?3:2 And the woman said to the serpent, Of the fruit of the trees of the garden we may eat:3:3 but of the fruit of the tree which is in the midst of the garden, God has said, You shall not eat of it, neither shall you touch it, lest you die. 3:4 And the serpent said to the woman, You shall not surely die:3:5 for God knows that in the day you eat of it, then your eyes shall be opened, and you shall be as God, knowing good and evil.3:6 And when the woman saw that the tree was good for food, and that it was a delight to the eyes, and that the tree was to be desired to make one wise, she took of the fruit of it, and did eat.  And she gave some also to her husband along with her, and he did eat.3:7 And the eyes of them both were opened, and they knew that they were naked; and they sewed fig-leaves together, and made themselves aprons.3:8 And they heard the voice of Yahweh God walking in the garden in the cool of the day: and the man and his wife hid themselves from the presence of Yahweh God among the trees of the garden.3:9 And Yahweh God called to the man, and said to him, Where are you?3:10 And he said, I heard your voice in the garden, and I was afraid, because I was naked; and I hid myself.3:11 And he said, Who told you that you were naked?  Have you eaten of the tree, of which I commanded you that you should not eat?3:12 And the man said, The woman whom you gave to be with me, she gave me of the tree, and then I ate.3:13 And Yahweh God said to the woman, What is this you have done?  And the woman said, The serpent beguiled me, and then I ate.3:14 And Yahweh God said to the serpent, Because you have done this, cursed are you above all cattle, and above every beast of the field; upon your belly shall you go, and dust shall you eat all the days of your life:3:15 and I will put enmity between you and the woman, and between your seed and her seed: he shall bruise your head, and you shall bruise his heel.3:16 To the woman he said, I will greatly multiply your pain in childbearing; in pain you shall bring forth children.  And your desire shall be your husband, and he shall rule over you.3:17 And to Adam he said, Because you have listened to the voice of your wife, and have eaten of the tree, about which I commanded you, saying, You shall not eat of it, cursed is the land for your sake; in toil shall you eat from it all the days of your life;3:18 thorns also and thistles shall it bring forth to you; and you shall eat the herb of the field;3:19 by the sweat of your face shall you eat bread, till you return to the ground; since out of it you were taken.  For dust you are, and to dust you shall return.3:20 And the man called his wife's name Eve; because she was the mother of all living.3:21 And Yahweh God made for Adam and for his wife coats of skins, and clothed them.3:22 And Yahweh God said, Behold, the man is become as one of us, to know good and evil; and now, lest he put forth his hand, and take also of the tree of life, and eat, and live for ever-3:23 therefore Yahweh God sent him forth from the garden of Eden, to till the ground from where he was taken.3:24 So he drove the man out; and he placed at the east of the garden of Eden the Cherubim, and the flame of a sword which turned every direction, to guard the way of the tree of life.Chapter 44:1 And the man knew Eve his wife; and she conceived, and bore Cain, and said, I have gotten a man with the help of Yahweh.4:2 And again she bore his brother Abel.  And Abel was a keeper of sheep, but Cain was a tiller of the ground.4:3 And in process of time it came to pass, that Cain brought an offering to Yahweh of the fruit of the ground.4:4 And Abel, he also brought one, of the firstlings of his flock and of the fat thereof.  And Yahweh had respect toward Abel and to his offering:4:5 but toward Cain and to his offering he did not have respect.  And Cain was very angry, and his countenance fell.4:6 And Yahweh said to Cain, Why are you angry?  and why is your countenance fallen?4:7 If you do well, shall it not be lifted up?  and if you do not do well, sin crouches at the door: and its desire is you, but you must rule over it. 4:8 And Cain told Abel his brother.  And it came to pass, when they were in the field, that Cain rose up against Abel his brother, and slew him.4:9 And Yahweh said to Cain, Where is Abel your brother?  And he said, I know not: am I my brother's keeper?4:10 And he said, What have you done?  the voice of your brother's blood cries to me from the ground.4:11 And now cursed are you from the ground, which has opened its mouth to receive your brother's blood from your hand;4:12 when you till the ground, it shall not anymore yield to you its strength; a fugitive and a wanderer shall you be in the earth.4:13 And Cain said to Yahweh, My punishment is greater than I can bear.4:14 Behold, you have driven me out this day from the face of the ground; and from your face shall I be hid; and I shall be a fugitive and a wanderer in the earth; and it will come to pass, that whosoever finds me will slay me.4:15 And Yahweh said to him, Therefore whosoever slays Cain, vengeance shall be taken on him sevenfold.  And Yahweh appointed a sign for Cain, lest anyone finding him should attack him.4:16 And Cain went out from the presence of Yahweh, and dwelt in the land of Nod, on the east of Eden.4:17 And Cain knew his wife; and she conceived, and bore Enoch: and he built a city, and called the name of the city, after the name of his son, Enoch.4:18 And to Enoch was born Irad: and Irad begat Mehujael: and Mehujael begat Methushael; and Methushael begat Lamech.4:19 And Lamech took to himself two wives: the name of the one was Adah, and the name of the other Zillah.4:20 And Adah bore Jabal: he was the father of such as dwell in tents and have cattle.4:21 And his brother's name was Jubal: he was the father of all such as handle the harp and pipe.4:22 And Zillah, she also bore Tubal-cain, the forger of every cutting instrument of brass and iron: and the sister of Tubal-cain was Naamah.4:23 And Lamech said to his wives: Adah and Zillah, hear my voice; You wives of Lamech, hearken to my speech: For I have slain a man for wounding me, and a young man for bruising me:4:24 If Cain shall be avenged sevenfold, Truly Lamech seventy-seven fold.4:25 And Adam knew his wife again; and she bore a son, and called his name Seth.  For, said she, God has appointed me another seed instead of Abel; for Cain slew him.4:26 And to Seth, to him also there was born a son; and he called his name Enosh.  Then began men to call upon the name of Yahweh.Chapter 55:1 This is the book of the generations of Adam.  In the day that God created man, in the likeness of God made he him;5:2 male and female created he them, and blessed them, and called their name Adam, in the day when they were created.5:3 And Adam lived 130 years, and begat a son in his own likeness, after his image; and called his name Seth:5:4 and the days of Adam after he begat Seth were 800 years: and he begat sons and daughters.5:5 And all the days that Adam lived were 930 years: and he died.5:6 And Seth lived 105 years, and begat Enosh:5:7 and Seth lived after he begat Enosh 807 years, and begat sons and daughters:5:8 and all the days of Seth were 912 years: and he died.5:9 And Enosh lived 90 years, and begat Kenan.5:10 and Enosh lived after he begat Kenan 815 years, and begat sons and daughters:5:11 and all the days of Enosh were 905 years: and he died.5:12 And Kenan lived 70 years, and begat Mahalalel:5:13 and Kenan lived after he begat Mahalalel 840 years, and begat sons and daughters:5:14 and all the days of Kenan were 910 years: and he died.5:15 And Mahalalel lived 65 years, and begat Jared:5:16 And Mahalalel lived after he begat Jared 830 years, and begat sons and daughters:5:17 and all the days of Mahalalel were 895 years: and he died.5:18 And Jared lived 162 years, and begat Enoch:5:19 and Jared lived after he begat Enoch 800 years, and begat sons and daughters:5:20 And all the days of Jared were 962 years: and he died.5:21 And Enoch lived 65 years, and begat Methuselah:5:22 and Enoch walked with God after he begat Methuselah 300 years, and begat sons and daughters:5:23 and all the days of Enoch were 365 years:5:24 and Enoch walked with God: and he was not; for God took him.5:25 And Methuselah lived 187 years, and begat Lamech:5:26 and Methuselah lived after he begat Lamech 782 years, and begat sons and daughters.5:27 And all the days of Methuselah were 969 years: and he died.5:28 And Lamech lived 182 years, and begat a son:5:29 and he called his name Noah, saying, This same shall comfort us in our work and in the toil of our hands, toil because of the ground which Yahweh has cursed.5:30 And Lamech lived after he begat Noah 595 years, and begat sons and daughters:5:31 And all the days of Lamech were 777 years: and he died.5:32 And Noah was 500 years old: And Noah begat Shem, Ham, and Japheth.Chapter 66:1 And it came to pass, when men began to multiply on the face of the ground, and daughters were born to them,6:2 that the sons of God saw the daughters of men that they were fair; and they took themselves wives of all that they chose.6:3 And Yahweh said, My spirit shall not strive with man for ever, for that he also is flesh: yet shall his days be a hundred and twenty years.6:4 The Nephilim were in the earth in those days, and also after that, when the sons of God came to the daughters of men, and they bore children to them: the same were the mighty men that were of old, the men of renown.6:5 And Yahweh saw that the wickedness of man was great in the earth, and that every imagination of the thoughts of his heart was only evil continually.6:6 And Yahweh regretted that he had made man on the earth, and it grieved him to his heart.6:7 And Yahweh said, I will destroy man whom I have created from the face of the ground; both man, and beast, and creeping things, and birds of the heavens; for I am sorry that I have made them.6:8 But Noah found favor in the eyes of Yahweh.6:9 These are the generations of Noah.  Noah was a righteous man, and perfect in his generations: Noah walked with God.6:10 And Noah begat three sons, Shem, Ham, and Japheth.6:11 And the earth was corrupt before God, and the earth was filled with violence.6:12 And God saw the earth, and, behold, it was corrupt; for all flesh had corrupted their way upon the earth.6:13 And God said to Noah, The end of all flesh is come before me; for the earth is filled with violence through them; and, behold, I will destroy them with the earth.6:14 Make you an ark of gopher wood; rooms shall you make in the ark, and shall pitch it within and without with pitch.6:15 And this is how you shall make it: the length of the ark three hundred cubits, the breadth of it fifty cubits, and the height of it thirty cubits.6:16 A light shall you make to the ark, and to a cubit shall you finish it upward; and the door of the ark shall you set in the side thereof; with lower, second, and third stories shall you make it.6:17 And I, behold, I am bringing the flood of waters upon this earth, to destroy all flesh, in which is the breath of life, from under heaven; everything that is in the earth shall die.6:18 But I will establish my covenant with you; and you shall come into the ark, you, and your sons, and your wife, and your sons' wives with you.6:19 And of every living thing of all flesh, two of every sort shall you bring into the ark, to keep them alive with you; they shall be male and female.6:20 Of the birds after their kind, and of the cattle after their kind, of every creeping thing of the ground after its kind, two of every sort shall come to you, to keep them alive.6:21 And take to yourselves of all food that is eaten, and gather it to you; and it shall be for food for you, and for them.6:22 Thus Noah did; according to all that God commanded him, so did he.Chapter 77:1 And Yahweh said to Noah, Come you and all your house into the ark; for you have I seen righteous before me in this generation.7:2 Of every clean beast you shall take to you seven and seven, the male and his female; and of the beasts that are not clean, two, the male and his female:7:3 of the birds also of the heavens, seven and seven, male and female, to keep seed alive upon the face of all the earth.7:4 For yet seven days, and I will cause it to rain upon the earth forty days and forty nights; and every living thing that I have made will I destroy from off the face of the ground.7:5 And Noah did according to all that Yahweh commanded him.7:6 And Noah was 600 years old when the flood of waters was upon the earth.7:7 And Noah went in, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives with him, into the ark, because of the waters of the flood.7:8 Of clean beasts, and of beasts that are not clean, and of birds, and of everything that creeps upon the ground,7:9 there went in two and two to Noah into the ark, male and female, as God commanded Noah.7:10 And it came to pass after the seven days, that the waters of the flood were upon the earth.7:11 In the 600th year of Noah's life, in the second month, on the seventeenth day of the month, on the same day were all the fountains of the great deep broken up, and the windows of heaven were opened.7:12 And the rain was upon the earth forty days and forty nights.7:13 In the selfsame day entered Noah, and Shem, and Ham, and Japheth, the sons of Noah, and Noah's wife, and the three wives of his sons with them, into the ark;7:14 they, and every beast after its kind, and all the cattle after their kind, and every creeping thing that creeps upon the earth after its kind, and every bird after its kind, every bird of every sort.7:15 And they went in to Noah into the ark, two and two of all flesh in which the breath of life is.7:16 And they that went in, went in male and female of all flesh, as God commanded him: and Yahweh shut him in.7:17 And the flood was forty days upon the earth; and the waters increased, and bore up the ark, and it was lifted up above the earth.7:18 And the waters prevailed, and increased greatly upon the earth; and the ark went upon the face of the waters.7:19 And the waters prevailed exceedingly upon the earth; and all the high mountains that were under the whole heaven were covered.7:20 Fifteen cubits above did the waters prevail; and the mountains were covered.7:21 And all flesh died that moved upon the earth, both birds, and cattle, and beasts, and every creeping thing that creeps upon the earth, and every man:7:22 all in whose nostrils was the breath of the spirit of life, of all that was on the dry land, died.7:23 And every living thing was destroyed that was upon the face of the ground, both man, and cattle, and creeping things, and birds of the heavens; and they were destroyed from the earth: and Noah alone was left, plus those who were with him in the ark.7:24 And the waters prevailed upon the earth a hundred and fifty days.Chapter 88:1 And God remembered Noah, and all the beasts, and all the cattle that were with him in the ark: and God made a wind to pass over the earth, and the waters subsided;8:2 the fountains also of the deep and the windows of heaven were stopped, and the rain from heaven was restrained;8:3 and the waters returned from off the earth continually: and after the end of a hundred and fifty days the waters decreased.8:4 And the ark rested in the seventh month, on the seventeenth day of the month, upon the mountains of Ararat.8:5 And the waters decreased continually until the tenth month: in the tenth month, on the first day of the month, were the tops of the mountains seen.8:6 And it came to pass at the end of forty days, that Noah opened the window of the ark which he had made:8:7 and he sent forth a raven, and it went forth to and fro, until the waters were dried up from off the earth.8:8 And he sent forth a dove from him, to see if the waters were abated from off the face of the ground;8:9 but the dove found no rest for the sole of her foot, and she returned to him to the ark; for the waters were on the face of the whole earth: and he put forth his hand, and took her, and brought her in to him into the ark.8:10 And he stayed yet other seven days; and again he sent forth the dove out of the ark;8:11 and the dove came in to him at eventide; and, lo, in her mouth an olive-leaf plucked off: so Noah knew that the waters were abated from off the earth.8:12 And he stayed yet other seven days, and sent forth the dove; and she returned not again to him any more.8:13 And it came to pass in the six hundred and first year, in the first month, the first day of the month, the waters were dried up from off the earth: and Noah removed the covering of the ark, and looked, and, behold, the face of the ground was dried.8:14 And in the second month, on the seven and twentieth day of the month, was the earth dry.8:15 And God spoke to Noah, saying,8:16 Go forth from the ark, you, and your wife, and your sons, and your sons' wives with you.8:17 Bring forth with you every living thing that is with you of all flesh, both birds, and cattle, and every creeping thing that creeps upon the earth; that they may breed abundantly in the earth, and be fruitful, and multiply upon the earth.8:18 And Noah went forth, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives with him:8:19 every beast, every creeping thing, and every bird, whatsoever moves upon the earth, after their families, went forth out of the ark.8:20 And Noah built an altar to Yahweh, and took of every clean beast, and of every clean bird, and offered burnt offerings on the altar.8:21 And Yahweh smelled the sweet savor; and Yahweh said in his heart, I will not again curse the ground any more for man's sake, for that the imagination of man's heart is evil from his youth; neither will I again destroy any more everything living, as I have done.8:22 While the earth remains, seed time and harvest, and cold and heat, and summer and winter, and day and night shall not cease.Chapter 99:1 And God blessed Noah and his sons, and said to them, Be fruitful, and multiply, and replenish the earth.9:2 And the fear of you and the dread of you shall be upon every beast of the earth, and upon every bird of the heavens; With all with which the ground teems, and all the fishes of the sea, into your hand are they delivered.9:3 Every moving thing that lives shall be food for you; Just as the green herb, have I now given you all things.9:4 But flesh with the life of it, which is the blood of it, ye shall not eat.9:5 And surely your blood, the blood of your lives, will I require; At the hand of every beast will I require it.  And at the hand of man, even at the hand of every man's brother, will I require the life of man.9:6 Whoever sheds man's blood, by man shall his blood be shed: For in the image of God made he man.9:7 And you, be ye fruitful, and multiply; Bring forth abundantly in the earth, and multiply therein.9:8 And God spoke to Noah, and to his sons with him, saying,9:9 And I, behold, I establish my covenant with you, and with your seed after you;9:10 and with every living creature that is with you, the birds, the cattle, and every beast of the earth with you.  Of all that go out of the ark, even every beast of the earth.9:11 And I will establish my covenant with you; neither shall all flesh be cut off any more by the waters of the flood; neither shall there any more be a flood to destroy the earth.9:12 And God said, This is the token of the covenant which I make between me and you and every living creature that is with you, for perpetual generations:9:13 I do set my bow in the cloud, and it shall be for a token of a covenant between me and the earth.9:14 And it shall come to pass, when I bring a cloud over the earth, that the bow shall be seen in the cloud,9:15 and I will remember my covenant, which is between me and you and every living creature of all flesh; and the waters shall no more become a flood to destroy all flesh.9:16 And the bow shall be in the cloud; and I will look upon it, that I may remember the everlasting covenant between God and every living creature of all flesh that is upon the earth.9:17 And God said to Noah, This is the token of the covenant which I have established between me and all flesh that is upon the earth.9:18 And the sons of Noah that went forth from the ark were Shem, and Ham, and Japheth: and Ham is the father of Canaan.9:19 These three were the sons of Noah: and from these was the whole earth overspread.9:20 And Noah began to be a husbandman, and planted a vineyard:9:21 and he drank of the wine, and was drunk.  And he was uncovered within his tent.9:22 And Ham, the father of Canaan, saw the nakedness of his father, and told his two brothers outside.9:23 And Shem and Japheth took a garment, and laid it upon both their shoulders, and went backward, and covered the nakedness of their father.  And their faces were backward, and they saw not their father's nakedness.9:24 And Noah awoke from his wine, and knew what his youngest son had done to him.9:25 And he said, Cursed be Canaan; A servant of servants shall he be to his brethren.9:26 And he said, Blessed be Yahweh, the God of Shem; And let Canaan be his servant.9:27 God enlarge Japheth, and let him dwell in the tents of Shem; And let Canaan be his servant.9:28 And Noah lived after the flood 350 years.9:29 And all the days of Noah were 950 years: And he died.Chapter 1010:1 Now these are the generations of the sons of Noah, namely, of Shem, Ham, and Japheth: and to them were sons born after the flood.10:2 The sons of Japheth: Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and Tubal, and Meshech, and Tiras.10:3 And the sons of Gomer: Ashkenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah.10:4 And the sons of Javan: Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim.10:5 From these were the island and coastal peoples divided in their lands, every one after his tongue, after their families, in their nations.10:6 And the sons of Ham: Cush, and Mizraim, and Put, and Canaan.10:7 And the sons of Cush: Seba, and Havilah, and Sabtah, and Raamah, and Sabteca; and the sons of Raamah: Sheba, and Dedan.10:8 And Cush begat Nimrod: he began to be a mighty one in the earth.10:9 He was a mighty hunter before Yahweh: therefore it is said, Like Nimrod a mighty hunter before Yahweh.10:10 And the beginning of his kingdom was Babel, and Erech, and Accad, and Calneh, in the land of Shinar.10:11 Out of that land he went forth into Assyria, and built Nineveh, and Rehoboth-ir, and Calah,10:12 and Resen between Nineveh and Calah (the same is the great city).10:13 And Mizraim begat Ludim, and Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim,10:14 and Pathrusim, and Casluhim, and Caphtorim (from which come the Philistines).10:15 And Canaan begat Sidon his first-born, and Heth,10:16 and the Jebusite, and the Amorite, and the Girgashite,10:17 and the Hivite, and the Arkite, and the Sinite,10:18 and the Arvadite, and the Zemarite, and the Hamathite: and afterward were the families of the Canaanite spread abroad.10:19 And the border of the Canaanite was from Sidon, as you go toward Gerar, up to Gaza; as you go toward Sodom and Gomorrah and Admah and Zeboiim, up to Lasha.10:20 These are the sons of Ham, after their families, after their tongues, in their lands, in their nations.10:21 And to Shem, the father of all the children of Eber, the elder brother of Japheth, to him also were children born.10:22 The sons of Shem: Elam, and Asshur, and Arpachshad, and Lud, and Aram.10:23 And the sons of Aram: Uz, and Hul, and Gether, and Mash.10:24 And Arpachshad begat Shelah; and Shelah begat Eber.10:25 And to Eber were born two sons: The name of the one was Peleg.  For in his days was the earth divided.  And his brother's name was Joktan.10:26 And Joktan begat Almodad, and Sheleph, and Hazarmaveth, and Jerah,10:27 and Hadoram, and Uzal, and Diklah,10:28 and Obal, and Abimael, and Sheba,10:29 and Ophir, and Havilah, and Jobab: all these were the sons of Joktan.10:30 And their dwelling was from Mesha, as you go toward Sephar, the mountain of the east.10:31 These are the sons of Shem, after their families, after their tongues, in their lands, after their nations.10:32 These are the families of the sons of Noah, after their generations, in their nations: and from these were the nations divided in the earth after the flood.Chapter 1111:1 And the whole earth was of one language and of one speech.11:2 And it came to pass, as they journeyed east, that they found a plain in the land of Shinar; and they dwelt there.11:3 And they said one to another, Come, let us make brick, and burn them thoroughly.  And they had brick for stone, and slime had they for mortar.11:4 And they said, Come, let us build us a city, and a tower, whose top may reach to heaven, and let us make us a name; lest we be scattered abroad upon the face of the whole earth.11:5 And Yahweh came down to see the city and the tower, which the children of men had built.11:6 And Yahweh said, Behold, they are one people, and they have all one language; and this is what they begin to do: and now nothing will be withheld from them, which they purpose to do.11:7 Come, let us go down, and there confound their language, that they may not understand one another's speech.11:8 So Yahweh scattered them abroad from there upon the face of all the earth: and they left off building the city.11:9 Therefore was the name of it called Babel; because Yahweh did there confound the language of all the earth: and from there did Yahweh scatter them abroad upon the face of all the earth.11:10 These are the generations of Shem.  Shem was 100 years old, and begat Arpachshad two years after the flood.11:11 and Shem lived 500 years after he begat Arpachshad, and begat sons and daughters.11:12 And Arpachshad lived 35 years, and begat Shelah.11:13 and Arpachshad lived after he begat Shelah 403 years, and begat sons and daughters.11:14 And Shelah lived 30 years, and begat Eber:11:15 and Shelah lived after he begat Eber 403 years, and begat sons and daughters.11:16 And Eber lived 34 years, and begat Peleg:11:17 and Eber lived after he begat Peleg 430 years, and begat sons and daughters.11:18 And Peleg lived 30 years, and begat Reu:11:19 and Peleg lived after he begat Reu 209 years, and begat sons and daughters.11:20 And Reu lived 32 years, and begat Serug:11:21 and Reu lived after he begat Serug 207 years, and begat sons and daughters.11:22 And Serug lived 30 years, and begat Nahor:11:23 and Serug lived after he begat Nahor 200 years, and begat sons and daughters.11:24 And Nahor lived 29 years, and begat Terah:11:25 and Nahor lived after he begat Terah a 119 years, and begat sons and daughters.11:26 And Terah lived 70 years, and begat Abram, Nahor, and Haran.11:27 Now these are the generations of Terah.  Terah begat Abram, Nahor, and Haran.  And Haran begat Lot.11:28 And Haran died before his father Terah in the land of his nativity, in Ur of the Chaldees.11:29 And Abram and Nahor took them wives: The name of Abram's wife was Sarai; and the name of Nahor's wife, Milcah, the daughter of Haran, the father of Milcah, and the father of Iscah.11:30 And Sarai was barren; She had no child.11:31 And Terah took Abram his son, and Lot the son of Haran, his son's son, and Sarai his daughter-in-law, his son Abram's wife; and they went forth with them from Ur of the Chaldees, to go into the land of Canaan; and they came to Haran, and dwelt there.11:32 And the days of Terah were 205 years: and Terah died in Haran.Chapter 1212:1 Now Yahweh said to Abram, Get you out of your country, and from your kindred, and from your father's house, to the land that I will show you:12:2 and I will make of you a great nation, and I will bless you, and make your name great; such that you will be a blessing;12:3 and I will bless them that bless you, and him that curses you will I curse: and in you all the families of the earth shall be blessed.12:4 So Abram went, as Yahweh had spoken to him; and Lot went with him: and Abram was 75 years old when he departed out of Haran.12:5 And Abram took Sarai his wife, and Lot his brother's son, and all their substance that they had gathered, and the souls that they had gotten in Haran; and they went forth to go into the land of Canaan; and into the land of Canaan they came.12:6 And Abram passed through the land to the place of Shechem, to the oak of Moreh.  And the Canaanite was then in the land.12:7 And Yahweh appeared to Abram, and said, To your seed I will give this land.  And there built he an altar to Yahweh, who appeared to him.12:8 And he removed from there to the mountain on the east of Beth-el, and pitched his tent, having Beth-el on the west, and Ai on the east: and there he built an altar to Yahweh, and called upon the name of Yahweh.12:9 And Abram journeyed, going on still toward the South.12:10 And there was a famine in the land: and Abram went down into Egypt to sojourn there; for the famine was severe in the land.12:11 And it came to pass, when he was come near to enter into Egypt, that he said to Sarai his wife, Behold now, I know that you are a fair woman to look upon:12:12 and it will come to pass, when the Egyptians shall see you, that they will say, This is his wife: and they will kill me, but they will save you alive.12:13 Say, I pray you, you are my sister; that it may be well with me for your sake, and that my soul may live because of you.12:14 And it came to pass, that, when Abram was come into Egypt, the Egyptians beheld the woman that she was very fair.12:15 And the princes of Pharaoh saw her, and praised her to Pharaoh: and the woman was taken into Pharaoh's house.12:16 And he treated Abram well for her sake: and he had sheep, and oxen, and he-asses, and men-servants, and maid-servants, and she-asses, and camels.12:17 And Yahweh plagued Pharaoh and his house with great plagues because of Sarai, Abram's wife.12:18 And Pharaoh called Abram, and said, What is this that you have done to me?  why did you not tell me that she was your wife?12:19 why did you say, She is my sister, so that I took her to be my wife?  now therefore behold your wife, take her, and go your way.12:20 And Pharaoh gave men charge concerning him: and they brought him on the way, and his wife, and all that he had.Chapter 1313:1 And Abram went up out of Egypt, he, and his wife, and all that he had, and Lot with him, into the South.13:2 And Abram was very rich in cattle, in silver, and in gold.13:3 And he went on his journeys from the South as far as Beth-el, to the place where his tent had been at the beginning, between Beth-el and Ai,13:4 to the place of the altar, which he had made there at the first: and there Abram called on the name of Yahweh.13:5 And Lot also, who went with Abram, had flocks, and herds, and tents.13:6 And the land was not able to bear them, that they might dwell together: for their substance was great, so that they could not dwell together.13:7 And there was a strife between the herdsmen of Abram's cattle and the herdsmen of Lot's cattle: and the Canaanite and the Perizzite dwelt then in the land.13:8 And Abram said to Lot, Let there be no strife, I pray you, between me and you, and between my herdsmen and your herdsmen; for we are brethren.13:9 Is not the whole land before you?  separate yourself, I pray you, from me.  If you will take the left hand, then I will go to the right.  Or if you take the right hand, then I will go to the left.13:10 And Lot lifted up his eyes, and beheld all the Plain of the Jordan, that it was well watered every where, before Yahweh destroyed Sodom and Gomorrah, like the garden of Yahweh, like the land of Egypt, as you go toward Zoar.13:11 So Lot chose him all the Plain of the Jordan; and Lot journeyed east: and they separated themselves the one from the other.13:12 Abram dwelt in the land of Canaan, and Lot dwelt in the cities of the Plain, and moved his tent as far as Sodom.13:13 Now the men of Sodom were wicked and sinners against Yahweh exceedingly.13:14 And Yahweh said to Abram, after that Lot was separated from him, Lift up now your eyes, and look from the place where you are, northward and southward and eastward and westward:13:15 for all the land which you see, to you will I give it, and to your seed for ever.13:16 And I will make your seed as the dust of the earth: So that if a man can number the dust of the earth, then may your seed also be numbered.13:17 Arise, walk through the land in the length of it and in the breadth of it; for to you will I give it.13:18 And Abram moved his tent, and came and dwelt by the oaks of Mamre, which are in Hebron, and built there an altar to Yahweh.Chapter 1414:1 And it came to pass in the days of Amraphel king of Shinar, Arioch king of Ellasar, Chedorlaomer king of Elam, and Tidal king of Goiim,14:2 that they made war with Bera king of Sodom, and with Birsha king of Gomorrah, Shinab king of Admah, and Shemeber king of Zeboiim, and the king of Bela (the same is Zoar).14:3 All these joined together in the valley of Siddim (the same is the Salt Sea).14:4 Twelve years they served Chedorlaomer, and in the thirteenth year they rebelled.14:5 And in the fourteenth year came Chedorlaomer, and the kings that were with him, and defeated the Rephaim in Ashteroth-karnaim, and the Zuzim in Ham, and the Emim in Shaveh-kiriathaim,14:6 and the Horites in their mount Seir, to Elparan, which is by the wilderness.14:7 And they returned, and came to En-mishpat (the same is Kadesh), and defeated all the country of the Amalekites, and also the Amorites, that dwelt in Hazazon-tamar.14:8 And there went out the king of Sodom, and the king of Gomorrah, and the king of Admah, and the king of Zeboiim, and the king of Bela (the same is Zoar); and they set the battle in array against them in the valley of Siddim;14:9 against Chedorlaomer king of Elam, and Tidal king of Goiim, and Amraphel king of Shinar, and Arioch king of Ellasar; four kings against the five.14:10 Now the valley of Siddim was full of slime pits; and the kings of Sodom and Gomorrah fled, and they fell there, and they that remained fled to the mountain.14:11 And they took all the goods of Sodom and Gomorrah, and all their victuals, and went their way.14:12 And they took Lot, Abram's brother's son, who dwelt in Sodom, and his goods, and departed.14:13 And there came one that had escaped, and told Abram the Hebrew: now he dwelt by the oaks of Mamre, the Amorite, brother of Eshcol, and brother of Aner; and these were confederate with Abram.14:14 And when Abram heard that his brother was taken captive, he led forth his trained men, born in his house, 318, and pursued as far as Dan.14:15 And he divided himself against them by night, he and his servants, and defeated them, and pursued them to Hobah, which is on the left hand of Damascus.14:16 And he brought back all the goods, and also brought back his brother Lot, and his goods, and the women also, and the people.14:17 And the king of Sodom went out to meet him, after his return from the slaughter of Chedorlaomer and the kings that were with him, at the valley of Shaveh (the same is the King's Valley).14:18 And Melchizedek king of Salem brought forth bread and wine: and he was priest of God Most High.14:19 And he blessed him, and said, Blessed be Abram of God Most High, possessor of heaven and earth:14:20 and blessed be God Most High, who has delivered your enemies into your hand.  And he gave him a tenth of all.14:21 And the king of Sodom said to Abram, Give me the persons, and take the goods to yourself.14:22 And Abram said to the king of Sodom, I have lifted up my hand to Yahweh, God Most High, possessor of heaven and earth,14:23 that I will not take a thread nor a shoe-latchet nor anything that is yours, lest you should say, I have made Abram rich:14:24 save only that which the young men have eaten, and the portion of the men that went with me, Aner, Eshcol, and Mamre.  Let them take their portion.Chapter 1515:1 After these things the word of Yahweh came to Abram in a vision, saying, Fear not, Abram: I am your shield, and your exceedingly great reward.15:2 And Abram said, O Lord Yahweh, what will you give me, seeing I go childless, and he that shall be possessor of my house is Eliezer of Damascus?15:3 And Abram said, Behold, to me you have given no seed: and, lo, one born in my house is my heir.15:4 And, behold, the word of Yahweh came to him, saying, This man shall not be your heir; But he that shall come forth out of your own bowels shall be your heir.15:5 And He brought him forth abroad, and said, Look now toward heaven, and number the stars, if you be able to number them: and He said to him, So shall your seed be.15:6 And he believed in Yahweh; and He reckoned it to him for righteousness.15:7 And He said to him, I am Yahweh that brought you out of Ur of the Chaldees, to give you this land to inherit it.15:8 And he said, O Lord Yahweh, whereby shall I know that I shall inherit it?15:9 And He said to him, Take me a heifer three years old, and a she-goat three years old, and a ram three years old, and a turtle-dove, and a young pigeon.15:10 And he took him all these, and divided them in the midst, and laid each half over against the other: but the birds divided he not.15:11 And the birds of prey came down upon the carcasses, and Abram drove them away.15:12 And when the sun was going down, a deep sleep fell upon Abram; and, lo, a horror of great darkness fell upon him.15:13 And He said to Abram, Know of a surety that your seed shall be sojourners in a land that is not theirs, and shall serve them; and they shall afflict them four hundred years;15:14 and also that nation, whom they shall serve, will I judge: and afterward shall they come out with great substance.15:15 But you shall go to your fathers in peace; you shall be buried at a good old age.15:16 And in the fourth generation they shall come here again; for the iniquity of the Amorite is not yet full.15:17 And it came to pass, that, when the sun went down, and it was dark, behold, a smoking furnace, and a flaming torch that passed between these pieces.15:18 In that day Yahweh made a covenant with Abram, saying, To your seed have I given this land, from the river of Egypt to the great river, the river Euphrates:15:19 the Kenite, and the Kenizzite, and the Kadmonite,15:20 and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, and the Rephaim,15:21 and the Amorite, and the Canaanite, and the Girgashite, and the Jebusite.Chapter 1616:1 Now Sarai, Abram's wife, bore him no children: and she had a handmaid, an Egyptian, whose name was Hagar.16:2 And Sarai said to Abram, Behold now, Yahweh has restrained me from bearing.  Go in, I pray you, to my handmaid; it may be that I shall obtain children by her.  And Abram hearkened to the voice of Sarai.16:3 And Sarai, Abram's wife, took Hagar the Egyptian, her handmaid, after Abram had dwelt ten years in the land of Canaan, and gave her to Abram her husband to be his wife.16:4 And he went in to Hagar, and she conceived: and when she saw that she had conceived, her mistress was despised in her eyes.16:5 And Sarai said to Abram, My wrong be upon you: I gave my handmaid into your bosom; and when she saw that she had conceived, I was despised in her eyes: Yahweh judge between me and you.16:6 But Abram said to Sarai, Behold, your maid is in your hand; do to her that which is good in your eyes.  And Sarai dealt harshly with her, and she fled from her face.16:7 And the angel of Yahweh found her by a spring of water in the wilderness, by the spring on the way to Shur.16:8 And he said, Hagar, Sarai's handmaid, where did you come from?  and where are you going?  And she said, I am fleeing from the face of my mistress Sarai.16:9 And the angel of Yahweh said to her, Return to your mistress, and submit yourself under her hands.16:10 And the angel of Yahweh said to her, I will greatly multiply your seed, such that it shall not be numbered for multitude.16:11 And the angel of Yahweh said to her, Behold, you are with child, and shall bear a son; and you shall call his name Ishmael, because Yahweh has heard your affliction.16:12 And he shall be as a wild donkey among men; his hand shall be against every man, and every man's hand against him; and he shall dwell over against all his brethren.16:13 And so she gave a name to Yahweh who had spoken to her: "You are a God that sees."  For she said, Surely here I have looked upon the back of him who sees me.16:14 For which reason the well was called Beer-lahai-roi.  Behold, it remains, between Kadesh and Bered.16:15 And Hagar bore Abram a son: and Abram called the name of his son, whom Hagar bore, Ishmael.16:16 And Abram was 86 years old when Hagar bore Ishmael to Abram.Chapter 1717:1 And when Abram was 99 years old, Yahweh appeared to Abram, and said to him, I am God Almighty; walk before me, and be perfect.17:2 And I will make my covenant between me and you, and will multiply you exceedingly.17:3 And Abram fell on his face: and God talked with him, saying,17:4 As for me, behold, my covenant is with you, and you shall be the father of a multitude of nations.17:5 Neither shall your name any more be called Abram, but your name shall be Abraham; for the father of a multitude of nations I have made you.17:6 And I will make you exceedingly fruitful, and I will make nations from you, and kings shall come out of you.17:7 And I will establish my covenant between me and you and your seed after you throughout their generations for an everlasting covenant, to be a God to you and to your seed after you.17:8 And I will give to you, and to your seed after you, the land of your sojournings, all the land of Canaan, for an everlasting possession; and I will be their God.17:9 And God said to Abraham, and as for you, you shall keep my covenant, you, and your seed after you throughout their generations.17:10 This is my covenant, which you and they shall keep, between me and you and your seed who are after you: every male among you shall be circumcised.17:11 And you shall be circumcised in the flesh of your foreskins; and it shall be a token of a covenant between me and you.17:12 And he who is eight days old shall be circumcised among you, every male throughout your generations, he who is born in the house, or purchased with money from any foreigner who is not of your seed.17:13 Both he who is born in your house and he who is purchased with your money, must surely be circumcised.  And thus my covenant shall be in your flesh for an everlasting covenant.17:14 And the uncircumcised male who is not circumcised in the flesh of his foreskin, that soul shall be cut off from his people; he has broken my covenant.17:15 And God said to Abraham, as for Sarai your wife, you shall not call her name Sarai, but Sarah shall be her name.17:16 And I will bless her, and moreover I will give you a son from her: yes, I will bless her, and she shall be a mother of nations; kings of peoples shall be from her.17:17 Then Abraham fell on his face, and laughed, and said in his heart, Shall a child be born to him who is 100 years old?  and shall Sarah, who is 90 years old, bear?17:18 And Abraham said to God, Oh that Ishmael might live before you!17:19 And God said, No, but Sarah your wife shall bear you a son; and you shall call his name Isaac: and I will establish my covenant with him for an everlasting covenant for his seed after him.17:20 And as for Ishmael, I have heard you: behold, I have blessed him, and will make him fruitful, and will multiply him exceedingly.  Twelve princes shall he beget, and I will make him a great nation.17:21 But with Isaac will I establish my covenant, whom Sarah shall bear to you at this set time in the next year.17:22 Then God left off talking with him, and he went up from Abraham.17:23 And Abraham took Ishmael his son, and all who were born in his house, and all who were purchased with his money- every male among the men of Abraham's house- and he circumcised the flesh of their foreskins that very same day, as God had said to him.17:24 And Abraham was 99 years old, when he was circumcised in the flesh of his foreskin.17:25 And Ishmael his son was 13 years old, when he was circumcised in the flesh of his foreskin.17:26 During that same day was Abraham circumcised, and Ishmael his son.17:27 And all the men of his house, those born in the house, and those bought with money from a foreigner, were circumcised along with him.Chapter 1818:1 And Yahweh appeared to him by the oaks of Mamre, as he sat in the tent door in the heat of the day;18:2 and he lifted up his eyes and looked, and, lo, three men stood over against him.  And when he saw them, he ran to meet them from the tent door, and bowed himself to the earth,18:3 and said, My lord, if now I have found favor in your sight, pass not away, I pray you, from your servant:18:4 let now a little water be brought, and wash your feet, and rest yourselves under the tree:18:5 and I will get a morsel of bread, and you strengthen your hearts.  And after that you shall pass on: forasmuch as ye are come to your servant.  And they said, So do, as you have said.18:6 And Abraham hurried in to the tent toward Sarah, and said, Make ready quickly three measures of fine meal, knead it, and make cakes.18:7 And Abraham ran to the herd, and fetched a calf tender and good, and gave it to the servant; and he made haste to dress it.18:8 And he took butter, and milk, and the calf which he had dressed, and set it before them.  And he stood by them under the tree, and they did eat.18:9 And they said to him, Where is Sarah your wife?  And he said, Behold, in the tent.18:10 And he said, I will certainly return to you when the season comes around; and, lo, Sarah your wife shall have a son.  And Sarah heard in the tent door, which was behind him.18:11 Now Abraham and Sarah were old, well advanced in age, and it had ceased to be with Sarah after the manner of women.18:12 And Sarah laughed within herself, saying, after I am grown old shall I have this pleasure, with my master being old as well?18:13 And Yahweh said to Abraham, Why did Sarah laugh, saying, Shall I really bear a child, who am old?18:14 Is anything too hard for Yahweh?  At the set time I will return to you, when the season comes around, and Sarah shall have a son.18:15 Then Sarah denied it, saying, I did not laugh.  For she was afraid.  And he said, On the contrary, you did laugh.18:16 And the men rose up from there, and looked toward Sodom.  And Abraham went with them to bring them on the way.18:17 And Yahweh said, Shall I hide from Abraham that which I am doing;18:18 seeing that Abraham had surely become a great and mighty nation, and all the nations of the earth shall be blessed in him?18:19 For I have known him, to the end that he may command his children and his household after him, that they may keep the way of Yahweh, to do righteousness and justice; to the end that Yahweh may bring upon Abraham that which he has spoken of him.18:20 And Yahweh said, Because the cry of Sodom and Gomorrah is great, and because their sin is very grievous;18:21 I will go down now, and see whether they have done altogether according to the cry of it, which has come to me; and if not, I will know.18:22 And the men turned from there, and went toward Sodom: but Abraham stood yet before Yahweh.18:23 And Abraham drew near, and said, Will you consume the righteous with the wicked?18:24 Suppose there are fifty righteous persons within the city.  Will you consume, and not spare the place for the sake of the fifty righteous that are in there?18:25 That be far from you to do after this manner, to slay the righteous with the wicked, such that the righteous should be as the wicked; that be far from you: shall not the Judge of all the earth do right?18:26 And Yahweh said, If I find in Sodom fifty righteous within the city, then I will spare all the place for their sake.18:27 And Abraham answered and said, Behold now, I have taken upon me to speak to the Lord, I who am but dust and ashes:18:28 suppose there shall lack five of the fifty righteous: will you destroy all the city for lack of five?  And he said, I will not destroy it, if I find there forty and five.18:29 And he spoke to him yet again, and said, Suppose there shall be forty found there.  And he said, I will not do it for the forty's sake.18:30 And he said, Oh let not the Lord be angry, and I will speak: suppose there shall thirty be found there.  And he said, I will not do it, if I find thirty there.18:31 And he said, Behold now, I have taken upon me to speak to the Lord: suppose there shall be twenty found there.  And he said, I will not destroy it for the twenty's sake.18:32 And he said, Oh let not the Lord be angry, and I will speak yet but this once: suppose ten shall be found there.  And he said, I will not destroy it for the ten's sake.18:33 And Yahweh went his way, as soon as he had left off communing with Abraham: and Abraham returned to his place.Chapter 1919:1 And the two angels came to Sodom at even; and Lot sat in the gate of Sodom: and Lot saw them, and rose up to meet them; and he bowed himself with his face to the earth;19:2 and he said, Behold now, my lords, turn aside, I pray you, into your servant's house, and tarry all night, and wash your feet, and ye shall rise up early, and go on your way.  And they said, Nay; but we will abide in the street all night.19:3 And he urged them greatly; and they turned in to him, and entered into his house; and he made them a feast, and did bake unleavened bread, and they did eat.19:4 But before they lay down, the men of the city, that is the men of Sodom, surrounded the house, both young and old, all the people from every quarter;19:5 and they called to Lot, and said to him, Where are the men that came in to you this night?  bring them out to us, that we may have sex with them.19:6 And Lot went out to them to the door, and shut the door behind him.19:7 And he said, I pray you, my brothers, do not so wickedly.19:8 Behold now, I have two daughters that have not had sex with a man; let me, I pray you, bring them out to you, and do ye to them as is good in your eyes: only to these men do nothing, forasmuch as they are come under the shelter of my roof.19:9 And they said, Stand back.  And they said, This one fellow came to sojourn, and he will needs be a judge.  Now we will deal with you worse than with them.  And they pressed hard upon the man, even Lot, and drew near to break the door.19:10 But the men put forth their hand, and brought Lot into the house to them, and shut to the door.19:11 And they struck the men that were at the door of the house with blindness, both small and great, so that they wearied themselves to find the door.19:12 And the men said to Lot, Have you here any besides you?  son-in-law, and your sons, and your daughters, and whomsoever you have in the city, bring them out of the place:19:13 for we will destroy this place, because the cry of them is become great before Yahweh: and Yahweh has sent us to destroy it.19:14 And Lot went out, and spoke to his sons-in-law, who married his daughters, and said, Up, get yourself out of this place; for Yahweh will destroy the city.  But he seemed to his sons-in-law as one that mocked.19:15 And when the morning arose, then the angels hurried Lot, saying, arise, take your wife, and your two daughters that are here, lest you be consumed in the iniquity of the city.19:16 But he lingered; and the men laid hold upon his hand, and upon the hand of his wife, and upon the hand of his two daughters, Yahweh being merciful to him; and they brought him forth, and set him outside the city.19:17 And it came to pass, when they had brought them forth abroad, that he said, Escape for your life; look not behind you, neither stay you in all the Plain; escape to the mountain, lest you be consumed.19:18 And Lot said to them, Oh, not so, my lord:19:19 behold now, your servant has found favor in your sight, and you have magnified your lovingkindness, which you have shown to me in saving my life; and I cannot escape to the mountain, lest evil overtake me, and I die:19:20 behold now, this city is near to flee to, and it is a little one.  Oh let me escape there (is it not a little one?), and my soul shall live.19:21 And he said to him, See, I have accepted you concerning this thing also, that I will not overthrow the city of which you have spoken.19:22 Make haste, escape there; for I cannot do anything till you be arrived there.  Therefore the name of the city was called Zoar.19:23 The sun was risen upon the earth when Lot came to Zoar.19:24 Then Yahweh rained upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah brimstone and fire from Yahweh out of heaven;19:25 and he overthrew those cities, and all the Plain, and all the inhabitants of the cities, and that which grew upon the ground.19:26 But his wife looked back from behind him, and she became a pillar of salt.19:27 And Abraham got up early in the morning to the place where he had stood before Yahweh:19:28 and he looked toward Sodom and Gomorrah, and toward all the land of the Plain, and beheld, and, lo, the smoke of the land went up as the smoke of a furnace.19:29 And it came to pass, when God destroyed the cities of the Plain, that God remembered Abraham, and sent Lot out of the midst of the overthrow, when he overthrew the cities in which Lot dwelt.19:30 And Lot went up out of Zoar, and dwelt in the mountain, and his two daughters with him; for he feared to dwell in Zoar: and he dwelt in a cave, he and his two daughters.19:31 And the first-born said to the younger, Our father is old, and there is not a man in the earth to come in to us after the manner of all the earth:19:32 come, let us make our father drink wine, and we will lie with him, that we may preserve seed of our father.19:33 And they made their father drink wine that night: and the first-born went in, and lay with her father; and he knew not when she lay down, nor when she arose.19:34 And it came to pass on the morrow, that the first-born said to the younger, Behold, I lay last night with my father: let us make him drink wine this night also; and you go in, and lie with him, that we may preserve seed of our father.19:35 And they made their father drink wine that night also: and the younger arose, and lay with him; and he knew not when she lay down, nor when she arose.19:36 Thus were both the daughters of Lot with child by their father.19:37 And the first-born bore a son, and called his name Moab: the same is the father of the Moabites to this day.19:38 And the younger, she also bore a son, and called his name Ben-ammi: the same is the father of the children of Ammon to this day.Chapter 2020:1 And Abraham journeyed from there toward the land of the South, and dwelt between Kadesh and Shur.  And he sojourned in Gerar.20:2 And Abraham said of Sarah his wife, She is my sister.  And Abimelech king of Gerar sent, and took Sarah.20:3 But God came to Abimelech in a dream of the night, and said to him, Behold, you are but a dead man, because of the woman whom you have taken.  For she is a man's wife.20:4 Now Abimelech had not come near her.  And he said, Lord, will you slay even a righteous nation?20:5 Said he not himself to me, She is my sister?  And she, even she herself said, He is my brother.  In the integrity of my heart and the innocence of my hands have I done this.20:6 And God said to him in the dream, Yes, I know that in the integrity of your heart you have done this, and I also withheld you from sinning against me.  Therefore I did not allow you not to touch her.20:7 Now therefore restore the man's wife.  For he is a prophet, and he shall pray for you, and you shall live.  And if you restore her not, know that you shall surely die, you, and all that are yours.20:8 And Abimelech rose early in the morning, and called all his servants, and told all these things in their ear.  And the men were sore afraid.20:9 Then Abimelech called Abraham, and said to him, What have you done to us?  And in what way have I sinned against you, that you have brought on me and on my kingdom a great sin?  You have done deeds to me that ought not to be done.20:10 And Abimelech said to Abraham, What saw you, that you have done this thing?20:11 And Abraham said, Because I thought, Surely the fear of God is not in this place.  And they will slay me for my wife's sake.20:12 And moreover she is indeed my sister, the daughter of my father, but not the daughter of my mother; and she became my wife:20:13 and it came to pass, when God caused me to wander from my father's house, that I said to her, This is your kindness which you shall show to me.  At every place whither we shall come, say of me, He is my brother.20:14 And Abimelech took sheep and oxen, and men-servants and women-servants, and gave them to Abraham, and restored him Sarah his wife.20:15 And Abimelech said, Behold, my land is before you.  Dwell where it pleases you.20:16 And to Sarah he said, Behold, I have given your brother a thousand pieces of silver.  Behold, it is for you a covering of the eyes of all who are with you.  And in respect of everyone, you are vindicated.20:17 And Abraham prayed to God.  And God healed Abimelech, and his wife, and his maid-servants.  And they bore children.20:18 For Yahweh had fast closed up all the wombs of the house of Abimelech, because of Sarah, Abraham's wife.Chapter 2121:1 And Yahweh visited Sarah as he had said, and Yahweh did to Sarah as he had spoken.21:2 And Sarah conceived, and bore Abraham a son in his old age, at the set time of which God had spoken to him.21:3 And Abraham called the name of his son that was born to him, whom Sarah bore to him, Isaac.21:4 And Abraham circumcised his son Isaac when he was eight days old, as God had commanded him.21:5 And Abraham was a hundred years old, when his son Isaac was born to him.21:6 And Sarah said, God has caused me to laugh.  Every one that hears will laugh with me.21:7 And she said, Who would have said to Abraham, that Sarah would give children suck?  For I have borne him a son in his old age.21:8 And the child grew, and was weaned.  And Abraham made a great feast on the day that Isaac was weaned.21:9 And Sarah saw the son of Hagar the Egyptian, whom she had borne to Abraham, mocking.21:10 Wherefore she said to Abraham, Cast out this handmaid and her son.  For the son of this handmaid shall not be heir with my son, even with Isaac.21:11 And the thing was very grievous in Abraham's sight on account of his son.21:12 And God said to Abraham, Let it not be grievous in your sight because of the lad, and because of your handmaid.  In all that Sarah says to you, hearken to her voice.  For in Isaac shall your seed be called.21:13 And also from the son of the handmaid will I make a nation, because he is your seed.21:14 And Abraham rose up early in the morning, and took bread and a bottle of water, and gave it to Hagar, putting it on her shoulder, and gave her the child, and sent her away.  And she departed, and wandered in the wilderness of Beer-sheba.21:15 And the water in the bottle was spent, and she placed the child under one of the shrubs.21:16 And she went, and sat herself down over opposite him a good way off, about a bowshot.  For she said, Let me not look upon the death of the child.  And she sat over opposite him, and lifted up her voice, and wept.21:17 And God heard the voice of the lad.  And the angel of God called to Hagar out of heaven, and said to her, What ails you, Hagar?  Fear not.  For God has heard the voice of the lad where he is.21:18 Arise, lift up the lad, and hold him in your hand.  For I will make him a great nation.21:19 And God opened her eyes, and she saw a well of water.  And she went, and filled the bottle with water, and gave the lad a drink.21:20 And God was with the lad, and he grew.  And he dwelt in the wilderness, and became, as he grew up, an archer.21:21 And he dwelt in the wilderness of Paran.  And his mother took him a wife out of the land of Egypt.21:22 And it came to pass at that time, that Abimelech and Phicol the captain of his host spoke to Abraham, saying, God is with you in all that you do.21:23 Now therefore swear to me here by God that you will not deal falsely with me, nor with my son, nor with my son's son.  But according to the kindness that I have done to you, you shall do to me, and to the land in which you have sojourned.21:24 And Abraham said, I will swear.21:25 And Abraham reproved Abimelech because of the well of water, which Abimelech's servants had violently taken away.21:26 And Abimelech said, I know not who has done this thing.  Neither did you tell me, neither yet heard I of it, but today.21:27 And Abraham took sheep and oxen, and gave them to Abimelech.  And they two made a covenant.21:28 And Abraham set seven ewe lambs of the flock by themselves.21:29 And Abimelech said to Abraham, What mean these seven ewe lambs which you have set by themselves?21:30 And he said, These seven ewe lambs shall you take of my hand, that it may be a witness to me, that I have dug this well.21:31 Wherefore he called that place Beer-sheba.  Because there they swore both of them.21:32 So they made a covenant at Beer-sheba.  And Abimelech rose up, and Phicol the captain of his host, and they returned into the land of the Philistines.21:33 And Abraham planted a tamarisk tree in Beer-sheba, and called there on the name of Yahweh, the Everlasting God.21:34 And Abraham sojourned in the land of the Philistines many days.Chapter 2222:1 And it came to pass after these things, that God did test Abraham, and said to him, Abraham.  And he said, Here am I.22:2 And he said, Take now your son, your only son, whom you love, even Isaac, and go into the land of Moriah.  And offer him there for a burnt offering upon one of the mountains which I will tell you of.22:3 And Abraham rose early in the morning, and saddled his donkey, and took two of his young men with him, and Isaac his son.  And he split the wood for the burnt offering, and rose up, and went to the place of which God had told him.22:4 On the third day Abraham lifted up his eyes, and saw the place afar off.22:5 And Abraham said to his young men, Stay here with the donkey, and I and the lad will go yonder; and we will worship, and come back to you.22:6 And Abraham took the wood of the burnt offering, and laid it upon Isaac his son.  And he took in his hand the fire and the knife.  And they went both of them together.22:7 And Isaac spoke to Abraham his father, and said, My father.  And he said, Here am I, my son.  And he said, Behold, the fire and the wood.  But where is the lamb for a burnt offering?22:8 And Abraham said, God will provide himself the lamb for a burnt offering, my son.  So they went both of them together.22:9 And they came to the place which God had told him of.  And Abraham built the altar there, and laid the wood in order, and bound Isaac his son, and laid him on the altar, upon the wood.22:10 And Abraham stretched forth his hand, and took the knife to slay his son.22:11 And the angel of Yahweh called to him out of heaven, and said, Abraham, Abraham.  And he said, Here I am.22:12 And he said, Lay not your hand upon the lad, neither do anything to him.  For now I know that you fear God, seeing you have not withheld your son, your only son, from me.22:13 And Abraham lifted up his eyes, and looked, and behold, behind him a ram caught in the thicket by his horns.  And Abraham went and took the ram, and offered him up for a burnt offering in the stead of his son.22:14 And Abraham called the name of that place Yahweh-jireh.  As it is said to this day, In the mount of Yahweh it shall be provided.22:15 And the angel of Yahweh called to Abraham a second time out of heaven,22:16 and said, By myself have I sworn, says Yahweh, because you have done this thing, and have not withheld your son, your only son,22:17 that in blessing I will bless you, and in multiplying I will multiply your seed as the stars of the heavens, and as the sand which is upon the seashore.  And your seed shall possess the gate of his enemies.22:18 And in your seed shall all the nations of the earth be blessed.  Because you have obeyed my voice.22:19 So Abraham returned to his young men, and they rose up and went together to Beer-sheba.  And Abraham dwelt at Beer-sheba.22:20 And it came to pass after these things, that it was told Abraham, saying, Behold, Milcah, she also has borne children to your brother Nahor.22:21 Uz his first-born, and Buz his brother, and Kemuel the father of Aram.22:22 And Chesed, and Hazo, and Pildash, and Jidlaph, and Bethuel.22:23 And Bethuel begat Rebekah.  These eight did Milcah bear to Nahor, Abraham's brother.22:24 And his concubine, whose name was Reumah, she also bore Tebah, and Gaham, and Tahash, and Maacah.Chapter 2323:1 And the life of Sarah was 127 years.  These were the years of the life of Sarah.23:2 And Sarah died in Kiriath-arba (the same is Hebron), in the land of Canaan.  And Abraham came to mourn for Sarah, and to weep for her.23:3 And Abraham rose up from before his dead, and spoke to the children of Heth, saying,23:4 I am a stranger and a sojourner with you.  Give me a possession of a burying-place with you, that I may bury my dead out of my sight.23:5 And the children of Heth answered Abraham, saying to him,23:6 Hear us, my lord.  You are a prince of God among us.  In the choice of our graveyards bury your dead.  None of us shall withhold from you his graveyard, so that you may bury your dead.23:7 And Abraham rose up, and bowed himself to the people of the land, even to the children of Heth.23:8 And he communed with them, saying, If it be your mind that I should bury my dead out of my sight, hear me, and entreat for me to Ephron the son of Zohar,23:9 that he may give me the cave of Machpelah, which he has, which is in the end of his field.  For the full price let him give it to me in the midst of you for a possession of a burying-place.23:10 Now Ephron was sitting in the midst of the children of Heth.  And Ephron the Hittite answered Abraham in the audience of the children of Heth, even of all that went in at the gate of his city, saying,23:11 No, my lord, hear me.  The field I give you, and the cave that is in it, I give it to you.  In the presence of the children of my people give I it to you.  Bury your dead.23:12 And Abraham bowed himself down before the people of the land.23:13 And he spoke to Ephron in the audience of the people of the land, saying, But if you will, I pray you, hear me.  I will give the price of the field.  Take it from me, and I will bury my dead there.23:14 And Ephron answered Abraham, saying to him,23:15 My lord, listen to me.  A piece of land worth four hundred shekels of silver, what is that between me and you?  Bury therefore your dead.23:16 And Abraham listened to Ephron.  And Abraham weighed to Ephron the silver which he had named in the audience of the children of Heth, four hundred shekels of silver, current money with the merchant.23:17 So the field of Ephron, which was in Machpelah, which was before Mamre, the field, and the cave which was in it, and all the trees that were in the field, that were in all the border of it round about, were made sure23:18 to Abraham for a possession in the presence of the children of Heth, before all that went in at the gate of his city.23:19 And after this, Abraham buried Sarah his wife in the cave of the field of Machpelah before Mamre (the same is Hebron), in the land of Canaan.23:20 And the field, and the cave that is in it, were deeded by the children of Heth to Abraham for a burying-place.Chapter 2424:1 And Abraham was old, and well advanced in age.  And Yahweh had blessed Abraham in all things.24:2 And Abraham said to his servant, the elder of his house, that ruled over all that he had, Put, I pray you, your hand under my thigh.24:3 And I will make you swear by Yahweh, the God of heaven and the God of the earth, that you will not take a wife for my son from the daughters of the Canaanites, among whom I dwell.24:4 But you shall go to my country, and to my kindred, and take a wife for my son Isaac.24:5 And the servant said to him, Suppose the woman will not be willing to follow me to this land.  Must I then take your son back to the land from where you came?24:6 And Abraham said to him, See to it that you take not my son there again.24:7 Yahweh, the God of heaven, who took me from my father's house, and from the land of my nativity, and who spoke to me, and who swore to me, saying, To your seed will I give this land, He will send his angel before you, and you shall take a wife for my son from there.24:8 And if the woman be not willing to follow you, then you shall be clear from this my oath.  Only you shall not take my son there again.24:9 And the servant put his hand under the thigh of Abraham his master, and swore to him concerning this matter.24:10 And the servant took ten camels, of the camels of his master, and departed, having all kinds of good things of his master's in his hand.  And he arose, and went to Mesopotamia, to the city of Nahor.24:11 And he made the camels kneel down outside the city by the well of water at the time of evening, the time that women go out to draw water.24:12 And he said, O Yahweh, the God of my master Abraham, send me, I pray you, good speed this day, and show kindness to my master Abraham.24:13 Behold, I am standing by the spring of water.  And the daughters of the men of the city are coming out to draw water.24:14 And let it come to pass, that the damsel to whom I shall say, Let down your pitcher, I pray you, that I may drink, and she shall say, Drink, and I will give your camels a drink also, let the same be she that you have appointed for your servant Isaac.  And thereby shall I know that you have shown kindness to my master.24:15 And it came to pass, before he had finished speaking, that, behold, Rebekah came out, (who was born to Bethuel the son of Milcah, the wife of Nahor, Abraham's brother) with her pitcher upon her shoulder.24:16 And the damsel was very fair to look upon, a virgin, neither had any man known her.  And she went down to the spring, and filled her pitcher, and came up.24:17 And the servant ran to meet her, and said, Give me to drink, I pray you, a little water from your pitcher.24:18 And she said, Drink, my lord.  And she hurried, and let down her pitcher upon her hand, and gave him a drink.24:19 And when she had done giving him a drink, she said, I will draw for your camels also, until they have finished drinking.24:20 And she hurried, and emptied her pitcher into the trough, and ran back to the well to draw, and drew for all his camels.24:21 And the man looked steadfastly upon her, holding his peace, to know whether Yahweh had made his journey prosperous or not.24:22 And it came to pass, as the camels had finished drinking, that the man took a golden ring of half a shekel weight, and two bracelets for her hands, of ten shekels weight of gold,24:23 and said, Whose daughter are you?  Tell me, I pray you.  Is there room in your father's house for us to lodge in?24:24 And she said to him, I am the daughter of Bethuel the son of Milcah, whom she bore to Nahor.24:25 She said moreover to him, We have both straw and fodder enough, and room to lodge in.24:26 And the man bowed his head, and worshipped Yahweh.24:27 And he said, Blessed be Yahweh, the God of my master Abraham, who has not forsaken his lovingkindness and his truth toward my master.  As for me, Yahweh has led me in the way to the house of my master's brethren.24:28 And the damsel ran, and told her mother's house according to these words.24:29 And Rebekah had a brother, and his name was Laban: and Laban ran out to the man, to the spring.24:30 And it came to pass, when he saw the ring, and the bracelets upon his sister's hands, and when he heard the words of Rebekah his sister, saying, "Thus spoke the man to me," that he came to the man.  And, behold, he was standing by the camels at the spring.24:31 And he said, Come in, you blessed of Yahweh.  Why are you standing outside?  For I have prepared the house, and room for the camels.24:32 And the man came into the house, and he ungirded the camels.  And he provided straw and fodder for the camels, and water to wash his feet and the feet of the men that were with him.24:33 And there was set food before him to eat.  But he said, I will not eat, until I have told my errand.  And he said, Speak on.24:34 And he said, I am Abraham's servant.24:35 And Yahweh has blessed my master greatly.  And he is become great.  And He has given him flocks and herds, and silver and gold, and men-servants and maid-servants, and camels and donkeys.24:36 And Sarah my master's wife bore a son to my master when she was old.  And to him has he given all that he has.24:37 And my master made me swear, saying, You shall not take a wife for my son from the daughters of the Canaanites, in whose land I dwell.24:38 But you shall go to my father's house, and to my kindred, and take a wife for my son.24:39 And I said to my master, Suppose the woman will not follow me.24:40 And he said to me, Yahweh, before whom I walk, will send his angel with you, and prosper your way.  And you shall take a wife for my son from my kindred, and from my father's house.24:41 Then shall you be clear from my oath, when you come to my kindred.  And if they give her not to you, you shall be clear from my oath.24:42 And I came this day to the spring, and said, O Yahweh, the God of my master Abraham, if only now you do prosper my way which I go.24:43 Behold, I am standing by the spring of water.  And let it come to pass, that the maiden that comes forth to draw, to whom I shall say, Give me, I pray you, a little water from your pitcher to drink,24:44 and she shall say to me, 'Both you drink and I will also draw for your camels,' let the same be the woman whom Yahweh has appointed for my master's son.24:45 And before I had finished speaking in my heart, behold, Rebekah came forth with her pitcher on her shoulder.  And she went down to the spring, and drew.  And I said to her, Let me drink, I pray you.24:46 And she made haste, and let down her pitcher from her shoulder, and said, Drink, and I will also give your camels a drink.  So I drank, and she made the camels drink also.24:47 And I questioned her, and said, Whose daughter are you?  And she said, The daughter of Bethuel, Nahor's son, whom Milcah bore to him.  And I put the ring on her nose, and the bracelets on her arms.24:48 And I bowed my head, and worshipped Yahweh, and blessed Yahweh, the God of my master Abraham, who had led me in the right way to get my master's brother's daughter for his son.24:49 And now if ye will deal kindly and truly with my master, tell me.  And if not, tell me.  So that I may turn to the right hand, or to the left.24:50 Then Laban and Bethuel answered and said, The thing proceeds from Yahweh.  We cannot speak to you bad or good.24:51 Behold, Rebekah is before you, take her, and go, and let her be your master's son's wife, as Yahweh has spoken.24:52 And it came to pass, that, when Abraham's servant heard their words, he bowed himself down to the earth to Yahweh.24:53 And the servant brought forth jewels of silver, and jewels of gold, and raiment, and gave them to Rebekah.  He gave also to her brother and to her mother precious things.24:54 And they did eat and drink, he and the men that were with him, and tarried all night.  And they rose up in the morning, and he said, Send me away to my master.24:55 And her brother and her mother said, Let the damsel abide with us a few days, at the least ten.  After that she shall go.24:56 And he said to them, Hinder me not, seeing Yahweh has prospered my way.  Send me away that I may go to my master.24:57 And they said, We will call the damsel, and inquire at her mouth.24:58 And they called Rebekah, and said to her, Will you go with this man?  And she said, I will go.24:59 And they sent away Rebekah their sister, and her nurse, and Abraham's servant, and his men.24:60 And they blessed Rebekah, and said to her, Our sister, may you be the mother of thousands of ten thousands, and let your seed possess the gate  of those that hate them.24:61 And Rebekah arose, and her damsels, and they rode upon the camels, and followed the man.  And the servant took Rebekah, and went his way.24:62 And Isaac came from the way of Beer-lahai-roi.  For he dwelt in the land of the South.24:63 And Isaac went out to meditate in the field at the eventide.  And he lifted up his eyes, and saw, and, behold, there were camels coming.24:64 And Rebekah lifted up her eyes, and when she saw Isaac, she alighted from the camel.24:65 And she said to the servant, What man is this that walks in the field to meet us?  And the servant said, It is my master.  And she took her veil, and covered herself.24:66 And the servant told Isaac all the things that he had done.24:67 And Isaac brought her into his mother Sarah's tent, and took Rebekah, and she became his wife.  And he loved her.  And Isaac was comforted after his mother's death.Chapter 2525:1 And Abraham took another wife, and her name was Keturah.25:2 And she bore him Zimran, and Jokshan, and Medan, and Midian, and Ishbak, and Shuah.25:3 And Jokshan begat Sheba, and Dedan.  And the sons of Dedan were Asshurim, and Letushim, and Leummim.25:4 And the sons of Midian: Ephah, and Epher, and Hanoch, and Abida, and Eldaah.  All these were the children of Keturah.25:5 And Abraham gave all that he had to Isaac.25:6 But to the sons of the concubines, that Abraham had, Abraham gave gifts.  And he sent them away from Isaac his son, while he still lived, eastward, to the east country.25:7 And these are the days of the years of Abraham's life which he lived, 175 years.25:8 And Abraham gave up the ghost, and died in a good old age, an old man, and full of years, and was gathered to his people.25:9 And Isaac and Ishmael his sons buried him in the cave of Machpelah, in the field of Ephron the son of Zohar the Hittite, which is before Mamre,25:10 The field which Abraham purchased of the children of Heth.  There was Abraham buried, and Sarah his wife.25:11 And it came to pass after the death of Abraham, that God blessed Isaac his son.  And Isaac dwelt by Beer-lahai-roi.25:12 Now these are the generations of Ishmael, Abraham's son, whom Hagar the Egyptian, Sarah's handmaid, bore to Abraham.25:13 And these are the names of the sons of Ishmael, by their names, according to their generations: the first-born of Ishmael, Nebaioth, and Kedar, and Adbeel, and Mibsam,25:14 and Mishma, and Dumah, and Massa,25:15 Hadad, and Tema, Jetur, Naphish, and Kedemah.25:16 These are the sons of Ishmael, and these are their names, by their villages, and by their encampments.  Twelve princes according to their nations.25:17 And these are the years of the life of Ishmael, 137 years.  And he gave up the ghost and died, and was gathered to his people.25:18 And they dwelt from Havilah to Shur that is before Egypt, as you go toward Assyria.  He abode over against all his brethren.25:19 And these are the generations of Isaac, Abraham's son.  Abraham begat Isaac.25:20 And Isaac was 40 years old when he took Rebekah, the daughter of Bethuel the Syrian of Paddan-aram, the sister of Laban the Syrian, to be his wife.25:21 And Isaac entreated Yahweh for his wife, because she was barren.  And Yahweh was entreated of him, and Rebekah his wife conceived.25:22 And the children struggled together within her.  And she said, If it is this way, why do I live?  And she went to inquire of Yahweh.25:23 And Yahweh said to her, Two nations are in your womb, and two peoples shall be separated from your bowels.  And the one people shall be stronger than the other people.  And the elder shall serve the younger.25:24 And when her days to be delivered were fulfilled, behold, there were twins in her womb.25:25 And the first came forth red, all over like a hairy garment.  And they called his name Esau.25:26 And after that came forth his brother, and his hand had hold on Esau's heel.  And his name was called Jacob.  And Isaac was 60 years old when she bore them.25:27 And the boys grew.  And Esau was a skillful hunter, a man of the field.  And Jacob was a quiet man, dwelling in tents.25:28 Now Isaac loved Esau, because he ate of his venison.  And Rebekah loved Jacob.25:29 And Jacob boiled pottage.  And Esau came in from the field, and he was faint.25:30 And Esau said to Jacob, Feed me, I pray you, with that same red pottage.  For I am faint.  Therefore was his name called Edom.25:31 And Jacob said, Sell me first your birthright.25:32 And Esau said, Behold, I am about to die.  And what good shall the birthright do me?25:33 And Jacob said, Swear to me first.  And he swore to him.  And he sold his birthright to Jacob.25:34 And Jacob gave Esau bread and pottage of lentils.  And he did eat and drink, and rose up, and went his way.  Thus Esau despised his birthright.Chapter 2626:1 And there was a famine in the land, besides the first famine that was in the days of Abraham.  And Isaac went to Abimelech king of the Philistines, to Gerar.26:2 And Yahweh appeared to him, and said, Go not down into Egypt.  Dwell in the land which I shall tell you of.26:3 Sojourn in this land, and I will be with you, and will bless you.  For to you, and to your seed, I will give all these lands, and I will establish the oath which I swore to Abraham your father.26:4 And I will multiply your seed as the stars of heaven, and will give to your seed all these lands.  And in your seed shall all the nations of the earth be blessed.26:5 For the reason that Abraham obeyed my voice, and kept my charge, my commandments, my statutes, and my laws.26:6 And Isaac dwelt in Gerar.26:7 And the men of the place asked him about his wife.  And he said, She is my sister.  For he feared to say, My wife.  Lest, said he, the men of the place should kill me for Rebekah.  Because she was fair to look upon.26:8 And it came to pass, when he had been there a long time, that Abimelech king of the Philistines looked out at a window, and saw, and, behold, Isaac was sporting with Rebekah his wife.26:9 And Abimelech called Isaac, and said, Behold, she is definitely your wife.  And how is it you said, She is my sister?  And Isaac said to him, Because I said, Lest I die because of her.26:10 And Abimelech said, What is this you have done to us?  One of the people might easily have lain with your wife, and you would have brought guilt upon us.26:11 And Abimelech charged all the people, saying, He that touches this man or his wife shall surely be put to death.26:12 And Isaac sowed in that land, and found in the same year a hundredfold.  And Yahweh blessed him.26:13 And the man became great, and grew more and more until he became very great.26:14 And he had possessions of flocks, and possessions of herds, and a great household.  And the Philistines envied him.26:15 Now all the wells which his father's servants had dug in the days of Abraham his father, the Philistines had plugged, and filled with earth.26:16 And Abimelech said to Isaac, Go away from us.  For you are much mightier than we are.26:17 And Isaac departed there, and encamped in the valley of Gerar, and dwelt there.26:18 And Isaac dug again the wells of water, which they had dug in the days of Abraham his father.  For the Philistines had stopped them after the death of Abraham.  And he called their names after the names by which his father had called them.26:19 And Isaac's servants dug in the valley, and found there a well of springing water.26:20 And the herdsmen of Gerar strove with Isaac's herdsmen, saying, The water is ours.  And he called the name of the well Esek, because they contended with him.26:21 And they dug another well, and they strove for that also.  And he called the name of it Sitnah.26:22 And he removed from there, and dug another well.  And for that they strove not.  And he called the name of it Rehoboth.  And he said, For now Yahweh has made room for us, and we shall be fruitful in the land.26:23 And he went up from there to Beer-sheba.26:24 And Yahweh appeared to him the same night, and said, I am the God of Abraham your father.  Fear not, for I am with you, and will bless you, and multiply your seed for my servant Abraham's sake.26:25 And he built an altar there, and called upon the name of Yahweh, and pitched his tent there.  And there Isaac's servants dug a well.26:26 Then Abimelech went to him from Gerar, and Ahuzzath his friend, and Phicol the captain of his host.26:27 And Isaac said to them, Why are ye come to me, seeing ye hate me, and have sent me away from you?26:28 And they said, We saw plainly that Yahweh was with you.  And we said, Let there now be an oath between us, even between us and you, and let us make a covenant with you,26:29 that you will do us no hurt, as we have not touched you, and as we have done to you nothing but good, and have sent you away in peace.  You are now the blessed of Yahweh.26:30 And he made them a feast, and they did eat and drink.26:31 And they rose up early in the morning, and swore one to another.  And Isaac sent them away, and they departed from him in peace.26:32 And it came to pass the same day, that Isaac's servants came, and told him concerning the well which they had dug, and said to him, We have found water.26:33 And he called it Shibah.  Therefore the name of the city is Beer-sheba to this day.26:34 And when Esau was forty years old he took to wife Judith the daughter of Beeri the Hittite, and Basemath the daughter of Elon the Hittite.26:35 And they were a grief of mind to Isaac and to Rebekah.Chapter 2727:1 And it came to pass, that when Isaac was old, and his eyes were dim, so that he could not see, he called Esau his elder son, and said to him, My son.  And he said to him, Here am I.27:2 And he said, Behold now, I am old, I know not the day of my death.27:3 Now therefore take, I pray you, your weapons, your quiver and your bow, and go out to the field, and get me venison.27:4 And make me savory food, such as I love, and bring it to me, that I may eat.  That my soul may bless you before I die.27:5 And Rebekah heard when Isaac spoke to Esau his son.  And Esau went to the field to hunt for venison, and to bring it.27:6 And Rebekah spoke to Jacob her son, saying, Behold, I heard your father speak to Esau your brother, saying,27:7 Bring me venison, and make me savory food, that I may eat, and bless you before Yahweh before my death.27:8 Now therefore, my son, obey my voice according to that which I command you.27:9 Go now to the flock, and fetch me from there two good kids of the goats.  And I will make them savory food for your father, such as he loves.27:10 And you shall bring it to your father, that he may eat, so that he may bless you before his death.27:11 And Jacob said to Rebekah his mother, Behold, Esau my brother is a hairy man, and I am a smooth man.27:12 My father perhaps will feel me, and I shall seem to him as a deceiver.  And I shall bring a curse upon myself, and not a blessing.27:13 And his mother said to him, Upon me be your curse, my son.  Only obey my voice, and go fetch them for me.27:14 And he went, and fetched, and brought them to his mother.  And his mother made savory food, such as his father loved.27:15 And Rebekah took the finest garments of Esau her elder son, which were with her in the house, and put them upon Jacob her younger son.27:16 And she put the skins of the kids of the goats upon his hands, and upon the smooth of his neck.27:17 And she gave the savory food and the bread, which she had prepared, into the hand of her son Jacob.27:18 And he came to his father, and said, My father.  And he said, Here am I.  Who are you, my son?27:19 And Jacob said to his father, I am Esau your first-born; I have done according as you bid me: arise, I pray you, sit and eat of my venison, that your soul may bless me.27:20 And Isaac said to his son, How is it that you have found it so quickly, my son?  And he said, Because Yahweh your God sent me good speed.27:21 And Isaac said to Jacob, Come near, I pray you, that I may feel you, my son, whether you really are my son Esau or not.27:22 And Jacob went near to Isaac his father.  And he felt him, and said, The voice is Jacob's voice, but the hands are the hands of Esau.27:23 And he discerned him not, because his hands were hairy, as his brother Esau's hands.  So he blessed him.27:24 And he said, are you really my son Esau?  And he said, I am.27:25 And he said, Bring it near to me, and I will eat of my son's venison, that my soul may bless you.  And he brought it near to him, and he ate.  And he brought him wine, and he drank.27:26 And his father Isaac said to him, Come near now, and kiss me, my son.27:27 And he came near, and kissed him.  And he smelled the smell of his clothing, and blessed him, and said, See, the smell of my son is as the smell of a field which Yahweh has blessed.27:28 And God five you of the dew of heaven, and of the fatness of the earth, and plenty of grain and new wine.27:29 Let peoples serve you, and nations bow down to you.  Be lord over your brothers, and let your mother's sons bow down to you.  Cursed be every one that curses you, and blessed be every one that blesses you.27:30 And it came to pass, as soon as Isaac had made an end of blessing Jacob, and Jacob was yet scarce gone out from the presence of Isaac his father, that Esau his brother came in from his hunting.27:31 And he also made savory food, and brought it to his father.  And he said to his father, Let my father arise, and eat of his son's venison, that your soul may bless me.27:32 And Isaac his father said to him, Who are you?  And he said, I am your son, your first-born, Esau.27:33 And Isaac trembled very exceedingly, and said, Who then is he that has taken venison, and brought it me, and I have eaten of all before you came, and have blessed him?  And he certainly shall be blessed.27:34 When Esau heard the words of his father, he cried with an exceedingly great and bitter cry, and said to his father, Bless me, even me also, O my father.27:35 And he said, Your brother came with guile, and has taken away your blessing.27:36 And he said, Is he not rightly name Jacob?  for he has supplanted me these two times.  He took away my birthright.  And, behold, now he has taken away my blessing.  And he said, Have you not reserved a blessing for me?27:37 And Isaac answered and said to Esau, Behold, I have made him your lord, and all his brethren have I given to him for servants.  And with grain and new wine have I sustained him.  And what then shall I do for you, my son?27:38 And Esau said to his father, Have you but one blessing, my father?  Bless me, even me also, O my father.  And Esau lifted up his voice, and wept.27:39 And Isaac his father answered and said to him, Behold, of the fatness of the earth shall be your dwelling, and of the dew of heaven from above.27:40 And by your sword shall you live, and you shall serve your brother.  And it shall come to pass, when you shall break loose, That you shall shake his yoke from off your neck.27:41 And Esau hated Jacob because of the blessing with which his father blessed him.  And Esau said in his heart, The days of mourning for my father are at hand.  Then will I slay my brother Jacob.27:42 And the words of Esau her elder son were told to Rebekah.  And she sent and called Jacob her younger son, and said to him, Behold, your brother Esau, as touching you, is comforting himself, purposing to kill you.27:43 Now therefore, my son, obey my voice.  And arise, flee to Laban my brother to Haran.27:44 And tarry with him a few days, until your brother's fury turns away.27:45 Until your brother's anger turns away from you, and he forgets that which you have done to him.  Then I will send, and fetch you from there.  Why should I be bereaved of you both in one day?27:46 And Rebekah said to Isaac, I am weary of my life because of the daughters of Heth.  If Jacob takes a wife of the daughters of Heth, such as these, of the daughters of the land, what good shall my life do me?Chapter 2828:1 And Isaac called Jacob, and blessed him, and charged him, and said to him, You shall not take a wife of the daughters of Canaan.28:2 Arise, go to Paddan-aram, to the house of Bethuel your mother's father.  And take yourself a wife from there of the daughters of Laban your mother's brother.28:3 And God Almighty bless you, and make you fruitful, and multiply you, that you may be a company of peoples.28:4 And give you the blessing of Abraham, to you, and to your seed with you.  That you may inherit the land of your sojournings, which God gave to Abraham.28:5 And Isaac sent away Jacob.  And he went to Paddan-aram to Laban, son of Bethuel the Syrian, the brother of Rebekah, Jacob's and Esau's mother.28:6 Now Esau saw that Isaac had blessed Jacob and sent him away to Paddan-aram, to take himself a wife from there.  And that as he blessed him he gave him a charge, saying, You shall not take a wife of the daughters of Canaan.28:7 And that Jacob obeyed his father and his mother, and was gone to Paddan-aram.28:8 And Esau saw that the daughters of Canaan pleased not Isaac his father.28:9 And Esau went to Ishmael, and took, besides the wives that he had, Mahalath the daughter of Ishmael Abraham's son, the sister of Nebaioth, to be his wife.28:10 And Jacob went out from Beer-sheba, and went toward Haran.28:11 And he came upon a certain place, and tarried there all night, because the sun was set.  And he took one of the stones of the place, and put it under his head, and lay down in that place to sleep.28:12 And he dreamed.  And behold, a ladder set up on the earth, and the top of it reached to heaven.  And behold, the angels of God ascending and descending on it.28:13 And, behold, Yahweh stood above it, and said, I am Yahweh, the God of Abraham your father, and the God of Isaac.  The land on which you lie, to you will I give it, and to your seed.28:14 And your seed shall be as the dust of the earth, and you shall spread abroad to the west, and to the east, and to the north, and to the south.  And in you and in your seed shall all the families of the earth be blessed.28:15 And, behold, I am with you, and will keep you, wherever you go, and will bring you again into this land.  For I will not leave you, until I have done that which I have spoken to you of.28:16 And Jacob awoke out of his sleep, and he said, Surely Yahweh is in this place.  And I knew it not.28:17 And he was afraid, and said, How dreadful is this place! This is none other than the house of God, and this is the gate of heaven.28:18 And Jacob rose up early in the morning, and took the stone that he had put under his head, and set it up for a pillar, and poured oil upon the top of it.28:19 And he called the name of that place Beth-el.  But the name of the city was Luz at the first.28:20 And Jacob vowed a vow, saying, If God will be with me, and will keep me in this way that I go, and will give me bread to eat, and clothing to put on,28:21 so that I come again to my father's house in peace, and Yahweh will be my God,28:22 then this stone, which I have set up for a pillar, shall be God's house.  And of all that you shall give me I will surely give the tenth to you.Chapter 2929:1 Then Jacob went on his journey, and came to the land of the children of the east.29:2 And he looked, and behold, a well in the field, and, lo, three flocks of sheep lying there by it.  For out of that well they watered the flocks.  And the stone upon the well's mouth was great.29:3 And there all the flocks were gathered.  And they rolled the stone from the well's mouth, and watered the sheep, and put the stone back upon the well's mouth in its place.29:4 And Jacob said to them, My brothers, where are you from?  And they said, Of Haran are we.29:5 And he said to them, Know ye Laban the son of Nahor?  And they said, We know him.29:6 And he said to them, Is it well with him?  And they said, It is well.  And, behold, Rachel his daughter comes with the sheep.29:7 And he said, Lo, it is yet high day, neither is it time that the cattle should be gathered together.  Water ye the sheep, and go and feed them.29:8 And they said, We cannot, until all the flocks be gathered together, and they roll the stone from the well's mouth.  Then we water the sheep.29:9 While he was yet speaking with them, Rachel came with her father's sheep.  For she kept them.29:10 And it came to pass, when Jacob saw Rachel the daughter of Laban his mother's brother, and the sheep of Laban his mother's brother, that Jacob went near, and rolled the stone from the well's mouth, and watered the flock of Laban his mother's brother.29:11 And Jacob kissed Rachel, and lifted up his voice, and wept.29:12 And Jacob told Rachel that he was her father's kinsman, and Rebekah's son.  And she ran and told her father.29:13 And it came to pass, when Laban heard the tidings of Jacob his sister's son, that he ran to meet him, and embraced him, and kissed him, and brought him to his house.  And he told Laban all these things.29:14 And Laban said to him, Surely you are my bone and my flesh.  And he abode with him the space of a month.29:15 And Laban said to Jacob, Because you are my kinsman, should you therefore serve me for nothing?  Tell me, what shall your wages be?29:16 And Laban had two daughters.  The name of the elder was Leah, and the name of the younger was Rachel.29:17 And Leah's eyes were tender.  But Rachel was beautiful and well favored.29:18 And Jacob loved Rachel.  And he said, I will serve you seven years for Rachel your younger daughter.29:19 And Laban said, It is better that I give her to you, than give her to another man.  Abide with me.29:20 And Jacob served seven years for Rachel.  And they seemed to him but a few days, for the love that he had toward her.29:21 And Jacob said to Laban, Give me my wife, for my days are fulfilled, so that I may go in to her.29:22 And Laban gathered together all the men of the place, and made a feast.29:23 And it came to pass in the evening, that he took Leah his daughter, and brought her to him.  And he went in to her.29:24 And Laban gave Zilpah his handmaid to his daughter Leah for a handmaid.29:25 And it came to pass in the morning that, behold, it was Leah.  And he said to Laban, What is this you have done to me?  Did not I serve with you for Rachel?  Why then have you deceived me?29:26 And Laban said, It is not so done in our place, to give the younger before the first-born.29:27 Fulfill the week of this one, and we will give you the other also for the service which you shall serve with me yet seven other years.29:28 And Jacob did so, and fulfilled her week.  And he gave him Rachel his daughter to wife.29:29 And Laban gave to Rachel his daughter Bilhah his handmaid to be her handmaid.29:30 And he went in also to Rachel, and he loved also Rachel more than Leah, and served with him yet seven other years.29:31 And Yahweh saw that Leah was hated, and he opened her womb.  But Rachel was barren.29:32 And Leah conceived, and bore a son, and she called his name Reuben.  For she said, Because Yahweh has looked upon my affliction.  For now my husband will love me.29:33 And she conceived again, and bore a son: and said, Because Yahweh has heard that I am hated, he has therefore given me this son also.  And she called his name Simeon.29:34 And she conceived again, and bore a son.  And said, Now this time will my husband be joined to me, because I have borne him three sons.  Therefore was his name called Levi.29:35 And she conceived again, and bore a son.  And she said, This time will I praise Yahweh.  Therefore she called his name Judah.  And she left off bearing.Chapter 3030:1 And when Rachel saw that she bore Jacob no children, Rachel envied her sister; and she said to Jacob, Give me children, or else I die.30:2 And Jacob's anger was kindled against Rachel: and he said, am I in the place of God, who has withheld from you the fruit of the womb?30:3 And she said, Behold, my maid Bilhah, go in to her; that she may bear upon my knees,  and thus I also may obtain children by her.30:4 And she gave him Bilhah her handmaid to wife: and Jacob went in to her.30:5 And Bilhah conceived, and bore Jacob a son.30:6 And Rachel said, God has judged me, and has also heard my voice, and has given me a son: therefore called she his name Dan.30:7 And Bilhah Rachel's handmaid conceived again, and bore Jacob a second son.30:8 And Rachel said, With wrestlings of God have I wrestled with my sister, and I have prevailed.  And she called his name Naphtali.30:9 When Leah saw that she had left off bearing, she took Zilpah her handmaid, and gave her to Jacob to wife.30:10 And Zilpah Leah's handmaid bore Jacob a son.30:11 And Leah said, Fortunate! and she called his name Gad.30:12 And Zilpah Leah's handmaid bore Jacob a second son.30:13 And Leah said, Happy am I! for the daughters will call me happy: and she called his name Asher.30:14 And Reuben went in the days of wheat harvest, and found mandrakes in the field, and brought them to his mother Leah.  Then Rachel said to Leah, Give me, I pray you, some of your son's mandrakes.30:15 And she said to her, Is it a small matter that you have taken away my husband?  and would you take away my son's mandrakes also?  And Rachel said, Then he shall lie with you tonight for your son's mandrakes.30:16 And Jacob came from the field in the evening, and Leah went out to meet him, and said, You must come in to me; for I have surely hired you with my son's mandrakes.  And he lay with her that night.30:17 And God hearkened to Leah, and she conceived, and bore Jacob a fifth son.30:18 And Leah said, God has given me my wages, because I gave my handmaid to my husband: and she called his name Issachar.30:19 And Leah conceived again, and bore a sixth son to Jacob.30:20 And Leah said, God has endowed me with a good dowry; now will my husband dwell with me, because I have borne him six sons: and she called his name Zebulun.30:21 And afterwards she bore a daughter, and called her name Dinah.30:22 And God remembered Rachel, and God hearkened to her, and opened her womb.30:23 And she conceived, and bore a son: and said, God has taken away my reproach:30:24 and she called his name Joseph, saying, Yahweh add to me another son.30:25 And it came to pass, when Rachel had borne Joseph, that Jacob said to Laban, Send me away, that I may go to my own place, and to my country.30:26 Give me my wives and my children for whom I have served you, and let me go: for you know my service with which I have served you.30:27 And Laban said to him, If now I have found favor in your eyes, tarry: for I have divined that Yahweh has blessed me for your sake.30:28 And he said, Name me your wages, and I will give it.30:29 And he said to him, You know how I have served you, and how your cattle have fared with me.30:30 For it was little which you had before I came, and it has increased into a multitude; and Yahweh has blessed you wherever I turned: and now when shall I provide for my own house also?30:31 And he said, What shall I give you?  And Jacob said, You shall not give me anything: if you will do this thing for me, I will again feed your flock and keep it.30:32 I will pass through all your flock today, removing from there every speckled and spotted one, and every black one among the sheep, and the spotted and speckled among the goats: and  of such shall be my wages.30:33 So shall my righteousness answer for me hereafter, when you shall come concerning my pay that is before you: every one that is not speckled and spotted among the goats, and black among the sheep, that if found with me, shall be considered stolen.30:34 And Laban said, Behold, I would it might be according to your word.30:35 And he removed that day the he-goats that were ring streaked and spotted, and all the she-goats that were speckled and spotted, every one that had white in it, and all the black ones among the sheep, and gave them into the hand of his sons;30:36 and he set three days' journey between himself and Jacob: and Jacob fed the rest of Laban's flocks.30:37 And Jacob took him rods of fresh poplar, and of the almond and of the plane-tree.  And he peeled white streaks in them, and made the white appear which was in the rods.30:38 And he set the rods which he had peeled over against the flocks in the gutters in the watering-troughs where the flocks came to drink; and they conceived when they came to drink.30:39 And the flocks conceived before the rods, and the flocks brought forth ring streaked, speckled, and spotted.30:40 And Jacob separated the lambs, and set the faces of the flocks toward the ring streaked and all the black in the flock of Laban: and he put his own droves apart, and put them not to Laban's flock.30:41 And it came to pass, whenever the stronger of the flock did conceive, that Jacob laid the rods before the eyes of the flock in the gutters, that they might conceive among the rods;30:42 but when the flock were feeble, he put them not in: so the feebler were Laban's, and the stronger Jacob's.30:43 And the man increased exceedingly, and had large flocks, and maid-servants and men-servants, and camels and asses.Chapter 3131:1 And he heard the words of Laban's sons, saying, Jacob has taken away all that was our father's; and from that which was our father's has he gotten all this glory.31:2 And Jacob beheld the countenance of Laban, and, behold, it was not toward him as before.31:3 And Yahweh said to Jacob, Return to the land of your fathers, and to your kindred; and I will be with you.31:4 And Jacob sent and called Rachel and Leah to the field, to his flock,31:5 and said to them, I see your father's countenance, that it is not toward me as before; but the God of my father has been with me.31:6 And ye know that with all my power I have served your father.31:7 And your father has deceived me, and changed my wages ten times; but God did not allow him to hurt me.31:8 If he said thus, The speckled shall be your wages; then all the flock bore speckled: and if he said thus, The ring streaked shall be your wages; then all the flock bore ring streaked.31:9 Thus God has taken away the cattle of your father, and given them to me.31:10 And it came to pass at the time that the flock conceived, that I lifted up my eyes, and saw in a dream, and, behold, the he-goats which leaped upon the flock were ring streaked, speckled, and grizzled.31:11 And the angel of God said to me in the dream, Jacob: and I said, Here am I.31:12 And he said, Lift up now your eyes, and see, all the he-goats which leap upon the flock are ring streaked, speckled, and grizzled: for I have seen all that Laban does to you.31:13 I am the God of Beth-el, where you anointed a pillar, where you vowed a vow to me: now arise, go out from this land, and return to the land of your nativity.31:14 And Rachel and Leah answered and said to him, Is there yet any portion or inheritance for us in our father's house?31:15 Are we not accounted by him as foreigners?  for he has sold us, and has also quite devoured our money.31:16 For all the riches, which God has taken away from our father, that is ours and our children's: now then, whatsoever God has said to you, do.31:17 Then Jacob rose up, and set his sons and his wives upon the camels;31:18 and he carried away all his cattle, and all his substance, which he had gathered, the cattle of his getting, which he had gathered in Paddan-aram, to go to Isaac his father to the land of Canaan.31:19 Now Laban was gone to shear his sheep: and Rachel stole the teraphim that were her father's.31:20 And Jacob snuck away without the knowledge of Laban the Syrian, in that he did not tell him that he fled.31:21 So he fled with all that he had; and he rose up, and passed over the River, and set his face toward the mountain of Gilead.31:22 And it was told Laban on the third day that Jacob was fled.31:23 And he took his brethren with him, and pursued after him seven days' journey; and he overtook him in the mountain of Gilead.31:24 And God came to Laban the Syrian in a dream of the night, and said to him, Take heed to yourself that you speak not to Jacob either good or bad.31:25 And Laban came up with Jacob.  Now Jacob had pitched his tent in the mountain: and Laban with his brethren encamped in the mountain of Gilead.31:26 And Laban said to Jacob, What have you done, that you have stolen away unawares to me, and carried away my daughters as captives of the sword?31:27 Why did you flee secretly, and steal away from me, and did not tell me, that I might have sent you away with mirth and with songs, with tabret and with harp;31:28 and did not allow me to kiss my sons and my daughters?  now have you done foolishly.31:29 It is in the power of my hand to do you hurt: but the God of your father spoke to me last night, saying, Take heed to yourself that you speak not to Jacob either good or bad.31:30 And now, sure, you had to go because you longed greatly for your father's house, but why have you stolen my gods?31:31 And Jacob answered and said to Laban, Because I was afraid: for I said, Lest you should take your daughters from me by force.31:32 With whomsoever you find your gods, he shall not live: before our brethren discern you what is yours with me, and take it to you.  For Jacob knew not that Rachel had stolen them.31:33 And Laban went into Jacob's tent, and into Leah's tent, and into the tent of the two maid-servants; but did not find them.  And he went out of Leah's tent, and entered into Rachel's tent.31:34 Now Rachel had taken the teraphim, and put them in the camel's saddle, and sat on them.  And Laban felt all around the tent, but did not find them.31:35 And she said to her father, Let not my lord be angry that I cannot rise up before you; for the manner of women is upon me.   And he searched, but found not the teraphim.31:36 And Jacob became angry, and chided Laban: and Jacob answered and said to Laban, What is my trespass?  what is my sin, that you have hotly pursued after me?31:37 Whereas you have felt about all my stuff, what have you found of all your household stuff?  Set it here before my brethren and your brethren, that they may judge between us two.31:38 These twenty years have I been with you; your ewes and your she-goats have not miscarried their young, and the rams of your flocks I have not eaten.31:39 That which was torn of beasts I brought not to you; I bore the loss of it; of my hand did you require it, whether stolen by day or stolen by night.31:40 Thus I was; in the day the drought consumed me, and the frost by night; and my sleep fled from my eyes.31:41 These twenty years I have been in your house; I served you fourteen years for your two daughters, and six years for your flock: and you have changed my wages ten times.31:42 Except the God of my father, the God of Abraham, and the Fear of Isaac, had been with me, surely now have you sent me away empty.  God has seen my affliction and the labor of my hands, and rebuked you last night.31:43 And Laban answered and said to Jacob, The daughters are my daughters, and the children are my children, and the flocks are my flocks, and all that you see is mine: and what can I do this day to these my daughters, or to their children whom they have borne?31:44 And now come, let us make a covenant, I and you; and let it be for a witness between me and you.31:45 And Jacob took a stone, and set it up for a pillar.31:46 And Jacob said to his kinsmen, Gather stones; and they took stones, and made a heap: and they did eat there by the heap.31:47 And Laban called it Jegar-saha-dutha: but Jacob called it Galeed.31:48 And Laban said, This heap is witness between me and you this day.  Therefore was the name of it called Galeed:31:49 and Mizpah, for he said, Yahweh watch between me and you, when we are absent one from another.31:50 If you shall afflict my daughters, and if you shall take wives besides my daughters, no man is with us; see, God is witness between me and you.31:51 And Laban said to Jacob, Behold this heap, and behold the pillar, which I have set between me and you.31:52 This heap be witness, and the pillar be witness, that I will not pass over this heap to you, and that you shall not pass over this heap and this pillar to me, for harm.31:53 The God of Abraham, and the God of Nahor, the God of their father, judge between us.  And Jacob swore by the Fear of his father Isaac.31:54 And Jacob offered a sacrifice in the mountain, and called his brethren to eat bread: and they did eat bread, and tarried all night in the mountain.31:55 And early in the morning Laban rose up, and kissed his sons and his daughters, and blessed them: and Laban departed and returned to his place.Chapter 3232:1 And Jacob went on his way, and the angels of God met him.32:2 And Jacob said when he saw them, This is God's encampment: and he called the name of that place Mahanaim.32:3 And Jacob sent messengers before him to Esau his brother to the land of Seir, the field of Edom.32:4 And he commanded them, saying, Thus shall ye say to my lord Esau: Thus says your servant Jacob, I have sojourned with Laban, and stayed until now:32:5 and I have oxen, and asses, and flocks, and men-servants, and maid-servants: and I have sent to tell my lord, that I may find favor in your sight.32:6 And the messengers returned to Jacob, saying, We came to your brother Esau, and moreover he comes to meet you, and four hundred men with him.32:7 Then Jacob was greatly afraid and was distressed: and he divided the people that were with him, and the flocks, and the herds, and the camels, into two companies;32:8 and he said, If Esau comes to the one company, and attacks it, then the company which is left shall escape.32:9 And Jacob said, O God of my father Abraham, and God of my father Isaac, O Yahweh, who said to me, Return to your country, and to your kindred, and I will do you good:32:10 I am not worthy of the least of all the lovingkindnesses, and of all the truth, which you have shown to your servant; for with my staff I passed over this Jordan; and now I am become two camps.32:11 Deliver me, I pray you, from the hand of my brother, from the hand of Esau: for I fear him, that he might come and attack me, the mother with the children.32:12 And you said, I will surely do you good, and make your seed as the sand of the sea, which cannot be numbered for multitude.32:13 And he lodged there that night, and took out of that he had with him a present for Esau his brother:32:14 two hundred she-goats and twenty he-goats, two hundred ewes and twenty rams,32:15 thirty milking camels and their colts, forty cows and ten bulls, twenty she-asses and ten foals.32:16 And he delivered them into the hand of his servants, every drove by itself, and said to his servants, Pass over before me, and put a space between drove and drove.32:17 And he commanded the front one, saying, When Esau my brother meets you, and asks you, saying, Whose are you?  and where are you going?  and whose are these before you?32:18 then you shall say They are your servant Jacob's; it is a present sent to my lord Esau: and, behold, he also is behind us.32:19 And he commanded also the second, and the third, and all that followed the droves, saying, On this same manner shall ye speak to Esau, when ye find him;32:20 and ye shall also say, Moreover, behold, your servant Jacob is behind us.  For he said, I will appease him with the present that goes before me, and afterward I will see his face; perhaps he will accept me.32:21 So the present passed over before him: and he himself lodged that night in the camp.32:22 And he rose up that night, and took his two wives, and his two handmaids, and his eleven children, and passed over the ford of the Jabbok.32:23 And he took them, and sent them over the stream, and sent over that which he had.32:24 And Jacob was left alone; and there a man wrestled with him until the breaking of the day.32:25 And when that man saw that he was not prevailing against him, he touched the hollow of Jacob's thigh; and the hollow of Jacob's thigh was strained, as he wrestled with him.32:26 And the man said, Let me go, for the day is breaking.  And Jacob said, I will not let you go, unless you bless me.32:27 And he said to him, What is your name?  And he said, Jacob.32:28 And he said, Your name shall no longer be called Jacob, but Israel: for you have striven with God and with men, and have prevailed.32:29 And Jacob asked him, and said, Tell me, I pray you, your name.  And he said, Why is it you are asking for my name?  And he blessed him there.32:30 And Jacob called the name of the place Peniel: for, said he, I have seen God face to face, and yet my life is preserved.32:31 And the sun rose upon him as he passed over Penuel, and he limped upon his thigh.32:32 Therefore the children of Israel eat not the sinew of the hip which is upon the hollow of the thigh, to this day: because he touched the hollow of Jacob's thigh in the sinew of the hip.Chapter 3333:1 And Jacob lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, Esau was coming, and with him four hundred men.  And he divided the children among Leah, and Rachel, and the two handmaids.33:2 And he put the handmaids and their children up front, and Leah and her children after, and Rachel and Joseph farthest back.33:3 And he himself passed over before them, and bowed himself to the ground seven times, until he came near to his brother.33:4 And Esau ran to meet him, and embraced him, and fell on his neck, and kissed him: and they wept.33:5 And he lifted up his eyes, and saw the women and the children; and said, Who are these with you?  And he said, The children whom God has graciously given your servant.33:6 Then the handmaids came near, they and their children, and they bowed themselves.33:7 And Leah also and her children came near, and bowed themselves: and after came Joseph near with Rachel, and they bowed themselves.33:8 And he said, What do you mean by all this company which I met?  And he said, To find favor in the sight of my lord.33:9 And Esau said, I have enough, my brother; let that which you have be yours.33:10 And Jacob said, No, I pray you, if now I have found favor in your sight, then receive my present at my hand; forasmuch as I have seen your face, which is like seeing the face of God, and you were pleased with me.33:11 Take, I pray you, my gift that is brought to you; because God has dealt graciously with me, and because I have enough.  And he urged him, and he took it.33:12 And Esau said, Let us take our journey, and let us go, and I will go along with you.33:13 And Jacob said to him, My lord knows that the children are tender, and that the flocks and herds with me have their young: and if they overdrive them one day, all the flocks will die.33:14 Let my lord, I pray you, pass over before his servant: and I will lead on gently, according to the pace of the cattle that are before me and according to the pace of the children, until I come to my lord to Seir.33:15 And Esau said, Let me now leave with you some of the folk that are with me.  And he said, What calls for it?  let me find favor in the sight of my lord.33:16 So Esau returned that day on his way to Seir.33:17 But Jacob journeyed to Succoth, and built him a house, and made booths for his cattle: that is why the name of the place is called Succoth.33:18 And Jacob came in peace to the city of Shechem, which is in the land of Canaan, when he came from Paddan-aram; and encamped before the city.33:19 And he bought the parcel of ground, where he had spread his tent, from the hand of the children of Hamor, Shechem's father, for a hundred pieces of money.33:20 And he erected there an altar, and called it El-elohe-israel.Chapter 3434:1 And Dinah the daughter of Leah, whom she bore to Jacob, went out to see the daughters of the land.34:2 And Shechem the son of Hamor the Hivite, the prince of the land, saw her; And he took her, and lay with her, and humiliated her.34:3 And his soul cleaved to Dinah the daughter of Jacob, and he loved the damsel, and spoke kindly to the damsel.34:4 And Shechem spoke to his father Hamor, saying, Get me this damsel for wife.34:5 Now Jacob heard that he had defiled Dinah his daughter; and his sons were with his cattle in the field: and Jacob held his peace until they came.34:6 And Hamor the father of Shechem went out to Jacob to commune with him.34:7 And the sons of Jacob came in from the field when they heard it.  And the men were shocked, and were very angry, because he had wrought folly in Israel in lying with Jacob's daughter; which thing ought not to be done.34:8 And Hamor communed with them, saying, The soul of my son Shechem longs for your daughter: I pray you, give her to him for a wife.34:9 And make ye marriages with us; give your daughters to us, and take our daughters to you.34:10 And ye shall dwell with us: and the land shall be before you; dwell and trade ye therein, and get yourself possessions therein.34:11 And Shechem said to her father and to her brethren, Let me find favor in your eyes, and what ye shall say to me I will give.34:12 Ask me never so much dowry and gift, and I will give according as ye shall say to me: but give me the damsel for wife.34:13 And the sons of Jacob answered Shechem and Hamor his father with deceit, and spoke, because he had defiled Dinah their sister,34:14 and said to them, We cannot do this thing, to give our sister to one that is uncircumcised; for that would be a reproach to us.34:15 Only on this condition will we consent to you: if ye will be as we are, that every male of you be circumcised;34:16 then will we give our daughters to you, and we will take your daughters to us, and we will dwell with you, and we will become one people.34:17 But if ye will not hearken to us, to be circumcised; then will we take our daughter, and we will be gone.34:18 And their words pleased Hamor, and Shechem Hamor's son.34:19 And the young man delayed not to do the thing, because he had delight in Jacob's daughter: and he was honored above all the house of his father.34:20 And Hamor and Shechem his son came to the gate of their city, and communed with the men of their city, saying,34:21 These men are peaceable with us; therefore let them dwell in the land, and trade therein; for, behold, the land is large enough for them; let us take their daughters to us for wives, and let us give them our daughters.34:22 Only on this condition will the men consent to us to dwell with us, to become one people, if every male among us be circumcised, as they are circumcised.34:23 Shall not their cattle and their substance and all their beasts be ours?  only let us consent to them, and they will dwell with us.34:24 And to Hamor and to Shechem his son they hearkened, all who went out of the gate of his city; and every male was circumcised, all who went out of the gate of his city.34:25 And it came to pass on the third day, when they were sore, that two of the sons of Jacob, Simeon and Levi, Dinah's brothers, took each man his sword, and came upon the city unawares, and slew all the males.34:26 And they slew Hamor and Shechem his son with the edge of the sword, and took Dinah out of Shechem's house, and went forth.34:27 The sons of Jacob came upon the slain, and plundered the city, because they had defiled their sister.34:28 They took their flocks and their herds and their asses, and that which was in the city, and that which was in the field;34:29 and all their wealth, and all their little ones and their wives, took they captive and made a prey, even all that was in the house.34:30 And Jacob said to Simeon and Levi, You have troubled me, to make me odious to the inhabitants of the land, among the Canaanites and the Perizzites: and, I being few in number, they will gather themselves together against me and attack me; and I shall be destroyed, I and my house.34:31 And they said, Should he treat our sister like a prostitute?Chapter 3535:1 And God said to Jacob, arise, go up to Beth-el, and dwell there: and make there an altar to God, who appeared to you when you fled from the face of Esau your brother.35:2 Then Jacob said to his household, and to all that were with him, Put away the foreign gods that are among you, and purify yourselves, and change your garments:35:3 and let us arise, and go up to Beth-el; and I will make there an altar to God, who answered me in the day of my distress, and was with me in the way which I went.35:4 And they gave to Jacob all the foreign gods which were in their hand, and the rings which were in their ears; and Jacob hid them under the oak which was by Shechem.35:5 And they journeyed: and a terror of God was upon the cities that were round about them, and they did not pursue after the sons of Jacob.35:6 So Jacob came to Luz, which is in the land of Canaan (the same is Beth-el), he and all the people that were with him.35:7 And he built there an altar, and called the place El-beth-el; because there God was revealed to him, when he fled from the face of his brother.35:8 And Deborah Rebekah's nurse died, and she was buried below Beth-el under the oak: and the name of it was called Allon-bacuth.35:9 And God appeared to Jacob again, when he came from Paddan-aram, and blessed him.35:10 And God said to him, Your name is Jacob: your name shall not be called Jacob any more, but Israel shall be your name.  And he called his name Israel.35:11 And God said to him, I am God Almighty: be fruitful and multiply; a nation and a company of nations shall be from you, and kings shall come out of your loins;35:12 and the land which I gave to Abraham and Isaac, to you I will give it, and to your seed after you will I give the land.35:13 And God went up from him in the place where he spoke with him.35:14 And Jacob set up a pillar in the place where he spoke with him, a pillar of stone: and he poured out a drink offering on it, and poured oil on it.35:15 And Jacob called the name of the place where God spoke with him, Beth-el.35:16 And they journeyed from Beth-el; and there was still some distance to come to Ephrath: and Rachel went into labor, and she had hard labor.35:17 And it came to pass, when she was in hard labor, that the midwife said to her, Fear not; for now you shall have another son.35:18 And it came to pass, as her soul was departing (for she died), that she called his name Ben-oni: but his father called him Benjamin.35:19 And Rachel died, and was buried on the way to Ephrath (the same is Beth-lehem).35:20 And Jacob set up a pillar upon her grave: the same is the Pillar of Rachel's grave to this day.35:21 And Israel journeyed, and spread his tent beyond the tower of Eder.35:22 And it came to pass, while Israel dwelt in that land, that Reuben went and lay with Bilhah his father's concubine: and Israel heard of it.  Now the sons of Jacob were twelve:35:23 The sons of Leah: Reuben, Jacob's first-born, and Simeon, and Levi, and Judah, and Issachar, and Zebulun;35:24 the sons of Rachel: Joseph and Benjamin;35:25 and the sons of Bilhah, Rachel's handmaid: Dan and Naphtali;35:26 and the sons of Zilpah, Leah's handmaid: Gad and Asher: these are the sons of Jacob, that were born to him in Paddan-aram.35:27 And Jacob came to Isaac his father to Mamre, to Kiriath-arba (the same is Hebron), where Abraham and Isaac sojourned.35:28 And the days of Isaac were 180 years.35:29 And Isaac gave up the ghost, and died, and was gathered to his people, old and full of days: and Esau and Jacob his sons buried him.Chapter 3636:1 Now these are the generations of Esau (the same is Edom).36:2 Esau took his wives of the daughters of Canaan: Adah the daughter of Elon the Hittite, and Oholibamah the daughter of Anah, the daughter of Zibeon the Hivite,36:3 and Basemath Ishmael's daughter, sister of Nebaioth.36:4 And Adah bore to Esau Eliphaz; and Basemath bore Reuel;36:5 and Oholibamah bore Jeush, and Jalam, and Korah: these are the sons of Esau, that were born to him in the land of Canaan.36:6 And Esau took his wives, and his sons, and his daughters, and all the souls of his house, and his cattle, and all his animals, and all his possessions, which he had gathered in the land of Canaan; and went into a land away from his brother Jacob.36:7 For their possessions were too great for them to dwell together; and the land of their sojournings could not hold them both, because of their livestock.36:8 And Esau dwelt in mount Seir.  (Esau is the same as Edom.)36:9 And these are the generations of Esau the father of the Edomites in mount Seir:36:10 these are the names of Esau's sons: Eliphaz the son of Adah the wife of Esau, Reuel the son of Basemath the wife of Esau.36:11 And the sons of Eliphaz were Teman, Omar, Zepho, and Gatam, and Kenaz.36:12 And Timna was concubine to Eliphaz Esau's son; and she bore to Eliphaz Amalek: these are the sons of Adah, Esau's wife.36:13 And these are the sons of Reuel: Nahath, and Zerah, Shammah, and Mizzah: these were the sons of Basemath, Esau's wife.36:14 And these were the sons of Oholibamah the daughter of Anah, the daughter of Zibeon, Esau's wife: and she bore to Esau Jeush, and Jalam, and Korah.36:15 These are the chiefs of the sons of Esau: the sons of Eliphaz the first-born of Esau: chief Teman, chief Omar, chief Zepho, chief Kenaz,36:16 chief Korah, chief Gatam, chief Amalek: these are the chiefs that came of Eliphaz in the land of Edom; these are the sons of Adah.36:17 And these are the sons of Reuel, Esau's son: chief Nahath, chief Zerah, chief Shammah, chief Mizzah: these are the chiefs that came of Reuel in the land of Edom; these are the sons of Basemath, Esau's wife.36:18 And these are the sons of Oholibamah, Esau's wife: chief Jeush, chief Jalam, chief Korah: these are the chiefs that came of Oholibamah the daughter of Anah, Esau's wife.36:19 These are the sons of Esau, and these are their chiefs: the same is Edom.36:20 These are the sons of Seir the Horite, the inhabitants of the land: Lotan and Shobal and Zibeon and Anah,36:21 and Dishon and Ezer and Dishan: these are the chiefs that came of the Horites, the children of Seir in the land of Edom.36:22 And the children of Lotan were Hori and Heman.  And Lotan's sister was Timna.36:23 And these are the children of Shobal: Alvan and Manahath and Ebal, Shepho and Onam.36:24 And these are the children of Zibeon: Aiah and Anah; this is Anah who found the hot springs in the wilderness, as he fed the donkeys of his father Zibeon.36:25 And these are the children of Anah: Dishon and Oholibamah the daughter of Anah.36:26 And these are the children of Dishon: Hemdan and Eshban and Ithran and Cheran.36:27 These are the children of Ezer: Bilhan and Zaavan and Akan.36:28 These are the children of Dishan: Uz and Aran.36:29 These are the chiefs that came of the Horites: chief Lotan, chief Shobal, chief Zibeon, chief Anah,36:30 chief Dishon, chief Ezer, chief Dishan: these are the chiefs that came of the Horites, according to their chiefs in the land of Seir.36:31 And these are the kings that reigned in the land of Edom, before there reigned any king over the children of Israel.36:32 And Bela the son of Beor reigned in Edom; and the name of his city was Dinhabah.36:33 And Bela died, and Jobab the son of Zerah of Bozrah reigned in his stead.36:34 And Jobab died, and Husham of the land of the Temanites reigned in his stead.36:35 And Husham died, and Hadad the son of Bedad, who defeated Midian in the field of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Avith.36:36 And Hadad died, and Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead.36:37 And Samlah died, and Shaul of Rehoboth by the River reigned in his stead.36:38 And Shaul died, and Baal-hanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead.36:39 And Baal-hanan the son of Achbor died, and Hadar reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Pau; and his wife's name was Mehetabel, the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Me-zahab.36:40 And these are the names of the chiefs that came of Esau, according to their families, after their places, by their names: chief Timna, chief Alvah, chief Jetheth,36:41 chief Oholibamah, chief Elah, chief Pinon,36:42 chief Kenaz, chief Teman, chief Mibzar,36:43 chief Magdiel, chief Iram: these are the chiefs of Edom, according to their habitations in the land of their possession.  This is Esau, the father of the Edomites.Chapter 3737:1 And Jacob dwelt in the land of his father's sojournings, in the land of Canaan.37:2 These are the generations of Jacob.  Joseph, being seventeen years old, was feeding the flock with his brothers; and he was a lad with the sons of Bilhah, and with the sons of Zilpah, his father's wives: and Joseph brought the evil report of them to their father.37:3 Now Israel loved Joseph more than the rest of his children, because he was the son of his old age: and he made for him a coat of many colors.37:4 And his brothers saw that their father loved him more than the rest of his brothers; and they hated him, and could not speak peaceably to him.37:5 And Joseph dreamed a dream, and he told it to his brothers: and they hated him even more.37:6 And he said to them, Listen, I pray you, to this dream which I have dreamed:37:7 for, behold, we were binding sheaves in the field, and, lo, my sheaf arose, and also stood upright; and, behold, your sheaves came in a circle around, and bowed down to my sheaf.37:8 And his brothers said to him, Shall you indeed reign over us?  Or shall you indeed have dominion over us?  And they hated him all the more because of his dreams, and because of his words.37:9 And he dreamed yet another dream, and told it to his brothers, and said, Behold, I have dreamed yet a dream: and, behold, the sun and the moon and eleven stars bowed down to me.37:10 And he told it to his father and to his brothers; and his father rebuked him, and said to him, What is this dream that you have dreamed?  Shall I and your mother and your brothers indeed come to bow down ourselves to you to the earth?37:11 And his brothers envied him; but his father kept the saying in mind.37:12 And his brothers went to feed their father's flock in Shechem.37:13 And Israel said to Joseph, are not your brothers feeding the flock in Shechem?  Come, and I will send you to them.  And he said to him, Here am I.37:14 And he said to him, Go now, see whether it is well with your brothers, and well with the flock; and bring word back to me.  So he sent him out of the valley of Hebron, and he came to Shechem.37:15 And a certain man found him, and, behold, he was wandering in the field: and the man asked him, saying, What are you looking for?37:16 And he said, I am looking for my brothers.  Tell me, I pray you, where it is they are feeding the flock.37:17 And the man said, They are departed from here; for I heard them say, Let us go to Doesan.  And Joseph went after his brothers, and found them in Doesan.37:18 And they saw him afar off, and before he came near to them, they conspired against him to kill him.37:19 And they said one to another, Behold, this dreamer comes.37:20 Come now therefore, and let us kill him, and throw him into one of the pits, and we will say, a fierce animal has devoured him.  Then we shall see what will become of his dreams.37:21 And Reuben heard it, and rescued him out of their hand, and said, Let us not take his life.37:22 And Reuben said to them, "Shed no blood; throw him into this pit that is in the wilderness, but lay no hand upon him," so that he might deliver him out of their hand, to restore him to his father.37:23 And it came to pass, when Joseph was come to his brothers, that they stripped Joseph of his coat, the coat of many colors that was on him;37:24 and they took him, and threw him into the pit.  And the pit was empty; there was no water in it.37:25 And they sat down to eat bread: and they lifted up their eyes and looked, and, behold, a caravan of Ishmaelites was coming from Gilead, with their camels bearing spices and balm and myrrh, going to carry it down to Egypt.37:26 And Judah said to his brothers, What profit is it if we slay our brother and conceal his blood?37:27 Come, and let us sell him to the Ishmaelites, and let not our hand be upon him; for he is our brother, our flesh.  And his brothers listened to him.37:28 And there passed by Midianites, merchant men; and they drew and lifted up Joseph out of the pit, and sold Joseph to the Ishmaelites for twenty pieces of silver.  And they took Joseph into Egypt.37:29 And Reuben returned to the pit; and, behold, Joseph was not in the pit.  And he tore his clothes.37:30 And he returned to his brothers, and said, The child is not; and I, where shall I go?37:31 And they took Joseph's coat, and killed a he-goat, and dipped the coat in the blood;37:32 and they sent the coat of many colors, and they brought it to their father, and said, This have we found: see now whether it is your son's coat or not.37:33 And he recognized it, and said, It is my son's coat: an evil beast has devoured him; Joseph is without doubt torn in pieces.37:34 And Jacob tore his garments, and put sackcloth on his loins, and mourned for his son many days.37:35 And all his sons and all his daughters rose up to comfort him; but he refused to be comforted; and he said, For I will go down to Sheol to my son mourning.  And his father wept for him.37:36 And the Midianites sold him into Egypt to Potiphar, an officer of Pharaoh's, the captain of the guard.Chapter 3838:1 And it came to pass at that time, that Judah went down from his brothers, and turned in to a certain Adullamite, whose name was Hirah.38:2 And Judah saw there a daughter of a certain Canaanite whose name was Shua.  And he took her, and went in to her.38:3 And she conceived, and bore a son; and he called his name Er.38:4 And she conceived again, and bore a son; and she called his name Onan.38:5 And she yet again bore a son, and called his name Shelah: and he was at Chezib, when she bore him.38:6 And Judah took a wife for Er his first-born, and her name was Tamar.38:7 And Er, Judah's first-born, was wicked in the sight of Yahweh.  And Yahweh put him to death.38:8 And Judah said to Onan, Go in to your brother's wife, and perform the duty of a husband's brother to her, and raise up seed to your brother.38:9 And Onan knew that the seed would not be his; and it came to pass, when he went in to his brother's wife, that he spilled it on the ground, so that he not give seed to his brother.38:10 And the thing which he did was evil in the sight of Yahweh: and he put him to death also.38:11 Then said Judah to Tamar his daughter-in-law, Remain a widow in your father's house, till Shelah my son is grown up; for he said, I fear he also might die, like his brothers.  And Tamar went and dwelt in her father's house.38:12 And in process of time Shua's daughter, the wife of Judah, died; and Judah was comforted, and went up to his sheep-shearers to Timnah, he and his friend Hirah the Adullamite.38:13 And it was told to Tamar, as follows: Behold, your father-in-law goes up to Timnah to shear his sheep.38:14 And she put off from her the widow's garments, and covered herself with her veil, and wrapped herself, and sat in the gate of Enaim, which is by the way to Timnah; for she saw that Shelah was grown up, and she was not given to him to wife.38:15 When Judah saw her, he thought she was a prostitute, because she had covered her face.38:16 And he turned to her by the way, and said, Come, I pray you, let me come in to you: for he knew not that she was his daughter-in-law.  And she said, What will you give me, that you may come in to me?38:17 And he said, I will send you a kid of the goats from the flock.  And she said, Will you give me a pledge, till you send it?38:18 And he said, What pledge shall I give you?  And she said, Your signet and your cord, and your staff that is in your hand.  And he gave them to her, and came in to her, and she conceived by him.38:19 And she arose, and went away, and put off her veil from her, and put on her widow's garments.38:20 And Judah sent the kid of the goats by the hand of his friend the Adullamite, to receive the pledge from the woman's hand: but he found her not.38:21 Then he asked the men of her place, saying, Where is the prostitute, that was at Enaim by the wayside?  And they said, There has been no prostitute here.38:22 And he returned to Judah, and said, I have not found her; and also the men of the place said, There has been no prostitute here.38:23 And Judah said, Let her keep it all, or we might be laughed at: behold, I sent this kid, and you have not found her.38:24 And it came to pass about three months afterward, that it was told Judah, as follows: Tamar your daughter-in-law has played the harlot; and moreover, behold, she is with child by whoredom.  And Judah said, Bring her forth, and let her be burnt.38:25 When she was brought forth, she sent to her father-in-law, saying, By the man, to whom these belong, am I with child: and she said, Discern, I pray you, whose are these, the signet, and the cords, and the staff.38:26 And Judah acknowledged them, and said, She is more righteous than I, since I did not give her to Shelah my son.  And he knew her again no longer.38:27 And it came to pass in the time of her labor, that, behold, twins were in her womb.38:28 And it came to pass, when she was in labor, that one put out a hand: and the midwife took and tied on his hand a scarlet thread, saying, This one came out first.38:29 And it came to pass, as he drew back his hand, that, behold, his brother came out: and she said, Why have you made a breach for yourself?  Therefore his name was called Perez.38:30 And afterward came out his brother, that had the scarlet thread on his hand: and his name was called Zerah.Chapter 3939:1 And Joseph was brought down to Egypt; and Potiphar, an officer of Pharaoh's, the captain of the guard, an Egyptian, bought him from the hand of the Ishmaelites that had brought him down there.39:2 And Yahweh was with Joseph, and he was a prosperous man; and he was in the house of his master the Egyptian.39:3 And his master saw that Yahweh was with him, and that Yahweh made all that he did to prosper in his hand.39:4 And Joseph found favor in his sight, and he ministered to him: and he made him overseer over his house, and all that he had he put into his hand.39:5 And it came to pass from the time that he made him overseer in his house, and over all that he had, that Yahweh blessed the Egyptian's house for Joseph's sake; and the blessing of Yahweh was upon all that he had, in the house and in the field.39:6 And he left all that he had in Joseph's hand; and he knew not anything that was with him, except the bread which he ate.  And Joseph was handsome, and well-favored.39:7 And it came to pass after these things, that his master's wife cast her eyes upon Joseph; and she said, Lie with me.39:8 But he refused, and said to his master's wife, Behold, my master knows not what is with me in the house, and he has put all that he has into my hand:39:9 he is not greater in this house than I; neither has he withheld anything from me except you, because you are his wife.  How then can I do this great wickedness, and sin against God?39:10 And it came to pass, as she spoke to Joseph day by day, that he refused to listen to her, to lie by her, or to be with her.39:11 And it came to pass about this time, that he went into the house to do his work; and there were none of the men of the house present inside.39:12 And she caught him by his garment, saying, Lie with me: and he left his garment in her hand, and fled, and got himself out.39:13 And it came to pass, when she saw that he had left his garment in her hand, and was fled forth,39:14 that she called to the men of her house, and spoke to them, saying, See, he has brought in a Hebrew to us to mock us: he came in to me to lie with me, and I cried with a loud voice:39:15 and it came to pass, when he heard that I lifted up my voice and cried, that he left his garment by me, and fled, and got himself out.39:16 And she laid up his garment by her, until his master came home.39:17 And she spoke to him according to these words, saying, The Hebrew servant, whom you have brought to us, came in to me to mock me:39:18 and it came to pass, as I lifted up my voice and cried, that he left his garment by me, and fled out.39:19 And it came to pass, when his master heard the words of his wife, which she spoke to him, saying, after this manner did your servant to me; that his wrath was kindled.39:20 And Joseph's master took him, and put him into the prison, the place where the king's prisoners were bound: and he was there in the prison.39:21 But Yahweh was with Joseph, and showed kindness to him, and gave him favor in the sight of the keeper of the prison.39:22 And the keeper of the prison committed to Joseph's hand all the prisoners that were in the prison; and whatsoever they did there, he was the doer of it.39:23 The keeper of the prison paid no attention to anything that was under his hand, because Yahweh was with him; and that which he did, Yahweh made it prosper.Chapter 4040:1 And it came to pass after these things, that the butler of the king of Egypt and his baker offended their lord the king of Egypt.40:2 And Pharaoh was angry against his two officers, against the chief of the butlers, and against the chief of the bakers.40:3 And he put them in custody in the house of the captain of the guard, into the prison, the place where Joseph was bound.40:4 And the captain of the guard charged Joseph with them, and he ministered to them: and they continued a season in custody.40:5 And they dreamed a dream both of them, each man his dream, in one night, each man according to the interpretation of his dream, the butler and the baker of the king of Egypt, who were bound in the prison.40:6 And Joseph came in to them in the morning, and saw them, and, behold, they were sad.40:7 And he asked Pharaoh's officers that were with him in custody in his master's house, saying, Why look ye so sad today?40:8 And they said to him, We have dreamed a dream, and there is no one who can interpret it.  And Joseph said to them, Do not interpretations belong to God?  tell it to me, I pray you.40:9 And the chief butler told his dream to Joseph, and said to him, In my dream, behold, a vine was before me;40:10 and in the vine were three branches: and it was as though it budded, and its blossoms shot forth; and the clusters of it brought forth ripe grapes:40:11 and Pharaoh's cup was in my hand; and I took the grapes, and pressed them into Pharaoh's cup, and I gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand.40:12 And Joseph said to him, This is the interpretation of it: the three branches are three days;40:13 within yet three days shall Pharaoh lift up your head, and restore you to your office: and you shall give Pharaoh's cup into his hand, after the former manner when you were his butler.40:14 But have me in your remembrance when it shall be well with you, and show kindness, I pray you, to me, and make mention of me to Pharaoh, and bring me out of this house:40:15 for indeed I was stolen away out of the land of the Hebrews: and here also have I done nothing that they should put me in the dungeon.40:16 When the chief baker saw that the interpretation was good, he said to Joseph, I also was in my dream, and, behold, three baskets of white bread were on my head:40:17 and in the uppermost basket there were all kinds of baked food for Pharaoh; and the birds ate them out of the basket on my head.40:18 And Joseph answered and said, This is the interpretation of it: the three baskets are three days;40:19 within yet three days shall Pharaoh lift up your head from off you, and shall hang you on a tree; and the birds shall eat your flesh from off you.40:20 And it came to pass the third day, which was Pharaoh's birthday, that he made a feast for all his servants: and he lifted up the head of the chief butler and the head of the chief baker among his servants.40:21 And he restored the chief butler to his butlership again; and he gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand:40:22 but he hanged the chief baker: as Joseph had interpreted to them.40:23 Yet the chief butler did not remember Joseph, but forgot him.Chapter 4141:1 And it came to pass at the end of two full years, that Pharaoh dreamed: and, behold, he stood by the river.41:2 And, behold, there came up out of the river seven cattle, well-favored and fat-fleshed; and they fed in the reed-grass.41:3 And, behold, seven other cattle came up after them out of the river, ill-favored and lean-fleshed, and stood by the other cattle upon the brink of the river.41:4 And the ill-favored and lean-fleshed cattle ate up the seven well-favored and fat cattle.  So Pharaoh awoke.41:5 And he slept and dreamed a second time: and, behold, seven ears of grain came up on one stalk, rank and good.41:6 And, behold, seven ears, thin and blasted with the east wind, sprung up after them.41:7 And the thin ears swallowed up the seven rank and full ears.  And Pharaoh awoke, and, behold, it was a dream.41:8 And it came to pass in the morning that his spirit was troubled; and he sent and called for all the magicians of Egypt, and all the wise men thereof: and Pharaoh told them his dream; but there was none that could interpret them to Pharaoh.41:9 Then spoke the chief butler to Pharaoh, saying, I do remember my faults this day:41:10 Pharaoh was angry with his servants, and put me in custody in the house of the captain of the guard, me and the chief baker:41:11 and we dreamed a dream in the same night, I and he; we dreamed each man according to the interpretation of his dream.41:12 And there was with us there a young man, a Hebrew, servant to the captain of the guard; and we told him, and he interpreted for us our dreams; to each man according to his dream he did interpret.41:13 And it came to pass, just as he interpreted to us, that is how it was: me he restored to my office, and him he hanged.41:14 Then Pharaoh sent and called Joseph, and they brought him hastily out of the dungeon: and he shaved himself, and changed his clothes, and came in to Pharaoh.41:15 And Pharaoh said to Joseph, I have dreamed a dream, and there is none that can interpret it: and I have heard it said of you, that when you hear a dream you can interpret it.41:16 And Joseph answered Pharaoh, saying, It is not in me: God will give Pharaoh an answer of peace.41:17 And Pharaoh spoke to Joseph, In my dream, behold, I stood upon the brink of the river:41:18 and, behold, there came up out of the river seven cattle, fat-fleshed and well-favored: and they fed in the reed-grass:41:19 and, behold, seven other cattle came up after them, poor and very ill-favored and lean-fleshed, such as I never saw in all the land of Egypt for badness:41:20 and the lean and ill-favored cattle ate up the first seven fat cattle:41:21 and when they had eaten them up, it could not be known that they had eaten them; but rather were still ill-favored, as at the beginning.  So I awoke.41:22 And I saw in my dream, and, behold, seven ears came up on one stalk, full and good:41:23 and, behold, seven ears, withered, thin, and blasted with the east wind, sprang up after them:41:24 and the thin ears swallowed up the seven good ears: and I told it to the magicians; but there was no one that could declare it to me.41:25 And Joseph said to Pharaoh, The dream of Pharaoh is one: what God is about to do he has declared to Pharaoh.41:26 The seven good cattle are seven years; and the seven good ears are seven years: the dream is one.41:27 And the seven lean and ill-favored cattle that came up after them are seven years, and also the seven empty ears blasted with the east wind; they shall be seven years of famine.41:28 That is the thing which I spoke to Pharaoh: what God is about to do, he has shown to Pharaoh.41:29 Behold, there come seven years of great plenty throughout all the land of Egypt:41:30 and there shall arise after them seven years of famine; and all the plenty shall be forgotten in the land of Egypt; and the famine shall consume the land;41:31 and the plenty shall not be known in the land by reason of that famine which follows; for it shall be very severe.41:32 And for that reason the dream was doubled to Pharaoh, it is because the thing is established by God, and God will shortly bring it to pass.41:33 Now therefore let Pharaoh look out for a man discreet and wise, and set him over the land of Egypt.41:34 Let Pharaoh do this, and let him appoint overseers over the land, and take up one fifth of the land of Egypt in the seven plenteous years.41:35 And let them gather all the food of these good years that come, and lay up grain under the hand of Pharaoh for food in the cities, and let them preserve it.41:36 And the food shall be for a store for the land against the seven years of famine, which shall be in the land of Egypt; so that the land not perish because of the famine.41:37 And the thing was good in the eyes of Pharaoh, and in the eyes of all his servants.41:38 And Pharaoh said to his servants, Can we find such a one as this, a man in whom the spirit of God is?41:39 And Pharaoh said to Joseph, Forasmuch as God has shown you all of this, there is no one so discreet and wise as you.41:40 You shall be over my house, and according to your word shall all my people be ruled: only in the throne will I be greater than you.41:41 And Pharaoh said to Joseph, See, I have set you over all the land of Egypt.41:42 And Pharaoh took off his signet ring from his hand, and put it on Joseph's hand, and arrayed him in vestures of fine linen, and put a gold chain around his neck;41:43 and he made him to ride in the second chariot which he had; and they cried before him, Bow the knee: and he set him over all the land of Egypt.41:44 And Pharaoh said to Joseph, I am Pharaoh, and without you shall no man lift up his hand or his foot in all the land of Egypt.41:45 And Pharaoh called Joseph's name Zaphenath-paneah; and he gave him for wife Asenath, the daughter of Poti-phera priest of On.  And Joseph went out over the land of Egypt.41:46 And Joseph was thirty years old when he stood before Pharaoh king of Egypt.  And Joseph went out from the presence of Pharaoh, and went throughout all the land of Egypt.41:47 And in the seven plenteous years the earth brought forth by handfuls.41:48 And he gathered up all the food of the seven years which were in the land of Egypt, and laid up the food in the cities: the food of the field, which was round about every city, laid he up in the same.41:49 And Joseph laid up grain like the sand of the sea, very much, until he left off counting; for it was without number.41:50 And to Joseph were born two sons before the year of famine came, whom Asenath, the daughter of Potiphera priest of On, bore to him.41:51 And Joseph called the name of the first-born Manasseh: For, said he, God has made me forget all my toil, and all my father's house.41:52 And the name of the second called he Ephraim: For God has made me fruitful in the land of my affliction.41:53 And the seven years of plenty, that was in the land of Egypt, came to an end.41:54 And the seven years of famine began to come, just as Joseph had said: and there was famine in all lands; but in the entire land of Egypt there was bread.41:55 And when all the land of Egypt was famished, the people cried to Pharaoh for bread: and Pharaoh said to all the Egyptians, Go to Joseph; what he says to you, do.41:56 And the famine covered the whole face of the earth: and Joseph opened all the store-houses, and sold to the Egyptians; and the famine was severe in the land of Egypt.41:57 And all countries came into Egypt, to Joseph to buy grain, because the famine was severe in all the earth.Chapter 4242:1 Now Jacob saw that there was grain in Egypt, and Jacob said to his sons, Why are you looking at each other?42:2 And he said, Behold, I have heard that there is grain in Egypt: go down there, and buy for us from there; so we may live, and not die.42:3 And Joseph's ten brothers went down to buy grain from Egypt.42:4 But Benjamin, Joseph's brother, Jacob did not send with his brothers; for he said, In case harm befalls him.42:5 And the sons of Israel came to buy among those that came: for the famine was in the land of Canaan.42:6 And Joseph was the governor over the land; he it was who sold to all the people of the land.  And Joseph's brothers came, and bowed down themselves to him with their faces to the earth.42:7 And Joseph saw his brothers, and he recognized them, but made himself a stranger to them, and spoke roughly with them; and he said to them, Where are you coming from?  And they said, From the land of Canaan to buy food.42:8 And Joseph recognized his brothers, but they did not recognize him.42:9 And Joseph remembered the dreams which he dreamed of them, and said to them, You are spies; to see the nakedness of the land ye are come.42:10 And they said to him, No, my lord, but to buy food are your servants come.42:11 We are all one man's sons; we are true men, your servants are no spies.42:12 And he said to them, No, but to see the nakedness of the land ye are come.42:13 And they said, We your servants are twelve brothers, the sons of one man in the land of Canaan; and, behold, the youngest is this day with our father, and one is not.42:14 And Joseph said to them, That is it that I spoke to you, saying, You are spies:42:15 By this ye shall be proven: by the life of Pharaoh ye shall not go forth from here, unless your youngest brother comes here.42:16 Send one of you, and let him fetch your brother, and ye shall be bound, that your words may be proved, whether there be truth in you: or else by the life of Pharaoh surely ye are spies.42:17 And he put them all together into ward three days.42:18 And Joseph said to them the third day, This do, and live: for I fear God:42:19 if ye be true men, let one of your brothers be bound in your prison-house; but go ye, carry grain for the famine of your houses:42:20 and bring your youngest brother to me; so shall your words be verified, and ye shall not die.  And they did so.42:21 And they said one to another, We are verily guilty concerning our brother, in that we saw the distress of his soul, when he besought us, and we would not hear; therefore is this distress come upon us.42:22 And Reuben answered them, saying, Spoke I not to you, saying, Do not sin against the child; and ye would not hear?  therefore also, behold, his blood is required.42:23 And they knew not that Joseph understood them; for there was an interpreter between them.42:24 And he turned himself around away from them, and wept; then he returned to them, and spoke to them, and took Simeon from among them, and bound him before their eyes.42:25 Then Joseph commanded to fill their vessels with grain, and to restore every man's money into his sack, and to give them provisions for the way: and thus was it done to them.42:26 And they laded their asses with their grain, and departed there.42:27 And as one of them opened his sack to give his donkey provender in the lodging-place, he espied his money; and, behold, it was in the mouth of his sack.42:28 And he said to his brothers, My money is restored; and, lo, it is even in my sack: and their heart failed them, and they turned trembling one to another, saying, What is this that God has done to us?42:29 And they came to Jacob their father to the land of Canaan, and told him all that had befallen them, saying,42:30 The man, the lord of the land, spoke roughly with us, and took us for spies of the country.42:31 And we said to him, We are true men; and we are no spies:42:32 we are twelve brothers, sons of our father; one is not, and the youngest is this day with our father in the land of Canaan.42:33 And the man, the lord of the land, said to us, Hereby shall I know that ye are true men: leave one of your brothers with me, and take grain for the famine of your houses, and go your way;42:34 and bring your youngest brother to me: then shall I know that ye are no spies, but that ye are true men: so will I deliver you your brother, and ye shall traffic in the land.42:35 And it came to pass as they emptied their sacks, that, behold, every man's bundle of money was in his sack: and when they and their father saw their bundles of money, they were afraid.42:36 And Jacob their father said to them, Me have ye bereaved of my children: Joseph is not, and Simeon is not, and ye will take Benjamin away: all these things are against me.42:37 And Reuben spoke to his father, saying, Slay my two sons, if I bring him not to you: deliver him into my hand, and I will bring him to you again.42:38 And he said, My son shall not go down with you; for his brother is dead, and he only is left: if harm befall him by the way in which ye go, then will ye bring down my gray hairs with sorrow to Sheol.Chapter 4343:1 And the famine was sore in the land.43:2 And it came to pass, when they had eaten up the grain which they had brought out of Egypt, their father said to them, Go again, buy us a little food.43:3 And Judah spoke to him, saying, The man did solemnly protest to us, saying, You shall not see my face, except your brother be with you.43:4 If you will send our brother with us, we will go down and buy you food:43:5 but if you will not send him, we will not go down; for the man said to us, You shall not see my face, except your brother be with you.43:6 And Israel said, Why dealt ye so ill with me, as to tell the man whether ye had yet a brother?43:7 And they said, The man questioned us closely about ourselves, and concerning our kindred, saying, Is your father yet alive?  have ye another brother?  and we told him according to the tenor of these words: could we in any wise know that he would say, Bring your brother down?43:8 And Judah said to Israel his father, Send the lad with me, and we will arise and go; that we may live, and not die, both we, and you, and also our little ones.43:9 I will be surety for him; of my hand shall you require him: if I bring him not to you, and set him before you, then let me bear the blame for ever:43:10 for except we had lingered, surely we had now returned a second time.43:11 And their father Israel said to them, If it be so now, do this: take of the choice fruits of the land in your vessels, and carry down the man a present, a little balm, and a little honey, spices and myrrh, nuts, and almonds;43:12 and take double money in your hand; and the money that was returned in the mouth of your sacks carry again in your hand; peradventure it was an oversight:43:13 take also your brother, and arise, go again to the man:43:14 and God Almighty give you mercy before the man, that he may release to you your other brother and Benjamin.  And if I be bereaved of my children, I am bereaved.43:15 And the men took that present, and they took double money in their hand, and Benjamin; and rose up, and went down to Egypt, and stood before Joseph.43:16 And when Joseph saw Benjamin with them, he said to the steward of his house, Bring the men into the house, and slay, and make ready; for the men shall dine with me at noon.43:17 And the man did as Joseph asked; and the man brought the men to Joseph's house.43:18 And the men were afraid, because they were brought to Joseph's house; and they said, Because of the money that was returned in our sacks at the first time are we brought in; that he may seek occasion against us, and fall upon us, and take us for bond slaves, and our asses.43:19 And they came near to the steward of Joseph's house, and they spoke to him at the door of the house,43:20 and said, Oh, my lord, we came indeed down at the first time to buy food:43:21 and it came to pass, when we came to the lodging-place, that we opened our sacks, and, behold, every man's money was in the mouth of his sack, our money in full weight: and we have brought it again in our hand.43:22 And other money have we brought down in our hand to buy food: we know not who put our money in our sacks.43:23 And he said, Peace be to you, fear not: your God, and the God of your father, has given you treasure in your sacks: I had your money.  And he brought Simeon out to them.43:24 And the man brought the men into Joseph's house, and gave them water, and they washed their feet.  And he gave their asses provender.43:25 And they made ready the present against Joseph's coming at noon: for they heard that they should eat bread there.43:26 And when Joseph came home, they brought him the present which was in their hand into the house, and bowed down themselves to him to the earth.43:27 And he asked them of their welfare, and said, Is your father well, the old man of whom ye spoke?  Is he yet alive?43:28 And they said, Your servant our father is well, he is yet alive.  And they bowed the head, and made obeisance.43:29 And he lifted up his eyes, and saw Benjamin his brother, his mother's son, and said, Is this your youngest brother, of whom ye spoke to me?  And he said, God be gracious to you, my son.43:30 And Joseph made haste; for his heart yearned over his brother: and he sought where to weep; and he entered into his chamber, and wept there.43:31 And he washed his face, and came out; and he refrained himself, and said, Set on bread.43:32 And they set on for him by himself, and for them by themselves, and for the Egyptians, that did eat with him, by themselves: because the Egyptians might not eat bread with the Hebrews; for that is an abomination to the Egyptians.43:33 And they sat before him, the first-born according to his birthright, and the youngest according to his youth: and the men marvelled one with another.43:34 And he took and sent messes to them from before him: but Benjamin's mess was five times so much as any of theirs.  And they drank, and were merry with him.Chapter 4444:1 And he commanded the steward of his house, saying, Fill the men's sacks with food, as much as they can carry, and put every man's money in his sack's mouth.44:2 And put my cup, the silver cup, in the sack's mouth of the youngest, and his grain money.  And he did according to the word that Joseph had spoken.44:3 As soon as the morning was light, the men were sent away, they and their asses.44:4 And when they were gone out of the city, and were not yet far off, Joseph said to his steward, Up, follow after the men; and when you overtake them, say to them, Why have ye rewarded evil for good?44:5 Is not this that in which my lord drinks, and whereby he indeed divines?  ye have done evil in so doing.44:6 And he overtook them, and he spoke to them these words.44:7 And they said to him, Why speaks my lord such words as these?  Far be it from your servants that they should do such a thing.44:8 Behold, the money, which we found in our sacks' mouths, we brought again to you out of the land of Canaan: how then should we steal out of your lord's house silver or gold?44:9 With whomsoever of your servants it be found, let him die, and we also will be my lord's bondservants.44:10 And he said, Now also let it be according to your words: he with whom it is found shall be my bondservant; and ye shall be blameless.44:11 Then they hurried, and took down every man his sack to the ground, and opened every man his sack.44:12 And he searched, and began at the eldest, and left off at the youngest: and the cup was found in Benjamin's sack.44:13 Then they rent their clothes, and laded every man his donkey, and returned to the city.44:14 And Judah and his brothers came to Joseph's house; and he was yet there: and they fell before him on the ground.44:15 And Joseph said to them, What deed is this that ye have done?  know ye not that such a man as I can indeed divine?44:16 And Judah said, What shall we say to my lord?  what shall we speak?  or how shall we clear ourselves?  God has found out the iniquity of your servants: behold, we are my lord's bondservants, both we, and he also in whose hand the cup is found.44:17 And he said, Far be it from me that I should do so: the man in whose hand the cup is found, he shall be my bondservant; but as for you, go up in peace to your father.44:18 Then Judah came near to him, and said, Oh, my lord, let your servant, I pray you, speak a word in my lord's ears, and let not your anger burn against your servant; for you are even as Pharaoh.44:19 My lord asked his servants, saying, Have ye a father, or a brother?44:20 And we said to my lord, We have a father, an old man, and a child of his old age, a little one; and his brother is dead, and he alone is left of his mother; and his father loves him.44:21 And you said to your servants, Bring him down to me, that I may set my eyes upon him.44:22 And we said to my lord, The lad cannot leave his father: for if he should leave his father, his father would die.44:23 And you said to your servants, Except your youngest brother come down with you, ye shall see my face no more.44:24 And it came to pass when we came up to your servant my father, we told him the words of my lord.44:25 And our father said, Go again, buy us a little food.44:26 And we said, We cannot go down: if our youngest brother be with us, then will we go down: for we may not see the man's face, expect our youngest brother be with us.44:27 And your servant my father said to us, You know that my wife bore me two sons:44:28 and the one went out from me, and I said, Surely he is torn in pieces; and I have not seen him since:44:29 and if ye take this one also from me, and harm befall him, ye will bring down my gray hairs with sorrow to Sheol.44:30 Now therefore when I come to your servant my father, and the lad is not with us; seeing that his life is bound up in the lad's life;44:31 it will come to pass, when he sees that the lad is not with us, that he will die: and your servants will bring down the gray hairs of your servant our father with sorrow to Sheol.44:32 For your servant became surety for the lad to my father, saying, If I bring him not to you, then shall I bear the blame to my father for ever.44:33 Now therefore, let your servant, I pray you, abide instead of the lad a bondservant to my lord; and let the lad go up with his brothers.44:34 For how shall I go up to my father, if the lad be not with me?  lest I see the evil that shall come on my father.Chapter 4545:1 Then Joseph could not restrain himself before all those who stood before him; and he proclaimed, Make every one go out from me.  And there stood no one with him, while Joseph made himself known to his brothers.45:2 And he wept aloud: and the Egyptians heard, and the house of Pharaoh heard.45:3 And Joseph said to his brothers, I am Joseph; is my father still alive?  And his brothers could not answer him, so troubled were they at his presence.45:4 And Joseph said to his brothers, Come near to me, I pray you.  And they came near.  And he said, I am Joseph your brother, whom ye sold into Egypt.45:5 And now be not grieved, nor angry with yourselves, that ye sold me here: for God sent me before you to preserve life.45:6 For these two years has the famine been in the land: and there are five more years, in which there shall be neither plowing nor harvest.45:7 And God sent me before you to preserve for you a remnant in the earth, and to keep alive by a great deliverance.45:8 So now it was not you that sent me here, but God: and he has made me a father to Pharaoh, and lord of all his house, and ruler over all the land of Egypt.45:9 Hasten ye, and go up to my father, and say to him, Thus says your son Joseph, God has made me lord of all Egypt: come down to me, do not delay;45:10 and you shall dwell in the land of Goshen, and you shall be near to me, you, and your children, and your children's children, and your flocks, and your herds, and all that you have:45:11 and there will I nourish you; for there are five years of famine to come; or you might come to poverty, you, and your household, and all that you have.45:12 And, behold, your eyes are seeing, and the eyes of my brother Benjamin, that it is my own mouth speaking to you.45:13 And ye shall tell my father about all my glory in Egypt, and of all that ye have seen: and ye shall hasten and bring my father down here.45:14 And he fell upon his brother Benjamin's neck, and wept; and Benjamin wept upon his neck.45:15 And he kissed all his brothers, and wept upon them: and after that his brothers talked with him.45:16 And the report of it was heard in Pharaoh's house, saying, Joseph's brothers have come.  And it pleased Pharaoh well, and his servants.45:17 And Pharaoh said to Joseph, Say to your brothers, This do ye: load your animals, and go, get yourself to the land of Canaan;45:18 and take your father and your households, and come to me: and I will give you the good of the land of Egypt, and ye shall eat the fat of the land.45:19 Now you are commanded, this do ye: take yourselves wagons out of the land of Egypt for your little ones, and for your wives, and bring your father, and come.45:20 Also regard not your stuff; for the good of all the land of Egypt is yours.45:21 And the sons of Israel did so: and Joseph gave them wagons, according to the commandment of Pharaoh, and gave them provision for the way.45:22 To all of them he gave each man changes of raiment; but to Benjamin he gave three hundred pieces of silver, and five changes of raiment.45:23 And to his father he sent after this manner: ten asses loaded with the good things of Egypt, and ten she-asses loaded with grain and bread and provision for his father by the way.45:24 So he sent his brothers away, and they departed: and he said to them, See that ye fall not out by the way.45:25 And they went up out of Egypt, and came into the land of Canaan to Jacob their father.45:26 And they told him as follows, Joseph is yet alive, and he is ruler over all the land of Egypt.  And his heart fainted, for he believed them not.45:27 And they told him all the words of Joseph, which he had said to them: and when he saw the wagons which Joseph had sent to carry him, the spirit of Jacob their father revived:45:28 and Israel said, It is enough; Joseph my son is yet alive: I will go and see him before I die.Chapter 4646:1 And Israel took his journey with all that he had, and came to Beer-sheba, and offered sacrifices to the God of his father Isaac.46:2 And God spoke to Israel in the visions of the night, and said, Jacob, Jacob.  And he said, Here am I.46:3 And he said, I am God, the God of your father: fear not to go down into Egypt; for there I will make of you a great nation:46:4 I will go down with you into Egypt; and I will also surely bring you up again: and Joseph shall put his hand upon your eyes.46:5 And Jacob rose up from Beer-sheba: and the sons of Israel carried Jacob their father, and their little ones, and their wives, in the wagons which Pharaoh had sent to carry him.46:6 And they took their cattle, and their goods, which they had gotten in the land of Canaan, and came into Egypt, Jacob, and all his seed with him:46:7 his sons, and his sons' sons with him, his daughters, and his sons' daughters, and all his seed he brought with him into Egypt.46:8 And these are the names of the children of Israel, who came into Egypt, Jacob and his sons: Reuben, Jacob's first-born.46:9 And the sons of Reuben: Hanoch, and Pallu, and Hezron, and Carmi.46:10 And the sons of Simeon: Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and Zohar, and Shaul the son of a Canaanitish woman.46:11 And the sons of Levi: Gershon, Kohath, and Merari.46:12 And the sons of Judah: Er, and Onan, and Shelah, and Perez, and Zerah; but Er and Onan died in the land of Canaan.  And the sons of Perez were Hezron and Hamul.46:13 And the sons of Issachar: Tola, and Puvah, and Iob, and Shimron.46:14 And the sons of Zebulun: Sered, and Elon, and Jahleel.46:15 These are the sons of Leah, whom she bore to Jacob in Paddan-aram, with his daughter Dinah: all the souls of his sons and his daughters were thirty and three.46:16 And the sons of Gad: Ziphion, and Haggi, Shuni, and Ezbon, Eri, and Arodi, and Areli.46:17 And the sons of Asher: Imnah, and Ishvah, and Ishvi, and Beriah, and Serah their sister; and the sons of Beriah: Heber, and Malchiel.46:18 These are the sons of Zilpah, whom Laban gave to Leah his daughter; and these she bore to Jacob, even sixteen souls.46:19 The sons of Rachel Jacob's wife: Joseph and Benjamin.46:20 And to Joseph in the land of Egypt were born Manasseh and Ephraim, whom Asenath, the daughter of Poti-phera priest of On, bore to him.46:21 And the sons of Benjamin: Bela, and Becher, and Ashbel, Gera, and Naaman, Ehi, and Rosh, Muppim, and Huppim, and Ard.46:22 These are the sons of Rachel, who were born to Jacob: all the souls were fourteen.46:23 And the sons of Dan: Hushim.46:24 And the sons of Naphtali: Jahzeel, and Guni, and Jezer, and Shillem.46:25 These are the sons of Bilhah, whom Laban gave to Rachel his daughter, and these she bore to Jacob: all the souls were seven.46:26 All the souls that came with Jacob into Egypt, that came out of his loins, besides Jacob's sons' wives, all the souls were 66;46:27 and the sons of Joseph, who were born to him in Egypt, were two souls: all the souls of the house of Jacob, that came into Egypt, were 70.46:28 And he sent Judah before him to Joseph, to show the way before him to Goshen; and they came into the land of Goshen.46:29 And Joseph made ready his chariot, and went up to meet Israel his father, to Goshen; and he presented himself to him, and fell on his neck, and wept on his neck a good while.46:30 And Israel said to Joseph, Now let me die, since I have seen your face, that you are yet alive.46:31 And Joseph said to his brothers, and to his father's house, I will go up, and tell Pharaoh, and will say to him, My brothers, and my father's house, who were in the land of Canaan, are come to me;46:32 and the men are shepherds, for they have been keepers of cattle; and they have brought their flocks, and their herds, and all that they have.46:33 And it shall come to pass, when Pharaoh shall call you, and shall say, What is your occupation?46:34 that ye shall say, Your servants have been keepers of cattle from our youth even until now, both we, and our fathers: that ye may dwell in the land of Goshen; for every shepherd is an abomination to the Egyptians.Chapter 4747:1 Then Joseph went in and told Pharaoh, and said, My father and my brothers, and their flocks, and their herds, and all that they have, are come out of the land of Canaan; and, behold, they are in the land of Goshen.47:2 And from among his brothers he took five men, and presented them to Pharaoh.47:3 And Pharaoh said to his brothers, What is your occupation?  And they said to Pharaoh, Your servants are shepherds, both we, and our fathers.47:4 And they said to Pharaoh, To sojourn in the land are we come; for there is no pasture for your servants' flocks; for the famine is sore in the land of Canaan: now therefore, we pray you, let your servants dwell in the land of Goshen.47:5 And Pharaoh spoke to Joseph, saying, Your father and your brothers are come to you:47:6 the land of Egypt is before you; in the best of the land make your father and your brothers to dwell; in the land of Goshen let them dwell: and if you know any able men among them, then make them rulers over my cattle.47:7 And Joseph brought in Jacob his father, and set him before Pharaoh: and Jacob blessed Pharaoh.47:8 And Pharaoh said to Jacob, How many are the days of the years of your life?47:9 And Jacob said to Pharaoh, The days of the years of my pilgrimage are 130 years: few and evil have been the days of the years of my life, and they have not attained to the days of the years of the life of my fathers in the days of their pilgrimage.47:10 And Jacob blessed Pharaoh, and went out from the presence of Pharaoh.47:11 And Joseph placed his father and his brothers, and gave them a possession in the land of Egypt, in the best of the land, in the land of Rameses, as Pharaoh had commanded.47:12 And Joseph nourished his father, and his brothers, and all his father's household, with bread, according to their families.47:13 And there was no bread in all the land; for the famine was very sore, so that the land of Egypt and the land of Canaan fainted by reason of the famine.47:14 And Joseph gathered up all the money that was found in the land of Egypt, and in the land of Canaan, for the grain which they bought: and Joseph brought the money into Pharaoh's house.47:15 And when the money was all spent in the land of Egypt, and in the land of Canaan, all the Egyptians came to Joseph, and said, Give us bread: for why should we die in your presence?  for our money is running out.47:16 And Joseph said, Give your cattle; and I will pay you for your cattle, if money runs out.47:17 And they brought their cattle to Joseph; and Joseph gave them bread in exchange for the horses, and for the flocks, and for the herds, and for the asses: and he fed them with bread in exchange for all their cattle for that year.47:18 And when that year was ended, they came to him the second year, and said to him, We will not hide from my lord, how that our money is all spent; and the herds of cattle are my lord's; there is nothing left in the sight of my lord, but our bodies, and our lands:47:19 why should we die before your eyes, both we and our land?  buy us and our land for bread, and we and our land will be servants to Pharaoh: and give us seed, that we may live, and not die, and that the land be not desolate.47:20 So Joseph bought all the land of Egypt for Pharaoh; for the Egyptians sold every man his field, because the famine was sore upon them: and the land became Pharaoh's.47:21 And as for the people, he removed them to the cities from one end of the border of Egypt even to the other end thereof.47:22 Only the land of the priests bought he not: for the priests had a portion from Pharaoh, and did eat their portion which Pharaoh gave them; therefore they sold not their land.47:23 Then Joseph said to the people, Behold, I have bought you this day and your land for Pharaoh: lo, here is seed for you, and ye shall sow the land.47:24 And it shall come to pass at the ingatherings, that ye shall give a fifth to Pharaoh, and four parts shall be your own, for seed of the field, and for your food, and for them of your households, and for food for your little ones.47:25 And they said, You have saved our lives: let us find favor in the sight of my lord, and we will be Pharaoh's servants.47:26 And Joseph made it a statute concerning the land of Egypt to this day, that Pharaoh should have the fifth; only the land of the priests alone became not Pharaoh's.47:27 And Israel dwelt in the land of Egypt, in the land of Goshen; and they got them possessions therein, and were fruitful, and multiplied exceedingly.47:28 And Jacob lived in the land of Egypt seventeen years: so the days of Jacob, the years of his life, were a hundred forty and seven years.47:29 And the time drew near that Israel must die: and he called his son Joseph, and said to him, If now I have found favor in your sight, put, I pray you, your hand under my thigh, and deal kindly and truly with me: bury me not, I pray you, in Egypt;47:30 but when I sleep with my fathers, you shall carry me out of Egypt, and bury me in their burying-place.  And he said, I will do as you have said.47:31 And he said, Swear to me: and he swore to him.  And Israel bowed himself upon the bed's head.Chapter 4848:1 And it came to pass after these things, that one said to Joseph, Behold, your father is sick: and he took with him his two sons, Manasseh and Ephraim.48:2 And one told Jacob, and said, Behold, your son Joseph comes to you: and Israel strengthened himself, and sat upon the bed.48:3 And Jacob said to Joseph, God Almighty appeared to me at Luz in the land of Canaan, and blessed me,48:4 and said to me, Behold, I will make you fruitful, and multiply you, and I will make of you a company of peoples, and will give this land to your seed after you for an everlasting possession.48:5 And now your two sons, who were born to you in the land of Egypt before I came to you into Egypt, are mine; Ephraim and Manasseh, even as Reuben and Simeon, shall be mine.48:6 And your issue, that you beget after them, shall be yours; they shall be called after the name of their brothers in their inheritance.48:7 And as for me, when I came from Paddan, Rachel died by me in the land of Canaan in the way, when there was still some distance to come to Ephrath: and I buried her there in the way to Ephrath (the same is Beth-lehem).48:8 And Israel beheld Joseph's sons, and said, Who are these?48:9 And Joseph said to his father, They are my sons, whom God has given me here.  And he said, Bring them, I pray you, to me, and I will bless them.48:10 Now the eyes of Israel were dim for age, so that he could not see.  And he brought them near to him; and he kissed them, and embraced them.48:11 And Israel said to Joseph, I had not thought to see your face: and, lo, God has let me see your seed also.48:12 And Joseph brought them out from between his knees; and he bowed himself with his face to the earth.48:13 And Joseph took them both, Ephraim in his right hand toward Israel's left hand, and Manasseh in his left hand toward Israel's right hand, and brought them near to him.48:14 And Israel stretched out his right hand, and laid it upon Ephraim's head, who was the younger, and his left hand upon Manasseh's head, guiding his hands wittingly; for Manasseh was the first-born.48:15 And he blessed Joseph, and said, The God before whom my fathers Abraham and Isaac did walk, the God who has fed me all my life long to this day,48:16 the angel who has redeemed me from all evil, bless the lads; and let my name be named on them, and the name of my fathers Abraham and Isaac; and let them grow into a multitude in the midst of the earth.48:17 And when Joseph saw that his father laid his right hand upon the head of Ephraim, it displeased him: and he held up his father's hand, to remove it from Ephraim's head to Manasseh's head.48:18 And Joseph said to his father, Not so, my father; for this is the first-born; put your right hand upon his head.48:19 And his father refused, and said, I know it, my son, I know it.  He also shall become a people, and he also shall be great: Nevertheless his younger brother shall be greater than he, and his seed shall become a multitude of nations.48:20 And he blessed them that day, saying, In you will Israel bless, saying, God make you as Ephraim and as Manasseh: and he set Ephraim before Manasseh.48:21 And Israel said to Joseph, Behold, I die: but God will be with you, and bring you again to the land of your fathers.48:22 Moreover I have given to you one portion above your brothers, which I took out of the hand of the Amorite with my sword and with my bow.Chapter 4949:1 And Jacob called to his sons, and said: gather yourselves together, that I may tell you that which shall befall you in the latter days.49:2 Assemble yourselves, and hear, ye sons of Jacob; And hearken to Israel your father.49:3 Reuben, you are my first-born, my might, and the beginning of my strength; The pre-eminence of dignity, and the pre-eminence of power.49:4 Boiling over as water, you shall not have the pre-eminence; Because you went up to your father's bed; Then you defiled it: he went up to my couch.49:5 Simeon and Levi are brothers; Weapons of violence are their swords.49:6 O my soul, come not you into their council; To their assembly, my glory, be not you united; For in their anger they slew a man, and in their self-will they hocked an ox.49:7 Cursed be their anger, for it was fierce; And their wrath, for it was cruel: I will divide them in Jacob, and scatter them in Israel.49:8 Judah, you shall your brothers praise: Your hand shall be on the neck of your enemies; Your father's sons shall bow down before you.49:9 Judah is a lion's whelp; From the prey, my son, you are gone up: He stooped down, he crouched as a lion, and as a lioness; who shall rouse him up?49:10 The scepter shall not depart from Judah, Nor the ruler's staff from between his feet, Until Shiloh come: And to him shall the obedience of the peoples be.49:11 Binding his foal to the vine, and his donkey's colt to the choice vine; He has washed his garments in wine, and his vesture in the blood of grapes:49:12 His eyes shall be red with wine, and his teeth white with milk.49:13 Zebulun shall dwell at the haven of the sea; And he shall be for a haven of ships; And his border shall be upon Sidon.49:14 Issachar is a strong donkey, Couching down between the sheepfolds:49:15 And he saw a resting-place that it was good, and the land that it was pleasant; And he bowed his shoulder to bear, and became a servant under forced labor.49:16 Dan shall judge his people, as one of the tribes of Israel.49:17 Dan shall be a serpent in the way, an adder in the path, That bites the horse's heels, So that his rider falls backward.49:18 I have waited for your salvation, O Yahweh.49:19 Gad, a troop shall press upon him; But he shall press upon their heel.49:20 Out of the Asher his bread shall be fat, and he shall yield royal dainties.49:21 Naphtali is a hind let loose: He gives goodly words.49:22 Joseph is a fruitful bough, a fruitful bough by a fountain; His branches run over the wall.49:23 The archers have sorely grieved him, and shot at him, and persecute him:49:24 But his bow abode in strength, and the arms of his hands were made strong, By the hands of the Mighty One of Jacob, (From there is the shepherd, the stone of Israel),49:25 Even by the God of your father, who shall help you, and by the Almighty, who shall bless you, With blessings of heaven above, Blessings of the deep that crouches beneath, Blessings of the breasts, and of the womb.49:26 The blessings of your father Have prevailed above the blessings of my progenitors To the utmost bound of the everlasting hills: They shall be on the head of Joseph, and on the crown of the head of him that was separate from his brothers.49:27 Benjamin is a ravenous wolf: In the morning she shall devour the prey, and at evening he shall divide the spoil.49:28 All these are the twelve tribes of Israel: and this is it that their father spoke to them and blessed them; every one according to his blessing he blessed them.49:29 And he charged them, and said to them, I am to be gathered to my people: bury me with my fathers in the cave that is in the field of Ephron the Hittite,49:30 in the cave that is in the field of Machpelah, which is before Mamre, in the land of Canaan, which Abraham bought with the field from Ephron the Hittite for a possession of a burying-place.49:31 there they buried Abraham and Sarah his wife; there they buried Isaac and Rebekah his wife; and there I buried Leah:49:32 the field and the cave that is in it, which was purchased from the children of Heth.49:33 And when Jacob made an end of charging his sons, he gathered up his feet into the bed, and yielded up the ghost, and was gathered to his people.Chapter 5050:1 And Joseph fell upon his father's face, and wept upon him, and kissed him.50:2 And Joseph commanded his servants the physicians to embalm his father: and the physicians embalmed Israel.50:3 And 40 days were fulfilled for him; for that is how the days of embalming are fulfilled: and the Egyptians wept for him 70 days.50:4 And when the days of weeping for him were past, Joseph spoke to the house of Pharaoh, saying, If now I have found favor in your eyes, speak, I pray you, in the ears of Pharaoh, saying,50:5 My father made me swear, saying, See, I am dying: in my grave which I have dug for me in the land of Canaan, there shall you bury me.  Now therefore let me go up, I pray you, and bury my father, and I will come again.50:6 And Pharaoh said, Go up, and bury your father, according as he made you swear.50:7 And Joseph went up to bury his father; and with him all the servants of Pharaoh went up, the elders of his house, and all the elders of the land of Egypt,50:8 and all the house of Joseph, and his brothers, and his father's house: only their little ones, and their flocks and their herds they left in the land of Goshen.50:9 And there went up with him both chariots and horsemen: and it was a very great company.50:10 And they came to the threshing-floor of Atad, which is beyond the Jordan, and there they lamented with a very great and sore lamentation: and he made a mourning for his father seven days.50:11 And when the inhabitants of the land, the Canaanites, saw the mourning in the floor of Atad, they said, This is a grievous mourning to the Egyptians: therefore the name of it was called Abel-mizraim, which is beyond the Jordan.50:12 And his sons did to him according as he commanded them:50:13 for his sons carried him into the land of Canaan, and buried him in the cave of the field of Machpelah, which Abraham bought along with the field, for a possession of a burying-place, from Ephron the Hittite, before Mamre.50:14 And Joseph returned into Egypt, he and his brothers and all who went up with him to bury his father, after he had buried his father.50:15 And when Joseph's brothers saw that their father was dead, they said, It may be that Joseph will hate us, and will fully repay us all the evil which we did to him.50:16 And they sent a message to Joseph, saying, Your father commanded before he died, saying,50:17 This ye shall say to Joseph, Forgive, I pray you now, the transgression of your brothers, and their sin, what harm they did to you.  So now, we pray you, forgive the transgression of the servants of the God of your father.  And Joseph wept when they spoke to him.50:18 And his brothers also went and fell down before his face; and they said, Behold, we are your servants.50:19 And Joseph said to them, Fear not: am I in the place of God?50:20 Though ye meant evil against me, yet God meant it for good, to bring to pass what it is this day, to save many people alive.50:21 Now therefore fear ye not: I will provide for you, and your little ones.  And he comforted them, and spoke kindly to them.50:22 And Joseph dwelt in Egypt, he, and his father's house: and Joseph lived 110 years.50:23 And Joseph saw Ephraim's children of the third generation: the children also of Machir the son of Manasseh were born upon Joseph's knees. 50:24 And Joseph said to his brothers, I am dying; but God will surely visit you, and bring you up out of this land to the land which he swore to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob.50:25 And Joseph took an oath of the children of Israel, saying, God will surely visit you, and ye shall carry up my bones from here.50:26 So Joseph died, being 110 years old: and they embalmed him, and he was put in a coffin in Egypt. End of GenesisExodusChapter 11:1 Now these are the names of the sons of Israel, who came into Egypt (every man and his household came with Jacob):1:2 Reuben, Simeon, Levi, and Judah,1:3 Issachar, Zebulun, and Benjamin,1:4 Dan and Naphtali, Gad and Asher.1:5 And all the souls that came out of the loins of Jacob were seventy souls: and Joseph was in Egypt already.1:6 And Joseph died, and all his brothers, and all that generation.1:7 And the children of Israel were fruitful, and increased abundantly, and multiplied, and grew exceedingly mighty; and the land was filled with them.1:8 Now there arose a new king over Egypt, who knew not Joseph.1:9 And he said to his people, Behold, the people of the children of Israel are more and mightier than we:1:10 Come, let us deal wisely with them, lest they multiply, and it come to pass, that, when there falls out any war, they also join themselves to our enemies, and fight against us, and get themselves up out of the land.1:11 Therefore they did set over them taskmasters to afflict them with their burdens.  And they built for Pharaoh store-cities, Pithom and Raamses.1:12 But the more they afflicted them, the more they multiplied and the more they spread abroad.  And the Egyptians were grieved because of the children of Israel.1:13 And they made the children of Israel to serve with rigor:1:14 and they made their lives bitter with hard service, in mortar and in brick, and in all manner of service in the field, all their service, in which they made them serve with rigor.1:15 And the king of Egypt spoke to the Hebrew midwives, of whom the name of the one was Shiphrah, and the name of the other Puah:1:16 and he said, When ye do the office of a midwife to the Hebrew women, and see them upon the birth-stool; if it be a son, then ye shall kill him; but if it be a daughter, then she shall live.1:17 But the midwives feared God, and did not do as the king of Egypt commanded them, but saved the male children alive.1:18 And the king of Egypt called for the midwives, and said to them, Why have ye done this thing, and have saved the male children alive?1:19 And the midwives said to Pharaoh, Because the Hebrew women are not as the Egyptian women; for they are lively, and are delivered before the midwife is come to them.1:20 And God dealt well with the midwives: and the people multiplied, and grew very mighty.1:21 And it came to pass, because the midwives feared God, that he made them households.1:22 And Pharaoh charged all his people, saying, Every son that is born ye shall cast into the river, and every daughter ye shall save alive.Chapter 22:1 And there went a man of the house of Levi, and took to wife a daughter of Levi.2:2 And the woman conceived, and bore a son: and when she saw him that he was a goodly child, she hid him three months.2:3 And when she could no longer hide him, she took for him an ark of papyrus reeds, and daubed it with slime and with pitch; and she put the child in it, and laid it in the reeds by the river's brink.2:4 And his sister stood afar off, to find out what would be done to him.2:5 And the daughter of Pharaoh came down to bathe at the river; and her maidens walked along by the riverside; and she saw the ark among the reeds, and sent her handmaid to fetch it.2:6 And she opened it, and saw the child: and, behold, the baby cried.  And she had compassion on him, and said, This is one of the Hebrews' children.2:7 Then said his sister to Pharaoh's daughter, Shall I go and call for you a nurse of the Hebrew women, so she may nurse the child for you?2:8 And Pharaoh's daughter said to her, Go.  And the maiden went and called the child's mother.2:9 And Pharaoh's daughter said to her, Take this child away, and nurse it for me, and I will give you your wages.  And the woman took the child, and nursed it.2:10 And the child grew, and she brought him to Pharaoh's daughter, and he became her son.  And she called his name Moses, and said, Because I drew him out of the water.2:11 And it came to pass in those days, when Moses was grown up, that he went out to his brethren, and looked on their burdens: and he saw an Egyptian striking a Hebrew, one of his brethren.2:12 And he looked this way and that way, and when he saw that there was no one, he struck down the Egyptian, and hid him in the sand.2:13 And he went out the second day, and, behold, two men of the Hebrews were striving together: and he said to him that did the wrong, Why do you strike your fellow?2:14 And he said, Who made you a prince and a judge over us?  Do you intend to kill me, as you killed the Egyptian?  And Moses feared, and said, Surely the thing is known.2:15 Now when Pharaoh heard this thing, he sought to slay Moses.  But Moses fled from the face of Pharaoh, and dwelt in the land of Midian: and he sat down by a well.2:16 Now the priest of Midian had seven daughters: and they came and drew water, and filled the troughs to water their father's flock.2:17 And the shepherds came and drove them away; but Moses stood up and helped them, and watered their flock.2:18 And when they came to Reuel their father, he said, How is it that ye are come so soon today?2:19 And they said, an Egyptian delivered us out of the hand of the shepherds, and moreover he drew water for us, and watered the flock.2:20 And he said to his daughters, and where is he?  Why is it that ye have left the man?  Call him, that he may eat bread.2:21 And Moses was content to dwell with the man: and he gave Moses Zipporah his daughter.2:22 And she bore a son, and he called his name Gershom; for he said, I have been a sojourner in a foreign land.2:23 And it came to pass in the course of those many days, that the king of Egypt died: and the children of Israel sighed by reason of the bondage, and they cried, and their cry came up to God by reason of the bondage.2:24 And God heard their groaning, and God remembered his covenant with Abraham, with Isaac, and with Jacob.2:25 And God saw the children of Israel, and God took knowledge of them.Chapter 33:1 Now Moses was keeping the flock of Jethro his father-in-law, the priest of Midian: and he led the flock to the back of the wilderness, and came to the mountain of God, to Horeb.3:2 And the angel of Yahweh appeared to him in a flame of fire out of the midst of a bush: and he looked, and, behold, the bush burned with fire, and the bush was not consumed.3:3 And Moses said, I will turn aside now, and see this great sight, why the bush is not burnt.3:4 And when Yahweh saw that he turned aside to see, God called to him out of the midst of the bush, and said, Moses, Moses.  And he said, Here am I.3:5 And he said, Draw not near to here: put off your shoes from off your feet, for the place whereon you stand is holy ground.3:6 Moreover he said, I am the God of your father, the God of Abraham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob.  And Moses hid his face; for he was afraid to look upon God.3:7 And Yahweh said, I have surely seen the affliction of my people that are in Egypt, and have heard their cry by reason of their taskmasters; for I know their sorrows;3:8 and I am come down to deliver them out of the hand of the Egyptians, and to bring them up out of that land to a good land and a large, to a land flowing with milk and honey; to the place of the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and the Amorite, and the Perizzite, and the Hivite, and the Jebusite.3:9 And now, behold, the cry of the children of Israel is come to me: moreover I have seen the oppression with which the Egyptians oppress them.3:10 Come now therefore, and I will send you to Pharaoh, that you may bring forth my people the children of Israel out of Egypt.3:11 And Moses said to God, Who am I, that I should go to Pharaoh, and that I should bring forth the children of Israel out of Egypt?3:12 And he said, Certainly I will be with you; and this shall be the token to you, that I have sent you: when you have brought forth the people out of Egypt, ye shall serve God upon this mountain.3:13 And Moses said to God, Behold, when I come to the children of Israel, and shall say to them, The God of your fathers has sent me to you; and they shall say to me, What is his name?  What shall I say to them?3:14 And God said to Moses, I AM THAT I AM: and he said, Thus shall you say to the children of Israel, I AM has sent me to you.3:15 And God said moreover to Moses, Thus shall you say to the children of Israel, Yahweh, the God of your fathers, the God of Abraham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob, has sent me to you: this is my name forever, and this is my memorial to all generations.3:16 Go, and gather the elders of Israel together, and say to them, Yahweh, the God of your fathers, the God of Abraham, of Isaac, and of Jacob, has appeared to me, saying, I have surely visited you, and seen that which is done to you in Egypt:3:17 and I have said, I will bring you up out of the affliction of Egypt to the land of the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and the Amorite, and the Perizzite, and the Hivite, and the Jebusite, to a land flowing with milk and honey.3:18 And they shall hearken to your voice: and you shall come, you and the elders of Israel, to the king of Egypt, and ye shall say to him, Yahweh, the God of the Hebrews, has met with us: and now let us go, we pray you, three days' journey into the wilderness, that we may sacrifice to Yahweh our God.3:19 And I know that the king of Egypt will not give you leave to go, no, not by a mighty hand.3:20 And I will put forth my hand, and strike Egypt with all my wonders which I will do in the midst of it: and after that he will let you go.3:21 And I will give this people favor in the sight of the Egyptians: and it shall come to pass, that, when ye go, ye shall not go empty.3:22 But every woman shall ask of her neighbor, and of her that sojourns in her house, jewels of silver, and jewels of gold, and raiment: and ye shall put them upon your sons, and upon your daughters; and ye shall despoil the Egyptians.Chapter 44:1 And Moses answered and said, But, behold, they will not believe me, nor hearken to my voice; for they will say, Yahweh has not appeared to you.4:2 And Yahweh said to him, What is that in your hand?  And he said, a rod.4:3 And he said, Cast in on the ground.  And he cast it on the ground, and it became a serpent; and Moses fled from before it.4:4 And Yahweh said to Moses, Put forth your hand, and take it by the tail: (and he put forth his hand, and laid hold of it, and it became a rod in his hand:)4:5 That they may believe that Yahweh, the God of their fathers, the God of Abraham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob, has appeared to you.4:6 And Yahweh said furthermore to him, Put now your hand into your bosom.  And he put his hand into his bosom: and when he took it out, behold, his hand was leprous, as white as snow.4:7 And he said, Put your hand into your bosom again.  (And he put his hand into his bosom again; and when he took it out of his bosom, behold, it was turned back like his other flesh.)4:8 And it shall come to pass, if they will not believe you, nor listen to the voice of the first sign, that they will believe the voice of the latter sign.4:9 And it shall come to pass, if they will not believe even these two signs, nor listen to your voice, that you shall take of the water of the river, and pour it upon the dry land: and the water which you take out of the river shall become blood upon the dry land.4:10 And Moses said to Yahweh, Oh, Lord, I am not eloquent, neither heretofore, nor since you have spoken to your servant; for I am slow of speech, and of a slow tongue.4:11 And Yahweh said to him, Who has made man's mouth?  Or who makes a man mute, or deaf, or seeing, or blind?  Is it not I, Yahweh?4:12 Now therefore go, and I will be with your mouth, and teach you what you shall speak.4:13 And he said, Oh, Lord, send, I pray you, by the hand of him whom you will send.4:14 And the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Moses, and he said, Is there not Aaron your brother the Levite?  I know that he can speak well.  And also, behold, he is coming forth to meet you: and when he sees you, he will be glad in his heart.4:15 And you shall speak to him, and put the words in his mouth: and I will be with your mouth, and with his mouth, and will teach you what ye shall do.4:16 And he shall be your spokesman to the people; and it shall come to pass, that he shall be to you a mouth, and you shall be to him as God.4:17 And you shall take in your hand this rod, with which you shall do the signs.4:18 And Moses went and returned to Jethro his father-in-law, and said to him, Let me go, I pray you, and return to my brethren that are in Egypt, and see whether they be yet alive.  And Jethro said to Moses, Go in peace.4:19 And Yahweh said to Moses in Midian, Go, return into Egypt; for all the men are dead that sought your life.4:20 And Moses took his wife and his sons, and set them upon a donkey, and he returned to the land of Egypt: and Moses took the rod of God in his hand.4:21 And Yahweh said to Moses, When you go back into Egypt, see that you do before Pharaoh all the wonders which I have put in your hand: but I will harden his heart and he will not let the people go.4:22 And you shall say to Pharaoh, Thus says Yahweh, Israel is my son, my first-born:4:23 and I have said to you, Let my son go, that he may serve me; and you have refused to let him go: behold, I will slay your son, your first-born.4:24 And it came to pass on the way at the lodging-place, that Yahweh met him, and sought to kill him.4:25 Then Zipporah took a flint, and cut off the foreskin of her son, and cast it at his feet; and she said, A bloody husband you surely are to me.4:26 Therefore Yahweh left him alone.  Then she said, a bloody husband are you, because of the circumcision.4:27 And Yahweh said to Aaron, Go into the wilderness to meet Moses.  And he went, and met him in the mountain of God, and kissed him.4:28 And Moses told Aaron all the words of Yahweh with which he had sent him, and all the signs with which he had charged him.4:29 And Moses and Aaron went and gathered together all the elders of the children of Israel:4:30 and Aaron spoke all the words which Yahweh had spoken to Moses, and did the signs in the sight of the people.4:31 And the people believed: and when they heard that Yahweh had visited the children of Israel, and that he had seen their affliction, then they bowed their heads and worshipped.Chapter 55:1 And afterward Moses and Aaron came, and said to Pharaoh, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Let my people go, that they may hold a feast to me in the wilderness.5:2 And Pharaoh said, Who is Yahweh, that I should listen to his voice to let Israel go?  I know not Yahweh, and moreover I will not let Israel go.5:3 And they said, The God of the Hebrews has met with us: let us go, we pray you, three days' journey into the wilderness, and sacrifice to Yahweh our God, lest he fall upon us with pestilence, or with the sword.5:4 And the king of Egypt said to them, Why do ye, Moses and Aaron, release the people from their tasks?  get yourselves to your burdens.5:5 And Pharaoh said, Behold, the people of the land are now many, and ye make them rest from their burdens.5:6 And the same day Pharaoh commanded the taskmasters of the people, and their officers, saying,5:7 You shall no more give the people straw to make brick, as up until now: let them go and gather straw for themselves.5:8 And the number of the bricks, which they did make until now, ye shall lay upon them; ye shall not diminish anything about it: for they are lazy; that is why they are crying, saying, Let us go and sacrifice to our God.5:9 Let heavier work be laid upon the men, that they may labor therein; and let them not regard lying words.5:10 And the taskmasters of the people went out, and their officers, and they spoke to the people, saying, Thus says Pharaoh, I will not give you straw.5:11 Go yourselves, get yourselves straw where ye can find it: for nothing of your work shall be diminished.5:12 So the people were scattered abroad throughout all the land of Egypt to gather stubble for straw.5:13 And the taskmasters were urgent saying, Fulfill your works, your daily tasks, as when there was straw.5:14 And the officers of the children of Israel, whom Pharaoh's taskmasters had set over them, were beaten, and demanded, Why have ye not fulfilled your task both yesterday and today, in making brick as previously?5:15 Then the officers of the children of Israel came and cried to Pharaoh, saying, Why are you dealing with your servants in this way?5:16 There is no straw given to your servants, and they say to us, Make brick: and, behold, your servants are beaten; but the fault is in your own people.5:17 But he said, You are lazy, ye are lazy: that is why ye say, Let us go and sacrifice to Yahweh.5:18 Go therefore now, and work; for there shall no straw be given you, yet shall ye deliver the number of bricks.5:19 And the officers of the children of Israel did see that they were in an evil situation, when it was said, You shall not diminish anything from your bricks, your daily tasks.5:20 And they met Moses and Aaron, who stood in the way, as they came forth from Pharaoh:5:21 and they said to them, Yahweh look upon you, and judge: because ye have made our savor to be abhorred in the eyes of Pharaoh, and in the eyes of his servants, to put a sword in their hand to slay us.5:22 And Moses returned to Yahweh, and said, Lord, why have you dealt ill with this people?  why is it that you have sent me?5:23 For since I came to Pharaoh to speak in your name, he has dealt ill with this people; neither have you delivered your people at all.Chapter 66:1 And Yahweh said to Moses, Now shall you see what I will do to Pharaoh: for by a strong hand shall he let them go, and by a strong hand shall he drive them out of his land.6:2 And God spoke to Moses, and said to him, I am Yahweh:6:3 and I appeared to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, as God Almighty; but by my name Yahweh I was not known to them.6:4 And I have also established my covenant with them, to give them the land of Canaan, the land of their sojournings, in which they sojourned.6:5 And moreover I have heard the groaning of the children of Israel, whom the Egyptians keep in bondage; and I have remembered my covenant.6:6 Wherefore say to the children of Israel, I am Yahweh, and I will bring you out from under the burdens of the Egyptians, and I will rid you out of their bondage, and I will redeem you with an outstretched arm, and with great judgments:6:7 and I will take you to myself for a people, and I will be to you a God; and ye shall know that I am Yahweh your God, who brings you out from under the burdens of the Egyptians.6:8 And I will bring you in to the land which I swore to give to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob; and I will give it you for a heritage: I am Yahweh.6:9 And Moses spoke so to the children of Israel: but they did not listen to Moses for anguish of spirit and because of cruel bondage.6:10 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,6:11 Go in, speak to Pharaoh king of Egypt, that he let the children of Israel go out of his land.6:12 And Moses spoke before Yahweh, saying, Behold, the children of Israel have not listened to me; how then shall Pharaoh listen to me, I who am of uncircumcised lips?6:13 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, and gave them a charge for the children of Israel, and for Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt.6:14 These are the heads of their fathers' houses.  The sons of Reuben the first-born of Israel: Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi; these are the families of Reuben.6:15 And the sons of Simeon: Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and Zohar, and Shaul the son of a Canaanitish woman; these are the families of Simeon.6:16 And these are the names of the sons of Levi according to their generations: Gershon, and Kohath, and Merari; and the years of the life of Levi were a hundred thirty and seven years.6:17 The sons of Gershon: Libni and Shimei, according to their families.6:18 And the sons of Kohath: Amram, and Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel; and the years of the life of Kohath were a hundred thirty and three years.6:19 And the sons of Merari: Mahli and Mushi.  These are the families of the Levites according to their generations.6:20 And Amram took him Jochebed his father's sister to wife; and she bore him Aaron and Moses: and the years of the life of Amram were a hundred and thirty and seven years.6:21 And the sons of Izhar: Korah, and Nepheg, and Zichri.6:22 And the sons of Uzziel: Mishael, and Elzaphan, and Sithri.6:23 And Aaron took him Elisheba, the daughter of Amminadab, the sister of Nahshon, to wife; and she bore him Nadab and Abihu, Eleazar and Ithamar.6:24 And the sons of Korah: Assir, and Elkanah, and Abiasaph; these are the families of the Korahites.6:25 And Eleazar Aaron's son took him one of the daughters of Putiel to wife; and she bore him Phinehas.  These are the heads of the fathers' houses of the Levites according to their families.6:26 These are that Aaron and Moses, to whom Yahweh said, Bring out the children of Israel from the land of Egypt according to their hosts.6:27 These are they that spoke to Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring out the children of Israel from Egypt: these are that Moses and Aaron.6:28 And it came to pass on the day when Yahweh spoke to Moses in the land of Egypt,6:29 that Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying, I am Yahweh: speak to Pharaoh king of Egypt all that I speak to you.6:30 And Moses said before Yahweh, Behold, I am of uncircumcised lips, and how shall Pharaoh hearken to me?Chapter 77:1 And Yahweh said to Moses, See, I have made you as God to Pharaoh; and Aaron your brother shall be your prophet.7:2 You shall speak all that I command you; and Aaron your brother shall speak to Pharaoh, that he must let the children of Israel go out of his land.7:3 And I will harden Pharaoh's heart, and multiply my signs and my wonders in the land of Egypt.7:4 But Pharaoh will not listen to you, and then I will lay my hand upon Egypt, and bring forth my hosts, my people the children of Israel, out of the land of Egypt, by great judgments.7:5 And the Egyptians shall know that I am Yahweh, when I stretch forth my hand upon Egypt, and bring out the children of Israel from among them.7:6 And Moses and Aaron did so; as Yahweh commanded them, that they did.7:7 And Moses was 80 years old, and Aaron 83 years old, when they spoke to Pharaoh.7:8 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,7:9 When Pharaoh shall speak to you, saying, Show a miracle; then you shall say to Aaron, Take your rod, and cast it down before Pharaoh, and it will become a serpent.7:10 And Moses and Aaron went in to Pharaoh, and they did so, as Yahweh had commanded: and Aaron cast down his rod before Pharaoh and before his servants, and it became a serpent.7:11 Then Pharaoh also called for the wise men and the sorcerers: and they also, the magicians of Egypt, performed in like manner with their enchantments.7:12 For every man of them cast down his rod, and they became serpents.  But, aaron's rod swallowed up their rods.7:13 Yet Pharaoh's heart was hardened, and he did not listen to them; as Yahweh had said.7:14 And Yahweh said to Moses, Pharaoh's heart is stubborn, he refuses to let the people go.7:15 Get you to Pharaoh in the morning; lo, he goes out to the water; and you shall stand by the river's brink to meet him; and the rod which was turned to a serpent you shall take in your hand.7:16 And you shall say to him, Yahweh, the God of the Hebrews, has sent me to you, saying, Let my people go, that they may serve me in the wilderness: and, behold, so far you have not listened.7:17 Thus says Yahweh, In this you shall know that I am Yahweh: behold, I will strike with the rod that is in my hand upon the waters which are in the river, and they shall be turned to blood.7:18 And the fish that are in the river shall die, and the river shall become foul; and the Egyptians shall loathe to drink water from the river.7:19 And Yahweh said to Moses, Say to Aaron, Take your rod, and stretch out your hand over the waters of Egypt, over their rivers, over their streams, and over their pools, and over all their ponds of water, that they may become blood; and there shall be blood throughout all the land of Egypt, both in vessels of wood and in vessels of stone.7:20 And Moses and Aaron did so, as Yahweh commanded; and he lifted up the rod, and struck the waters that were in the river, in the sight of Pharaoh, and in the sight of his servants; and all the waters that were in the river were turned to blood.7:21 And the fish that were in the river died; and the river became foul, and the Egyptians could not drink water from the river; and the blood was throughout all the land of Egypt.7:22 And the magicians of Egypt did in like manner with their enchantments: and Pharaoh's heart was hardened, and he hearkened not to them; as Yahweh had spoken.7:23 And Pharaoh turned and went into his house, neither did he lay even this to heart.7:24 And all the Egyptians dug round about the river for water to drink; for they could not drink of the water of the river.7:25 And seven days were fulfilled, after that Yahweh had smitten the river.Chapter 88:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, Go in to Pharaoh, and say to him, Thus says Yahweh, Let my people go, that they may serve me.8:2 And if you refuse to let them go, behold, I will strike all your territory with frogs:8:3 and the river shall swarm with frogs, which shall go up and come into your house, and into your bedchamber, and upon your bed, and into the house of your servants, and upon your people, and into your ovens, and into your kneading-troughs:8:4 and the frogs shall come up both upon you, and upon your people, and upon all your servants.8:5 And Yahweh said to Moses, Say to Aaron, Stretch forth your hand with your rod over the rivers, over the streams, and over the pools, and cause frogs to come up upon the land of Egypt.8:6 And Aaron stretched out his hand over the waters of Egypt; and the frogs came up, and covered the land of Egypt.8:7 And the magicians did in like manner with their enchantments, and brought up frogs upon the land of Egypt.8:8 Then Pharaoh called for Moses and Aaron, and said, Entreat Yahweh, that he take away the frogs from me, and from my people; and I will let the people go, that they may sacrifice to Yahweh.8:9 And Moses said to Pharaoh, Have you this glory over me: against what time shall I entreat for you, and for your servants, and for your people, that the frogs be destroyed from you and your houses, and remain in the river only?8:10 And he said, against tomorrow.  And he said, Be it according to your word; that you may know that there is none like to Yahweh our God.8:11 And the frogs shall depart from you, and from your houses, and from your servants, and from your people; they shall remain in the river only.8:12 And Moses and Aaron went out from Pharaoh: and Moses cried to Yahweh concerning the frogs which he had brought upon Pharaoh.8:13 And Yahweh did according to the word of Moses; and the frogs died out of the houses, out of the courts, and out of the fields.8:14 And they gathered them together in heaps; and the land stank.8:15 But when Pharaoh saw that there was respite, he hardened his heart, and hearkened not to them, as Yahweh had spoken.8:16 And Yahweh said to Moses, Say to Aaron, Stretch out your rod, and strike the dust of the earth, that is may become lice throughout all the land of Egypt.8:17 And they did so; and Aaron stretched out his hand with his rod, and struck the dust of the earth, and there were lice upon man, and upon beast; all the dust of the earth became lice throughout all the land of Egypt.8:18 And the magicians did so with their enchantments to bring forth lice, but they could not: and there were lice upon man, and upon beast.8:19 Then the magicians said to Pharaoh, This is the finger of God: and Pharaoh's heart was hardened, and he hearkened not to them; as Yahweh had spoken.8:20 And Yahweh said to Moses, Rise up early in the morning, and stand before Pharaoh; lo, he comes forth to the water; and say to him, Thus says Yahweh, Let my people go, that they may serve me.8:21 Else, if you will not let my people go, behold, I will send swarms of flies upon you, and upon they servants, and upon your people, and into your houses: and the houses of the Egyptians shall be full of swarms of flies, and also the ground whereon they are.8:22 And I will set apart in that day the land of Goshen, in which my people dwell, that no swarms of flies shall be there; to the end you may know that I am Yahweh in the midst of the earth.8:23 And I will put a division between my people and your people: by tomorrow shall this sign be.8:24 And Yahweh did so; and there came grievous swarms of flies into the house of Pharaoh, and into his servants' houses: and in all the land of Egypt the land was corrupted by reason of the swarms of flies.8:25 And Pharaoh called for Moses and for Aaron, and said, Go ye, sacrifice to your God in the land.8:26 And Moses said, It is not meet so to do; for we shall sacrifice the abomination of the Egyptians to Yahweh our God: lo, shall we sacrifice the abomination of the Egyptians before their eyes, and will they not stone us?8:27 We will go three days' journey into the wilderness, and sacrifice to Yahweh our God, as he shall command us.8:28 And Pharaoh said, I will let you go, that ye may sacrifice to Yahweh your God in the wilderness; only ye shall not go very far away: entreat for me.8:29 And Moses said, Behold, I go out from you, and I will entreat Yahweh that the swarms of flies may depart from Pharaoh, from his servants, and from his people, tomorrow: only let not Pharaoh deal deceitfully any more in not letting the people go to sacrifice to Yahweh.8:30 And Moses went out from Pharaoh, and entreated Yahweh.8:31 And Yahweh did according to the word of Moses; and he removed the swarms of flies from Pharaoh, from his servants, and from his people; there remained not one.8:32 And Pharaoh hardened his heart this time also, and he did not let the people go.Chapter 99:1 Then Yahweh said to Moses, Go in to Pharaoh, and tell him, Thus says Yahweh, the God of the Hebrews, Let my people go, that they may serve me.9:2 For if you refuse to let them go, and will hold them still,9:3 behold, the hand of Yahweh is upon your cattle which are in the field, upon the horses, upon the asses, upon the camels, upon the herds, and upon the flocks: there shall be a very grievous murrain.9:4 And Yahweh shall make a distinction between the cattle of Israel and the cattle of Egypt; and there shall nothing die of all that belongs to the children of Israel.9:5 And Yahweh appointed a set time, saying, Tomorrow Yahweh shall do this thing in the land.9:6 And Yahweh did that thing on the morrow; and all the cattle of Egypt died; but of the cattle of the children of Israel died not one.9:7 And Pharaoh sent, and, behold, there was not so much as one of the cattle of the Israelites dead.  But the heart of Pharaoh was stubborn, and he did not let the people go.9:8 And Yahweh said to Moses and to Aaron, Take to you handfuls of ashes of the furnace, and let Moses sprinkle it toward heaven in the sight of Pharaoh.9:9 And it shall become small dust over all the land of Egypt, and shall be a boil breaking forth with sores upon man and upon beast, throughout all the land of Egypt.9:10 And they took ashes of the furnace, and stood before Pharaoh; and Moses sprinkled it up toward heaven; and it became a boil breaking forth with sores upon man and upon beast.9:11 And the magicians could not stand before Moses because of the boils; for the boils were upon the magicians, and upon all the Egyptians.9:12 And Yahweh hardened the heart of Pharaoh, and he hearkened not to them, as Yahweh had spoken to Moses.9:13 And Yahweh said to Moses, Rise up early in the morning, and stand before Pharaoh, and say to him, Thus says Yahweh, the God of the Hebrews, Let my people go, that they may serve me.9:14 For I will this time send all my plagues upon your heart, and upon your servants, and upon your people; that you may know that there is none like me in all the earth.9:15 For now I had put forth my hand, and smitten you and your people with pestilence, and you had been cut off from the earth:9:16 but in very deed for this cause have I made you to stand, to show you my power, and that my name may be declared throughout all the earth.9:17 You are still exalting yourself against my people, that you will not let them go?9:18 Behold, tomorrow about this time I will cause it to rain a very grievous hail, such as has not been in Egypt since the day it was founded even until now.9:19 Now therefore send, hasten in your cattle and all that you have in the field; for every man and beast that shall be found in the field, and shall not be brought home, the hail shall come down upon them, and they shall die.9:20 He that feared the word of Yahweh among the servants of Pharaoh made his servants and his cattle flee into the houses.9:21 And he that regarded not the word of Yahweh left his servants and his cattle in the field.9:22 And Yahweh said to Moses, Stretch forth your hand toward heaven, that there may be hail in all the land of Egypt, upon man, and upon beast, and upon every herb of the field, throughout the land of Egypt.9:23 And Moses stretched forth his rod toward heaven: and Yahweh sent thunder and hail, and fire ran down to the earth; and Yahweh rained hail upon the land of Egypt.9:24 So there was hail, and fire mingled with the hail, very grievous, such as had not been in all the land of Egypt since it became a nation.9:25 And the hail struck throughout all the land of Egypt all that was in the field, both man and beast; and the hail struck every herb of the field, and broke every tree of the field.9:26 Only in the land of Goshen, where the children of Israel were, was there no hail.9:27 And Pharaoh sent, and called for Moses and Aaron, and said to them, I have sinned this time: Yahweh is righteous, and I and my people are wicked.9:28 Entreat Yahweh; for there has been enough of these mighty thunderings and hail; and I will let you go, and ye shall stay no longer.9:29 And Moses said to him, as soon as I am gone out of the city, I will spread abroad my hands to Yahweh; the thunders shall cease, neither shall there be any more hail; that you may know that the earth is Yahweh's.9:30 But as for you and your servants, I know that ye will not yet fear Yahweh God.9:31 And the flax and the barley were smitten: for the barley was in the ear, and the flax was in bloom.9:32 But the wheat and the spelt were not smitten: for they were not grown up.9:33 And Moses went out of the city from Pharaoh, and spread abroad his hands to Yahweh: and the thunders and hail ceased, and the rain was not poured upon the earth.9:34 And when Pharaoh saw that the rain and the hail and the thunders were ceased, he sinned yet more, and hardened his heart, he and his servants.9:35 And the heart of Pharaoh was hardened, and he did not let the children of Israel go, as Yahweh had spoken by Moses.Chapter 1010:1 And Yahweh said to Moses, Go in to Pharaoh: for I have hardened his heart, and the heart of his servants, that I may show these my signs in the midst of them,10:2 and that you may tell in the ears of your son, and of your son's son, what things I have wrought upon Egypt, and my signs which I have done among them; that ye may know that I am Yahweh.10:3 And Moses and Aaron went in to Pharaoh, and said to him, Thus says Yahweh, the God of the Hebrews, How long will you refuse to humble yourself before me?  let my people go, that they may serve me.10:4 Else, if you refuse to let my people go, behold, tomorrow will I bring locusts into your border:10:5 and they shall cover the face of the earth, so that one shall not be able to see the earth: and they shall eat the residue of that which is escaped, which remains to you from the hail, and shall eat every tree which grows for you out of the field:10:6 and your houses shall be filled, and the houses of all your servants, and the houses of all the Egyptians; as neither your fathers nor your fathers' fathers have seen, since the day that they were upon the earth to this day.  And he turned, and went out from Pharaoh.10:7 And Pharaoh's servants said to him, How long shall this man be a snare to us?  let the men go, that they may serve Yahweh their God: do you not yet know that Egypt is destroyed?10:8 And Moses and Aaron were brought again to Pharaoh: and he said to them, Go, serve Yahweh your God; but who are they that shall go?10:9 And Moses said, We will go with our young and with our old; with our sons and with our daughters, with our flocks and with our herds will we go; for we must hold a feast to Yahweh.10:10 And he said to them, So be Yahweh with you, as I will let you go, and your little ones: look to it; for evil is before you.10:11 Not so: go now ye that are men, and serve Yahweh; for that is what ye desire.  And they were driven out from Pharaoh's presence.10:12 And Yahweh said to Moses, Stretch out your hand over the land of Egypt for the locusts, that they may come up upon the land of Egypt, and eat every herb of the land, even all that the hail has left.10:13 And Moses stretched forth his rod over the land of Egypt, and Yahweh brought an east wind upon the land all that day, and all the night; and when it was morning, the east wind brought the locusts.10:14 And the locusts went up over all the land of Egypt, and rested in all the borders of Egypt; very grievous were they; before them there were no such locusts as they, neither after them shall be such.10:15 For they covered the face of the whole earth, so that the land was darkened; and they did eat every herb of the land, and all the fruit of the trees which the hail had left: and there remained not any green thing, either tree or herb of the field, through all the land of Egypt.10:16 Then Pharaoh called for Moses and Aaron in haste; and he said, I have sinned against Yahweh your God, and against you.10:17 Now therefore forgive, I pray you, my sin only this once, and entreat Yahweh your God, that he may take away from me this death only.10:18 And he went out from Pharaoh, and entreated Yahweh.10:19 And Yahweh turned an exceedingly strong west wind, which took up the locusts, and drove them into the Red Sea; there remained not one locust in all the border of Egypt.10:20 But Yahweh hardened Pharaoh's heart, and he did not let the children of Israel go.10:21 And Yahweh said to Moses, Stretch out your hand toward heaven, that there may be darkness over the land of Egypt, even darkness which may be felt.10:22 And Moses stretched forth his hand toward heaven; and there was a thick darkness in all the land of Egypt three days;10:23 they saw not one another, neither rose any one from his place for three days: but all the children of Israel had light in their dwellings.10:24 And Pharaoh called to Moses, and said, Go ye, serve Yahweh; only let your flocks and your herds be stayed: let your little ones also go with you.10:25 And Moses said, You must also give into our hand sacrifices and burnt offerings, that we may sacrifice to Yahweh our God.10:26 Our cattle also shall go with us; there shall not a hoof be left behind: for thereof must we take to serve Yahweh our God; and we know not with what we must serve Yahweh, until we come there.10:27 But Yahweh hardened Pharaoh's heart, and he would not let them go.10:28 And Pharaoh said to him, Get you from me, take heed to yourself, see my face no more; for in the day you see my face you shall die.10:29 And Moses said, You have spoken well.  I will see your face again no more.Chapter 1111:1 And Yahweh said to Moses, Yet one plague more will I bring upon Pharaoh, and upon Egypt; afterwards he will let you go from here: when he shall let you go, he shall surely thrust you out from here altogether.11:2 Speak now in the ears of the people, and let them ask every man of his neighbor, and every woman of her neighbor, jewels of silver, and jewels of gold.11:3 And Yahweh gave the people favor in the sight of the Egyptians.  Moreover the man Moses was very great in the land of Egypt, in the sight of Pharaoh's servants, and in the sight of the people.11:4 And Moses said, Thus says Yahweh, about midnight will I go out into the midst of Egypt:11:5 and all the first-born in the land of Egypt shall die, from the first-born of Pharaoh that sits upon his throne, even to the first-born of the maid-servant that is behind the mill; and all the first-born of cattle.11:6 And there shall be a great cry throughout all the land of Egypt, such as there has not been, nor shall be any more.11:7 But against any of the children of Israel shall not a dog move his tongue, against man or beast: that ye may know how that Yahweh makes a distinction between the Egyptians and Israel.11:8 And all these your servants shall come down to me, and bow down themselves to me, saying, Get you out, and all the people that follow you: and after that I will go out.  And he went out from Pharaoh in hot anger.11:9 And Yahweh said to Moses, Pharaoh will not hearken to you; that my wonders may be multiplied in the land of Egypt.11:10 And Moses and Aaron did all these wonders before Pharaoh: and Yahweh hardened Pharaoh's heart, and he did not let the children of Israel go out of his land.Chapter 1212:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and Aaron in the land of Egypt, saying,12:2 This month shall be to you the beginning of months: it shall be the first month of the year to you.12:3 Speak ye to all the congregation of Israel, saying, In the tenth day of this month they shall take to them every man a lamb, according to their fathers' houses, a lamb for a household:12:4 and if the household be too little for a lamb, then shall he and his neighbor next to his house take one according to the number of the souls; according to every man's eating ye shall make your count for the lamb.12:5 Your lamb shall be without blemish, a male a year old: ye shall take it from the sheep, or from the goats:12:6 and ye shall keep it until the fourteenth day of the same month; and the whole assembly of the congregation of Israel shall kill it at twilight. 12:7 And they shall take of the blood, and put it on the two side-posts and on the lintel, upon the houses in which they shall eat it.12:8 And they shall eat the flesh in that night, roast with fire, and unleavened bread; with bitter herbs they shall eat it.12:9 Eat not of it raw, nor boiled at all with water, but roast with fire; its head with its legs and with the inwards thereof.12:10 And ye shall let nothing of it remain until the morning; but that which remains of it until the morning ye shall burn with fire.12:11 And thus shall ye eat it: with your loins girded, your shoes on your feet, and your staff in your hand; and ye shall eat it in haste: it is Yahweh's Passover.12:12 For I will go through the land of Egypt in that night, and will strike down all the first-born in the land of Egypt, both man and beast; and against all the gods of Egypt I will execute judgments: I am Yahweh.12:13 And the blood shall be to you for a token upon the houses where ye are: and when I see the blood, I will pass over you, and there shall no plague be upon you to destroy you, when I strike the land of Egypt.12:14 And this day shall be to you for a memorial, and ye shall keep it a feast to Yahweh: throughout your generations ye shall keep it a feast by an ordinance for ever.12:15 Seven days shall ye eat unleavened bread; even the first day ye shall put away leaven out of your houses: for whosoever eats leavened bread from the first day until the seventh day, that soul shall be cut off from Israel.12:16 And in the first day there shall be to you a holy convocation, and in the seventh day a holy convocation; no manner of work shall be done in them, save that which every man must eat, that only may be done by you.12:17 And ye shall observe the feast of unleavened bread; for in this selfsame day have I brought your hosts out of the land of Egypt: therefore shall ye observe this day throughout your generations by an ordinance for ever.12:18 In the first month, on the fourteenth day of the month at evening, ye shall eat unleavened bread, until the twenty-first day of the month at evening.12:19 Seven days shall there be no leaven found in your houses: for whosoever eats that which is leavened, that soul shall be cut off from the congregation of Israel, whether he is a sojourner, or one that is born in the land.12:20 You shall eat nothing leavened; in all your habitations shall ye eat unleavened bread.12:21 Then Moses called for all the elders of Israel, and said to them, Draw out, and take you lambs according to your families, and kill the Passover.12:22 And ye shall take a bunch of hyssop, and dip it in the blood that is in the basin, and strike the lintel and the two side-posts with the blood that is in the basin; and none of you shall go out of the door of his house until the morning.12:23 For Yahweh will pass through to strike down the Egyptians; and when he sees the blood upon the lintel, and on the two side-posts, Yahweh will pass over the door, and will not allow the destroyer to come in to your houses to strike you.12:24 And ye shall observe this thing for an ordinance to you and to your sons for ever.12:25 And it shall come to pass, when ye are come to the land which Yahweh will give you, according as he has promised, that ye shall keep this service.12:26 And it shall come to pass, when your children shall say to you, What mean ye by this service?12:27 that ye shall say, It is the sacrifice of Yahweh's Passover, who passed over the houses of the children of Israel in Egypt, when he struck the Egyptians, and spared our houses.  And the people bowed the head and worshipped.12:28 And the children of Israel went and did so; as Yahweh had commanded Moses and Aaron, so did they.12:29 And it came to pass at midnight, that Yahweh struck all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, from the firstborn of Pharaoh that sat on his throne to the first-born of the captive that was in the dungeon; and all the firstborn of cattle.12:30 And Pharaoh rose up in the night, he, and all his servants, and all the Egyptians; and there was a great cry in Egypt, for there was not a house where there was not one dead.12:31 And he called for Moses and Aaron by night, and said, Rise up, go forth from among my people, both ye and the children of Israel; and go, serve Yahweh, as ye have said.12:32 Take both your flocks and your herds, as ye have said, and be gone; and bless me also.12:33 And the Egyptians were urgent upon the people, to send them out of the land in haste; for they said, We are all dead men.12:34 And the people took their dough before it was leavened, their kneading troughs being bound up in their clothes upon their shoulders.12:35 And the children of Israel did according to the word of Moses; and they asked of the Egyptians jewels of silver, and jewels of gold, and raiment.12:36 And Yahweh gave the people favor in the sight of the Egyptians, so that they let them have what they asked.  And they despoiled the Egyptians.12:37 And the children of Israel journeyed from Rameses to Succoth, about six hundred thousand on foot that were men, besides children.12:38 And a mixed multitude went up also with them; and flocks, and herds, even very much cattle.12:39 And they baked unleavened cakes of the dough which they brought forth out of Egypt; for it was not leavened, because they were thrust out of Egypt, and could not tarry, neither had they prepared for themselves any victuals.12:40 Now the time that the children of Israel dwelt in Egypt was four hundred and thirty years.12:41 And it came to pass at the end of four hundred and thirty years, even the selfsame day it came to pass, that all the hosts of Yahweh went out from the land of Egypt.12:42 It is a night to be much observed to Yahweh for bringing them out from the land of Egypt: this is that night of Yahweh, to be much observed of all the children of Israel throughout their generations.12:43 And Yahweh said to Moses and Aaron, This is the ordinance of the Passover: there shall no foreigner be allowed to eat of it;12:44 but every man's servant that is bought for money, when you have circumcised him, then shall he eat of it.12:45 A sojourner and a hired servant shall not eat of it.12:46 In one house shall it be eaten; you shall not carry forth anything of the flesh abroad out of the house; neither shall ye break a bone of it.12:47 All the congregation of Israel shall keep it.12:48 And when a stranger shall sojourn with you, and will keep the Passover to Yahweh, let all his males be circumcised, and then let him come near and keep it; and he shall be as one that is born in the land: but no uncircumcised person shall eat of it.12:49 The same law shall be for him that is home-born, and for the stranger that sojourns among you.12:50 This all the children of Israel did; as Yahweh commanded Moses and Aaron, so they did.12:51 And it came to pass that very same day, that Yahweh did bring the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt by their multitudes.Chapter 1313:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,13:2 Sanctify to me all the first-born, whatsoever opens the womb among the children of Israel, both of man and of beast: it is mine.13:3 And Moses said to the people, Remember this day, in which ye came out from Egypt, out of the house of bondage; for by strength of hand Yahweh brought you out from this place: there shall no leavened bread be eaten.13:4 This day ye go forth in the month Abib.13:5 And it shall be, when Yahweh shall bring you into the land of the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and the Amorite, and the Hivite, and the Jebusite, which he swore to your fathers to give you, a land flowing with milk and honey, that you shall keep this service in this month.13:6 Seven days you shall eat unleavened bread, and in the seventh day shall be a feast to Yahweh.13:7 Unleavened bread shall be eaten throughout the seven days; and there shall no leavened bread be seen with you, neither shall there be leaven seen with you, in all your borders.13:8 And you shall tell your son in that day, saying, It is because of that which Yahweh did for me when I came forth out of Egypt.13:9 And it shall be for a sign to you upon your hand, and for a memorial between your eyes, that the law of Yahweh may be in your mouth: for with a strong hand has Yahweh brought you out of Egypt.13:10 You shall therefore keep this ordinance in its season from year to year.13:11 And it shall be, when Yahweh shall bring you into the land of the Canaanite, as he swore to you and to your fathers, and shall give it to you,13:12 that you shall set apart to Yahweh all that opens the womb, and every firstling which you have that comes of a beast; the males shall be Yahweh's.13:13 And every firstling of a donkey you shall redeem with a lamb; and if you will not redeem it, then you shall break its neck: and all the first-born of man among your sons shall you redeem.13:14 And it shall be, when your son asks you in time to come, saying, What is this?  that you shall say to him, By strength of hand Yahweh brought us out from Egypt, from the house of bondage:13:15 and it came to pass, when Pharaoh would hardly let us go, that Yahweh slew all the first-born in the land of Egypt, both the first-born of man, and the first-born of beast: therefore I sacrifice to Yahweh all that opens the womb, being males; but all the firstborn of my sons I redeem.13:16 And it shall be for a sign upon your hand, and for frontlets between your eyes: for by strength of hand Yahweh brought us forth out of Egypt.13:17 And it came to pass, when Pharaoh had let the people go, that God led them not by the way of the land of the Philistines, although that was near; for God said, Lest peradventure the people repent when they see war, and they return to Egypt:13:18 but God led the people about, by the way of the wilderness by the Red Sea: and the children of Israel went up armed out of the land of Egypt.13:19 And Moses took the bones of Joseph with him: for he had sternly sworn the children of Israel, saying, God will surely visit you; and ye shall carry up my bones away from here with you.13:20 And they took their journey from Succoth, and encamped in Etham, in the edge of the wilderness.13:21 And Yahweh went before them by day in a pillar of cloud, to lead them the way, and by night in a pillar of fire, to give them light, that they might go by day and by night:13:22 the pillar of cloud by day, and the pillar of fire by night, departed not from before the people.Chapter 1414:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,14:2 Tell the children of Israel, that they turn back and encamp before Pihahiroth, between Migdol and the sea, before Baal-zephon: over against it shall ye encamp by the sea.14:3 And Pharaoh will say of the children of Israel, They are entangled in the land, the wilderness has shut them in.14:4 And I will harden Pharaoh's heart, and he shall follow after them; and I will get me honor upon Pharaoh, and upon all his host: and the Egyptians shall know that I am Yahweh.  And they did so.14:5 And it was told the king of Egypt that the people were fled: and the heart of Pharaoh and of his servants was changed towards the people, and they said, What is this we have done, that we have let Israel go from serving us?14:6 And he made ready his chariot, and took his people with him:14:7 and he took six hundred chosen chariots, and all the chariots of Egypt, and captains over all of them.14:8 And Yahweh hardened the heart of Pharaoh king of Egypt, and he pursued after the children of Israel: for the children of Israel went out with a high hand.14:9 And the Egyptians pursued after them, all the horses and chariots of Pharaoh, and his horsemen, and his army, and overtook them encamping by the sea, beside Pihahiroth, before Baal-zephon.14:10 And when Pharaoh drew near, the children of Israel lifted up their eyes, and, behold, the Egyptians were marching after them; and they were sore afraid: and the children of Israel cried out to Yahweh.14:11 And they said to Moses, Because there were no graves in Egypt, have you taken us away to die in the wilderness?  why have you dealt thus with us, to bring us forth out of Egypt?14:12 Is not this the word that we spoke to you in Egypt, saying, Let us alone, that we may serve the Egyptians?  For it were better for us to serve the Egyptians, than that we should die in the wilderness.14:13 And Moses said to the people, Fear ye not, stand still, and see the salvation of Yahweh, which he will work for you today: for the Egyptians whom ye have seen today, ye shall see them again no more for ever.14:14 Yahweh will fight for you, and ye shall hold your peace.14:15 And Yahweh said to Moses, Why are you crying to me?  Tell the children of Israel that they should go forward.14:16 And lift you up your rod, and stretch out your hand over the sea, and divide it: and the children of Israel shall go into the midst of the sea on dry ground.14:17 And I, behold, I will harden the hearts of the Egyptians, and they shall go in after them: and I will get me honor upon Pharaoh, and upon all his host, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen.14:18 And the Egyptians shall know that I am Yahweh, when I have gotten me honor upon Pharaoh, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen.14:19 And the angel of God, who went before the camp of Israel, removed and went behind them; and the pillar of cloud removed from before them, and stood behind them:14:20 and it came between the camp of Egypt and the camp of Israel; and there was the cloud and the darkness, yet gave it light by night: and the one came not near the other all the night.14:21 And Moses stretched out his hand over the sea; and Yahweh caused the sea to go back by a strong east wind all the night, and made the sea dry land, and the waters were divided.14:22 And the children of Israel went into the midst of the sea upon the dry ground: and the waters were a wall to them on their right hand, and on their left.14:23 And the Egyptians pursued, and went in after them into the midst of the sea, all Pharaoh's horses, his chariots, and his horsemen.14:24 And it came to pass in the morning watch, that Yahweh looked forth upon the host of the Egyptians through the pillar of fire and of cloud, and discomfited the host of the Egyptians.14:25 And he took off their chariot wheels, and they drove them heavily; so that the Egyptians said, Let us flee from the face of Israel; for Yahweh fights for them against the Egyptians.14:26 And Yahweh said to Moses, Stretch out your hand over the sea, so that the waters may come back upon the Egyptians, upon their chariots, and upon their horsemen.14:27 And Moses stretched forth his hand over the sea, and the sea returned to its strength when the morning appeared; and the Egyptians fled against it; and Yahweh overthrew the Egyptians in the midst of the sea.14:28 And the waters returned, and covered the chariots, and the horsemen, even all the host of Pharaoh that went in after them into the sea; there remained not so much as one of them.14:29 But the children of Israel walked upon dry land in the midst of the sea; and the waters were a wall to them on their right hand, and on their left.14:30 Thus Yahweh saved Israel that day out of the hand of the Egyptians; and Israel saw the Egyptians dead upon the sea-shore.14:31 And Israel saw the great work which Yahweh did upon the Egyptians, and the people feared Yahweh: and they believed in Yahweh, and in his servant Moses.Chapter 1515:1 Then sang Moses and the children of Israel this song to Yahweh, and spoke, saying, I will sing to Yahweh, for he has triumphed gloriously: The horse and his rider has he thrown into the sea.15:2 Yahweh is my strength and song, and he is become my salvation: This is my God, and I will praise him; My father's God, and I will exalt him.15:3 Yahweh is a man of war: Yahweh is his name.15:4 Pharaoh's chariots and his host has he cast into the sea; And his chosen captains are sunk in the Red Sea.15:5 The deeps cover them: They went down into the depths like a stone.15:6 Your right hand, O Yahweh, is glorious in power, Your right hand, O Yahweh, dashes in pieces the enemy.15:7 And in the greatness of your Excellency you overthrow them that rise up against you: You send forth your wrath, it consumes them as stubble.15:8 And with the blast of your nostrils the waters were piled up, The floods stood upright as a heap; The deeps were congealed in the heart of the sea.15:9 The enemy said, I will pursue, I will overtake, I will divide the spoil; My desire shall be satisfied upon them; I will draw my sword, my hand shall destroy them.15:10 You blew with your wind, the sea covered them: They sank as lead in the mighty waters.15:11 Who is like to you, O Yahweh, among the gods?  Who is like you, glorious in holiness, Fearful in praises, doing wonders?15:12 You stretched out your right hand, The earth swallowed them.15:13 You in your lovingkindness have led the people that you have redeemed: You have guided them in your strength to your holy habitation.15:14 The peoples have heard, they tremble: Pangs have taken hold on the inhabitants of Philistia.15:15 Then were the chiefs of Edom dismayed; The mighty men of Moab, trembling takes hold upon them: All the inhabitants of Canaan are melted away.15:16 Terror and dread falls upon them; By the greatness of your arm they are as still as a stone; Till your people pass over, O Yahweh, Till the people pass over that you have purchased.15:17 You will bring them in, and plant them in the mountain of your inheritance, The place, O Yahweh, which you have made for you to dwell in, The sanctuary, O Lord, which your hands have established.15:18 Yahweh shall reign for ever and ever.15:19 For the horses of Pharaoh went in with his chariots and with his horsemen into the sea, and Yahweh brought back the waters of the sea upon them; but the children of Israel walked on dry land in the midst of the sea.15:20 And Miriam the prophetess, the sister of Aaron, took a tambourine in her hand; and all the women went out after her with tambourines and with dances.15:21 And Miriam answered them, Sing ye to Yahweh, for he has triumphed gloriously; The horse and his rider has he thrown into the sea.15:22 And Moses led Israel onward from the Red Sea, and they went out into the wilderness of Shur; and they went three days in the wilderness, and found no water.15:23 And when they came to Marah, they could not drink of the waters of Marah, for they were bitter: therefore the name of it was called Marah.15:24 And the people murmured against Moses, saying, What shall we drink?15:25 An he cried to Yahweh; And Yahweh showed him a tree, and he cast it into the waters, and the waters were made sweet.   There he made for them a statute and an ordinance, and there he proved them;15:26 and he said, If you will diligently hearken to the voice of Yahweh your God, and will do that which is right in his eyes, and will give ear to his commandments, and keep all his statutes, I will put none of the diseases upon you, which I have put upon the Egyptians: for I am Yahweh who heals you.15:27 And they came to Elim, where were twelve springs of water, and 70 palm-trees: and they encamped there by the waters.Chapter 1616:1 And they took their journey from Elim, and all the congregation of the children of Israel came to the wilderness of Sin, which is between Elim and Sinai, on the fifteenth day of the second month after their departing out of the land of Egypt.16:2 And the whole congregation of the children of Israel murmured against Moses and against Aaron in the wilderness:16:3 and the children of Israel said to them, Would that we had died by the hand of Yahweh in the land of Egypt, when we sat by the flesh-pots, when we did eat bread to the full; for ye have brought us forth into this wilderness, to kill this whole assembly with hunger.16:4 Then said Yahweh to Moses, Behold, I will rain bread from heaven for you; and the people shall go out and gather a day's portion every day, that I may prove them, whether they will walk in my law, or not.16:5 And it shall come to pass on the sixth day, that they shall prepare that which they bring in, and it shall be twice as much as they gather daily.16:6 And Moses and Aaron said to all the children of Israel, at even, then ye shall know that Yahweh has brought you out from the land of Egypt;16:7 and in the morning, then ye shall see the glory of Yahweh; for that he hears your murmurings against Yahweh.  And what are we, that ye murmur against us?16:8 And Moses said, This shall be, when Yahweh shall give you in the evening flesh to eat, and in the morning bread to the full; for that Yahweh hears your murmurings which ye murmur against him: and what are we?  your murmurings are not against us, but against Yahweh.16:9 And Moses said to Aaron, Say to all the congregation of the children of Israel, Come near before Yahweh; for he has heard your murmurings.16:10 And it came to pass, as Aaron spoke to the whole congregation of the children of Israel, that they looked toward the wilderness, and, behold, the glory of Yahweh appeared in the cloud.16:11 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,16:12 I have heard the murmurings of the children of Israel: speak to them, saying, at even ye shall eat flesh, and in the morning ye shall be filled with bread: and ye shall know that I am Yahweh your God.16:13 And it came to pass at even, that the quails came up, and covered the camp: and in the morning the dew lay round about the camp.16:14 And when the dew that lay was gone up, behold, upon the face of the wilderness a fine flake-like thing, fine as the hoar-frost on the ground.16:15 And when the children of Israel saw it, they said one to another, What is it?  For they knew not what it was.  And Moses said to them, It is the bread which Yahweh has given you to eat.16:16 This is the thing which Yahweh has commanded, Gather ye of it every man according to his eating; an omer a head, according to the number of your persons, shall ye take it, every man for them that are in his tent.16:17 And the children of Israel did so, and gathered some more, some less.16:18 And when they measured it with an omer, he that gathered much had nothing over, and he that gathered little had no lack; they gathered every man according to his eating.16:19 And Moses said to them, Let no man leave of it till the morning.16:20 Notwithstanding they hearkened not to Moses; but some of them left of it until the morning, and it bred worms, and became foul: and Moses was angry with them.16:21 And they gathered it morning by morning, every man according to his eating: and when the sun became hot, it melted.16:22 And it came to pass, that on the sixth day they gathered twice as much bread, two omers for each one: and all the rulers of the congregation came and told Moses.16:23 And he said to them, This is that which Yahweh has spoken, Tomorrow is a solemn rest, a holy sabbath to Yahweh: bake that which ye will bake, and boil that which ye will boil; and all that remains over lay up for you to be kept until the morning.16:24 And they laid it up till the morning, as Moses instructed: and it did not become foul, neither was there any worm therein.16:25 And Moses said, Eat that today; for today is a sabbath to Yahweh: today ye shall not find it in the field.16:26 Six days ye shall gather it; but on the seventh day is the sabbath, in it there shall be none.16:27 And it came to pass on the seventh day, that there went out some of the people to gather, and they found none.16:28 And Yahweh said to Moses, How long do you refuse to keep my commandments and my laws?16:29 See, for that Yahweh has given you the sabbath, therefore he gives you on the sixth day the bread of two days; abide ye every man in his place, let no man go out of his place on the seventh day.16:30 So the people rested on the seventh day.16:31 And the house of Israel called the name thereof Manna: and it was like coriander seed, white; and the taste of it was like wafers made with honey.16:32 And Moses said, This is the thing which Yahweh has commanded, Let an omerful of it be kept throughout your generations, that they may see the bread with which I fed you in the wilderness, when I brought you forth from the land of Egypt.16:33 And Moses said to Aaron, Take a pot, and put an omerful of manna therein, and lay it up before Yahweh, to be kept throughout your generations.16:34 As Yahweh commanded Moses, so Aaron laid it up before the Testimony, to be kept.16:35 And the children of Israel did eat the manna forty years, until they came to a land inhabited; they did eat the manna, until they came to the borders of the land of Canaan.16:36 Now an omer is the tenth part of an ephah.Chapter 1717:1 And all the congregation of the children of Israel journeyed from the wilderness of Sin, by their journeys, according to the commandment of Yahweh, and encamped in Rephidim: and there was no water for the people to drink.17:2 Therefore the people quarreled with Moses, and said, Give us water that we may drink.  And Moses said to them, Why strive ye with me?  Why do ye tempt Yahweh?17:3 And the people thirsted there for water; and the people murmured against Moses, and said, Why have you brought us up out of Egypt, to kill us and our children and our cattle with thirst?17:4 And Moses cried to Yahweh, saying, What shall I do to this people?  They are almost ready to stone me.17:5 And Yahweh said to Moses, Pass on before the people, and take with you some of the elders of Israel.  And your rod, with which you struck the river, take it in your hand, and go.17:6 Behold, I will stand before you there upon the rock in Horeb; and you shall strike the rock, and there shall come water out of it, that the people may drink.  And Moses did so in the sight of the elders of Israel.17:7 And he called the name of the place Massah, and Meribah, because of the striving of the children of Israel, and because they tempted Yahweh, saying, Is Yahweh among us, or not?17:8 Then came Amalek, and fought with Israel in Rephidim.17:9 And Moses said to Joshua, Choose us out men, and go out, fight with Amalek: tomorrow I will stand on the top of the hill with the rod of God in my hand.17:10 So Joshua did as Moses had said to him, and fought with Amalek: and Moses, Aaron, and Hur went up to the top of the hill.17:11 And it came to pass, that as long as Moses held up his hand, Israel prevailed; and when he let down his hand, Amalek prevailed.17:12 But Moses' hands became heavy; so they took a stone, and put it under him, and he sat on it, and Aaron and Hur stayed up his hands, one on one side, and the other on the other side.  And his hands were steady until the going down of the sun.17:13 And Joshua discomfited Amalek and his people with the edge of the sword.17:14 And Yahweh said to Moses, Write this for a memorial in a book, and rehearse it in the ears of Joshua: that I will utterly blot out the remembrance of Amalek from under heaven.17:15 And Moses built an altar, and called the name of it Yahweh-nissi;17:16 And he said, Yahweh has sworn: Yahweh will have war with Amalek from generation to generation.Chapter 1818:1 Now Jethro, the priest of Midian, Moses' father-in-law, heard about all that God had done for Moses, and for Israel his people, how Yahweh had brought Israel out of Egypt.18:2 And Jethro, Moses' father-in-law, took Zipporah, Moses' wife, after he had sent her away,18:3 and her two sons; of whom the name of the one was Gershom; for he said, I have been a sojourner in a foreign land:18:4 and the name of the other was Eliezer; for he said, The God of my father was my help, and delivered me from the sword of Pharaoh.18:5 And Jethro, Moses' father-in-law, came with his sons and his wife to Moses into the wilderness where he was encamped, at the mount of God:18:6 and he said to Moses, I, your father-in-law Jethro, am come to you, and your wife, and her two sons with her.18:7 And Moses went out to meet his father-in-law, and did obeisance, and kissed him: and they asked each other of their welfare; and they came into the tent.18:8 And Moses told his father-in-law all that Yahweh had done to Pharaoh and to the Egyptians for Israel's sake, all the travail that had come upon them by the way, and how Yahweh delivered them.18:9 And Jethro rejoiced for all the goodness which Yahweh had done to Israel, in that he had delivered them out of the hand of the Egyptians.18:10 And Jethro said, Blessed be Yahweh, who has delivered you out of the hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of Pharaoh; who has delivered the people from under the hand of the Egyptians.18:11 I know now that Yahweh is greater than all other gods; indeed, witness the matter in which they dealt proudly against the people.18:12 And Jethro, Moses' father-in-law, took a burnt offering and sacrifices for God: and Aaron came, and all the elders of Israel, to eat bread with Moses' father-in-law before God.18:13 And it came to pass the next day, that Moses sat to judge the people: and the people stood about Moses from the morning to the evening.18:14 And when Moses' father-in-law saw all that he did to the people, he said, What is this thing that you are doing to the people?  Why are you sitting by yourself, and all the people are standing around you from morning until evening?18:15 And Moses said to his father-in-law,  Because the people come to me to inquire of God.18:16 When they have a matter, they come to me; and I judge between a man and his neighbor, and I make them know the statutes of God, and his laws.18:17 And Moses' father-in-law said to him, The thing that you are doing is not good.18:18 You will surely wear away, both you, and this people that is with you: for the thing is too heavy for you; you are not able to perform it yourself alone.18:19 Take heed now to my voice, I will give you counsel, and God be with you.  You be for the people to God-ward, and you bring the causes to God.18:20 And you shall teach them the statutes and the laws, and show them the way in which they must walk, and the work that they must do.18:21 Moreover you shall provide out of all the people able men, such as fear God, men of truth, hating unjust gain; and place such men over them, to be rulers of thousands, rulers of hundreds, rulers of fifties, and rulers of tens:18:22 and let them judge the people at all seasons: and it shall be, that all the important cases they shall bring to you, but every small matter they shall judge themselves: so shall it be easier for you, and thus they shall bear it with you.18:23 If you shall do this thing, and God commands you so, then you shall be able to endure, and all this people also shall go to their place in peace.18:24 So Moses did take heed to the voice of his father-in-law, and did all that he had said.18:25 And Moses chose able men out of all Israel, and made them heads over the people, rulers of thousands, rulers of hundreds, rulers of fifties, and rulers of tens.18:26 And they judged the people at all seasons: the hard cases they brought to Moses, but every small matter they judged themselves.18:27 And Moses let his father-in-law depart; and he went his way into his own land.Chapter 1919:1 In the third month after the children of Israel were gone forth out of the land of Egypt, the same day came they into the wilderness of Sinai.19:2 And when they were departed from Rephidim, and were come to the wilderness of Sinai, they encamped in the wilderness; and there Israel encamped before the mountain.19:3 And Moses went up to God, and Yahweh called to him out of the mountain, saying, Thus shall you say to the house of Jacob, and tell the children of Israel:19:4 You have seen what I did to the Egyptians, and how I bore you on eagles' wings, and brought you to myself.19:5 Now therefore, if ye will obey my voice indeed, and keep my covenant, then ye shall be my own possession from among all peoples: for all the earth is mine:19:6 and ye shall be to me a kingdom of priests, and a holy nation.  These are the words which you shall speak to the children of Israel.19:7 And Moses came and called for the elders of the people, and set before them all these words which Yahweh commanded him.19:8 And all the people answered together, and said, all that Yahweh has spoken we will do.  And Moses reported the words of the people to Yahweh.19:9 And Yahweh said to Moses, Lo, I come to you in a thick cloud, that the people may hear when I speak with you, and may also believe you for ever.  And Moses told the words of the people to Yahweh.19:10 And Yahweh said to Moses, Go to the people, and sanctify them today and tomorrow, and let them wash their garments,19:11 and be ready against the third day; for the third day Yahweh will come down in the sight of all the people upon mount Sinai.19:12 And you shall set bounds to the people round about, saying, Take heed to yourselves, that ye go not up into the mount, or touch the border of it: whoever touches the mountain shall be surely put to death:19:13 no hand shall touch him, without surely being stoned, or shot through; whether it is beast or man, he shall not live: when the trumpet sounds long, they shall come up to the mountain.19:14 And Moses went down from the mount to the people, and sanctified the people; and they washed their garments.19:15 And he said to the people, Be ready against the third day: come not near a woman.19:16 And it came to pass on the third day, when it was morning, that there were thunders and lightnings, and a thick cloud upon the mountain, and the voice of a trumpet exceedingly loud; and all the people that were in the camp trembled.19:17 And Moses brought forth the people out of the camp to meet God; and they stood at the foot of the mountain.19:18 And mount Sinai, the whole of it, smoked, because Yahweh descended upon it in fire; and the smoke thereof ascended as the smoke of a furnace, and the whole mount quaked greatly.19:19 And when the voice of the trumpet became louder and louder, Moses spoke, and God answered him by a voice.19:20 And Yahweh came down upon mount Sinai, to the top of the mount: and Yahweh called Moses to the top of the mount; and Moses went up.19:21 And Yahweh said to Moses, Go down, admonish the people, before they break through to Yahweh to gaze, and many of them perish.19:22 And let the priests also, that come near to Yahweh, sanctify themselves, lest Yahweh break forth upon them.19:23 And Moses said to Yahweh, The people cannot come up to mount Sinai: for you charged us, saying, Set bounds about the mount, and sanctify it.19:24 And Yahweh said to him, Go, get yourself down; and you shall come up, you, and Aaron with you: but let not the priests and the people break through to come up to Yahweh, lest he break forth upon them.19:25 So Moses went down to the people, and told them.Chapter 2020:1 And God spoke all these words, saying,20:2 I am Yahweh your God, who brought you out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondage.20:3 You shall have no other gods before me.20:4 You shall not make for yourselves a graven image, nor any likeness of any thing that is in heaven above, or that is in the earth beneath, or that is in the water under the earth.20:5 You shall not bow down yourself to them, nor serve them, for I Yahweh your God am a jealous God, visiting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children, upon the third and upon the fourth generation of those who hate me,20:6 and showing lovingkindness to thousands of them that love me and keep my commandments.20:7 You shall not take the name of Yahweh your God in vain; for Yahweh will not hold him guiltless that takes his name in vain.20:8 Remember the sabbath day, to keep it holy.20:9 Six days shall you labor, and do all your work;20:10 but the seventh day is a sabbath to Yahweh your God: in it you shall not do any work, you, neither your son, nor your daughter, your man-servant, nor your maid-servant, nor your cattle, nor your stranger that is within your gates:20:11 for in six days Yahweh made heaven and earth, the sea, and all that in them is, and rested the seventh day: therefore Yahweh blessed the sabbath day, and hallowed it.20:12 Honor your father and your mother, that your days may be long in the land which Yahweh your God is giving you.20:13 You shall not murder.20:14 You shall not commit adultery.20:15 You shall not steal.20:16 You shall not bear false witness against your neighbor.20:17 You shall not covet your neighbor's house, you shall not covet your neighbor's wife, nor his man-servant, nor his maid-servant, nor his ox, nor his donkey, nor anything that is your neighbor's.20:18 And all the people perceived the thunderings, and the lightnings, and the voice of the trumpet, and the mountain smoking: and when the people saw it, they trembled, and stood afar off.20:19 And they said to Moses, Speak with us, and we will listen; but do not let God speak with us, lest we die.20:20 And Moses said to the people, Fear not: for God is come to prove you, and so that his fear may be before you, that ye sin not.20:21 And the people stood afar off, and Moses drew near to the thick darkness where God was.20:22 And Yahweh said to Moses, Thus you shall say to the children of Israel, You yourselves have seen that I have talked with you from heaven.20:23 You shall not make other gods with me; gods of silver, or gods of gold, ye shall not make to you.20:24 An altar of earth you shall make to me, and shall sacrifice upon it your burnt offerings, and your peace offerings, your sheep, and your oxen: in every place where I record my name I will come to you and I will bless you.20:25 And if you make me an altar of stone, you shall not build it of hewn stones; for if you lift up your tool upon it, you have polluted it.20:26 Neither shall you go up by steps to my altar, that your nakedness be not uncovered upon it.Chapter 2121:1 Now these are the ordinances which you shall set before them.21:2 If you buy a Hebrew servant, six years he shall serve: and in the seventh he shall go out free for nothing.21:3 If he comes in by himself, he shall go out by himself: if he be married, then his wife shall go out with him.21:4 If his master give him a wife and she bear him sons or daughters; the wife and her children shall be her master's, and he shall go out by himself.21:5 But if the servant shall plainly say, I love my master, my wife, and my children; I will not go out free:21:6 then his master shall bring him to God, and shall bring him to the door, or to the door-post; and his master shall bore his ear through with an awl; and he shall serve him for ever.21:7 And if a man sell his daughter to be a maid-servant, she shall not go out as the men-servants do.21:8 If she pleases not her master, who has espoused her to himself, then shall he let her be redeemed: to sell her to a foreign people he shall have no power, seeing he has dealt deceitfully with her.21:9 And if he espouse her to his son, he shall deal with her after the manner of daughters.21:10 If he take him another wife; her food, her raiment, and her duty of marriage, shall he not diminish.21:11 And if he do not these three things to her, then shall she go out for nothing, without money.21:12 He who strikes a man, such that he dies, shall surely be put to death.21:13 And if a man lie not in wait, but God deliver him into his hand; then I will appoint you a place whither he shall flee.21:14 And if a man should come premeditatedly upon his neighbor, to slay him with guile; you shall take him from away from my altar, that he may die.21:15 And he who strikes his father, or his mother, shall be surely put to death.21:16 And he who steals a man, and sells him, or if he is found in his hand, he shall surely be put to death.21:17 And he who curses his father or his mother, shall surely be put to death.21:18 And if men fight, and one strikes the other with a stone, or with his fist, and the other does not die but takes to his bed;21:19 if he should rise again, and walk abroad upon his staff, then shall he who struck him is acquitted: provided he shall pay for the loss of his time, and shall cause him to be thoroughly healed.21:20 And if a man strikes his servant, or his maid, with a rod, and he dies under his hand; he shall surely be punished.21:21 Notwithstanding, if the slave continues a day or two, he shall not be punished: for he is his living.21:22 And if men are fighting, and hurt a woman with child, such that her fruit departs, and yet no harm follow; he shall be surely fined, according as the woman's husband shall lay upon him; and he shall pay as the judges determine.21:23 But if any harm follows, then you shall give life for life,21:24 eye for eye, tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot,21:25 burning for burning, wound for wound, stripe for stripe.21:26 And if a man strikes the eye of his servant, or the eye of his maid, and destroys it; he shall let him go free for his eye's sake.21:27 And if he knocks out his man-servant's tooth, or his maid-servant's tooth, he shall let him go free for his tooth's sake.21:28 And if an ox should gore a man or a woman to death, the ox shall be surely stoned, and its flesh shall not be eaten; but the owner of the ox shall be acquitted.21:29 But if the ox was in the habit to gore in times past, and it has been testified to its owner, and he has not kept it in, but it has killed a man or a woman, the ox shall be stoned and its owner also shall be put to death.21:30 Should there be imposed upon him a ransom, then he shall give for the redemption of his life whatsoever is imposed upon him.21:31 Whether it has gored a son, or has gored a daughter, according to this judgment shall it be done to him.21:32 If the ox should gore a man-servant or a maid-servant, there shall be given to their master thirty shekels of silver, and the ox shall be stoned.21:33 And if a man shall open a pit, or if a man shall dig a pit and not cover it, and an ox or a donkey fall therein,21:34 the owner of the pit shall make it good; he shall give money to its owner, and the dead beast shall be his.21:35 And if one man's ox should hurt another's, such that it dies, then they shall sell the live ox, and divide the price of it: and the dead one also they shall divide.21:36 Or if it be known that the ox was in the habit to gore in times past, and its owner hats not kept it in, he shall surely pay ox for ox, and the dead beast shall be his own.Chapter 2222:1 If a man shall steal an ox, or a sheep, and kill it, or sell it; he shall pay five oxen for an ox, and four sheep for a sheep.22:2 If the thief should be found breaking in, and be struck such that he dies, there shall be no bloodguilt for that one striking; 22:3 but should the sun be risen upon him, there shall be bloodguilt for him.  The thief shall make restitution.  If he has nothing, then he shall be sold for his theft.22:4 If the theft be found in his hand alive, whether it be ox, or donkey, or sheep, he shall pay double.22:5 If a man shall cause a field or vineyard to be eaten, and shall let his beast loose, and it feeds in another man's field, he shall make restitution from the best of his own field, and from the best of his own vineyard.22:6 If fire should break out, and catch in thorns, such that the shocks of grain, or the standing grain, or the field are consumed; the one that kindled the fire shall surely make restitution.22:7 If a man shall entrust to his neighbor money or stuff to keep, and it is stolen out of the man's house; if the thief be found, he shall pay double.22:8 If the thief be not found, then the master of the house shall come near to God, to be seen whether or not he has put his hand to his neighbor's goods.22:9 For every matter of adverse possession, whether it be for ox, for donkey, for sheep, for raiment, or for any manner of lost thing, about which one person says, This is it, the cause of both parties shall come before God.  He whom God shall convict shall pay double to his neighbor.22:10 If a man delivers to his neighbor a donkey, or an ox, or a sheep, or any beast, to keep; and it die, or be hurt, or driven away, no man seeing it:22:11 the oath of Yahweh shall be between them both, whether he has not put his hand to his neighbor's goods; and the owner thereof shall accept it, and he shall not make restitution.22:12 But if it be stolen from him, he shall make restitution to the owner thereof.22:13 If it be torn in pieces, let him bring it for witness: he shall not make good that which was torn.22:14 And if a man borrow anything of his neighbor, and it be hurt, or die, the owner thereof not being with it, he shall surely make restitution.22:15 If the owner thereof is with it, he shall not make it good: if it be a hired thing, it came for its hire.22:16 And if a man entices a virgin that is not betrothed, and lies with her, he shall surely pay a dowry for her to be his wife.22:17 If her father utterly refuses to give her to him, he shall pay money according to the dowry of virgins.22:18 You shall not allow a sorceress to live.22:19 Whosoever lies with a beast shall surely be put to death.22:20 He that sacrifices to any god, except to Yahweh only, shall be utterly destroyed.22:21 And a sojourner shall you not wrong, neither shall you oppress him: for ye were sojourners in the land of Egypt.22:22 You shall not afflict any widow, or fatherless child.22:23 If you afflict them at all, and they cry at all to me, I will surely hear their cry;22:24 and my wrath shall grow hot, and I will kill you with the sword; and your wives shall be widows, and your children fatherless.22:25 If you lend money to any of my people with you that is poor, you shall not be to him as a creditor; neither shall ye lay upon him interest.22:26 If you at all take your neighbor's garment to pledge, you shall restore it to him before the sun goes down:22:27 for that is his only covering, it is his garment for his skin.  In what shall he sleep?  And it shall come to pass, when he cries to me, that I will hear; for I am gracious.22:28 You shall not revile God, nor curse a ruler of your people.22:29 You shall not delay to offer of your harvest, and of the outflow of your presses.  The first-born of your sons shall you give to me.22:30 Likewise shall you do with your oxen, and with your sheep: seven days it shall be with its dam; on the eighth day you shall give it me.22:31 And ye shall be holy men to me: therefore ye shall not eat any flesh that is torn by beasts in the field; ye shall cast it to the dogs.Chapter 2323:1 You shall not take up a false report: put not your hand with the wicked to be an unrighteous witness.23:2 You shall not follow a multitude to do evil; neither shall you speak in a cause to turn aside after a multitude to wrest justice:23:3 neither shall you favor a poor man in his cause.23:4 If you meet your enemy's ox or his donkey going astray, you shall surely bring it back to him again.23:5 If you see the donkey of him that hates you lying under his burden, you shall forbear to leave him, you shall surely release it with him.23:6 You shall not wrest the justice due to your poor in his cause.23:7 Keep you far from a false matter; and the innocent and righteous slay you not: for I will not justify the wicked.23:8 And you shall take no bribe: for a bribe blinds them that have sight, and perverts the words of the righteous.23:9 And a sojourner shall you not oppress: for ye know the heart of a sojourner, seeing ye were sojourners in the land of Egypt.23:10 And six years you shall sow your land, and shall gather in the increase thereof:23:11 but the seventh year you shall let it rest and lie fallow; so that the poor of your people may eat: and what they leave the beast of the field shall eat.  In like manner you shall deal with your vineyard, and with your olive yard.23:12 Six days you shall do your work, and on the seventh day you shall rest; that your ox and your donkey may have rest, and the son of your handmaid, and the sojourner, may be refreshed.23:13 And in all things that I have said to you take ye heed: and make no mention of the name of other gods, neither let it be heard out of your mouth.23:14 Three times you shall keep a feast to me in the year.23:15 The feast of unleavened bread shall you keep: seven days you shall eat unleavened bread, as I commanded you, at the time appointed in the month Abib (for in it you came out from Egypt); and none shall appear before me empty:23:16 and the feast of harvest, the first-fruits of your labors, which you sow in the field: and the feast of ingathering, at the end of the year, when you gather in your labors out of the field.23:17 Three times in the year all your males shall appear before the Lord Yahweh.23:18 You shall not offer the blood of my sacrifice with leavened bread; neither shall the fat of my feast remain all night until the morning.23:19 The first of the first-fruits of your ground you shall bring into the house of Yahweh your God.  You shall not boil a kid in it mother's milk.23:20 Behold, I send an angel before you, to keep you by the way, and to bring you into the place which I have prepared.23:21 Take ye heed before him, and hearken to his voice; provoke him not; for he will not pardon your transgression: for my name is in him.23:22 But if you shall indeed hearken to his voice, and do all that I speak; then I will be an enemy to your enemies, and an adversary to your adversaries.23:23 For my angel shall go before you, and bring you in to the Amorite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, and the Canaanite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite: and I will cut them off.23:24 You shall not bow down to their gods, nor serve them, nor do after their works; but you shall utterly overthrow them, and break in pieces their pillars.23:25 And ye shall serve Yahweh your God, and he will bless your bread, and your water; and I will take sickness away from the midst of you.23:26 There shall none cast her young, nor be barren, in your land: the number of your days I will fulfill.23:27 I will send my terror before you, and will discomfit all the people to whom you shall come, and I will make all your enemies turn their backs to you.23:28 And I will send the hornet before you, which shall drive out the Hivite, the Canaanite, and the Hittite, from before you.23:29 I will not drive them out from before you in one year, lest the land become desolate, and the beasts of the field multiply against you.23:30 Little by little I will drive them out from before you, until you are increased, and inherit the land.23:31 And I will set your border from the Red Sea even to the sea of the Philistines, and from the wilderness to the River: for I will deliver the inhabitants of the land into your hand: and you shall drive them out before you.23:32 You shall make no covenant with them, nor with their gods.23:33 They shall not dwell in your land, lest they make you sin against me; for if you serve their gods, it will surely be a snare to you.Chapter 2424:1 And he said to Moses, Come up to Yahweh, you, and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of the elders of Israel; and worship ye afar off:24:2 and Moses alone shall come near to Yahweh; but they shall not come near; neither shall the people go up with him.24:3 And Moses came and told the people all the words of Yahweh, and all the ordinances: and all the people answered with one voice, and said, all the words which Yahweh has spoken will we do.24:4 And Moses wrote all the words of Yahweh, and rose up early in the morning, and built an altar under the mount, and twelve pillars, according to the twelve tribes of Israel.24:5 And he sent young men of the children of Israel, who offered burnt offerings, and sacrificed peace offerings of oxen to Yahweh.24:6 And Moses took half of the blood, and put it in basins; and half of the blood he sprinkled on the altar.24:7 And he took the book of the covenant, and read in the audience of the people: and they said, all that Yahweh has spoken will we do, and be obedient.24:8 And Moses took the blood, and sprinkled it on the people, and said, Behold the blood of the covenant, which Yahweh has made with you concerning all these words.24:9 Then went up Moses, and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of the elders of Israel.24:10 And they saw the God of Israel; and there was under his feet as it were a paved work of sapphire stone, and as it were the very heaven for clearness.24:11 And upon the nobles of the children of Israel he laid not his hand: and they beheld God, and did eat and drink.24:12 And Yahweh said to Moses, Come up to me into the mount, and stay there: and I will give you the tables of stone, and the law and the commandment, which I have written, that you may teach them.24:13 And Moses rose up, and Joshua his minister: and Moses went up into the mount of God.24:14 And he said to the elders, Tarry ye here for us, until we come again to you: and, behold, Aaron and Hur are with you: whosoever has a cause, let him come near to them.24:15 And Moses went up into the mount, and the cloud covered the mount.24:16 And the glory of Yahweh abode upon mount Sinai, and the cloud covered it six days: and the seventh day he called to Moses out of the midst of the cloud.24:17 And the appearance of the glory of Yahweh was like devouring fire on the top of the mount in the eyes of the children of Israel.24:18 And Moses entered into the midst of the cloud, and went up into the mount: and Moses was in the mount forty days and forty nights.Chapter 2525:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,25:2 Tell the children of Israel to take for me an offering: of every man whose heart makes him willing ye shall take my offering.25:3 And this is the offering which ye shall take of them: gold, and silver, and brass,25:4 and blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen, and goats' hair,25:5 and rams' skins dyed red, and sealskins, and acacia wood,25:6 oil for the light, spices for the anointing oil, and for the sweet incense,25:7 onyx stones, and stones to be set, for the ephod, and for the breastplate.25:8 And let them make me a sanctuary, that I may dwell among them.25:9 According to all that I show you, the pattern of the tabernacle, and the pattern of all the furniture thereof, even so shall ye make it.25:10 And they shall make an ark of acacia wood: two cubits and a half shall be the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a half the height thereof.25:11 And you shall overlay it with pure gold, within and without shall you overlay it, and shall make upon it a crown of gold round about.25:12 And you shall cast four rings of gold for it, and put them in the four feet thereof; and two rings shall be on the one side of it, and two rings on the other side of it.25:13 And you shall make staves of acacia wood, and overlay them with gold.25:14 And you shall put the staves into the rings on the sides of the ark, with which to bear the ark.25:15 The staves shall be in the rings of the ark: they shall not be taken from it.25:16 And you shall put into the ark the testimony which I shall give you.25:17 And you shall make a mercy-seat of pure gold: two cubits and a half shall be the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth thereof.25:18 And you shall make two cherubim of gold; of beaten work shall you make them, at the two ends of the mercy-seat.25:19 And make one cherub at the one end, and one cherub at the other end: of one piece with the mercy-seat shall ye make the cherubim on the two ends thereof.25:20 And the cherubim shall spread out their wings on high, covering the mercy-seat with their wings, with their faces one to another; toward the mercy-seat shall the faces of the cherubim be.25:21 And you shall put the mercy-seat above upon the ark; and in the ark you shall put the testimony that I shall give you.25:22 And there I will meet with you, and I will commune with you from above the mercy-seat, from between the two cherubim which are upon the ark of the testimony, of all things which I will give you in commandment to the children of Israel.25:23 And you shall make a table of acacia wood: two cubits shall be the length thereof, and a cubit the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a half the height thereof.25:24 And you shall overlay it with pure gold, and make thereto a crown of gold round about.25:25 And you shall make to it a border of a handbreadth round about; and you shall make a golden crown to the border thereof round about.25:26 And you shall make for it four rings of gold, and put the rings in the four corners that are on the four feet thereof.25:27 Close by the border shall the rings be, for places for the staves to bear the table.25:28 And you shall make the staves of acacia wood, and overlay them with gold, that the table may be borne with them.25:29 And you shall make the dishes thereof, and the spoons thereof, and the flagons thereof, and the bowls thereof, with which to pour out: of pure gold shall you make them.25:30 And you shall set upon the table showbread before me always.25:31 And you shall make a candlestick of pure gold: of beaten work shall the candlestick be made, even its base, and its shaft; its cups, its buds, and its flowers, shall be of one piece with it.25:32 And there shall be six branches going out of the sides thereof; three branches of the candlestick out of the one side thereof, and three branches of the candlestick out of the other side thereof:25:33 three cups made like almond-blossoms in one branch, a bud and a flower; and three cups made like almond-blossoms in the other branch, a bud and a flower: so for the six branches going out of the candlestick:25:34 and in the candlestick four cups made like almond-blossoms, the buds thereof, and the flowers thereof;25:35 and a bud under two branches of one piece with it, and a bud under two branches of one piece with it, and a bud under two branches of one piece with it, for the six branches going out of the candlestick.25:36 Their buds and their branches shall be of one piece with it; the whole of it one beaten work of pure gold.25:37 And you shall make the lamps thereof, seven: and they shall light the lamps thereof, to give light over against it.25:38 And the snuffers thereof, and the snuff dishes thereof, shall be of pure gold.25:39 Of a talent of pure gold shall it be made, with all these vessels.25:40 And see that you make them after their pattern, which has been shown you in the mount.Chapter 2626:1 Moreover you shall make the tabernacle with ten curtains; of fine twined linen, and blue, and purple, and scarlet, with cherubim the work of the skilful workman shall you make them.26:2 The length of each curtain shall be eight and twenty cubits, and the breadth of each curtain four cubits: all the curtains shall have one measure.26:3 Five curtains shall be coupled together one to another; and the other five curtains shall be coupled one to another.26:4 And you shall make loops of blue upon the edge of the one curtain from the selvedge in the coupling; and likewise shall you make in the edge of the curtain that is outmost in the second coupling.26:5 Fifty loops shall you make in the one curtain, and fifty loops shall you make in the edge of the curtain that is in the second coupling; the loops shall be opposite one to another.26:6 And you shall make fifty clasps of gold, and couple the curtains one to another with the clasps: and the tabernacle shall be one whole.26:7 And you shall make curtains of goats' hair for a tent over the tabernacle: eleven curtains shall you make them.26:8 The length of each curtain shall be thirty cubits, and the breadth of each curtain four cubits: the eleven curtains shall have one measure.26:9 And you shall couple five curtains by themselves, and six curtains by themselves, and shall double over the sixth curtain in the forefront of the tent.26:10 And you shall make fifty loops on the edge of the one curtain that is outmost in the coupling, and fifty loops upon the edge of the curtain which is outmost in the second coupling.26:11 And you shall make fifty clasps of brass, and put the clasps into the loops, and couple the tent together, that it may be one.26:12 And the overhanging part that remains of the curtains of the tent, the half curtain that remains, shall hang over the back of the tabernacle.26:13 And the cubit on the one side, and the cubit on the other side, of that which remains in the length of the curtains of the tent, shall hang over the sides of the tabernacle on this side and on that side, to cover it.26:14 And you shall make a covering for the tent of rams' skins dyed red, and a covering of sealskins above.26:15 And you shall make the boards for the tabernacle of acacia wood, standing up.26:16 Ten cubits shall be the length of a board, and a cubit and a half the breadth of each board.26:17 Two tenons shall there be in each board, joined one to another: thus shall you make for all the boards of the tabernacle.26:18 And you shall make the boards for the tabernacle, twenty boards for the south side southward.26:19 And you shall make forty sockets of silver under the twenty boards; two sockets under one board for its two tenons, and two sockets under another board for its two tenons.26:20 And for the second side of the tabernacle, on the north side, twenty boards,26:21 and their forty sockets of silver; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board.26:22 And for the hinder part of the tabernacle westward you shall make six boards.26:23 And two boards shall you make for the corners of the tabernacle in the hinder part.26:24 And they shall be double beneath, and in like manner they shall be entire to the top thereof to one ring: thus shall it be for them both; they shall be for the two corners.26:25 And there shall be eight boards, and their sockets of silver, sixteen sockets; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board.26:26 And you shall make bars of acacia wood: five for the boards of the one side of the tabernacle,26:27 and five bars for the boards of the other side of the tabernacle, and five bars for the boards of the side of the tabernacle, for the hinder part westward.26:28 And the middle bar in the midst of the boards shall pass through from end to end.26:29 And you shall overlay the boards with gold, and make their rings of gold for places for the bars: and you shall overlay the bars with gold.26:30 And you shall rear up the tabernacle according to the fashion thereof which has been shown you in the mount.26:31 And you shall make a veil of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen: with cherubim the work of the skilful workman shall it be made.26:32 And you shall hang it upon four pillars of acacia overlaid with gold; their hooks shall be of gold, upon four sockets of silver.26:33 And you shall hang up the veil under the clasps, and shall bring in there within the veil the ark of the testimony: and the veil shall separate to you between the holy place and the most holy.26:34 And you shall put the mercy-seat upon the ark of the testimony in the most holy place.26:35 And you shall set the table without the veil, and the candlestick over against the table on the side of the tabernacle toward the south: and you shall put the table on the north side.26:36 And you shall make a screen for the door of the Tent, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, the work of the embroiderer.26:37 And you shall make for the screen five pillars of acacia, and overlay them with gold: their hooks shall be of gold: and you shall cast five sockets of brass for them.Chapter 2727:1 And you shall make the altar of acacia wood, five cubits long, and five cubits broad; the altar shall be foursquare: and the height thereof shall be three cubits.27:2 And you shall make the horns of it upon the four corners thereof; the horns thereof shall be of one piece with it: and you shall overlay it with brass.27:3 And you shall make its pots to take away its ashes, and its shovels, and its basins, and its flesh-hooks, and its fire pans: all the vessels thereof you shall make of brass.27:4 And you shall make for it a grating of network of brass: and upon the net shall you make four brazen rings in the four corners thereof.27:5 And you shall put it under the ledge round the altar beneath, that the net may reach halfway up the altar.27:6 And you shall make staves for the altar, staves of acacia wood, and overlay them with brass.27:7 And the staves thereof shall be put into the rings, and the staves shall be upon the two sides of the altar, in bearing it.27:8 Hollow with planks shall you make it: as it has been shown you in the mount, so shall they make it.27:9 And you shall make the court of the tabernacle: for the south side southward there shall be hangings for the court of fine twined linen a hundred cubits long for one side:27:10 and the pillars thereof shall be twenty, and their sockets twenty, of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets shall be of silver.27:11 And likewise for the north side in length there shall be hangings a hundred cubits long, and the pillars thereof twenty, and their sockets twenty, of brass; the hooks of the pillars, and their fillets, of silver.27:12 And for the breadth of the court on the west side shall be hangings of fifty cubits; their pillars ten, and their sockets ten.27:13 And the breadth of the court on the east side eastward shall be fifty cubits.27:14 The hangings for the one side of the gate shall be fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three.27:15 And for the other side shall be hangings of fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three.27:16 And for the gate of the court shall be a screen of twenty cubits, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, the work of the embroiderer; their pillars four, and their sockets four.27:17 All the pillars of the court round about shall be filleted with silver; their hooks of silver, and their sockets of brass.27:18 The length of the court shall be a hundred cubits, and the breadth fifty every where, and the height five cubits, of fine twined linen, and their sockets of brass.27:19 All the instruments of the tabernacle in all the service thereof, and all the pins thereof, and all the pins of the court, shall be of brass.27:20 And you shall command the children of Israel, that they bring to you pure olive oil beaten for the light, to cause a lamp to burn continually.27:21 In the tent of meeting, without the veil which is before the testimony, Aaron and his sons shall keep it in order from evening to morning before Yahweh: it shall be a statue for ever throughout their generations on the behalf of the children of Israel.Chapter 2828:1 And bring you near to you Aaron your brother, and his sons with him, from among the children of Israel, that he may minister to me in the priest's office, even Aaron, Nadab and Abihu, Eleazar and Ithamar, Aaron's sons.28:2 And you shall make holy garments for Aaron your brother, for glory and for beauty.28:3 And you shall speak to all that are wise-hearted, whom I have filled with the spirit of wisdom, that they make Aaron's garments to sanctify him, that he may minister to me in the priest's office.28:4 And these are the garments which they shall make: a breastplate, and an ephod, and a robe, and a coat of checker work, a mitre, and a girdle: and they shall make holy garments for Aaron your brother, and his sons, that he may minister to me in the priest's office.28:5 And they shall take the gold, and the blue, and the purple, and the scarlet, and the fine linen.28:6 And they shall make the ephod of gold, of blue, and purple, scarlet, and fine twined linen, the work of the skilful workman.28:7 It shall have two shoulder-pieces joined to the two ends thereof, that it may be joined together.28:8 And the skillfully woven band, which is upon it, with which to gird it on, shall be like the work thereof and of the same piece; of gold, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen.28:9 And you shall take two onyx stones, and grave on them the names of the children of Israel:28:10 six of their names on the one stone, and the names of the six that remain on the other stone, according to their birth.28:11 With the work of an engraver in stone, like the engravings of a signet, shall you engrave the two stones, according to the names of the children of Israel: you shall make them to be inclosed in settings of gold.28:12 And you shall put the two stones upon the shoulder-pieces of the ephod, to be stones of memorial for the children of Israel: and Aaron shall bear their names before Yahweh upon his two shoulders for a memorial.28:13 And you shall make settings of gold,28:14 and two chains of pure gold; like cords shall you make them, of wreathen work: and you shall put the wreathen chains on the settings.28:15 And you shall make a breastplate of judgment, the work of the skilful workman; like the work of the ephod you shall make it; of gold, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, shall you make it.28:16 Foursquare it shall be and double; a span shall be the length thereof, and a span the breadth thereof.28:17 And you shall set in it settings of stones, four rows of stones: a row of sardius, topaz, and carbuncle shall be the first row;28:18 and the second row an emerald, a sapphire, and a diamond;28:19 and the third row a jacinth, an agate, and an ameyourst;28:20 and the fourth row a beryl, and an onyx, and a jasper: they shall be inclosed in gold in their settings.28:21 And the stones shall be according to the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names; like the engravings of a signet, every one according to his name, they shall be for the twelve tribes.28:22 And you shall make upon the breastplate chains like cords, of wreathen work of pure gold.28:23 And you shall make upon the breastplate two rings of gold, and shall put the two rings on the two ends of the breastplate.28:24 And you shall put the two wreathen chains of gold in the two rings at the ends of the breastplate.28:25 And the other two ends of the two wreathen chains you shall put on the two settings, and put them on the shoulder-pieces of the ephod in the forepart thereof.28:26 And you shall make two rings of gold, and you shall put them upon the two ends of the breastplate, upon the edge thereof, which is toward the side of the ephod inward.28:27 And you shall make two rings of gold, and shall put them on the two shoulder-pieces of the ephod underneath, in the forepart thereof, close by the coupling thereof, above the skillfully woven band of the ephod.28:28 And they shall bind the breastplate by the rings thereof to the rings of the ephod with a lace of blue, that it may be upon the skillfully woven band of the ephod, and that the breastplate be not loosed from the ephod.28:29 And Aaron shall bear the names of the children of Israel in the breastplate of judgment upon his heart, when he goes in to the holy place, for a memorial before Yahweh continually.28:30 And you shall put in the breastplate of judgment the Urim and the Thummim; and they shall be upon Aaron's heart, when he goes in before Yahweh: and Aaron shall bear the judgment of the children of Israel upon his heart before Yahweh continually.28:31 And you shall make the robe of the ephod all of blue.28:32 And it shall have a hole for the head in the midst thereof: it shall have a binding of woven work round about the hole of it, as it were the hole of a coat of mail, that it be not rent.28:33 And upon the skirts of it you shall make pomegranates of blue, and of purple, and of scarlet, round about the skirts thereof; and bells of gold between them round about:28:34 a golden bell and a pomegranate, a golden bell and a pomegranate, upon the skirts of the robe round about.28:35 And it shall be upon Aaron to minister: and the sound thereof shall be heard when he goes in to the holy place before Yahweh, and when he comes out, that he die not.28:36 And you shall make a plate of pure gold, and grave upon it, like the engravings of a signet, HOLY TO YAHWEH.28:37 And you shall put it on a lace of blue, and it shall be upon the mitre; upon the forefront of the mitre it shall be.28:38 And it shall be upon Aaron's forehead, and Aaron shall bear the iniquity of the holy things, which the children of Israel shall hallow in all their holy gifts; and it shall be always upon his forehead, that they may be accepted before Yahweh.28:39 And you shall weave the coat in checker work of fine linen, and you shall make a mitre of fine linen, and you shall make a girdle, the work of the embroiderer.28:40 And for Aaron's sons you shall make coats, and you shall make for them girdles, and head-tires shall you make for them, for glory and for beauty.28:41 And you shall put them upon Aaron your brother, and upon his sons with him, and shall anoint them, and consecrate them, and sanctify them, that they may minister to me in the priest's office.28:42 And you shall make them linen breeches to cover the flesh of their nakedness; from the loins even to the thighs they shall reach:28:43 And they shall be upon Aaron, and upon his sons, when they go in to the tent of meeting, or when they come near to the altar to minister in the holy place; that they bear not iniquity, and die: it shall be a statute for ever to him and to his seed after him.Chapter 2929:1 And this is the thing that you shall do to them to hallow them, to minister to me in the priest's office: take one young bullock and two rams without blemish,29:2 and unleavened bread, and cakes unleavened mingled with oil, and wafers unleavened anointed with oil: of fine wheaten flour shall you make them.29:3 And you shall put them into one basket, and bring them in the basket, with the bullock and the two rams.29:4 And Aaron and his sons you shall bring to the door of the tent of meeting, and shall wash them with water.29:5 And you shall take the garments, and put upon Aaron the coat, and the robe of the ephod, and the ephod, and the breastplate, and gird him with the skillfully woven band of the ephod;29:6 and you shall set the mitre upon his head, and put the holy crown upon the mitre.29:7 Then shall you take the anointing oil, and pour it upon his head, and anoint him.29:8 And you shall bring his sons, and put coats upon them.29:9 And you shall gird them with girdles, Aaron and his sons, and bind head-tires on them: and they shall have the priesthood by a perpetual statute: and you shall consecrate Aaron and his sons.29:10 And you shall bring the bullock before the tent of meeting: and Aaron and his sons shall lay their hands upon the head of the bullock.29:11 And you shall kill the bullock before Yahweh, at the door of the tent of meeting.29:12 And you shall take of the blood of the bullock, and put it upon the horns of the altar with your finger; and you shall pour out all the blood at the base of the altar.29:13 And you shall take all the fat that covers the inwards, and the lobe upon the liver, and the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, and burn them upon the altar.29:14 But the flesh of the bullock, and its skin, and it dung, shall you burn with fire without the camp: it is a sin offering.29:15 You shall also take the one ram; and Aaron and his sons shall lay their hands upon the head of the ram.29:16 And you shall slay the ram, and you shall take its blood, and sprinkle it round about upon the altar.29:17 And you shall cut the ram into its pieces, and wash its inwards, and its legs, and put them with its pieces, and with its head.29:18 And you shall burn the whole ram upon the altar: it is a burnt offering to Yahweh; it is a sweet savor, an offering made by fire to Yahweh.29:19 And you shall take the other ram; and Aaron and his sons shall lay their hands upon the head of the ram.29:20 Then shall you kill the ram, and take of its blood, and put it upon the tip of the right ear of Aaron, and upon the tip of the right ear of his sons, and upon the thumb of their right hand, and upon the great toe of their right foot, and sprinkle the blood upon the altar round about.29:21 And you shall take of the blood that is upon the altar, and of the anointing oil, and sprinkle it upon Aaron, and upon his garments, and upon his sons, and upon the garments of his sons with him: and he shall be hallowed, and his garments, and his sons, and his sons' garments with him.29:22 Also you shall take of the ram the fat, and the fat tail, and the fat that covers the inwards, and the lobe of the liver, and the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, and the right thigh (for it is a ram of consecration),29:23 and one loaf of bread, and one cake of oiled bread, and one wafer, out of the basket of unleavened bread that is before Yahweh.29:24 And you shall put the whole upon the hands of Aaron, and upon the hands of his sons, and shall wave them for a wave-offering before Yahweh.29:25 And you shall take them from their hands, and burn them on the altar upon the burnt offering, for a sweet savor before Yahweh: it is an offering made by fire to Yahweh.29:26 And you shall take the breast of Aaron's ram of consecration, and wave it for a wave-offering before Yahweh: and it shall be your portion.29:27 And you shall sanctify the breast of the wave-offering, and the thigh of the heave-offering, which is waved, and which is heaved up, of the ram of consecration, even of that which is for Aaron, and of that which is for his sons:29:28 and it shall be for Aaron and his sons as their portion for ever from the children of Israel; for it is a portion set aside: and it shall be a portion set aside from the children of Israel of the sacrifices of their peace offerings, even their portion set aside to Yahweh.29:29 And the holy garments of Aaron shall be for his sons after him, to be anointed in them, and to be consecrated in them.29:30 Seven days shall the son that is priest in his stead put them on, when he comes into the tent of meeting to minister in the holy place.29:31 And you shall take the ram of consecration, and boil its flesh in a holy place.29:32 And Aaron and his sons shall eat the flesh of the ram, and the bread that is in the basket, at the door of the tent of meeting.29:33 And they shall eat those things with which atonement was made, to consecrate and to sanctify them: but a stranger shall not eat thereof, because they are holy.29:34 And if anything of the flesh of the consecration, or of the bread, remains to the morning, then you shall burn the remainder with fire: it shall not be eaten, because it is holy.29:35 And thus shall you do to Aaron, and to his sons, according to all that I have commanded you: seven days shall you consecrate them.29:36 And every day shall you offer the bullock of sin offering for atonement: and you shall cleanse the altar, when you make atonement for it; and you shall anoint it, to sanctify it.29:37 Seven days you shall make atonement for the altar, and sanctify it: and the altar shall be most holy; whatsoever touches the altar shall be holy.29:38 Now this is that which you shall offer upon the altar: two lambs a year old day by day continually.29:39 The one lamb you shall offer in the morning; and the other lamb you shall offer at even:29:40 and with the one lamb a tenth part of an ephah of fine flour mingled with the fourth part of a hin of beaten oil, and the fourth part of a hin of wine for a drink offering.29:41 And the other lamb you shall offer at even, and shall do thereto according to the meal offering of the morning, and according to the drink offering thereof, for a sweet savor, an offering made by fire to Yahweh.29:42 It shall be a continual burnt offering throughout your generations at the door of the tent of meeting before Yahweh, where I will meet with you, to speak there to you.29:43 And there I will meet with the children of Israel; and the Tent shall be sanctified by my glory.29:44 And I will sanctify the tent of meeting, and the altar: Aaron also and his sons will I sanctify, to minister to me in the priest's office.29:45 And I will dwell among the children of Israel, and will be their God.29:46 And they shall know that I am Yahweh their God, that brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, that I might dwell among them: I am Yahweh their God.Chapter 3030:1 And you shall make an altar to burn incense upon: of acacia wood shall you make it.30:2 A cubit shall be the length of it, and a cubit the breadth of it; foursquare shall it be; and two cubits shall be the height of it: its horns shall be of one piece with it.30:3 And you shall overlay it with pure gold, the top of it, and the sides of it round about, and the horns of it; and you shall make to it a crown of gold round about.30:4 And two golden rings shall you make for it under its crown; upon its two ribs, upon the two sides of it shall you make them; and they shall be for places for staves with which to bear it.30:5 And you shall make the staves of acacia wood, and overlay them with gold.30:6 And you shall put it before the veil that is by the ark of the testimony, before the mercy-seat that is over the testimony, where I will meet with you.30:7 And Aaron shall burn upon it incense of sweet spices: every morning, when he dresses the lamps, he shall burn it.30:8 And when Aaron lights the lamps at even, he shall burn it, a perpetual incense before Yahweh throughout your generations.30:9 You shall offer no strange incense upon it, nor burnt offering, nor meal offering; and ye shall pour no drink offering upon it.30:10 And Aaron shall make atonement upon the horns of it once in the year; with the blood of the sin offering of atonement once in the year shall he make atonement for it throughout your generations: it is most holy to Yahweh.30:11 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,30:12 When you take the sum of the children of Israel, according to those that are numbered of them, then shall they give every man a ransom for his soul to Yahweh, when you number them; that there be no plague among them, when you number them.30:13 This they shall give, every one that passes over to them that are numbered, half a shekel after the shekel of the sanctuary; (the shekel is twenty gerahs;) half a shekel for an offering to Yahweh.30:14 Every one that passes over to them that are numbered, from twenty years old and upward, shall give the offering of Yahweh.30:15 The rich shall not give more, and the poor shall not give less, than the half shekel, when they give the offering of Yahweh, to make atonement for your souls.30:16 And you shall take the atonement money from the children of Israel, and shall appoint it for the service of the tent of meeting; that it may be a memorial for the children of Israel before Yahweh, to make atonement for your souls.30:17 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,30:18 You shall also make a laver of brass, and the base thereof of brass, whereat to wash.  And you shall put it between the tent of meeting and the altar, and you shall put water therein.30:19 And Aaron and his sons shall wash their hands and their feet thereat:30:20 when they go into the tent of meeting, they shall wash with water, that they die not; or when they come near to the altar to minister, to burn an offering made by fire to Yahweh.30:21 So they shall wash their hands and their feet, so that they die not: and it shall be a statute for ever to them, even to him and to his seed throughout their generations.30:22 Moreover Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,30:23 Take you also to you the chief spices: of flowing myrrh five hundred shekels, and of sweet cinnamon half so much, even two hundred and fifty, and of sweet calamus two hundred and fifty,30:24 and of cassia five hundred, after the shekel of the sanctuary, and of olive oil a hin.30:25 And you shall make it a holy anointing oil, a perfume compounded after the are of the perfumer: it shall be a holy anointing oil.30:26 And you shall anoint with it the tent of meeting, and the ark of the testimony,30:27 and the table and all the vessels thereof, and the candlestick and the vessels thereof, and the altar of incense,30:28 and the altar of burnt offering with all the vessels thereof, and the laver and the base thereof.30:29 And you shall sanctify them, that they may be most holy: whatsoever touches them shall be holy.30:30 And you shall anoint Aaron and his sons, and sanctify them, that they may minister to me in the priest's office.30:31 And you shall speak to the children of Israel, saying, This shall be a holy anointing oil to me throughout your generations.30:32 Upon the flesh of man shall it not be poured, neither shall ye make any like it, according to the composition thereof: it is holy, and it shall be holy to you.30:33 Whosoever compounds any like it, or whosoever puts any of it upon a stranger, he shall be cut off from his people.30:34 And Yahweh said to Moses, Take to you sweet spices, stacte, and onycha, and galbanum; sweet spices with pure frankincense: of each shall there be a like weight;30:35 and you shall make of it incense, a perfume after the are of the perfumer, seasoned with salt, pure and holy:30:36 and you shall beat some of it very small, and put of it before the testimony in the tent of meeting, where I will meet with you: it shall be to you most holy.30:37 And the incense which you shall make, according to the composition thereof ye shall not make for yourselves: it shall be to you holy for Yahweh.30:38 Whosoever shall make like to that, to smell thereof, he shall be cut off from his people.Chapter 3131:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,31:2 See, I have called by name Bezalel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah:31:3 and I have filled him with the Spirit of God, in wisdom, and in understanding, and in knowledge, and in all manner of workmanship,31:4 to devise skilful works, to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass,31:5 and in cutting of stones for setting, and in carving of wood, to work in all manner of workmanship.31:6 And I, behold, I have appointed with him Oholiab, the son of Ahisamach, of the tribe of Dan; and in the heart of all that are wise-hearted I have put wisdom, that they may make all that I have commanded you:31:7 the tent of meeting, and the ark of the testimony, and the mercy-seat that is thereupon, and all the furniture of the Tent,31:8 and the table and its vessels, and the pure candlestick with all its vessels, and the altar of incense,31:9 and the altar of burnt offering with all its vessels, and the laver and its base,31:10 and the finely wrought garments, and the holy garments for Aaron the priest, and the garments of his sons, to minister in the priest's office,31:11 and the anointing oil, and the incense of sweet spices for the holy place: according to all that I have commanded you shall they do.31:12 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,31:13 Speak you also to the children of Israel, saying, Verily ye shall keep my sabbaths: for it is a sign between me and you throughout your generations; that ye may know that I am Yahweh who sanctifies you.31:14 You shall keep the sabbath therefore; for it is holy to you: every one that profanes it shall surely be put to death; for whosoever does any work therein, that soul shall be cut off from among his people.31:15 Six days shall work be done, but on the seventh day is a sabbath of solemn rest, holy to Yahweh: whosoever does any work on the sabbath day, he shall surely be put to death.31:16 Wherefore the children of Israel shall keep the sabbath, to observe the sabbath throughout their generations, for a perpetual covenant.31:17 It is a sign between me and the children of Israel for ever: for in six days Yahweh made heaven and earth, and on the seventh day he rested, and was refreshed.31:18 And he gave to Moses, when he had made an end of communing with him upon mount Sinai, the two tables of the testimony, tables of stone, written with the finger of God.Chapter 3232:1 And when the people saw that Moses delayed to come down from the mount, the people gathered themselves together to Aaron, and said to him, Up, make us gods, which shall go before us; for as for this Moses, the man that brought us up out of the land of Egypt, we know not what is become of him.32:2 And Aaron said to them, Break off the golden rings, which are in the ears of your wives, of your sons, and of your daughters, and bring them to me.32:3 And all the people broke off the golden rings which were in their ears, and brought them to Aaron.32:4 And he received it at their hand, and fashioned it with a graving tool, and made it a molten calf: and they said, These are your gods, O Israel, which brought you up out of the land of Egypt.32:5 And when Aaron saw this, he built an altar before it; and Aaron made proclamation, and said, Tomorrow shall be a feast to Yahweh.32:6 And they rose up early on the morrow, and offered burnt offerings, and brought peace offerings; and the people sat down to eat and to drink, and rose up to play.32:7 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, Go, get yourself down; for your people, that you brought up out of the land of Egypt, have corrupted themselves:32:8 they have turned aside quickly out of the way which I commanded them: they have made them a molten calf, and have worshipped it, and have sacrificed to it, and said, These are your gods, O Israel, which brought you up out of the land of Egypt.32:9 And Yahweh said to Moses, I have seen this people, and, behold, it is a stiff-necked people:32:10 now therefore let me alone, that my wrath may grow hot against them, and that I may consume them: and I will make of you a great nation.32:11 And Moses besought Yahweh his God, and said, Yahweh, why does your wrath grow hot against your people, that you have brought forth out of the land of Egypt with great power and with a mighty hand?32:12 Why should the Egyptians speak, saying, For evil did he bring them forth, to slay them in the mountains, and to consume them from the face of the earth?  Turn from your fierce wrath, and repent of this evil against your people.32:13 Remember Abraham, Isaac, and Israel, your servants, to whom you swore by your own self, and said to them, I will multiply your seed as the stars of heaven, and all this land that I have spoken of will I give to your seed, and they shall inherit it for ever.32:14 And Yahweh repented of the evil which he said he would do to his people.32:15 And Moses turned, and went down from the mount, with the two tables of the testimony in his hand; tables that were written on both their sides; on the one side and on the other were they written.32:16 And the tables were the work of God, and the writing was the writing of God, graven upon the tables.32:17 And when Joshua heard the noise of the people as they shouted, he said to Moses, There is a noise of war in the camp.32:18 And he said, It is not the voice of them that shout for mastery, neither is it the voice of them that cry for being overcome; but the noise of them that sing do I hear.32:19 And it came to pass, as soon as he came near to the camp, that he saw the calf and the dancing: and Moses' anger became hot, and he cast the tables out of his hands, and broke them beneath the mount.32:20 And he took the calf which they had made, and burnt it with fire, and ground it to powder, and strewed it upon the water, and made the children of Israel drink of it.32:21 And Moses said to Aaron, What did this people to you, that you have brought a great sin upon them?32:22 And Aaron said, Let not the anger of my lord grow hot: you know the people, that they are set on evil.32:23 For they said to me, Make us gods, which shall go before us; for as for this Moses, the man that brought us up out of the land of Egypt, we know not what is become of him.32:24 And I said to them, Whosoever has any gold, let them break it off: so they gave it me; and I cast it into the fire, and there came out this calf.32:25 And when Moses saw that the people were broken loose, (for Aaron had let them loose for a derision among their enemies,)32:26 then Moses stood in the gate of the camp, and said, Whoso is on Yahweh's side, let him come to me.  And all the sons of Levi gathered themselves together to him.32:27 And he said to them, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Put ye every man his sword upon his thigh, and go to and fro from gate to gate throughout the camp, and slay every man his brother, and every man his companion, and every man his neighbor.32:28 And the sons of Levi did according to the word of Moses: and there fell of the people that day about three thousand men.32:29 And Moses said, Consecrate yourselves today to Yahweh, yes, every man against his son, and against his brother; that he may bestow upon you a blessing this day.32:30 And it came to pass the next day, that Moses said to the people, You have sinned a great sin: and now I will go up to Yahweh; perhaps I shall make atonement for your sin.32:31 And Moses returned to Yahweh, and said, Oh, this people have sinned a great sin, and have made themselves gods of gold.32:32 But now, please forgive their sin- but if not, let it be me, I pray you, who you blot out of your book which you have written.32:33 And Yahweh said to Moses, Whosoever has sinned against me, him will I blot out of my book.32:34 And now go, lead the people to the place of which I have spoken to you: behold, my angel shall go before you; nevertheless in the day when I visit, I will visit their sin upon them.32:35 And Yahweh attacked the people, because they made the calf, which Aaron made.Chapter 3333:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, Depart, go up from here, you and the people that you have brought up out of the land of Egypt, to the land of which I swore to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, saying, To your seed will I give it:33:2 and I will send an angel before you; and I will drive out the Canaanite, the Amorite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite:33:3 to a land flowing with milk and honey: for I will not go up in the midst of you, for you are a stiff-necked people, lest I consume you in the way.33:4 And when the people heard these evil tidings, they mourned: and no man did put on him his ornaments.33:5 And Yahweh said to Moses, Say to the children of Israel, You are a stiff-necked people; if I go up into the midst of you for one moment, I shall consume you: therefore now put off your ornaments from you, that I may know what to do to you.33:6 And the children of Israel stripped themselves of their ornaments from mount Horeb onward.33:7 Now Moses used to take the tent and to pitch it without the camp, afar off from the camp; and he called it, The tent of meeting.  And it came to pass, that every one that sought Yahweh went out to the tent of meeting, which was without the camp.33:8 And it came to pass, when Moses went out to the Tent, that all the people rose up, and stood, every man at his tent door, and looked after Moses, until he was gone into the Tent.33:9 And it came to pass, when Moses entered into the Tent, the pillar of cloud descended, and stood at the door of the Tent: and Yahweh spoke with Moses.33:10 And all the people saw the pillar of cloud stand at the door of the Tent: and all the people rose up and worshipped, every man at his tent door.33:11 And Yahweh spoke to Moses face to face, as a man speaks to his friend.  And he turned again into the camp: but his minister Joshua, the son of Nun, a young man, departed not out of the Tent.33:12 And Moses said to Yahweh, See, you say to me, Bring up this people: and you have not let me know whom you will send with me.  Yet you have said, I know you by name, and you have also found favor in my sight.33:13 Now therefore, I pray you, if I have found favor in your sight, show me now your ways, that I may know you, to the end that I may find favor in your sight: and consider that this nation is your people.33:14 And he said, My presence shall go with you, and I will give you rest.33:15 And he said to him, If your presence go not with me, carry us not up from here.33:16 For in what way now shall it be known that I have found favor in your sight, I and your people?  is it not in that you go with us, so that we are separated, I and your people, from all the people that are upon the face of the earth?33:17 And Yahweh said to Moses, I will do this thing also that you have spoken; for you have found favor in my sight, and I know you by name.33:18 And he said, Show me, I pray you, your glory.33:19 And he said, I will make all my goodness pass before you, and will proclaim the name of Yahweh before you; and I will be gracious to whom I will be gracious, and will show mercy on whom I will show mercy.33:20 And he said, You can not see my face; for man shall not see me and live.33:21 and Yahweh said, Behold, there is a place by me, and you shall stand upon the rock:33:22 and it shall come to pass, while my glory passes by, that I will put you in a cleft of the rock, and will cover you with my hand until I have passed by:33:23 and I will take away my hand, and you shall see my back; but my face shall not be seen.Chapter 3434:1 And Yahweh said to Moses, Hew you two tables of stone like to the first: and I will write upon the tables the words that were on the first tables, which you broke.34:2 And be ready by the morning, and come up in the morning to mount Sinai, and present yourself there to me on the top of the mount.34:3 And no man shall come up with you; neither let any man be seen throughout all the mount; neither let the flocks nor herds feed before that mount.34:4 And he hewed two tables of stone like to the first; and Moses rose up early in the morning, and went up to mount Sinai, as Yahweh had commanded him, and took in his hand two tables of stone.34:5 And Yahweh descended in the cloud, and stood with him there, and proclaimed the name of Yahweh.34:6 And Yahweh passed by before him, and proclaimed, Yahweh, Yahweh, a God merciful and gracious, slow to anger, and abundant in lovingkindness and truth,34:7 keeping lovingkindness for thousands, forgiving iniquity and transgression and sin; and that will by no means clear the guilty, visiting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children, and upon the children's children, upon the third and upon the fourth generation.34:8 And Moses made haste, and bowed his head toward the earth, and worshipped.34:9 And he said, If now I have found favor in your sight, O Lord, let the Lord, I pray you, go in the midst of us; for it is a stiff-necked people; and pardon our iniquity and our sin, and take us for your inheritance.34:10 And he said, Behold, I make a covenant: before all your people I will do marvels, such as have not been wrought in all the earth, nor in any nation; and all the people among which you are shall see the work of Yahweh; for it is a terrible thing that I do with you.34:11 Observe you that which I command you this day: behold, I drive out before you the Amorite, and the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, and the Hivite, and the Jebusite.34:12 Take heed to yourself, lest you make a covenant with the inhabitants of the land whither you go, lest it be for a snare in the midst of you:34:13 but ye shall break down their altars, and dash in pieces their pillars, and ye shall cut down their Asherim;34:14 for you shall worship no other god: for Yahweh, whose name is Jealous, is a jealous God:34:15 lest you make a covenant with the inhabitants of the land, and they play the harlot after their gods, and sacrifice to their gods, and one call you and you eat of his sacrifice;34:16 and you take of their daughters to your sons, and their daughters play the harlot after their gods, and make your sons play the harlot after their gods.34:17 You shall make you no molten gods.34:18 The feast of unleavened bread shall you keep.  Seven days you shall eat unleavened bread, as I commanded you, at the time appointed in the month Abib; for in the month Abib you came out from Egypt.34:19 All that opens the womb is mine; and all your cattle that is male, the firstlings of cow and sheep.34:20 And the firstling of a donkey you shall redeem with a lamb: and if you will not redeem it, then you shall break its neck.  All the first-born of your sons you shall redeem.  And none shall appear before me empty.34:21 Six days you shall work, but on the seventh day you shall rest: in plowing time and in harvest you shall rest.34:22 And you shall observe the feast of weeks, even of the first-fruits of wheat harvest, and the feast of ingathering at the year's end.34:23 Three times in the year shall all your males appear before the Lord Yahweh, the God of Israel.34:24 For I will cast out nations before you, and enlarge your borders: neither shall any man desire your land, when you go up to appear before Yahweh your God three times in the year.34:25 You shall not offer the blood of my sacrifice with leavened bread; neither shall the sacrifice of the feast of the Passover be left to the morning.34:26 The first of the first-fruits of your ground you shall bring to the house of Yahweh your God.  You shall not boil a kid in its mother's milk.34:27 And Yahweh said to Moses, Write you these words: for after the tenor of these words I have made a covenant with you and with Israel.34:28 And he was there with Yahweh forty days and forty nights; he neither ate bread, nor drank water.  And he wrote upon the tablets the words of the covenant, the ten commandments.34:29 And it came to pass, when Moses came down from mount Sinai with the two tables of the testimony in Moses' hand, when he came down from the mount, that Moses knew not that the skin of his face shone by reason of his speaking with him.34:30 And when Aaron and all the children of Israel saw Moses, behold, the skin of his face shone; and they were afraid to come near him.34:31 And Moses called to them; and Aaron and all the rulers of the congregation returned to him: and Moses spoke to them.34:32 And afterward all the children of Israel came near: and he gave them in commandment all that Yahweh had spoken with him in mount Sinai.34:33 And when Moses had done speaking with them, he put a veil on his face.34:34 But when Moses went in before Yahweh to speak with him, he took the veil off, until he came out; and he came out, and spoke to the children of Israel that which he was commanded.34:35 And the children of Israel saw the face of Moses, that the skin of Moses' face shone: and Moses put the veil upon his face again, until he went in to speak with him.Chapter 3535:1 And Moses assembled all the congregation of the children of Israel, and said to them, These are the words which Yahweh has commanded, that ye should do them.35:2 Six days shall work be done; but on the seventh day there shall be to you a holy day, a sabbath of solemn rest to Yahweh: whosoever does any work therein shall be put to death.35:3 You shall kindle no fire throughout your habitations upon the sabbath day.35:4 And Moses spoke to all the congregation of the children of Israel, saying, This is the thing which Yahweh commanded, saying,35:5 Take ye from among you an offering to Yahweh; whosoever is of a willing heart, let him bring it, Yahweh's offering: gold, and silver, and brass,35:6 and blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen, and goats' hair,35:7 and rams' skins dyed red, and sealskins, and acacia wood,35:8 and oil for the light, and spices for the anointing oil, and for the sweet incense,35:9 and onyx stones, and stones to be set, for the ephod, and for the breastplate.35:10 And let every wise-hearted man among you come, and make all that Yahweh has commanded:35:11 the tabernacle, its tent, and its covering, its clasps, and its boards, its bars, its pillars, and its sockets;35:12 the ark, and the staves thereof, the mercy-seat, and the veil of the screen;35:13 the table, and its staves, and all its vessels, and the showbread;35:14 the candlestick also for the light, and its vessels, and its lamps, and the oil for the light;35:15 and the altar of incense, and its staves, and the anointing oil, and the sweet incense, and the screen for the door, at the door of the tabernacle;35:16 the altar of burnt offering, with its grating of brass, it staves, and all its vessels, the laver and its base;35:17 the hangings of the court, the pillars thereof, and their sockets, and the screen for the gate of the court;35:18 the pins of the tabernacle, and the pins of the court, and their cords;35:19 the finely wrought garments, for ministering in the holy place, the holy garments for Aaron the priest, and the garments of his sons, to minister in the priest's office.35:20 And all the congregation of the children of Israel departed from the presence of Moses.35:21 And they came, every one whose heart stirred him up, and every one whom his spirit made willing, and brought Yahweh's offering, for the work of the tent of meeting, and for all the service thereof, and for the holy garments.35:22 And they came, both men and women, as many as were willing-hearted, and brought brooches, and ear-rings, and signet-rings, and armlets, all jewels of gold; even every man that offered an offering of gold to Yahweh.35:23 And every man, with whom was found blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen, and goats' hair, and rams' skins dyed red, and sealskins, brought them.35:24 Every one that did offer an offering of silver and brass brought Yahweh's offering; and every man, with whom was found acacia wood for any work of the service, brought it.35:25 And all the women that were wise-hearted did spin with their hands, and brought that which they had spun, the blue, and the purple, the scarlet, and the fine linen.35:26 And all the women whose heart stirred them up in wisdom spun the goats' hair.35:27 And the rulers brought the onyx stones, and the stones to be set, for the ephod, and for the breastplate;35:28 and the spice, and the oil; for the light, and for the anointing oil, and for the sweet incense.35:29 The children of Israel brought a freewill-offering to Yahweh; every man and woman, whose heart made them willing to bring for all the work, which Yahweh had commanded to be made by Moses.35:30 And Moses said to the children of Israel, See, Yahweh has called by name Bezalel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah.35:31 And he has filled him with the Spirit of God, in wisdom, in understanding, and in knowledge, and in all manner of workmanship;35:32 and to devise skilful works, to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass,35:33 and in cutting of stones for setting, and in carving of wood, to work in all manner of skilful workmanship.35:34 And he has put in his heart that he may teach, both he, and Oholiab, the son of Ahisamach, of the tribe of Dan.35:35 Them has he filled with wisdom of heart, to work all manner of workmanship, of the engraver, and of the skilful workman, and of the embroiderer, in blue, and in purple, in scarlet, and in fine linen, and of the weaver, even of them that do any workmanship, and of those that devise skilful works.Chapter 3636:1 And Bezalel and Oholiab shall work, and every wise-hearted man, in whom Yahweh has put wisdom and understanding to know how to work all the work for the service of the sanctuary, according to all that Yahweh has commanded.36:2 And Moses called Bezalel and Oholiab, and every wise-hearted man, in whose heart Yahweh had put wisdom, even every one whose heart stirred him up to come to the work to do it:36:3 and they received of Moses all the offering which the children of Israel had brought for the work of the service of the sanctuary, with which to make it.  And they brought yet to him freewill-offerings every morning.36:4 And all the wise men, that wrought all the work of the sanctuary, came every man from his work which they wrought.36:5 And they spoke to Moses, saying, The people bring much more than enough for the service of the work which Yahweh commanded to make.36:6 And Moses gave commandment, and they caused it to be proclaimed throughout the camp, saying, Let neither man nor woman make any more work for the offering of the sanctuary.  So the people were restrained from bringing.36:7 For the stuff they had was sufficient for all the work to make it, and too much.36:8 And all the wise-hearted men among them that wrought the work made the tabernacle with ten curtains; of fine twined linen, and blue, and purple, and scarlet, with cherubim, the work of the skilful workman, Bezalel made them.36:9 The length of each curtain was eight and twenty cubits, and the breadth of each curtain four cubits: all the curtains had one measure.36:10 And he coupled five curtains one to another: and the other five curtains he coupled one to another.36:11 And he made loops of blue upon the edge of the one curtain from the selvedge in the coupling: likewise he made in the edge of the curtain that was outmost in the second coupling.36:12 Fifty loops made he in the one curtain, and fifty loops made he in the edge of the curtain that was in the second coupling: the loops were opposite one to another.36:13 And he made fifty clasps of gold, and coupled the curtains one to another with the clasps: so the tabernacle was one.36:14 And he made curtains of goats' hair for a tent over the tabernacle: eleven curtains he made them.36:15 The length of each curtain was thirty cubits, and four cubits the breadth of each curtain: the eleven curtains had one measure.36:16 And he coupled five curtains by themselves, and six curtains by themselves.36:17 And he made fifty loops on the edge of the curtain that was outmost in the coupling, and fifty loops made he upon the edge of the curtain which was outmost in the second coupling.36:18 And he made fifty clasps of brass to couple the tent together, that it might be one.36:19 And he made a covering for the tent of rams' skins dyed red, and a covering of sealskins above.36:20 And he made the boards for the tabernacle, of acacia wood, standing up.36:21 Ten cubits was the length of a board, and a cubit and a half the breadth of each board.36:22 Each board had two tenons, joined one to another: thus did he make for all the boards of the tabernacle.36:23 And he made the boards for the tabernacle: twenty boards for the south side southward.36:24 And he made forty sockets of silver under the twenty boards; two sockets under one board for its two tenons, and two sockets under another board for its two tenons.36:25 And for the second side of the tabernacle, on the north side, he made twenty boards,36:26 and their forty sockets of silver; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board.36:27 And for the hinder part of the tabernacle westward he made six boards.36:28 And two boards made he for the corners of the tabernacle in the hinder part.36:29 And they were double beneath; and in like manner they were entire to the top thereof to one ring: thus he did to both of them in the two corners.36:30 And there were eight boards, and their sockets of silver, sixteen sockets; under every board two sockets.36:31 And he made bars of acacia wood; five for the boards of the one side of the tabernacle,36:32 and five bars for the boards of the other side of the tabernacle, and five bars for the boards of the tabernacle for the hinder part westward.36:33 And he made the middle bar to pass through in the midst of the boards from the one end to the other.36:34 And he overlaid the boards with gold, and made their rings of gold for places for the bars, and overlaid the bars with gold.36:35 And he made the veil of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen: with cherubim, the work of the skilful workman, made he it.36:36 And he made thereto four pillars of acacia, and overlaid them with gold: their hooks were of gold; And he cast for them four sockets of silver.36:37 And he made a screen for the door of the Tent, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, the work of the embroiderer;36:38 and the five pillars of it with their hooks: and he overlaid their capitals and their fillets with gold; and their five sockets were of brass.Chapter 3737:1 And Bezalel made the ark of acacia wood: two cubits and a half was the length of it, and a cubit and a half the breadth of it, and a cubit and a half the height of it:37:2 and he overlaid it with pure gold within and without, and made a crown of gold to it round about.37:3 And he cast for it four rings of gold, in the four feet thereof; even two rings on the one side of it, and two rings on the other side of it.37:4 And he made staves of acacia wood, and overlaid them with gold.37:5 And he put the staves into the rings on the sides of the ark, to bear the ark.37:6 And he made a mercy-seat of pure gold: two cubits and a half was the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth thereof.37:7 And he made two cherubim of gold; of beaten work made he them, at the two ends of the mercy-seat;37:8 one cherub at the one end, and one cherub at the other end: of one piece with the mercy-seat made he the cherubim at the two ends thereof.37:9 And the cherubim spread out their wings on high, covering the mercy-seat with their wings, with their faces one to another; toward the mercy-seat were the faces of the cherubim.37:10 And he made the table of acacia wood: two cubits was the length thereof, and a cubit the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a half the height thereof:37:11 and he overlaid it with pure gold, and made thereto a crown of gold round about.37:12 And he made to it a border of a handbreadth round about, and made a golden crown to the border thereof round about.37:13 And he cast for it four rings of gold, and put the rings in the four corners that were on the four feet thereof.37:14 Close by the border were the rings, the places for the staves to bear the table.37:15 And he made the staves of acacia wood, and overlaid them with gold, to bear the table.37:16 And he made the vessels which were upon the table, the dishes thereof, and the spoons thereof, and the bowls thereof, and the flagons thereof, with which to pour out, of pure gold.37:17 And he made the candlestick of pure gold: of beaten work made he the candlestick, even its base, and its shaft; its cups, it bulbs, and its flowers, were of one piece with it:37:18 and there were six branches going out of the sides thereof; three branches of the candlestick out of the one side thereof, and three branches of the candlestick out of the other side thereof:37:19 three cups made like almond-blossoms in one branch, a bulb and a flower, and three cups made like almond-blossoms in the other branch, a bulb and a flower: so for the six branches going out of the candlestick.37:20 And in the candlestick were four cups made like almond-blossoms, the bulbs thereof, and the flowers thereof;37:21 and a bulb under two branches of one piece with it, and a bulb under two branches of one piece with it, and a bulb under two branches of one piece with it, for the six branches going out of it.37:22 Their bulbs and their branches were of one piece with it: the whole of it was one beaten work of pure gold.37:23 And he made the lamps thereof, seven, and the snuffers thereof, and the snuffdishes thereof, of pure gold.37:24 Of a talent of pure gold made he it, and all the vessels thereof.37:25 And he made the altar of incense of acacia wood: a cubit was the length thereof, and a cubit the breadth thereof, foursquare; and two cubits was the height thereof; the horns thereof were of one piece with it.37:26 And he overlaid it with pure gold, the top thereof, and the sides thereof round about, and the horns of it: and he made to it a crown of gold round about.37:27 And he made for it two golden rings under the crown thereof, upon the two ribs thereof, upon the two sides of it, for places for staves with which to bear it.37:28 And he made the staves of acacia wood, and overlaid them with gold.37:29 And he made the holy anointing oil, and the pure incense of sweet spices, after the are of the perfumer.Chapter 3838:1 And he made the altar of burnt offering of acacia wood: five cubits was the length thereof, and five cubits the breadth thereof, foursquare; and three cubits the height thereof.38:2 And he made the horns thereof upon the four corners of it; the horns thereof were of one piece with it: and he overlaid it with brass.38:3 And he made all the vessels of the altar, the pots, and the shovels, and the basins, the flesh-hooks, and the firepans: all the vessels thereof made he of brass.38:4 And he made for the altar a grating of network of brass, under the ledge round it beneath, reaching halfway up.38:5 And he cast four rings for the four ends of the grating of brass, to be places for the staves.38:6 And he made the staves of acacia wood, and overlaid them with brass.38:7 And he put the staves into the rings on the sides of the altar, with which to bear it; he made it hollow with planks.38:8 And he made the laver of brass, and the base thereof of brass, of the mirrors of the ministering women that ministered at the door of the tent of meeting.38:9 And he made the court: for the south side southward the hangings of the court were of fine twined linen, a hundred cubits;38:10 their pillars were twenty, and their sockets twenty, of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets were of silver.38:11 And for the north side a hundred cubits, their pillars twenty, and their sockets twenty, of brass; the hooks of the pillars, and their fillets, of silver.38:12 And for the west side were hangings of fifty cubits, their pillars ten, and their sockets ten; the hooks of the pillars, and their fillets, of silver.38:13 And for the east side eastward fifty cubits.38:14 The hangings for the one side of the gate were fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three;38:15 and so for the other side: on this hand and that hand by the gate of the court were hangings of fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three.38:16 All the hangings of the court round about were of fine twined linen.38:17 And the sockets for the pillars were of brass; the hooks of the pillars, and their fillets, of silver; and the overlaying of their capitals, of silver; and all the pillars of the court were filleted with silver.38:18 And the screen for the gate of the court was the work of the embroiderer, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen: and twenty cubits was the length, and the height in the breadth was five cubits, answerable to the hangings of the court.38:19 And their pillars were four, and their sockets four, of brass; their hooks of silver, and the overlaying of their capitals, and their fillets, of silver.38:20 And all the pins of the tabernacle, and of the court round about, were of brass.38:21 This is the sum of the things for the tabernacle, even the tabernacle of the testimony, as they were counted, according to the commandment of Moses, for the service of the Levites, by the hand of Ithamar, the son of Aaron the priest.38:22 And Bezalel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah, made all that Yahweh commanded Moses.38:23 And with him was Oholiab, the son of Ahisamach, of the tribe of Dan, an engraver, and a skilful workman, and an embroiderer in blue, and in purple, and in scarlet, and in fine linen.38:24 All the gold that was used for the work in all the work of the sanctuary, even the gold of the offering, was twenty and nine talents, and seven hundred and thirty shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary.38:25 And the silver of them that were numbered of the congregation was a hundred talents, and a thousand seven hundred and 75 shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary:38:26 a beka a head, that is, half a shekel, after the shekel of the sanctuary, for every one that passed over to them that were numbered, from twenty years old and upward, for six hundred thousand and three thousand and five hundred and fifty men.38:27 And the hundred talents of silver were for casting the sockets of the sanctuary, and the sockets of the veil; a hundred sockets for the hundred talents, a talent for a socket.38:28 And of the thousand seven hundred seventy and five shekels he made hooks for the pillars, and overlaid their capitals, and made fillets for them.38:29 And the brass of the offering was seventy talents, and two thousand and four hundred shekels.38:30 And with it he made the sockets to the door of the tent of meeting, and the brazen altar, and the brazen grating for it, and all the vessels of the altar,38:31 and the sockets of the court round about, and the sockets of the gate of the court, and all the pins of the tabernacle, and all the pins of the court round about.Chapter 3939:1 And of the blue, and purple, and scarlet, they made finely wrought garments, for ministering in the holy place, and made the holy garments for Aaron; as Yahweh commanded Moses.39:2 And he made the ephod of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen.39:3 And they did beat the gold into thin plates, and cut it into wires, to work it in the blue, and in the purple, and in the scarlet, and in the fine linen, the work of the skilful workman.39:4 They made shoulder-pieces for it, joined together; at the two ends was it joined together.39:5 And the skilfully woven band, that was upon it, with which to gird it on, was of the same piece and like the work thereof; of gold, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen; as Yahweh commanded Moses.39:6 And they wrought the onyx stones, inclosed in settings of gold, graven with the engravings of a signet, according to the names of the children of Israel.39:7 And he put them on the shoulder-pieces of the ephod, to be stones of memorial for the children of Israel; as Yahweh commanded Moses.39:8 And he made the breastplate, the work of the skilful workman, like the work of the ephod; of gold, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen.39:9 It was foursquare; they made the breastplate double: a span was the length thereof, and a span the breadth thereof, being double.39:10 And they set in it four rows of stones.  A row of sardius, topaz, and carbuncle was the first row;39:11 and the second row, an emerald, a sapphire, and a diamond;39:12 and the third row, a jacinth, an agate, and an ameyourst;39:13 and the fourth row, a beryl, an onyx, and a jaspar: they were inclosed in inclosings of gold in their settings.39:14 And the stones were according to the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names; like the engravings of a signet, every one according to his name, for the twelve tribes.39:15 And they made upon the breastplate chains like cords, of wreathen work of pure gold.39:16 And they made two settings of gold, and two gold rings, and put the two rings on the two ends of the breastplate.39:17 And they put the two wreathen chains of gold in the two rings at the ends of the breastplate.39:18 And the other two ends of the two wreathen chains they put on the two settings, and put them on the shoulder-pieces of the ephod, in the forepart thereof.39:19 And they made two rings of gold, and put them upon the two ends of the breastplate, upon the edge thereof, which was toward the side of the ephod inward.39:20 And they made two rings of gold, and put them on the two shoulder-pieces of the ephod underneath, in the forepart thereof, close by the coupling thereof, above the skilfully woven band of the ephod.39:21 And they did bind the breastplate by the rings thereof to the rings of the ephod with a lace of blue, that it might be upon the skilfully woven band of the ephod, and that the breastplate might not be loosed from the ephod; as Yahweh commanded Moses.39:22 And he made the robe of the ephod of woven work, all of blue.39:23 And the hole of the robe in the midst thereof, as the hole of a coat of mail, with a binding round about the hole of it, that it should not be rent.39:24 And they made upon the skirts of the robe pomegranates of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and twined linen.39:25 And they made bells of pure gold, and put the bells between the pomegranates upon the skirts of the robe round about, between the pomegranates;39:26 a bell and a pomegranate, a bell and a pomegranate, upon the skirts of the robe round about, to minister in; as Yahweh commanded Moses.39:27 And they made the coats of fine linen of woven work for Aaron, and for his sons,39:28 and the mitre of fine linen, and the goodly head-tires of fine linen, and the linen breeches of fine twined linen,39:29 and the girdle of fine twined linen, and blue, and purple, and scarlet, the work of the embroiderer; as Yahweh commanded Moses.39:30 And they made the plate of the holy crown of pure gold, and wrote upon it a writing, like the engravings of a signet, HOLY TO YAHWEH.39:31 And they tied to it a lace of blue, to fasten it upon the mitre above; as Yahweh commanded Moses.39:32 Thus was finished all the work of the tabernacle of the tent of meeting: and the children of Israel did according to all that Yahweh commanded Moses; so did they.39:33 And they brought the tabernacle to Moses, the Tent, and all its furniture, its clasps, its boards, it bars, and its pillars, and it sockets;39:34 and the covering of rams' skins dyed red, and the covering of sealskins, and the veil of the screen;39:35 the ark of the testimony, and the staves thereof, and the mercy-seat;39:36 the table, all the vessels thereof, and the showbread;39:37 the pure candlestick, the lamps thereof, even the lamps to be set in order, and all the vessels thereof, and the oil for the light;39:38 and the golden altar, and the anointing oil, and the sweet incense, and the screen for the door of the Tent;39:39 the brazen altar, and its grating of brass, its staves, and all its vessels, the laver and its base;39:40 the hangings of the court, its pillars, and its sockets, and the screen for the gate of the court, the cords thereof, and the pins thereof, and all the instruments of the service of the tabernacle, for the tent of meeting;39:41 the finely wrought garments for ministering in the holy place, and the holy garments for Aaron the priest, and the garments of his sons, to minister in the priest's office.39:42 According to all that Yahweh commanded Moses, so the children of Israel did all the work.39:43 And Moses saw all the work, and, behold, they had done it; as Yahweh had commanded, even so had they done it: and Moses blessed them.Chapter 4040:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,40:2 On the first day of the first month shall you rear up the tabernacle of the tent of meeting.40:3 And you shall put therein the ark of the testimony, and you shall screen the ark with the veil.40:4 And you shall bring in the table, and set in order the things that are upon it; and you shall bring in the candlestick, and light the lamps thereof.40:5 And you shall set the golden altar for incense before the ark of the testimony, and put the screen of the door to the tabernacle.40:6 And you shall set the altar of burnt offering before the door of the tabernacle of the tent of meeting.40:7 And you shall set the laver between the tent of meeting and the altar, and shall put water therein.40:8 And you shall set up the court round about, and hang up the screen of the gate of the court.40:9 And you shall take the anointing oil, and anoint the tabernacle, and all that is therein, and shall hallow it, and all the furniture thereof: and it shall be holy.40:10 And you shall anoint the altar of burnt offering, and all its vessels, and sanctify the altar: and the altar shall be most holy.40:11 And you shall anoint the laver and its base, and sanctify it.40:12 And you shall bring Aaron and his sons to the door of the tent of meeting, and shall wash them with water.40:13 And you shall put upon Aaron the holy garments; and you shall anoint him, and sanctify him, that he may minister to me in the priest's office.40:14 And you shall bring his sons, and put coats upon them;40:15 and you shall anoint them, as you anointed their father, that they may minister to me in the priest's office: and their anointing shall be to them for an everlasting priesthood throughout their generations.40:16 Thus did Moses: according to all that Yahweh commanded him, so did he.40:17 And it came to pass in the first month in the second year, on the first day of the month, that the tabernacle was reared up.40:18 And Moses reared up the tabernacle, and laid its sockets, and set up the boards thereof, and put in the bars thereof, and reared up its pillars.40:19 And he spread the tent over the tabernacle, and put the covering of the tent above upon it; as Yahweh commanded Moses.40:20 And he took and put the testimony into the ark, and set the staves on the ark, and put the mercy-seat above upon the ark:40:21 and he brought the ark into the tabernacle, and set up the veil of the screen, and screened the ark of the testimony; as Yahweh commanded Moses.40:22 And he put the table in the tent of meeting, upon the side of the tabernacle northward, without the veil.40:23 And he set the bread in order upon it before Yahweh; as Yahweh commanded Moses.40:24 And he put the candlestick in the tent of meeting, over against the table, on the side of the tabernacle southward.40:25 And he lighted the lamps before Yahweh; as Yahweh commanded Moses.40:26 And he put the golden altar in the tent of meeting before the veil:40:27 and he burnt upon it incense of sweet spices; as Yahweh commanded Moses.40:28 And he put the screen of the door to the tabernacle.40:29 And he set the altar of burnt offering at the door of the tabernacle of the tent of meeting, and offered upon it the burnt offering and the meal offering; as Yahweh commanded Moses.40:30 And he set the laver between the tent of meeting and the altar, and put water therein, with which to wash.40:31 And Moses and Aaron and his sons washed their hands and their feet thereat;40:32 when they went into the tent of meeting, and when they came near to the altar, they washed; as Yahweh commanded Moses.40:33 And he reared up the court round about the tabernacle and the altar, and set up the screen of the gate of the court.  So Moses finished the work.40:34 Then the cloud covered the tent of meeting, and the glory of Yahweh filled the tabernacle.40:35 And Moses was not able to enter into the tent of meeting, because the cloud remained above it, and the glory of Yahweh filled the tabernacle.40:36 And when the cloud was taken up from over the tabernacle, the children of Israel went onward, throughout all their journeys:40:37 but if the cloud was not taken up, then they journeyed not till the day that it was taken up.40:38 For the cloud of Yahweh was upon the tabernacle by day, and there was fire therein by night, in the sight of all the house of Israel, throughout all their journeys.End of ExodusLeviticusChapter 11:1 And Yahweh called to Moses, and spoke to him out of the tent of meeting, saying,1:2 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When any man of you offers an oblation to Yahweh, ye shall offer your oblation of the cattle, even of the herd and of the flock.1:3 If his oblation is a burnt offering of the herd, he shall offer it a male without blemish: he shall offer it at the door of the tent of meeting, that he may be accepted before Yahweh.1:4 And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the burnt offering; and it shall be accepted for him to make atonement for him.1:5 And he shall kill the bullock before Yahweh: and Aaron's sons, the priests, shall present the blood, and sprinkle the blood round about upon the altar that is at the door of the tent of meeting.1:6 And he shall flay the burnt offering, and cut it into its pieces.1:7 And the sons of Aaron the priest shall put fire upon the altar, and lay wood in order upon the fire;1:8 and Aaron's sons, the priests, shall lay the pieces, the head, and the fat, in order upon the wood that is on the fire which is upon the altar:1:9 but its inwards and its legs shall he wash with water: and the priest shall burn the whole on the altar, for a burnt offering, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.1:10 And if his oblation be of the flock, of the sheep, or of the goats, for a burnt offering; he shall offer it a male without blemish.1:11 And he shall kill it on the side of the altar northward before Yahweh: and Aaron's sons, the priests, shall sprinkle its blood upon the altar round about.1:12 And he shall cut it into its pieces, with its head and its fat; and the priest shall lay them in order on the wood that is on the fire which is upon the altar:1:13 but the inwards and the legs shall he wash with water; and the priest shall offer the whole, and burn it upon the altar: it is a burnt offering, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.1:14 And if his oblation to Yahweh be a burnt offering of birds, then he shall offer his oblation of turtle-doves, or of young pigeons.1:15 And the priest shall bring it to the altar, and wring off its head, and burn it on the altar; and the blood thereof shall be drained out on the side of the altar;1:16 and he shall take away its crop with the filth thereof, and cast it beside the altar on the east part, in the place of the ashes:1:17 and he shall rend it by the wings thereof, but shall not divide it asunder; and the priest shall burn it upon the altar, upon the wood that is upon the fire: it is a burnt offering, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.Chapter 22:1 And when any one offers an oblation of a meal offering to Yahweh, his oblation shall be of fine flour; and he shall pour oil upon it, and put frankincense upon it:2:2 and he shall bring it to Aaron's sons the priests; and he shall take thereout his handful of the fine flour thereof, and of the oil thereof, with all the frankincense thereof; and the priest shall burn it as the memorial thereof upon the altar, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh:2:3 and that which is left of the meal offering shall be Aaron's and his sons': it is a thing most holy of the offerings of Yahweh made by fire.2:4 And when you offer an oblation of a meal offering baked in the oven, it shall be unleavened cakes of fine flour mingled with oil, or unleavened wafers anointed with oil.2:5 And if your oblation be a meal offering of the baking-pan, it shall be of fine flour unleavened, mingled with oil.2:6 You shall part it in pieces, and pour oil upon it: it is a meal offering.2:7 And if your oblation be a meal offering of the frying-pan, it shall be made of fine flour with oil.2:8 And you shall bring the meal offering that is made of these things to Yahweh: and it shall be presented to the priest, and he shall bring it to the altar.2:9 And the priest shall take up from the meal offering the memorial thereof, and shall burn it upon the altar, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.2:10 And that which is left of the meal offering shall be Aaron's and his sons': it is a thing most holy of the offerings of Yahweh made by fire.2:11 No meal offering, which ye shall offer to Yahweh, shall be made with leaven; for ye shall burn no leaven, nor any honey, as an offering made by fire to Yahweh.2:12 As an oblation of first-fruits ye shall offer them to Yahweh: but they shall not come up for a sweet savor on the altar.2:13 And every oblation of your meal offering shall you season with salt; neither shall you allow the salt of the covenant of your God to be lacking from your meal offering: with all your oblations you shall offer salt.2:14 And if you offer a meal offering of first-fruits to Yahweh, you shall offer for the meal offering of your first-fruits grain in the ear parched with fire, bruised grain of the fresh ear.2:15 And you shall put oil upon it, and lay frankincense upon it: it is a meal offering.2:16 And the priest shall burn the memorial of it, part of the bruised grain thereof, and part of the oil thereof, with all the frankincense thereof: it is an offering made by fire to Yahweh.Chapter 33:1 And if his oblation be a sacrifice of peace offerings; if he offer of the herd, whether male or female, he shall offer it without blemish before Yahweh.3:2 And he shall lay his hand upon the head of his oblation, and kill it at the door of the tent of meeting: and Aaron's sons the priests shall sprinkle the blood upon the altar round about.3:3 And he shall offer of the sacrifice of peace offerings an offering made by fire to Yahweh; the fat that covers the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards,3:4 and the two kidneys, and the fat that is on them, which is by the loins, and the lobe upon the liver, with the kidneys, shall he take away.3:5 And Aaron's sons shall burn it on the altar upon the burnt offering, which is upon the wood that is on the fire: it is an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.3:6 And if his oblation for a sacrifice of peace offerings to Yahweh be of the flock; male or female, he shall offer it without blemish.3:7 If he offers a lamb for his oblation, then shall he offer it before Yahweh;3:8 and he shall lay his hand upon the head of his oblation, and kill it before the tent of meeting: and Aaron's sons shall sprinkle the blood thereof upon the altar round about.3:9 And he shall offer of the sacrifice of peace offerings an offering made by fire to Yahweh; the fat thereof, the fat tail entire, he shall take away hard by the backbone; and the fat that covers the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards,3:10 and the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, which is by the loins, and the lobe upon the liver, with the kidneys, shall he take away.3:11 And the priest shall burn it upon the altar: it is the food of the offering made by fire to Yahweh.3:12 And if his oblation be a goat, then he shall offer it before Yahweh:3:13 and he shall lay his hand upon the head of it, and kill it before the tent of meeting; and the sons of Aaron shall sprinkle the blood thereof upon the altar round about.3:14 And he shall offer thereof his oblation, even an offering made by fire to Yahweh; the fat that covers the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards,3:15 and the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, which is by the loins, and the lobe upon the liver, with the kidneys, shall he take away.3:16 And the priest shall burn them upon the altar: it is the food of the offering made by fire, for a sweet savor; all the fat is Yahweh's.3:17 It shall be a perpetual statute throughout your generations in all your dwellings, that ye shall eat neither fat nor blood.Chapter 44:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,4:2 Speak to the children of Israel, saying, If any one shall sin unwittingly, in any of the things which Yahweh has commanded not to be done, and shall do any one of them:4:3 if the anointed priest shall sin so as to bring guilt on the people, then let him offer for his sin, which he has sinned, a young bullock without blemish to Yahweh for a sin offering.4:4 And he shall bring the bullock to the door of the tent of meeting before Yahweh; and he shall lay his hand upon the head of the bullock, and kill the bullock before Yahweh.4:5 And the anointed priest shall take of the blood of the bullock, and bring it to the tent of meeting:4:6 and the priest shall dip his finger in the blood, and sprinkle of the blood seven times before Yahweh, before the veil of the sanctuary.4:7 And the priest shall put of the blood upon the horns of the altar of sweet incense before Yahweh, which is in the tent of meeting; and all the blood of the bullock shall he pour out at the base of the altar of burnt offering, which is at the door of the tent of meeting.4:8 And all the fat of the bullock of the sin offering he shall take off from it; the fat that covers the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards,4:9 and the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, which is by the loins, and the lobe upon the liver, with the kidneys, shall he take away,4:10 as it is taken off from the ox of the sacrifice of peace offerings: and the priest shall burn them upon the altar of burnt offering.4:11 And the skin of the bullock, and all its flesh, with its head, and with its legs, and its inwards, and its dung,4:12 even the whole bullock shall he carry forth without the camp to a clean place, where the ashes are poured out, and burn it on wood with fire: where the ashes are poured out shall it be burnt.4:13 And if the whole congregation of Israel err, and the thing be hid from the eyes of the assembly, and they have done any of the things which Yahweh has commanded not to be done, and are guilty;4:14 when the sin in which they have sinned is known, then the assembly shall offer a young bullock for a sin offering, and bring it before the tent of meeting.4:15 And the elders of the congregation shall lay their hands upon the head of the bullock before Yahweh; and the bullock shall be killed before Yahweh.4:16 And the anointed priest shall bring of the blood of the bullock to the tent of meeting:4:17 and the priest shall dip his finger in the blood, and sprinkle it seven times before Yahweh, before the veil.4:18 And he shall put of the blood upon the horns of the altar which is before Yahweh, that is in the tent of meeting; and all the blood shall he pour out at the base of the altar of burnt offering, which is at the door of the tent of meeting.4:19 And all the fat thereof shall he take off from it, and burn it upon the altar.4:20 Thus shall he do with the bullock; as he did with the bullock of the sin offering, so shall he do with this; and the priest shall make atonement for them, and they shall be forgiven.4:21 And he shall carry forth the bullock without the camp, and burn it as he burned the first bullock: it is the sin offering for the assembly.4:22 When a ruler sins, and does unwittingly any one of all the things which Yahweh his God has commanded not to be done, and is guilty;4:23 if his sin, in which he has sinned, be made known to him, he shall bring for his oblation a goat, a male without blemish.4:24 And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the goat, and kill it in the place where they kill the burnt offering before Yahweh: it is a sin offering.4:25 And the priest shall take of the blood of the sin offering with his finger, and put it upon the horns of the altar of burnt offering; and the blood thereof shall he pour out at the base of the altar of burnt offering.4:26 And all the fat thereof shall he burn upon the altar, as the fat of the sacrifice of peace offerings; and the priest shall make atonement for him as concerning his sin, and he shall be forgiven.4:27 And if any one of the common people sin unwittingly, in doing any of the things which Yahweh has commanded not to be done, and be guilty;4:28 if his sin, which he has sinned, be made known to him, then he shall bring for his oblation a goat, a female without blemish, for his sin which he has sinned.4:29 And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the sin offering, and kill the sin offering in the place of burnt offering.4:30 And the priest shall take of the blood thereof with his finger, and put it upon the horns of the altar of burnt offering; and all the blood thereof shall he pour out at the base of the altar.4:31 And all the fat thereof shall he take away, as the fat is taken away from off the sacrifice of peace offerings; and the priest shall burn it upon the altar for a sweet savor to Yahweh; and the priest shall make atonement for him, and he shall be forgiven.4:32 And if he bring a lamb as his oblation for a sin offering, he shall bring it a female without blemish.4:33 And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the sin offering, and kill it for a sin offering in the place where they kill the burnt offering.4:34 And the priest shall take of the blood of the sin offering with his finger, and put it upon the horns of the altar of burnt offering; and all the blood thereof shall he pour out at the base of the altar:4:35 and all the fat thereof shall he take away, as the fat of the lamb is taken away from the sacrifice of peace offerings; and the priest shall burn them on the altar, upon the offerings of Yahweh made by fire; and the priest shall make atonement for him as touching his sin that he has sinned, and he shall be forgiven.Chapter 55:1 And if any one sin, in that he hears the voice of adjuration, he being a witness, whether he has seen or known, if he do not utter it, then he shall bear his iniquity.5:2 Or if any one touch any unclean thing, whether it be the carcass of an unclean beast, or the carcass of unclean cattle, or the carcass of unclean creeping things, and it be hidden from him, and he be unclean, then he shall be guilty.5:3 Or if he touch the uncleanness of man, whatsoever his uncleanness be with which he is unclean, and it be hid from him; when he knows of it, then he shall be guilty.5:4 Or if any one swear rashly with his lips to do evil, or to do good, whatsoever it be that a man shall utter rashly with an oath, and it be hid from him; when he knows of it, then he shall be guilty in one of these things.5:5 And it shall be, when he shall be guilty in one of these things, that he shall confess that manner in which he has sinned:5:6 and he shall bring his trespass offering to Yahweh for his sin which he has sinned, a female from the flock, a lamb or a goat, for a sin offering; and the priest shall make atonement for him as concerning his sin.5:7 And if his means suffice not for a lamb, then he shall bring his trespass offering for that manner in which he has sinned, two turtle-doves, or two young pigeons, to Yahweh; one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering.5:8 And he shall bring them to the priest, who shall offer that which is for the sin offering first, and wring off its head from its neck, but shall not divide it asunder:5:9 and he shall sprinkle of the blood of the sin offering upon the side of the altar; and the rest of the blood shall be drained out at the base of the altar: it is a sin offering.5:10 And he shall offer the second for a burnt offering, according to the ordinance; and the priest shall make atonement for him as concerning his sin which he has sinned, and he shall be forgiven.5:11 But if his means suffice not for two turtle-doves, or two young pigeons, then he shall bring his oblation for that manner in which he has sinned, the tenth part of an ephah of fine flour for a sin offering: he shall put no oil upon it, neither shall he put any frankincense upon it; for it is a sin offering.5:12 And he shall bring it to the priest, and the priest shall take his handful of it as the memorial thereof, and burn it on the altar, upon the offerings of Yahweh made by fire: it is a sin offering.5:13 And the priest shall make atonement for him as touching his sin that he has sinned in any of these things, and he shall be forgiven: and the remnant shall be the priest's, as the meal offering.5:14 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,5:15 If any one commit a trespass, and sin unwittingly, in the holy things of Yahweh; then he shall bring his trespass offering to Yahweh, a ram without blemish out of the flock, according to your estimation in silver by shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary, for a trespass offering:5:16 and he shall make restitution for that which he has done amiss in the holy thing, and shall add the fifth part thereto, and give it to the priest; and the priest shall make atonement for him with the ram of the trespass offering, and he shall be forgiven.5:17 And if any one sin, and do any of the things which Yahweh has commanded not to be done; though he knew it not, yet is he guilty, and shall bear his iniquity.5:18 And he shall bring a ram without blemish out of the flock, according to your estimation, for a trespass offering, to the priest; and the priest shall make atonement for him concerning the thing in which he erred unwittingly and knew it not, and he shall be forgiven.5:19 It is a trespass offering: he is certainly guilty before Yahweh.Chapter 66:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,6:2 If any one sin, and commit a trespass against Yahweh, and deal falsely with his neighbor in a matter of deposit, or of bargain, or of robbery, or have oppressed his neighbor,6:3 or have found that which was lost, and deal falsely therein, and swear to a lie; in any of all these things that a man does, sinning therein;6:4 then it shall be, if he has sinned, and is guilty, that he shall restore that which he took by robbery, or the thing which he has gotten by oppression, or the deposit which was committed to him, or the lost thing which he found,6:5 or any thing about which he has sworn falsely; he shall even restore it in full, and shall add the fifth part more thereto: to him to whom it belongs shall he give it, in the day of his being found guilty.6:6 And he shall bring his trespass offering to Yahweh, a ram without blemish out of the flock, according to your estimation, for a trespass offering, to the priest:6:7 and the priest shall make atonement for him before Yahweh; and he shall be forgiven concerning whatsoever he does so as to be guilty thereby.6:8 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,6:9 Command Aaron and his sons, saying, This is the law of the burnt offering: the burnt offering shall be on the hearth upon the altar all night to the morning; and the fire of the altar shall be kept burning upon it.6:10 And the priest shall put on his linen garment, and his linen breeches shall he put upon his flesh; and he shall take up the ashes whereto the fire has consumed the burnt offering on the altar, and he shall put them beside the altar.6:11 And he shall put off his garments, and put on other garments, and carry forth the ashes without the camp to a clean place.6:12 And the fire upon the altar shall be kept burning upon it, it shall not go out; and the priest shall burn wood on it every morning: and he shall lay the burnt offering in order upon it, and shall burn upon it the fat of the peace offerings.6:13 Fire shall be kept burning upon the altar continually; it shall not go out.6:14 And this is the law of the meal offering: the sons of Aaron shall offer it before Yahweh, before the altar.6:15 And he shall take from it his handful, of the fine flour of the meal offering, and of the oil thereof, and all the frankincense which is upon the meal offering, and shall burn it upon the altar for a sweet savor, as the memorial thereof, to Yahweh.6:16 And that which is left thereof shall Aaron and his sons eat: it shall be eaten without leaven in a holy place; in the court of the tent of meeting they shall eat it.6:17 It shall not be baked with leaven.  I have given it as their portion of my offerings made by fire; it is most holy, as the sin offering, and as the trespass offering.6:18 Every male among the children of Aaron shall eat of it, as his portion for ever throughout your generations, from the offerings of Yahweh made by fire: whosoever touches them shall be holy.6:19 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,6:20 This is the oblation of Aaron and of his sons, which they shall offer to Yahweh in the day when he is anointed: the tenth part of an ephah of fine flour for a meal offering perpetually, half of it in the morning, and half thereof in the evening.6:21 On a baking-pan it shall be made with oil; when it is soaked, you shall bring it in: in baked pieces shall you offer the meal offering for a sweet savor to Yahweh.6:22 And the anointed priest that shall be in his stead from among his sons shall offer it: by a statute for ever it shall be wholly burnt to Yahweh.6:23 And every meal offering of the priest shall be wholly burnt: it shall not be eaten.6:24 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,6:25 Speak to Aaron and to his sons, saying, This is the law of the sin offering: in the place where the burnt offering is killed shall the sin offering be killed before Yahweh: it is most holy.6:26 The priest that offers it for sin shall eat it: in a holy place shall it be eaten, in the court of the tent of meeting.6:27 Whatsoever shall touch the flesh thereof shall be holy; and when there is sprinkled of the blood thereof upon any garment, you shall wash that whereon it was sprinkled in a holy place.6:28 But the earthen vessel in which it is boiled shall be broken; and if it be boiled in a brazen vessel, it shall be scoured, and rinsed in water.6:29 Every male among the priests shall eat thereof: it is most holy.6:30 And no sin offering, whereof any of the blood is brought into the tent of meeting to make atonement in the holy place, shall be eaten: it shall be burnt with fire.Chapter 77:1 And this is the law of the trespass offering: it is most holy.7:2 In the place where they kill the burnt offering shall they kill the trespass offering; and the blood thereof shall he sprinkle upon the altar round about.7:3 And he shall offer of it all the fat thereof: the fat tail, and the fat that covers the inwards,7:4 and the two kidneys, and the fat that is on them, which is by the loins, and the lobe upon the liver, with the kidneys, shall he take away;7:5 and the priest shall burn them upon the altar for an offering made by fire to Yahweh: it is a trespass offering.7:6 Every male among the priests shall eat thereof: it shall be eaten in a holy place: it is most holy.7:7 As is the sin offering, so is the trespass offering; there is one law for them: the priest that makes atonement with it, he shall have it.7:8 And the priest that offers any man's burnt offering, even the priest shall have to himself the skin of the burnt offering which he has offered.7:9 And every meal offering that is baked in the oven, and all that is dressed in the frying-pan, and on the baking-pan, shall be the priest's that offers it.7:10 And every meal offering, mingled with oil, or dry, shall all the sons of Aaron have, one as well as another.7:11 And this is the law of the sacrifice of peace offerings, which one shall offer to Yahweh.7:12 If he offers it for a thanksgiving, then he shall offer with the sacrifice of thanksgiving unleavened cakes mingled with oil, and unleavened wafers anointed with oil, and cakes mingled with oil, of fine flour soaked.7:13 With cakes of leavened bread he shall offer his oblation with the sacrifice of his peace offerings for thanksgiving.7:14 And of it he shall offer one out of each oblation for a heave-offering to Yahweh; it shall be the priest's that sprinkles the blood of the peace offerings.7:15 And the flesh of the sacrifice of his peace offerings for thanksgiving shall be eaten on the day of his oblation; he shall not leave any of it until the morning.7:16 But if the sacrifice of his oblation is a vow, or a freewill-offering, it shall be eaten on the day that he offers his sacrifice; and on the morrow that which remains of it shall be eaten:7:17 but that which remains of the flesh of the sacrifice on the third day shall be burnt with fire.7:18 And if any of the flesh of the sacrifice of his peace offerings be eaten on the third day, it shall not be accepted, neither shall it be imputed to him that offers it: it shall be an abomination, and the soul that eats of it shall bear his iniquity.7:19 And the flesh that touches any unclean thing shall not be eaten; it shall be burnt with fire.  And as for the flesh, every one that is clean shall eat thereof:7:20 but the soul that eats of the flesh of the sacrifice of peace offerings, that pertain to Yahweh, having his uncleanness upon him, that soul shall be cut off from his people.7:21 And when any one shall touch any unclean thing, the uncleanness of man, or an unclean beast, or any unclean abomination, and eat of the flesh of the sacrifice of peace offerings, which pertain to Yahweh, that soul shall be cut off from his people.7:22 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,7:23 Speak to the children of Israel, saying, You shall eat no fat, of ox, or sheep, or goat.7:24 And the fat of that which dies of itself, and the fat of that which is torn of beasts, may be used for any other service; but ye shall in no wise eat of it.7:25 For whosoever eats the fat of the beast, of which men offer an offering made by fire to Yahweh, even the soul that eats it shall be cut off from his people.7:26 And ye shall eat no manner of blood, whether it be of bird or of beast, in any of your dwellings.7:27 Whosoever it be that eats any blood, that soul shall be cut off from his people.7:28 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,7:29 Speak to the children of Israel, saying, He that offers the sacrifice of his peace offerings to Yahweh shall bring his oblation to Yahweh out of the sacrifice of his peace offerings:7:30 his own hands shall bring the offerings of Yahweh made by fire; the fat with the breast shall he bring, that the breast may be waved for a wave-offering before Yahweh.7:31 And the priest shall burn the fat upon the altar; but the breast shall be Aaron's and his sons'.7:32 And the right thigh shall ye give to the priest for a heave-offering out of the sacrifices of your peace offerings.7:33 He among the sons of Aaron that offers the blood of the peace offerings, and the fat, shall have the right thigh for a portion.7:34 For the wave-breast and the heave-thigh have I taken of the children of Israel out of the sacrifices of their peace offerings, and have given them to Aaron the priest and to his sons as their portion for ever from the children of Israel.7:35 This is the anointing-portion of Aaron, and the anointing-portion of his sons, out of the offerings of Yahweh made by fire, in the day when he presented them to minister to Yahweh in the priest's office;7:36 which Yahweh commanded to be given them of the children of Israel, in the day that he anointed them.  It is their portion for ever throughout their generations.7:37 This is the law of the burnt offering, of the meal offering, and of the sin offering, and of the trespass offering, and of the consecration, and of the sacrifice of peace offerings;7:38 which Yahweh commanded Moses in mount Sinai, in the day that he commanded the children of Israel to offer their oblations to Yahweh, in the wilderness of Sinai.Chapter 88:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,8:2 Take Aaron and his sons with him, and the garments, and the anointing oil, and the bullock of the sin offering, and the two rams, and the basket of unleavened bread;8:3 and assemble you all the congregation at the door of the tent of meeting.8:4 And Moses did as Yahweh commanded him; and the congregation was assembled at the door of the tent of meeting.8:5 And Moses said to the congregation, This is the thing which Yahweh has commanded to be done.8:6 And Moses brought Aaron and his sons, and washed them with water.8:7 And he put upon him the coat, and girded him with the girdle, and clothed him with the robe, and put the ephod upon him, and he girded him with the skillfully woven band of the ephod, and bound it to him with it.8:8 And he placed the breastplate upon him: and in the breastplate he put the Urim and the Thummim.8:9 And he set the mitre upon his head; and upon the mitre, in front, did he set the golden plate, the holy crown; as Yahweh commanded Moses.8:10 And Moses took the anointing oil, and anointed the tabernacle and all that was therein, and sanctified them.8:11 And he sprinkled thereof upon the altar seven times, and anointed the altar and all its vessels, and the laver and its base, to sanctify them.8:12 And he poured of the anointing oil upon Aaron's head, and anointed him, to sanctify him.8:13 And Moses brought Aaron's sons, and clothed them with coats, and girded them with girdles, and bound head-tires upon them; as Yahweh commanded Moses.8:14 And he brought the bullock of the sin offering: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the bullock of the sin offering.8:15 And he slew it; and Moses took the blood, and put it upon the horns of the altar round about with his finger, and purified the altar, and poured out the blood at the base of the altar, and sanctified it, to make atonement for it.8:16 And he took all the fat that was upon the inwards, and the lobe of the liver, and the two kidneys, and their fat; and Moses burned it upon the altar.8:17 But the bullock, and its skin, and its flesh, and its dung, he burnt with fire without the camp; as Yahweh commanded Moses.8:18 And he presented the ram of the burnt offering: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the ram.8:19 And he killed it; and Moses sprinkled the blood upon the altar round about.8:20 And he cut the ram into its pieces; and Moses burnt the head, and the pieces, and the fat.8:21 And he washed the inwards and the legs with water; and Moses burnt the whole ram upon the altar: it was a burnt offering for a sweet savor: it was an offering made by fire to Yahweh; as Yahweh commanded Moses.8:22 And he presented the other ram, the ram of consecration: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the ram.8:23 And he slew it; and Moses took of the blood thereof, and put it upon the tip of Aaron's right ear, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot.8:24 And he brought Aaron's sons; and Moses put of the blood upon the tip of their right ear, and upon the thumb of their right hand, and upon the great toe of their right foot: and Moses sprinkled the blood upon the altar round about.8:25 And he took the fat, and the fat tail, and all the fat that was upon the inwards, and the lobe of the liver, and the two kidneys, and their fat, and the right thigh:8:26 and out of the basket of unleavened bread, that was before Yahweh, he took one unleavened cake, and one cake of oiled bread, and one wafer, and placed them on the fat, and upon the right thigh:8:27 and he put the whole upon the hands of Aaron, and upon the hands of his sons, and waved them for a wave-offering before Yahweh.8:28 And Moses took them from off their hands, and burnt them on the altar upon the burnt offering: they were a consecration for a sweet savor: it was an offering made by fire to Yahweh.8:29 And Moses took the breast, and waved it for a wave-offering before Yahweh: it was Moses' portion of the ram of consecration; as Yahweh commanded Moses.8:30 And Moses took of the anointing oil, and of the blood which was upon the altar, and sprinkled it upon Aaron, upon his garments, and upon his sons, and upon his sons' garments with him, and sanctified Aaron, his garments, and his sons, and his sons' garments with him.8:31 And Moses said to Aaron and to his sons, Boil the flesh at the door of the tent of meeting: and there eat it and the bread that is in the basket of consecration, as I commanded, saying, Aaron and his sons shall eat it.8:32 And that which remains of the flesh and of the bread shall ye burn with fire.8:33 And ye shall not go out from the door of the tent of meeting seven days, until the days of your consecration are fulfilled: for he shall consecrate you seven days.8:34 As has been done this day, so Yahweh has commanded to do, to make atonement for you.8:35 And at the door of the tent of meeting shall ye abide day and night seven days, and keep the charge of Yahweh, that ye die not: for so I am commanded.8:36 And Aaron and his sons did all the things which Yahweh commanded by Moses.Chapter 99:1 And it came to pass on the eighth day, that Moses called Aaron and his sons, and the elders of Israel;9:2 and he said to Aaron, Take you a calf of the herd for a sin offering, and a ram for a burnt offering, without blemish, and offer them before Yahweh.9:3 And to the children of Israel you shall speak, saying, Take ye a he-goat for a sin offering; and a calf and a lamb, both a year old, without blemish, for a burnt offering;9:4 and an ox and a ram for peace offerings, to sacrifice before Yahweh; and a meal offering mingled with oil: for today Yahweh appears to you.9:5 And they brought that which Moses commanded before the tent of meeting: and all the congregation drew near and stood before Yahweh.9:6 And Moses said, This is the thing which Yahweh commanded that ye should do: and the glory of Yahweh shall appear to you.9:7 And Moses said to Aaron, Draw near to the altar, and offer your sin offering, and your burnt offering, and make atonement for yourself, and for the people; and offer the oblation of the people, and make atonement for them; as Yahweh commanded.9:8 So Aaron drew near to the altar, and slew the calf of the sin offering, which was for himself.9:9 And the sons of Aaron presented the blood to him; and he dipped his finger in the blood, and put it upon the horns of the altar, and poured out the blood at the base of the altar:9:10 but the fat, and the kidneys, and the lobe from the liver of the sin offering, he burnt upon the altar; as Yahweh commanded Moses.9:11 And the flesh and the skin he burnt with fire without the camp.9:12 And he slew the burnt offering; and Aaron's sons delivered to him the blood, and he sprinkled it upon the altar round about.9:13 And they delivered the burnt offering to him, piece by piece, and the head: and he burnt them upon the altar.9:14 And he washed the inwards and the legs, and burnt them upon the burnt offering on the altar.9:15 And he presented the people's oblation, and took the goat of the sin offering which was for the people, and slew it, and offered it for sin, as the first.9:16 And he presented the burnt offering, and offered it according to the ordinance.9:17 And he presented the meal offering, and filled his hand from it, and burnt it upon the altar, besides the burnt offering of the morning.9:18 He slew also the ox and the ram, the sacrifice of peace offerings, which was for the people: and Aaron's sons delivered to him the blood, which he sprinkled upon the altar round about,9:19 and the fat of the ox and of the ram, the fat tail, and that which covers the inwards, and the kidneys, and the lobe of the liver:9:20 and they put the fat upon the breasts, and he burnt the fat upon the altar:9:21 and the breasts and the right thigh Aaron waved for a wave-offering before Yahweh; as Moses commanded.9:22 And Aaron lifted up his hands toward the people, and blessed them; and he came down from offering the sin offering, and the burnt offering, and the peace offerings.9:23 And Moses and Aaron went into the tent of meeting, and came out, and blessed the people: and the glory of Yahweh appeared to all the people.9:24 And there came forth fire from before Yahweh, and consumed upon the altar the burnt offering and the fat: and when all the people saw it, they shouted, and fell on their faces.Chapter 1010:1 And Nadab and Abihu, the sons of Aaron, took each of them his censer, and put fire therein, and laid incense upon it, and offered strange fire before Yahweh, which he had not commanded them.10:2 And there came forth fire from before Yahweh, and devoured them, and they died before Yahweh.10:3 Then Moses said to Aaron, This is it that Yahweh spoke, saying, I will be sanctified in them that come near me, and before all the people I will be glorified.  And Aaron held his peace.10:4 And Moses called Mishael and Elzaphan, the sons of Uzziel the uncle of Aaron, and said to them, Draw near, carry your brethren from before the sanctuary out of the camp.10:5 So they drew near, and carried them in their coats out of the camp, as Moses had said.10:6 And Moses said to Aaron, and to Eleazar and to Ithamar, his sons, Let not the hair of your heads go loose, neither rend your clothes; that ye die not, and that he be not angry with all the congregation: but let your brethren, the whole house of Israel, bewail the burning which Yahweh has kindled.10:7 And ye shall not go out from the door of the tent of meeting, lest ye die; for the anointing oil of Yahweh is upon you.  And they did according to the word of Moses.10:8 And Yahweh spoke to Aaron, saying,10:9 Drink neither wine nor strong drink, neither you, nor your sons with you, when ye go into the tent of meeting, or you will die.  This shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations:10:10 and that ye may make a distinction between the holy and the common, and between the unclean and the clean;10:11 and that ye may teach the children of Israel all the statutes which Yahweh has spoken to them by Moses.10:12 And Moses spoke to Aaron, and to Eleazar and to Ithamar, his sons that were left, Take the meal offering that remains of the offerings of Yahweh made by fire, and eat it without leaven beside the altar; for it is most holy;10:13 and ye shall eat it in a holy place, because it is your portion, and your sons' portion, of the offerings of Yahweh made by fire: for so I am commanded.10:14 And the wave-breast and the heave-thigh shall ye eat in a clean place, you, and your sons, and your daughters with you: for they are given as your portion, and your sons' portion, out of the sacrifices of the peace offerings of the children of Israel.10:15 The heave-thigh and the wave-breast shall they bring with the offerings made by fire of the fat, to wave it for a wave-offering before Yahweh: and it shall be yours, and your sons' with you, as a portion for ever; as Yahweh has commanded.10:16 And Moses diligently sought the goat of the sin offering, and, behold, it was burnt: and he was angry with Eleazar and with Ithamar, the sons of Aaron that were left, saying,10:17 Why have ye not eaten the sin offering in the place of the sanctuary, seeing it is most holy, and he has given it you to bear the iniquity of the congregation, to make atonement for them before Yahweh?10:18 Behold, the blood of it was not brought into the sanctuary within: ye should certainly have eaten it in the sanctuary, as I commanded.10:19 And Aaron spoke to Moses, Behold, this day have they offered their sin offering and their burnt offering before Yahweh; and there have befallen me such things as these: and if I had eaten the sin offering today, would it have been well-pleasing in the sight of Yahweh?10:20 And when Moses heard that, it was well-pleasing in his sight.Chapter 1111:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying to them,11:2 Speak to the children of Israel, saying, These are the living things which ye may eat among all the beasts that are on the earth.11:3 Whatsoever parts the hoof, and is cloven-footed, and chews the cud, among the beasts, that may ye eat.11:4 Nevertheless these shall ye not eat of them that chew the cud, or of them that part the hoof: the camel, because he chews the cud but parts not the hoof, he is unclean to you.11:5 And the Coney, because he chews the cud but parts not the hoof, he is unclean to you.11:6 And the hare, because she chews the cud but parts not the hoof, she is unclean to you.11:7 And the swine, because he parts the hoof, and is cloven-footed, but chews not the cud, he is unclean to you.11:8 Of their flesh ye shall not eat, and their carcasses ye shall not touch; they are unclean to you.11:9 These may ye eat of all that are in the waters: whatsoever has fins and scales in the waters, in the seas, and in the rivers, that may ye eat.11:10 And all that have not fins and scales in the seas, and in the rivers, of all that move in the waters, and of all the living creatures that are in the waters, they are an abomination to you,11:11 and they shall be an abomination to you; ye shall not eat of their flesh, and their carcasses ye shall have in abomination.11:12 Whatever has neither fins nor scales in the waters, that is an abomination to you.11:13 And these ye shall have in abomination among the birds; they shall not be eaten, they are an abomination: the eagle, and the giver-eagle, and the osprey,11:14 and the kite, and the falcon after its kind,11:15 every raven after its kind,11:16 and the ostrich, and the night-hawk, and the seamew, and the hawk after its kind,11:17 and the little owl, and the cormorant, and the great owl,11:18 and the horned owl, and the pelican, and the vulture,11:19 and the stork, the heron after its kind, and the hoopoe, and the bat.11:20 All winged creeping things that go upon all fours are an abomination to you.11:21 Yet these may ye eat of all winged creeping things that go upon all fours, which have legs above their feet, with which to leap upon the earth.11:22 Even these of them ye may eat: the locust after its kind, and the bald locust after its kind, and the cricket after its kind, and the grasshopper after its kind.11:23 But all winged creeping things, which have four feet, are an abomination to you.11:24 And by these ye shall become unclean: whosoever touches the carcass of them shall be unclean until the even;11:25 And whosoever bears anything of the carcass of them shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even.11:26 Every beast which parts the hoof, and is not cloven-footed, nor chews the cud, is unclean to you: every one that touches them shall be unclean.11:27 And whatsoever goes upon its paws, among all beasts that go on all fours, they are unclean to you: whoso touches their carcass shall be unclean until the even.11:28 And he that bears the carcass of them shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even: they are unclean to you.11:29 And these are they which are unclean to you among the creeping things that creep upon the earth: the weasel, and the mouse, and the great lizard after its kind,11:30 and the gecko, and the land-crocodile, and the lizard, and the sand-lizard, and the chameleon.11:31 These are they which are unclean to you among all that creep: whosoever does touch them, when they are dead, shall be unclean until the even.11:32 And upon whatsoever any of them, when they are dead, does fall, it shall be unclean; whether it be any vessel of wood, or raiment, or skin, or sack, whatsoever vessel it be, with which any work is done, it must be put into water, and it shall be unclean until the even; then shall it be clean.11:33 And every earthen vessel, into which any of them falls, whatsoever is in it shall be unclean, and it ye shall break.11:34 All food in it which may be eaten, that on which water comes, shall be unclean; and all drink that may be drunk in every such vessel shall be unclean.11:35 And every thing whereupon any part of their carcass falls shall be unclean; whether oven, or range for pots, it shall be broken in pieces: they are unclean, and shall be unclean to you.11:36 Nevertheless a fountain or a pit in which is a gathering of water shall be clean: but that which touches their carcass shall be unclean.11:37 And if anything of their carcass fall upon any sowing seed which is to be sown, it is clean.11:38 But if water be put upon the seed, and anything of their carcass fall upon it, it is unclean to you.11:39 And if any beast, of which ye may eat, die; he that touches the carcass thereof shall be unclean until the even.11:40 And he that eats of the carcass of it shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even: he also that bears the carcass of it shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even.11:41 And every creeping thing that creeps upon the earth is an abomination; it shall not be eaten.11:42 Whatsoever goes upon the belly, and whatsoever goes upon all fours, or whatsoever has many feet, even all creeping things that creep upon the earth, them ye shall not eat; for they are an abomination.11:43 You shall not make yourselves abominable with any creeping thing that creeps, neither shall ye make yourselves unclean with them, that ye should be defiled thereby.11:44 For I am Yahweh your God: sanctify yourselves therefore, and be ye holy; for I am holy.  Neither shall ye defile yourselves with any manner of creeping thing that moves upon the earth.11:45 For I am Yahweh that brought you up out of the land of Egypt, to be your God.  Ye shall therefore be holy, for I am holy.11:46 This is the law of the beast, and of the bird, and of every living creature that moves in the waters, and of every creature that creeps upon the earth;11:47 to make a distinction between the unclean and the clean, and between the living thing that may be eaten and the living thing that may not be eaten.Chapter 1212:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,12:2 Speak to the children of Israel, saying, If a woman conceive seed, and bear a man-child, then she shall be unclean seven days; as in the days of the impurity of her sickness shall she be unclean.12:3 And in the eighth day the flesh of his foreskin shall be circumcised.12:4 And she shall continue in the blood of her purifying three and thirty days; she shall touch no hallowed thing, nor come into the sanctuary, until the days of her purifying be fulfilled.12:5 But if she bear a maid-child, then she shall be unclean two weeks, as in her impurity; and she shall continue in the blood of her purifying 66 days.12:6 And when the days of her purifying are fulfilled, for a son, or for a daughter, she shall bring a lamb a year old for a burnt offering, and a young pigeon, or a turtle-dove, for a sin offering, to the door of the tent of meeting, to the priest:12:7 and he shall offer it before Yahweh, and make atonement for her; and she shall be cleansed from the fountain of her blood.  This is the law for her that bears, whether a male or a female.12:8 And if her means suffice not for a lamb, then she shall take two turtle-doves, or two young pigeons; the one for a burnt offering, and the other for a sin offering: and the priest shall make atonement for her, and she shall be clean.Chapter 1313:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,13:2 When a man shall have in the skin of his flesh a rising, or a scab, or a bright spot, and it become in the skin of his flesh the plague of leprosy, then he shall be brought to Aaron the priest, or to one of his sons the priests:13:3 and the priest shall look on the plague in the skin of the flesh: and if the hair in the plague be turned white, and the appearance of the plague be deeper than the skin of his flesh, it is the plague of leprosy; and the priest shall look on him, and pronounce him unclean.13:4 And if the bright spot be white in the skin of his flesh, and the appearance thereof be not deeper than the skin, and the hair thereof be not turned white, then the priest shall shut up him that has the plague seven days:13:5 and the priest shall look on him the seventh day: and, behold, if in his eyes the plague be at a stay, and the plague be not spread in the skin, then the priest shall shut him up seven days more:13:6 and the priest shall look on him again the seventh day; and, behold, if the plague be dim, and the plague be not spread in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him clean: it is a scab: and he shall wash his clothes, and be clean.13:7 But if the scab spread abroad in the skin, after that he has shown himself to the priest for his cleansing, he shall show himself to the priest again:13:8 and the priest shall look; and, behold, if the scab be spread in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is leprosy.13:9 When the plague of leprosy is in a man, then he shall be brought to the priest;13:10 and the priest shall look; and, behold, if there be a white rising in the skin, and it have turned the hair white, and there be quick raw flesh in the rising,13:11 it is an old leprosy in the skin of his flesh, and the priest shall pronounce him unclean: he shall not shut him up, for he is unclean.13:12 And if the leprosy break out abroad in the skin, and the leprosy cover all the skin of him that has the plague from his head even to his feet, as far as appears to the priest;13:13 then the priest shall look; and, behold, if the leprosy have covered all his flesh, he shall pronounce him clean that has the plague: it is all turned white: he is clean.13:14 But whensoever raw flesh appears in him, he shall be unclean.13:15 And the priest shall look on the raw flesh, and pronounce him unclean: the raw flesh is unclean: it is leprosy.13:16 Or if the raw flesh turn back, and be changed to white, then he shall come to the priest;13:17 and the priest shall look on him; and, behold, if the plague be turned into white, then the priest shall pronounce him clean that has the plague: he is clean.13:18 And when the flesh has in the skin thereof a boil, and it is healed,13:19 and in the place of the boil there is a white rising, or a bright spot, reddish-white, then it shall be shown to the priest;13:20 and the priest shall look; and, behold, if the appearance thereof be lower than the skin, and the hair thereof be turned white, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is the plague of leprosy, it has broken out in the boil.13:21 But if the priest looks on it, and, behold, there are no white hairs in it, and it is not lower than the skin, but is dim; then the priest shall shut him up seven days:13:22 And if it spreads abroad in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a plague.13:23 But if the bright spot stay in its place, and be not spread, it is the scar of the boil; and the priest shall pronounce him clean.13:24 Or when the flesh has in the skin thereof a burning by fire, and the quick flesh of the burning become a bright spot, reddish-white, or white;13:25 then the priest shall look upon it; and, behold, if the hair in the bright spot is turned white, and the appearance thereof is deeper than the skin; it is leprosy, it has broken out in the burning: and the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is the plague of leprosy.13:26 But if the priest look on it, and, behold, there is no white hair in the bright spot, and it is no lower than the skin, but is dim; then the priest shall shut him up seven days:13:27 and the priest shall look upon him the seventh day: if it is spread abroad in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is the plague of leprosy.13:28 And if the bright spot stays in its place, and is not spread in the skin, but is dim; it is the rising of the burning, and the priest shall pronounce him clean: for it is the scar of the burning.13:29 And when a man or woman has a plague upon the head or upon the beard,13:30 then the priest shall look on the plague; and, behold, if the appearance thereof is deeper than the skin, and there is in it yellow thin hair, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is an itch, it is leprosy of the head or of the beard.13:31 And if the priest looks on the plague of the scall, and, behold, the appearance thereof is not deeper than the skin, and there is no black hair in it, then the priest shall shut up him that has the plague of the scall seven days:13:32 And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the plague; and, behold, if the scall is not spread, and there is in it no yellow hair, and the appearance of the scall is not deeper than the skin,13:33 then he shall be shaven, but the scall shall he not shave; and the priest shall shut up him that has the scall seven days more:13:34 and in the seventh day the priest shall look on the scall; and, behold, if the scall is not spread in the skin, and the appearance thereof is not deeper than the skin; then the priest shall pronounce him clean: and he shall wash his clothes, and be clean.13:35 But if the scall spread abroad in the skin after his cleansing,13:36 then the priest shall look on him; and, behold, if the scall is spread in the skin, the priest shall not seek for the yellow hair; he is unclean.13:37 But if in his eyes the scall is at a stay, and black hair is grown up in it; the scall is healed, he is clean: and the priest shall pronounce him clean.13:38 And when a man or a woman has in the skin of the flesh bright spots, even white bright spots;13:39 then the priest shall look; and, behold, if the bright spots in the skin of their flesh are of a dull white, it is a tetter, it has broken out in the skin; he is clean.13:40 And if a man's hair is fallen off his head, he is bald; yet is he clean.13:41 And if his hair is fallen off from the front part of his head, he is forehead bald; yet is he clean.13:42 But if there is in the bald head, or the bald forehead, a reddish-white plague; it is leprosy breaking out in his bald head, or his bald forehead.13:43 Then the priest shall look upon him; and, behold, if the rising of the plague is reddish-white in his bald head, or in his bald forehead, as the appearance of leprosy in the skin of the flesh;13:44 he is a leprous man, he is unclean: the priest shall surely pronounce him unclean; his plague is in his head.13:45 And the leper in whom the plague is, his clothes shall be rent, and the hair of his head shall go loose, and he shall cover his upper lip, and shall cry, Unclean, unclean.13:46 All the days in which the plague is in him he shall be unclean; he is unclean: he shall dwell alone.  Outside the camp shall his dwelling be.13:47 The garment also that the plague of leprosy is in, whether it be a woollen garment, or a linen garment;13:48 whether it be in warp, or woof; of linen, or of woollen; whether in a skin, or in anything made of skin;13:49 if the plague be greenish or reddish in the garment, or in the skin, or in the warp, or in the woof, or in anything of skin; it is the plague of leprosy, and shall be shown to the priest.13:50 And the priest shall look upon the plague, and shut up that which has the plague seven days:13:51 and he shall look on the plague on the seventh day: if the plague be spread in the garment, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in the skin, whatever service skin is used for; the plague is a fretting leprosy; it is unclean.13:52 And he shall burn the garment, whether the warp or the woof, in woollen or in linen, or anything of skin, in which the plague is: for it is a fretting leprosy; it shall be burnt in the fire.13:53 And if the priest shall look, and, behold, the plague be not spread in the garment, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in anything of skin;13:54 then the priest shall command that they wash the thing in which the plague is, and he shall shut it up seven days more:13:55 and the priest shall look, after that the plague is washed; and, behold, if the plague have not changed its color, and the plague be not spread, it is unclean; you shall burn it in the fire: it is a fret, whether the bareness be within or without.13:56 And if the priest look, and, behold, the plague be dim after the washing thereof, then he shall rend it out of the garment, or out of the skin, or out of the warp, or out of the woof:13:57 and if it appear still in the garment, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in anything of skin, it is breaking out: you shall burn that in which the plague is with fire.13:58 And the garment, either the warp, or the woof, or whatsoever thing of skin it be, which you shall wash, if the plague be departed from them, then it shall be washed the second time, and shall be clean.13:59 This is the law of the plague of leprosy in a garment of woollen or linen, either in the warp, or the woof, or anything of skin, to pronounce it clean, or to pronounce it unclean.Chapter 1414:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,14:2 This shall be the law of the leper in the day of his cleansing: he shall be brought to the priest:14:3 and the priest shall go forth out of the camp; and the priest shall look; and, behold, if the plague of leprosy be healed in the leper,14:4 then shall the priest command to take for him that is to be cleansed two living clean birds, and cedar wood, and scarlet, and hyssop:14:5 And the priest shall command to kill one of the birds in an earthen vessel over running water.14:6 As for the living bird, he shall take it, and the cedar wood, and the scarlet, and the hyssop, and shall dip them and the living bird in the blood of the bird that was killed over the running water:14:7 And he shall sprinkle upon him that is to be cleansed from the leprosy seven times, and shall pronounce him clean, and shall let go the living bird into the open field.14:8 And he that is to be cleansed shall wash his clothes, and shave off all his hair, and bathe himself in water; and he shall be clean: and after that he shall come into the camp, but shall dwell outside his tent seven days.14:9 And it shall be on the seventh day, that he shall shave all his hair off his head and his beard and his eyebrows, even all his hair he shall shave off: and he shall wash his clothes, and he shall bathe his flesh in water, and he shall be clean.14:10 And on the eighth day he shall take two he-lambs without blemish, and one ewe-lamb a year old without blemish, and three tenth parts of an ephah of fine flour for a meal offering, mingled with oil, and one log of oil.14:11 And the priest that cleanses him shall set the man that is to be cleansed, and those things, before Yahweh, at the door of the tent of meeting.14:12 And the priest shall take one of the he-lambs, and offer him for a trespass offering, and the log of oil, and wave them for a wave-offering before Yahweh:14:13 and he shall kill the he-lamb in the place where they kill the sin offering and the burnt offering, in the place of the sanctuary: for as the sin offering is the priest's, so is the trespass offering: it is most holy:14:14 and the priest shall take of the blood of the trespass offering, and the priest shall put it upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot.14:15 And the priest shall take of the log of oil, and pour it into the palm of his own left hand;14:16 and the priest shall dip his right finger in the oil that is in his left hand, and shall sprinkle of the oil with his finger seven times before Yahweh:14:17 and of the rest of the oil that is in his hand shall the priest put upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot, upon the blood of the trespass offering:14:18 and the rest of the oil that is in the priest's hand he shall put upon the head of him that is to be cleansed: and the priest shall make atonement for him before Yahweh.14:19 And the priest shall offer the sin offering, and make atonement for him that is to be cleansed because of his uncleanness: and afterward he shall kill the burnt offering;14:20 and the priest shall offer the burnt offering and the meal offering upon the altar: and the priest shall make atonement for him, and he shall be clean.14:21 And if he be poor, and cannot get so much, then he shall take one he-lamb for a trespass offering to be waved, to make atonement for him, and one tenth part of an ephah of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering, and a log of oil;14:22 and two turtle-doves, or two young pigeons, such as he is able to get; and the one shall be a sin offering, and the other a burnt offering.14:23 And on the eighth day he shall bring them for his cleansing to the priest, to the door of the tent of meeting, before Yahweh:14:24 and the priest shall take the lamb of the trespass offering, and the log of oil, and the priest shall wave them for a wave-offering before Yahweh.14:25 And he shall kill the lamb of the trespass offering; and the priest shall take of the blood of the trespass offering, and put it upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot.14:26 And the priest shall pour of the oil into the palm of his own left hand;14:27 and the priest shall sprinkle with his right finger some of the oil that is in his left hand seven times before Yahweh:14:28 and the priest shall put of the oil that is in his hand upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot, upon the place of the blood of the trespass offering:14:29 and the rest of the oil that is in the priest's hand he shall put upon the head of him that is to be cleansed, to make atonement for him before Yahweh.14:30 And he shall offer one of the turtle-doves, or of the young pigeons, such as he is able to get,14:31 even such as he is able to get, the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, with the meal offering: and the priest shall make atonement for him that is to be cleansed before Yahweh.14:32 This is the law of him in whom is the plague of leprosy, who is not able to get that which pertains to his cleansing.14:33 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,14:34 When ye are come into the land of Canaan, which I give to you for a possession, and I put the plague of leprosy in a house of the land of your possession;14:35 then he that owns the house shall come and tell the priest, saying, There seems to me to be as it were a plague in the house.14:36 And the priest shall command that they empty the house, before the priest goes in to see the plague, that all that is in the house be not made unclean: and afterward the priest shall go in to see the house:14:37 and he shall look on the plague; and, behold, if the plague be in the walls of the house with hollow streaks, greenish or reddish, and the appearance thereof be lower than the wall;14:38 then the priest shall go out of the house to the door of the house, and shut up the house seven days.14:39 And the priest shall come again the seventh day, and shall look; and, behold, if the plague be spread in the walls of the house;14:40 then the priest shall command that they take out the stones in which the plague is, and cast them into an unclean place without the city:14:41 and he shall cause the house to be scraped within round about, and they shall pour out the mortar, that they scrape off, without the city into an unclean place:14:42 and they shall take other stones, and put them in the place of those stones; and he shall take other mortar, and shall plaster the house.14:43 And if the plague come again, and break out in the house, after that he has taken out the stones, and after he has scraped the house, and after it is plastered;14:44 then the priest shall come in and look; and, behold, if the plague be spread in the house, it is a fretting leprosy in the house: it is unclean.14:45 And he shall break down the house, the stones of it, and the timber thereof, and all the mortar of the house; and he shall carry them forth out of the city into an unclean place.14:46 Moreover he that goes into the house all the while that it is shut up shall be unclean until the even.14:47 And he that lies in the house shall wash his clothes; and he that eats in the house shall wash his clothes.14:48 And if the priest shall come in, and look, and, behold, the plague has not spread in the house, after the house was plastered; then the priest shall pronounce the house clean, because the plague is healed.14:49 And he shall take to cleanse the house two birds, and cedar wood, and scarlet, and hyssop:14:50 and he shall kill one of the birds in an earthen vessel over running water:14:51 and he shall take the cedar wood, and the hyssop, and the scarlet, and the living bird, and dip them in the blood of the slain bird, and in the running water, and sprinkle the house seven times:14:52 and he shall cleanse the house with the blood of the bird, and with the running water, and with the living bird, and with the cedar wood, and with the hyssop, and with the scarlet:14:53 but he shall let got the living bird out of the city into the open field: so shall he make atonement for the house; and it shall be clean.14:54 This is the law for all manner of plague of leprosy, and for a scall,14:55 and for the leprosy of a garment, and for a house,14:56 and for a rising, and for a scab, and for a bright spot;14:57 to teach when it is unclean, and when it is clean: this is the law of leprosy.Chapter 1515:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,15:2 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When any man has an issue out of his flesh, because of his issue he is unclean.15:3 And this shall be his uncleanness in his issue: whether his flesh run with his issue, or his flesh be stopped from his issue, it is his uncleanness.15:4 Every bed whereon he that has the issue lies shall be unclean; and everything whereon he sits shall be unclean.15:5 And whosoever touches his bed shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even.15:6 And he that sits on anything whereon he that has the issue sat shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even.15:7 And he that touches the flesh of him that has the issue shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even.15:8 And if he that has the issue spit upon him that is clean, then he shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even.15:9 And what saddle soever he that has the issue rides upon shall be unclean.15:10 And whosoever touches anything that was under him shall be unclean until the even: and he that bears those things shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even.15:11 And whomsoever he that has the issue touches, without having rinsed his hands in water, he shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even.15:12 And the earthen vessel, which he that has the issue touches, shall be broken; and every vessel of wood shall be rinsed in water.15:13 And when he that has an issue is cleansed of his issue, then he shall number to himself seven days for his cleansing, and wash his clothes; and he shall bathe his flesh in running water, and shall be clean.15:14 And on the eighth day he shall take to him two turtle-doves, or two young pigeons, and come before Yahweh to the door of the tent of meeting, and give them to the priest:15:15 and the priest shall offer them, the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering; and the priest shall make atonement for him before Yahweh for his issue.15:16 And if any man's seed of copulation go out from him, then he shall bathe all his flesh in water, and be unclean until the even.15:17 And every garment, and every skin, whereon is the seed of copulation, shall be washed with water, and be unclean until the even.15:18 The woman also with whom a man shall lie with seed of copulation, they shall both bathe themselves in water, and be unclean until the even.15:19 And if a woman have an issue, and her issue in her flesh be blood, she shall be in her impurity seven days: and whosoever touches her shall be unclean until the even.15:20 And everything that she lies upon in her impurity shall be unclean: everything also that she sits upon shall be unclean.15:21 And whosoever touches her bed shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even.15:22 And whosoever touches anything that she sits upon shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even.15:23 And if it be on the bed, or on anything whereon she sits, when he touches it, he shall be unclean until the even.15:24 And if any man lie with her, and her impurity be upon him, he shall be unclean seven days; and every bed whereon he lies shall be unclean.15:25 And if a woman have an issue of her blood many days not in the time of her impurity, or if she have an issue beyond the time of her impurity; all the days of the issue of her uncleanness she shall be as in the days of her impurity: she is unclean.15:26 Every bed on which she lies all the days of her issue shall be to her as the bed of her impurity: and everything on which she sits shall be unclean, as the uncleanness of her impurity.15:27 And whosoever touches those things shall be unclean, and shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even.15:28 But if she be cleansed of her issue, then she shall number to herself seven days, and after that she shall be clean.15:29 And on the eighth day she shall take to her two turtle-doves, or two young pigeons, and bring them to the priest, to the door of the tent of meeting.15:30 And the priest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering; and the priest shall make atonement for her before Yahweh for the issue of her uncleanness.15:31 Thus shall ye separate the children of Israel from their uncleanness, that they die not in their uncleanness, when they defile my tabernacle that is in the midst of them.15:32 This is the law of him that has an issue, and of him whose seed of copulation goes from him, so that he is unclean thereby;15:33 and of her that is sick with her impurity, and of him that has an issue, of the man, and of the woman, and of him that lies with her that is unclean.Chapter 1616:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, after the death of the two sons of Aaron, when they drew near before Yahweh, and died;16:2 and Yahweh said to Moses, Speak to Aaron your brother, that he come not at all times into the holy place within the veil, before the mercy-seat which is upon the ark; that he die not: for I will appear in the cloud upon the mercy-seat.16:3 Herewith shall Aaron come into the holy place: with a young bullock for a sin offering, and a ram for a burnt offering.16:4 He shall put on the holy linen coat, and he shall have the linen breeches upon his flesh, and shall be girded with the linen girdle, and with the linen mitre shall he be attired: they are the holy garments; and he shall bathe his flesh in water, and put them on.16:5 And he shall take of the congregation of the children of Israel two he-goats for a sin offering, and one ram for a burnt offering.16:6 And Aaron shall present the bullock of the sin offering, which is for himself, and make atonement for himself, and for his house.16:7 And he shall take the two goats, and set them before Yahweh at the door of the tent of meeting.16:8 And Aaron shall cast lots upon the two goats; one lot for Yahweh, and the other lot for Azazel.16:9 And Aaron shall present the goat upon which the lot fell for Yahweh, and offer him for a sin offering.16:10 But the goat, on which the lot fell for Azazel, shall be set alive before Yahweh, to make atonement for him, to send him away for Azazel into the wilderness.16:11 And Aaron shall present the bullock of the sin offering, which is for himself, and shall make atonement for himself, and for his house, and shall kill the bullock of the sin offering which is for himself:16:12 and he shall take a censer full of coals of fire from off the altar before Yahweh, and his hands full of sweet incense beaten small, and bring it within the veil:16:13 and he shall put the incense upon the fire before Yahweh, that the cloud of the incense may cover the mercy-seat that is upon the testimony, that he die not:16:14 and he shall take of the blood of the bullock, and sprinkle it with his finger upon the mercy-seat on the east; and before the mercy-seat shall he sprinkle of the blood with his finger seven times.16:15 Then shall he kill the goat of the sin offering, that is for the people, and bring his blood within the veil, and do with his blood as he did with the blood of the bullock, and sprinkle it upon the mercy-seat, and before the mercy-seat:16:16 and he shall make atonement for the holy place, because of the uncleannesses of the children of Israel, and because of their transgressions, even all their sins: and so shall he do for the tent of meeting, that dwells with them in the midst of their uncleannesses.16:17 And there shall be no man in the tent of meeting when he goes in to make atonement in the holy place, until he come out, and have made atonement for himself, and for his household, and for all the assembly of Israel.16:18 And he shall go out to the altar that is before Yahweh, and make atonement for it, and shall take of the blood of the bullock, and of the blood of the goat, and put it upon the horns of the altar round about.16:19 And he shall sprinkle of the blood upon it with his finger seven times, and cleanse it, and hallow it from the uncleannesses of the children of Israel.16:20 And when he has made an end of atoning for the holy place, and the tent of meeting, and the altar, he shall present the live goat:16:21 and Aaron shall lay both his hands upon the head of the live goat, and confess over him all the iniquities of the children of Israel, and all their transgressions, even all their sins; and he shall put them upon the head of the goat, and shall send him away by the hand of a man that is in readiness into the wilderness:16:22 and the goat shall bear upon him all their iniquities to a solitary land: and he shall let go the goat in the wilderness.16:23 And Aaron shall come into the tent of meeting, and shall put off the linen garments, which he put on when he went into the holy place, and shall leave them there:16:24 and he shall bathe his flesh in water in a holy place, and put on his garments, and come forth, and offer his burnt offering and the burnt offering of the people, and make atonement for himself and for the people.16:25 And the fat of the sin offering shall he burn upon the altar.16:26 And he that lets go the goat for Azazel shall wash his clothes, and bathe his flesh in water, and afterward he shall come into the camp.16:27 And the bullock of the sin offering, and the goat of the sin offering, whose blood was brought in to make atonement in the holy place, shall be carried forth without the camp; and they shall burn in the fire their skins, and their flesh, and their dung.16:28 And he that burns them shall wash his clothes, and bathe his flesh in water, and afterward he shall come into the camp.16:29 And it shall be a statute for ever to you: in the seventh month, on the tenth day of the month, ye shall afflict your souls, and shall do no manner of work, the home-born, or the stranger that sojourns among you:16:30 for on this day shall atonement be made for you, to cleanse you; from all your sins shall ye be clean before Yahweh.16:31 It is a sabbath of solemn rest to you, and ye shall afflict your souls; it is a statute for ever.16:32 And the priest, who shall be anointed and who shall be consecrated to be priest in his father's stead, shall make the atonement, and shall put on the linen garments, even the holy garments:16:33 and he shall make atonement for the holy sanctuary; and he shall make atonement for the tent of meeting and for the altar; and he shall make atonement for the priests and for all the people of the assembly.16:34 And this shall be an everlasting statute to you, to make atonement for the children of Israel because of all their sins once in the year.  And he did as Yahweh commanded Moses.Chapter 1717:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,17:2 Speak to Aaron, and to his sons, and to all the children of Israel, and say to them: This is the thing which Yahweh has commanded, saying,17:3 What man soever there be of the house of Israel, that kills an ox, or lamb, or goat, in the camp, or that kills it without the camp,17:4 and has not brought it to the door of the tent of meeting, to offer it as an oblation to Yahweh before the tabernacle of Yahweh: blood shall be imputed to that man; he has shed blood; and that man shall be cut off from among his people:17:5 To the end that the children of Israel may bring their sacrifices, which they sacrifice in the open field, even that they may bring them to Yahweh, to the door of the tent of meeting, to the priest, and sacrifice them for sacrifices of peace offerings to Yahweh.17:6 And the priest shall sprinkle the blood upon the altar of Yahweh at the door of the tent of meeting, and burn the fat for a sweet savor to Yahweh.17:7 And they shall no more sacrifice their sacrifices to the he-goats, after which they play the harlot.  This shall be a statute forever to them throughout their generations.17:8 And you shall say to them, Whatsoever man there be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn among them, that offers a burnt offering or sacrifice,17:9 and brings it not to the door of the tent of meeting, to sacrifice it to Yahweh; that man shall be cut off from his people.17:10 And whatsoever man there be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn among them, that eats any manner of blood, I will set my face against that soul that eats blood, and will cut him off from among his people.17:11 For the life of the flesh is in the blood; and I have given it to you upon the altar to make atonement for your souls: for it is the blood that makes atonement by reason of the life.17:12 Therefore I said to the children of Israel, No soul of you shall eat blood, neither shall any stranger that sojourns among you eat blood.17:13 And whatsoever man there be of the children of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn among them, who takes in hunting any beast or bird that may be eaten; he shall pour out the blood thereof, and cover it with dust.17:14 For as to the life of all flesh, the blood of it is all one with the life of it: therefore I said to the children of Israel, You shall eat the blood of no manner of flesh; for the life of all flesh is the blood thereof: whosoever eats it shall be cut off.17:15 And every soul that eats that which dies of itself, or that which is torn of beasts, whether he be home-born or a sojourner, he shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even: then shall he be clean.17:16 But if he wash them not, nor bathe his flesh, then he shall bear his iniquity.Chapter 1818:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,18:2 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, I am Yahweh your God.18:3 After the doings of the land of Egypt, in which ye dwelt, shall ye not do: and after the doings of the land of Canaan, whither I bring you, shall ye not do; neither shall ye walk in their statutes.18:4 My ordinances shall ye do, and my statutes shall ye keep, to walk therein: I am Yahweh your God.18:5 You shall therefore keep my statutes, and my ordinances; which if a man do, he shall live in them: I am Yahweh.18:6 None of you shall approach to any that are near of kin to him, to uncover their nakedness: I am Yahweh.18:7 The nakedness of your father, even the nakedness of your mother, shall you not uncover: she is your mother; you shall not uncover her nakedness.18:8 The nakedness of your father's wife shall you not uncover: it is your father's nakedness.18:9 The nakedness of your sister, the daughter of your father, or the daughter of your mother, whether born at home, or born abroad, even their nakedness you shall not uncover.18:10 The nakedness of your son's daughter, or of your daughter's daughter, even their nakedness you shall not uncover: for theirs is your own nakedness.18:11 The nakedness of your father's wife's daughter, begotten of your father, she is your sister, you shall not uncover her nakedness.18:12 You shall not uncover the nakedness of your father's sister: she is your father's near kinswoman.18:13 You shall not uncover the nakedness of your mother's sister: for she is your mother's near kinswoman.18:14 You shall not uncover the nakedness of your father's brother, you shall not approach to his wife: she is your aunt.18:15 You shall not uncover the nakedness of your daughter-in-law: she is your son's wife; you shall not uncover her nakedness.18:16 You shall not uncover the nakedness of your brother's wife: it is your brother's nakedness.18:17 You shall not uncover the nakedness of a woman and her daughter; you shall not take her son's daughter, or her daughter's daughter, to uncover her nakedness; they are near kinswomen: it is wickedness.18:18 And you shall not take a wife to her sister, to be a rival to her, to uncover her nakedness, besides the other in her life-time.18:19 And you shall not approach to a woman to uncover her nakedness, as long as she is impure by her uncleanness.18:20 And you shall not lie carnally with your neighbor's wife, to defile yourself with her.18:21 And you shall not give any of your seed to make them pass through the fire to Molech; neither shall you profane the name of your God: I am Yahweh.18:22 You shall not lie with mankind, as with womankind: it is abomination.18:23 And you shall not lie with any beast to defile yourself with it; neither shall any woman stand before a beast, to lie down thereto: it is confusion.18:24 Defile not ye yourselves in any of these things: for in all these the nations are defiled which I cast out from before you;18:25 And the land is defiled: therefore I do visit the iniquity thereof upon it, and the land vomits out her inhabitants.18:26 You therefore shall keep my statutes and my ordinances, and shall not do any of these abominations; neither the home-born, nor the stranger that sojourns among you;18:27 (for all these abominations have the men of the land done, that were before you, and the land is defiled);18:28 that the land vomit not you out also, when ye defile it, as it vomited out the nation that was before you.18:29 For whosoever shall do any of these abominations, even the souls that do them shall be cut off from among their people.18:30 Therefore shall ye keep my charge, that ye practice not any of these abominable customs, which were practiced before you, and that ye defile not yourselves therein: I am Yahweh your God.Chapter 1919:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,19:2 Speak to all the congregation of the children of Israel, and say to them, You shall be holy; for I Yahweh your God am holy.19:3 You shall fear every man his mother, and his father; and ye shall keep my sabbaths: I am Yahweh your God.19:4 Turn ye not to idols, nor make to yourselves molten gods: I am Yahweh your God.19:5 And when ye offer a sacrifice of peace offerings to Yahweh, ye shall offer it that ye may be accepted.19:6 It shall be eaten the same day ye offer it, and on the morrow: and if anything remain until the third day, it shall be burnt with fire.19:7 And if it be eaten at all on the third day, it is an abomination; it shall not be accepted:19:8 but every one that eats it shall bear his iniquity, because he has profaned the holy thing of Yahweh: and that soul shall be cut off from his people.19:9 And when ye reap the harvest of your land, you shall not wholly reap the corners of your field, neither shall you gather the gleaning of your harvest.19:10 And you shall not glean your vineyard, neither shall you gather the fallen fruit of your vineyard; you shall leave them for the poor and for the sojourner: I am Yahweh your God.19:11 You shall not steal; neither shall ye deal falsely, nor lie one to another.19:12 And ye shall not swear by my name falsely, and profane the name of your God: I am Yahweh.19:13 You shall not oppress your neighbor, nor rob him: the wages of a hired servant shall not abide with you all night until the morning.19:14 You shall not curse the deaf, nor put a stumblingblock before the blind; but you shall fear your God: I am Yahweh.19:15 You shall do no unrighteousness in judgment: you shall not respect the person of the poor, nor honor the person of the mighty; but in righteousness shall you judge your neighbor.19:16 You shall not go up and down as a talebearer among your people: neither shall you stand against the blood of your neighbor: I am Yahweh.19:17 You shall not hate your brother in your heart: you shall surely rebuke your neighbor, and not bear sin because of him.19:18 You shall not take vengeance, nor bear any grudge against the children of your people; but you shall love your neighbor as yourself: I am Yahweh.19:19 You shall keep my statutes.  You shall not let your cattle gender with a diverse kind: you shall not sow your field with two kinds of seed: neither shall there come upon you a garment of two kinds of stuff mingled together.19:20 And whosoever lies carnally with a woman that is a bondmaid, betrothed to a husband, and not at all redeemed, nor freedom given her; they shall be punished; they shall not be put to death, because she was not free.19:21 And he shall bring his trespass offering to Yahweh, to the door of the tent of meeting, even a ram for a trespass offering.19:22 And the priest shall make atonement for him with the ram of the trespass offering before Yahweh for his sin which he has sinned: and the sin which he has sinned shall be forgiven him.19:23 And when ye shall come into the land, and shall have planted all manner of trees for food, then ye shall consider their fruit as their uncircumcision: three years shall they be as uncircumcised to you; it shall not be eaten.19:24 But in the fourth year all the fruit thereof shall be holy, for giving praise to Yahweh.19:25 And in the fifth year shall ye eat of the fruit thereof, that it may yield to you the increase thereof: I am Yahweh your God.19:26 You shall not eat anything with the blood: neither shall ye use enchantments, nor practice divination.19:27 You shall not round the corners of your heads, neither shall you mar the corners of your beard.19:28 You shall not make any cuttings in your flesh for the dead, nor print any marks upon you: I am Yahweh.19:29 Profane not your daughter, to make her a harlot; lest the land fall to whoredom, and the land become full of wickedness.19:30 You shall keep my sabbaths, and reverence my sanctuary; I am Yahweh.19:31 Turn ye not to them that have familiar spirits, nor to the wizards; seek them not out, to be defiled by them: I am Yahweh your God.19:32 You shall rise up before the gray head, and honor the face of the old man, and you shall fear your God: I am Yahweh.19:33 And if a stranger sojourns with you in your land, ye shall not do him wrong.19:34 The stranger that sojourns with you shall be to you as the home-born among you, and you shall love him as yourself; for ye were sojourners in the land of Egypt: I am Yahweh your God.19:35 You shall do no unrighteousness in judgment, in measures of length, of weight, or of quantity.19:36 Just balances, just weights, a just ephah, and a just hin, shall ye have: I am Yahweh your God, who brought you out of the land of Egypt.19:37 And ye shall observe all my statutes, and all my ordinances, and do them: I am Yahweh.Chapter 2020:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,20:2 Moreover, you shall say to the children of Israel, Whosoever he be of the children of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn in Israel, that gives of his seed to Molech; he shall surely be put to death: the people of the land shall stone him with stones.20:3 I also will set my face against that man, and will cut him off from among his people; because he has given of his seed to Molech, to defile my sanctuary, and to profane my holy name.20:4 And if the people at the land do at all hide their eyes from that man, when he gives of his seed to Molech, and put him not to death;20:5 then I will set my face against that man, and against his family, and will cut him off, and all that play the harlot after him, to play the harlot with Molech, from among their people.20:6 And the soul that turns to them that have familiar spirits, and to the wizards, to play the harlot after them, I will even set my face against that soul, and will cut him off from among his people.20:7 Sanctify yourselves therefore, and be ye holy; for I am Yahweh your God.20:8 And ye shall keep my statutes, and do them: I am Yahweh who sanctifies you.20:9 For every one that curses his father or his mother shall surely be put to death: he has cursed his father or his mother; his blood shall be upon him.20:10 And the man that commits adultery with another man's wife, even he that commits adultery with his neighbor's wife, the adulterer and the adulteress shall surely be put to death.20:11 And the man that lies with his father's wife has uncovered his father's nakedness: both of them shall surely be put to death; their blood shall be upon them.20:12 And if a man lies with his daughter-in-law, both of them shall surely be put to death: they have wrought confusion; their blood shall be upon them.20:13 And if a man lies with mankind, as with womankind, both of them have committed abomination: they shall surely be put to death; their blood shall be upon them.20:14 And if a man take a wife and her mother, it is wickedness: they shall be burnt with fire, both he and they; so that there be no wickedness among you.20:15 And if a man lies with a beast, he shall surely be put to death: and ye shall slay the beast.20:16 And if a woman approaches to any beast, and lies down for it, you shall kill the woman, and the beast: they shall surely be put to death; their blood shall be upon them.20:17 And if a man shall take his sister, his father's daughter, or his mother's daughter, and see her nakedness, and she see his nakedness; it is a shameful thing; and they shall be cut off in the sight of the children of their people: he has uncovered his sister's nakedness; he shall bear his iniquity.20:18 And if a man shall lie with a woman having her sickness, and shall uncover her nakedness; he has made naked her fountain, and she has uncovered the fountain of her blood: and both of them shall be cut off from among their people.20:19 And you shall not uncover the nakedness of your mother's sister, nor of your father's sister; for he has made naked his near kin: they shall bear their iniquity.20:20 And if a man shall lie with his uncle's wife, he has uncovered his uncle's nakedness: they shall bear their sin; they shall die childless.20:21 And if a man shall take his brother's wife, it is impurity: he has uncovered his brother's nakedness; they shall be childless.20:22 You shall therefore keep all my statutes, and all my ordinances, and do them; so that the land, to which I bring you to dwell therein, does not vomit you out.20:23 And ye shall not walk in the customs of the nation which I am casting out before you: for they did all these things, and that is why I abhorred them.20:24 But I have said to you, You shall inherit their land, and I will give it to you to possess it, a land flowing with milk and honey.  I am Yahweh your God, who has separated you from the peoples.20:25 You shall therefore make a distinction between the clean beast and the unclean, and between the unclean fowl and the clean: and ye shall not make your souls abominable by beast, or by bird, or by anything with which the ground teems, which I have separated from you as unclean.20:26 And ye shall be holy to me: for I, Yahweh, am holy, and have set you apart from the peoples, that ye should be mine.20:27 A man also or a woman that has a familiar spirit, or that is a wizard, shall surely be put to death: they shall stone them with stones; their blood shall be upon them.Chapter 2121:1 And Yahweh said to Moses, Speak to the priests, the sons of Aaron, and say to them, There shall none defile himself for the dead among his people;21:2 except for his kin, that is near to him, for his mother, and for his father, and for his son, and for his daughter, and for his brother,21:3 and for his sister a virgin, that is near to him, that has had no husband; for her he may defile himself.21:4 He shall not defile himself, being a chief man among his people, to profane himself.21:5 They shall not make baldness upon their head, neither shall they shave off the corner of their beard, nor make any cuttings in their flesh.21:6 They shall be holy to their God, and not profane the name of their God; for the offerings of Yahweh made by fire, the bread of their God, they do offer: therefore they shall be holy.21:7 They shall not take a woman that is a harlot, or profane; neither shall they take a woman put away from her husband: for he is holy to his God.21:8 You shall sanctify him therefore; for he offers the bread of your God: he shall be holy to you: for I Yahweh, who sanctify you, am holy.21:9 And the daughter of any priest, if she profane herself by playing the harlot, she profanes her father: she shall be burnt with fire.21:10 And he that is the high priest among his brethren, upon whose head the anointing oil is poured, and that is consecrated to put on the garments, shall not let the hair of his head go loose, nor tear his clothes;21:11 neither shall he go in to any dead body, nor defile himself for his father, or for his mother;21:12 neither shall he go out of the sanctuary, nor profane the sanctuary of his God; for the crown of the anointing oil of his God is upon him: I am Yahweh.21:13 And he shall take a wife in her virginity.21:14 A widow, or one divorced, or a profane woman, a harlot, these shall he not take: but a virgin of his own people shall he take to wife.21:15 And he shall not profane his seed among his people: for I am Yahweh who sanctifies him.21:16 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,21:17 Speak to Aaron, saying, Whosoever he be of your seed throughout their generations that has a blemish, let him not approach to offer the bread of his God.21:18 For whatsoever man he be that has a blemish, he shall not approach: a blind man, or a lame, or he that has a flat nose, or anything superfluous,21:19 or a man that is broken-footed, or broken-handed,21:20 or crook-backed, or a dwarf, or that has a blemish in his eye, or is scurvy, or scabbed, or has his stones broken;21:21 no man of the seed of Aaron the priest, that has a blemish, shall come near to offer the offerings of Yahweh made by fire: he has a blemish; he shall not come near to offer the bread of his God.21:22 He shall eat the bread of his God, both of the most holy, and of the holy:21:23 only he shall not go in to the veil, nor come near to the altar, because he has a blemish; that he profane not my sanctuaries: for I am Yahweh who sanctifies them.21:24 So Moses spoke to Aaron, and to his sons, and to all the children of Israel.Chapter 2222:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,22:2 Speak to Aaron and to his sons, that they separate themselves from the holy things of the children of Israel, which they hallow to me, and that they profane not my holy name: I am Yahweh.22:3 Say to them, Whosoever he be of all your seed throughout your generations, that approaches to the holy things, which the children of Israel hallow to Yahweh, having his uncleanness upon him, that soul shall be cut off from before me: I am Yahweh.22:4 What man soever of the seed of Aaron is a leper, or has an issue; he shall not eat of the holy things, until he be clean.  And whoso touches anything that is unclean by the dead, or a man whose seed goes from him;22:5 or whosoever touches any creeping thing, whereby he may be made unclean, or a man of whom he may take uncleanness, whatsoever uncleanness he has;22:6 the soul that touches any such shall be unclean until the even, and shall not eat of the holy things, unless he bathe his flesh in water.22:7 And when the sun is down, he shall be clean; and afterward he shall eat of the holy things, because it is his bread.22:8 That which dies of itself, or is torn by beasts, he shall not eat, to defile himself with it: I am Yahweh.22:9 They shall therefore keep my charge, lest they bear sin for it, and die therein, if they profane it: I am Yahweh who sanctifies them.22:10 There shall no stranger eat of the holy thing: a sojourner of the priest's, or a hired servant, shall not eat of the holy thing.22:11 But if a priest buys any soul, the purchase of his money, he shall eat of it; and such as are born in his house, they shall eat of his bread.22:12 And if a priest's daughter be married to a stranger, she shall not eat of the heave-offering of the holy things.22:13 But if a priest's daughter be a widow, or divorced, and have no child, and be returned to her father's house, as in her youth, she shall eat of her father's bread: but there shall no stranger eat of it.22:14 And if a man eats of the holy thing unwittingly, then he shall put the fifth part thereof to it, and shall give to the priest the holy thing.22:15 And they shall not profane the holy things of the children of Israel, which they offer to Yahweh,22:16 and so cause them to bear the iniquity that brings guilt, when they eat their holy things: for I am Yahweh who sanctifies them.22:17 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,22:18 Speak to Aaron, and to his sons, and to all the children of Israel, and say to them, Whosoever he be of the house of Israel, or of the sojourners in Israel, that offers his oblation, whether it be any of their vows, or any of their freewill-offerings, which they offer to Yahweh for a burnt offering;22:19 that ye may be accepted, ye shall offer a male without blemish, of the bullocks, of the sheep, or of the goats.22:20 But whatsoever has a blemish, that is something ye shall not offer: for it shall not be acceptable for you.22:21 And whosoever offers a sacrifice of peace offerings to Yahweh to accomplish a vow, or for a freewill-offering, from the herd or from the flock, it must be perfect to be accepted; there shall be no blemish therein.22:22 Blind, or broken, or maimed, or having a wen, or scurvy, or scabbed, ye shall not offer these to Yahweh, nor make an offering by fire of them upon the altar to Yahweh.22:23 Either a bullock or a lamb that has anything superfluous or lacking in his parts, that may you offer for a freewill-offering; but for a vow it shall not be accepted.22:24 That which has its stones bruised, or crushed, or broken, or cut, ye shall not offer to Yahweh; neither shall ye do thus in your land.22:25 Neither from the hand of a foreigner shall ye offer the bread of your God of any of these; because their corruption is in them, there is a blemish in them: they shall not be accepted for you.22:26 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,22:27 When a bullock, or a sheep, or a goat, is brought forth, then it shall be seven days under the dam; and from the eighth day and then onward it shall be accepted for the oblation of an offering made by fire to Yahweh.22:28 And whether it be cow or ewe, ye shall not kill it and its young both in one day.22:29 And when ye sacrifice a sacrifice of thanksgiving to Yahweh, ye shall sacrifice it that ye may be accepted.22:30 On the same day it shall be eaten; ye shall leave none of it until the morning: I am Yahweh.22:31 Therefore shall ye keep my commandments, and do them: I am Yahweh.22:32 And ye shall not profane my holy name; but I will be hallowed among the children of Israel: I am Yahweh who hallows you,22:33 who brought you out of the land of Egypt, to be your God: I am Yahweh.Chapter 2323:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,23:2 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, The set feasts of Yahweh, which ye shall proclaim to be holy convocations, even these are my set feasts.23:3 Six days shall work be done: but on the seventh day is a sabbath of solemn rest, a holy convocation; ye shall do no manner of work: it is a sabbath to Yahweh in all your dwellings.23:4 These are the set feasts of Yahweh, even holy convocations, which ye shall proclaim in their appointed season.23:5 In the first month, on the fourteenth day of the month at even, is Yahweh's passover.23:6 And on the fifteenth day of the same month is the feast of unleavened bread to Yahweh: seven days ye shall eat unleavened bread.23:7 In the first day ye shall have a holy convocation: ye shall do no servile work.23:8 But ye shall offer an offering made by fire to Yahweh seven days: in the seventh day is a holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work.23:9 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,23:10 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When ye are come into the land which I give to you, and shall reap the harvest thereof, then ye shall bring the sheaf of the first-fruits of your harvest to the priest:23:11 and he shall wave the sheaf before Yahweh, to be accepted for you: on the morrow after the sabbath the priest shall wave it.23:12 And in the day when ye wave the sheaf, ye shall offer a he-lamb without blemish a year old for a burnt offering to Yahweh.23:13 And the meal offering thereof shall be two tenth parts of an ephah of fine flour mingled with oil, an offering made by fire to Yahweh for a sweet savor; and the drink offering thereof shall be of wine, the fourth part of a hin.23:14 And ye shall eat neither bread, nor parched grain, nor fresh ears, until this selfsame day, until ye have brought the oblation of your God: it is a statute for ever throughout your generations in all your dwellings.23:15 And ye shall count to you from the morrow after the sabbath, from the day that ye brought the sheaf of the wave-offering; seven sabbaths shall there be complete:23:16 even to the morrow after the seventh sabbath shall ye number fifty days; and ye shall offer a new meal offering to Yahweh.23:17 You shall bring out of your habitations two wave-loaves of two tenth parts of an ephah: they shall be of fine flour, they shall be baken with leaven, for first-fruits to Yahweh.23:18 And ye shall present with the bread seven lambs without blemish a year old, and one young bullock, and two rams: they shall be a burnt offering to Yahweh, with their meal offering, and their drink offerings, even an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.23:19 And ye shall offer one he-goat for a sin offering, and two he-lambs a year old for a sacrifice of peace offerings.23:20 And the priest shall wave them with the bread of the first-fruits for a wave-offering before Yahweh, with the two lambs: they shall be holy to Yahweh for the priest.23:21 And ye shall make proclamation on the selfsame day; there shall be a holy convocation to you; ye shall do no servile work: it is a statute for ever in all your dwellings throughout your generations.23:22 And when ye reap the harvest of your land, you shall not wholly reap the corners of your field, neither shall you gather the gleaning of your harvest: you shall leave them for the poor, and for the sojourner: I am Yahweh your God.23:23 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,23:24 Speak to the children of Israel, saying, In the seventh month, on the first day of the month, shall be a solemn rest to you, a memorial of blowing of trumpets, a holy convocation.23:25 You shall do no servile work; and ye shall offer an offering made by fire to Yahweh.23:26 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,23:27 Furthermore, on the tenth day of this seventh month is the day of atonement: it shall be a holy convocation to you, and ye shall afflict your souls; and ye shall offer an offering made by fire to Yahweh.23:28 And ye shall do no manner of work in that same day; for it is a day of atonement, to make atonement for you before Yahweh your God.23:29 For whatsoever soul it be that shall not be afflicted in that same day; he shall be cut off from his people.23:30 And whatsoever soul it be that does any manner of work in that same day, that soul will I destroy from among his people.23:31 You shall do no manner of work: it is a statute for ever throughout your generations in all your dwellings.23:32 It shall be to you a sabbath of solemn rest, and ye shall afflict your souls: in the ninth day of the month at even, from even to even, shall ye keep your sabbath.23:33 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,23:34 Speak to the children of Israel, saying, On the fifteenth day of this seventh month is the feast of tabernacles for seven days to Yahweh.23:35 On the first day shall be a holy convocation: ye shall do no servile work.23:36 Seven days ye shall offer an offering made by fire to Yahweh: on the eighth day shall be a holy convocation to you; and ye shall offer an offering made by fire to Yahweh: it is a solemn assembly; ye shall do no servile work.23:37 These are the set feasts of Yahweh, which ye shall proclaim to be holy convocations, to offer an offering made by fire to Yahweh, a burnt offering, and a meal offering, a sacrifice, and drink offerings, each on its own day;23:38 besides the sabbaths of Yahweh, and besides your gifts, and besides all your vows, and besides all your freewill-offerings, which ye give to Yahweh.23:39 Furthermore, on the fifteenth day of the seventh month, when ye have gathered in the fruits of the land, ye shall keep the feast of Yahweh seven days: on the first day shall be a solemn rest, and on the eighth day shall be a solemn rest.23:40 And ye shall take you on the first day the fruit of goodly trees, branches of palm-trees, and boughs of thick trees, and willows of the brook; and ye shall rejoice before Yahweh your God seven days.23:41 And ye shall keep it a feast to Yahweh seven days in the year: it is a statute for ever throughout your generations; ye shall keep it in the seventh month.23:42 You shall dwell in booths seven days; all that are home-born in Israel shall dwell in booths;23:43 that your generations may know that I made the children of Israel to dwell in booths, when I brought them out of the land of Egypt: I am Yahweh your God.23:44 And Moses declared to the children of Israel the set feasts of Yahweh.Chapter 2424:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,24:2 Command the children of Israel, that they bring to you pure olive oil beaten for the light, to cause a lamp to burn continually.24:3 Without the veil of the testimony, in the tent of meeting, shall Aaron keep it in order from evening to morning before Yahweh continually: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations.24:4 He shall keep in order the lamps upon the pure candlestick before Yahweh continually.24:5 And you shall take fine flour, and bake twelve cakes thereof: two tenth parts of an ephah shall be in one cake.24:6 And you shall set them in two rows, six on a row, upon the pure table before Yahweh.24:7 And you shall put pure frankincense upon each row, that it may be to the bread for a memorial, even an offering made by fire to Yahweh.24:8 Every sabbath day he shall set it in order before Yahweh continually; it is on the behalf of the children of Israel, an everlasting covenant.24:9 And it shall be for Aaron and his sons; and they shall eat it in a holy place: for it is most holy to him of the offerings of Yahweh made by fire by a perpetual statute.24:10 And the son of an Israelitish woman, whose father was an Egyptian, went out among the children of Israel; and the son of the Israelitish woman and a man of Israel strove together in the camp:24:11 and the son of the Israelitish woman blasphemed the Name, and cursed; and they brought him to Moses.  And his mother's name was Shelomith, the daughter of Dibri, of the tribe of Dan.24:12 And they put him in ward, that it might be declared to them at the mouth of Yahweh.24:13 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,24:14 Bring forth him that has cursed without the camp; and let all that heard him lay their hands upon his head, and let all the congregation stone him.24:15 And you shall speak to the children of Israel, saying, Whosoever curses his God shall bear his sin.24:16 And he that blasphemes the name of Yahweh, he shall surely be put to death; all the congregation shall certainly stone him: as well the sojourner, as the home-born, when he blasphemes the name of Yahweh, shall be put to death.24:17 And he that strikes any man mortally shall surely be put to death.24:18 And he that strikes a beast mortally shall make it good, life for life.24:19 And if a man cause a blemish in his neighbor; as he has done, so shall it be done to him:24:20 breach for breach, eye for eye, tooth for tooth; as he has caused a blemish in a man, so shall it be rendered to him.24:21 And he that kills a beast shall make it good: and he that kills a man shall be put to death.24:22 You shall have one manner of law, as well for the sojourner, as for the home-born: for I am Yahweh your God.24:23 And Moses spoke to the children of Israel; and they brought forth him that had cursed out of the camp, and stoned him with stones.  And the children of Israel did as Yahweh commanded Moses.Chapter 2525:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses in mount Sinai, saying,25:2 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When ye come into the land which I give you, then shall the land keep a sabbath to Yahweh.25:3 Six years you shall sow your field, and six years you shall prune your vineyard, and gather in the fruits thereof;25:4 but in the seventh year shall be a sabbath of solemn rest for the land, a sabbath to Yahweh: you shall neither sow your field, nor prune your vineyard.25:5 That which grows of itself of your harvest you shall not reap, and the grapes of your undressed vine you shall not gather: it shall be a year of solemn rest for the land.25:6 And the sabbath of the land shall be for food for you; for you, and for your servant and for your maid, and for your hired servant and for your stranger, who sojourn with you.25:7 And for your cattle, and for the beasts that are in your land, shall all the increase thereof be for food.25:8 And you shall number seven sabbaths of years to you, seven times seven years; and there shall be to you the days of seven sabbaths of years, even forty and nine years.25:9 Then shall you send abroad the loud trumpet on the tenth day of the seventh month; in the day of atonement shall ye send abroad the trumpet throughout all your land.25:10 And ye shall hallow the fiftieth year, and proclaim liberty throughout the land to all the inhabitants thereof: it shall be a jubilee to you; and ye shall return every man to his possession, and ye shall return every man to his family.25:11 A jubilee shall that fiftieth year be to you: ye shall not sow, neither reap that which grows of itself in it, nor gather the grapes in it of the undressed vines.25:12 For it is a jubilee; it shall be holy to you: ye shall eat the increase thereof out of the field.25:13 In this year of jubilee ye shall return every man to his possession.25:14 And if you sell anything to your neighbor, or buy of your neighbor's hand, ye shall not wrong one another.25:15 According to the number of years after the jubilee you shall buy of your neighbor, and according to the number of years of the crops he shall sell to you.25:16 According to the multitude of the years you shall increase the price of it, and according to the fewness of the years you shall diminish the price of it; for the number of the crops he sells to you.25:17 And ye shall not wrong one another; but you shall fear your God: for I am Yahweh your God.25:18 Wherefore ye shall do my statutes, and keep my ordinances and do them; and ye shall dwell in the land in safety.25:19 And the land shall yield its fruit, and ye shall eat your fill, and dwell therein in safety.25:20 And if ye shall say, What shall we eat the seventh year?  Behold, we shall not sow, nor gather in our increase;25:21 then I will command my blessing upon you in the sixth year, and it shall bring forth fruit for the three years.25:22 And ye shall sow the eighth year, and eat of the fruits, the old store; until the ninth year, until its fruits come in, ye shall eat the old store.25:23 And the land shall not be sold in perpetuity; for the land is mine: for ye are strangers and sojourners with me.25:24 And in all the land of your possession ye shall grant a redemption for the land.25:25 If your brother becomes poor, and sells some of his possession, then shall his kinsman that is next to him come, and shall redeem that which his brother has sold.25:26 And if a man has no one to redeem it, and he becomes rich and finds sufficient to redeem it;25:27 then let him reckon the years of the sale thereof, and restore the overplus to the man to whom he sold it; and he shall return to his possession.25:28 But if he be not able to get it back for himself, then that which he has sold shall remain in the hand of him that has bought it until the year of jubilee: and in the jubilee it shall go out, and he shall return to his possession.25:29 And if a man sells a dwelling-house in a walled city, then he may redeem it within a whole year after it is sold; for a full year shall he have the right of redemption.25:30 And if it be not redeemed within the space of a full year, then the house that is in the walled city shall be made sure in perpetuity to him that bought it, throughout his generations: it shall not go out in the jubilee.25:31 But the houses of the villages which have no wall round about them shall be reckoned with the fields of the country: they may be redeemed, and they shall go out in the jubilee.25:32 Nevertheless the cities of the Levites, the houses of the cities of their possession, may the Levites redeem at any time.25:33 And if one of the Levites redeem, then the house that was sold, and the city of his possession, shall go out in the jubilee; for the houses of the cities of the Levites are their possession among the children of Israel.25:34 But the field of the suburbs of their cities may not be sold; for it is their perpetual possession.25:35 And if your brother becomes poor, and his hand fail with you; then you shall uphold him: as a stranger and a sojourner shall he live with you.25:36 Take you no interest from him or increase, but fear your God; that your brother may live with you.25:37 You shall not give him your money upon interest, nor give him your victuals for increase.25:38 I am Yahweh your God, who brought you forth out of the land of Egypt, to give you the land of Canaan, and to be your God.25:39 And if your brother becomes poor with you, and sells himself to you; you shall not make him to serve as a bond-servant.25:40 As a hired servant, and as a sojourner, he shall be with you; he shall serve with you to the year of jubilee:25:41 then shall he go out from you, he and his children with him, and shall return to his own family, and to the possession of his fathers shall he return.25:42 For they are my servants, whom I brought forth out of the land of Egypt: they shall not be sold as bondmen.25:43 You shall not rule over him with rigor, but shall fear your God.25:44 And as for your bondmen, and your bondmaids, whom you shall have; of the nations that are round about you, of them shall ye buy bondmen and bondmaids.25:45 Moreover of the children of the strangers that sojourn among you, of them shall ye buy, and of their families that are with you, which they have begotten in your land: and they shall be your possession.25:46 And ye shall make them an inheritance for your children after you, to hold for a possession; of them shall ye take your bondmen for ever: but over your brethren the children of Israel ye shall not rule, one over another, with rigor.25:47 And if a stranger or sojourner among you becomes rich, and your brother becomes poor beside him, and sells himself to the stranger or sojourner with you, or to the stock of the stranger's family;25:48 after that he is sold he may be redeemed: one of his brethren may redeem him;25:49 or his uncle, or his uncle's son, may redeem him, or any that is near of kin to him of his family may redeem him; or if he becomes rich, he may redeem himself.25:50 And he shall reckon with him that bought him from the year that he sold himself to him to the year of jubilee: and the price of his sale shall be according to the number of years; according to the time of a hired servant shall he be with him.25:51 If there be yet many years, according to them he shall give back the price of his redemption out of the money that he was bought for.25:52 And if there remain but few years to the year of jubilee, then he shall reckon with him; according to his years shall he give back the price of his redemption.25:53 As a servant hired year by year shall he be with him: he shall not rule with rigor over him in your sight.25:54 And if he be not redeemed by these means, then he shall go out in the year of jubilee, he, and his children with him.25:55 For to me the children of Israel are servants; they are my servants whom I brought forth out of the land of Egypt: I am Yahweh your God.Chapter 2626:1 You shall make you no idols, neither shall ye rear you up a graven image, or a pillar, neither shall ye place any figured stone in your land, to bow down to it: for I am Yahweh your God.26:2 You shall keep my sabbaths, and reverence my sanctuary: I am Yahweh.26:3 If ye walk in my statutes, and keep my commandments, and do them;26:4 then I will give your rains in their season, and the land shall yield its increase, and the trees of the field shall yield their fruit.26:5 And your threshing shall reach to the vintage, and the vintage shall reach to the sowing time; and ye shall eat your bread to the full, and dwell in your land safely.26:6 And I will give peace in the land, and ye shall lie down, and none shall make you afraid: and I will cause evil beasts to cease out of the land, neither shall the sword go through your land.26:7 And ye shall chase your enemies, and they shall fall before you by the sword.26:8 And five of you shall chase a hundred, and a hundred of you shall chase ten thousand; and your enemies shall fall before you by the sword.26:9 And I will have respect to you, and make you fruitful, and multiply you, and will establish my covenant with you.26:10 And ye shall eat old store long kept, and ye shall bring forth the old because of the new.26:11 And I will set my tabernacle among you: and my soul shall not abhor you.26:12 And I will walk among you, and will be your God, and ye shall be my people.26:13 I am Yahweh your God, who brought you forth out of the land of Egypt, that ye should not be their bondmen; and I have broken the bars of your yoke, and made you go upright.26:14 But if ye will not hearken to me, and will not do all these commandments;26:15 and if ye shall reject my statutes, and if your soul abhor my ordinances, so that ye will not do all my commandments, but break my covenant;26:16 I also will do this to you: I will appoint terror over you, even consumption and fever, that shall consume the eyes, and make the soul to pine away; and ye shall sow your seed in vain, for your enemies shall eat it.26:17 And I will set my face against you, and ye shall be smitten before your enemies: they that hate you shall rule over you; and ye shall flee when none pursues you.26:18 And if ye will not yet for these things hearken to me, then I will chastise you seven times more for your sins.26:19 And I will break the pride of your power: and I will make your heaven as iron, and your earth as brass;26:20 and your strength shall be spent in vain; for your land shall not yield its increase, neither shall the trees of the land yield their fruit.26:21 And if ye walk contrary to me, and will not hearken to me, I will bring seven times more plagues upon you according to your sins.26:22 And I will send the beast of the field among you, which shall rob you of your children, and destroy your cattle, and make you few in number; and your ways shall become desolate.26:23 And if by these things ye will not be reformed to me, but will walk contrary to me;26:24 then will I also walk contrary to you; and I will strike you, even I, seven times for your sins.26:25 And I will bring a sword upon you, that shall execute the vengeance of the covenant; and ye shall be gathered together within your cities: and I will send the pestilence among you; and ye shall be delivered into the hand of the enemy.26:26 When I break your staff of bread, ten women shall bake your bread in one oven, and they shall deliver your bread again by weight: and ye shall eat, and not be satisfied.26:27 And if ye will not for all this hearken to me, but walk contrary to me;26:28 then I will walk contrary to you in wrath; and I also will chastise you seven times for your sins.26:29 And ye shall eat the flesh of your sons, and the flesh of your daughters shall ye eat.26:30 And I will destroy your high places, and cut down your sun-images, and cast your dead bodies upon the bodies of your idols; and my soul shall abhor you.26:31 And I will make your cities a waste, and will bring your sanctuaries to desolation, and I will not smell the savor of your sweet odors.26:32 And I will bring the land into desolation; and your enemies that dwell therein shall be astonished at it.26:33 And you will I scatter among the nations, and I will draw out the sword after you: and your land shall be a desolation, and your cities shall be a waste.26:34 Then shall the land enjoy its sabbaths, as long as it lies desolate, and ye are in your enemies' land; even then shall the land rest, and enjoy its sabbaths.26:35 As long as it lies desolate it shall have rest, even the rest which it had not in your sabbaths, when ye dwelt upon it.26:36 And as for them that are left of you, I will send a faintness into their heart in the lands of their enemies: and the sound of a driven leaf shall chase them; and they shall flee, as one flees from the sword; and they shall fall when none pursues.26:37 And they shall stumble one upon another, as it were before the sword, when none pursues: and ye shall have no power to stand before your enemies.26:38 And ye shall perish among the nations, and the land of your enemies shall eat you up.26:39 And they that are left of you shall pine away in their iniquity in your enemies' lands; and also in the iniquities of their fathers shall they pine away with them.26:40 And they shall confess their iniquity, and the iniquity of their fathers, in their trespass which they trespassed against me, and also that, because they walked contrary to me,26:41 I also walked contrary to them, and brought them into the land of their enemies: if then their uncircumcised heart be humbled, and they then accept of the punishment of their iniquity;26:42 then will I remember my covenant with Jacob; and also my covenant with Isaac, and also my covenant with Abraham will I remember; and I will remember the land.26:43 The land also shall be left by them, and shall enjoy its sabbaths, while it lies desolate without them: and they shall accept of the punishment of their iniquity; because, even because they rejected my ordinances, and their soul abhorred my statutes.26:44 And yet for all that, when they are in the land of their enemies, I will not reject them, neither will I abhor them, to destroy them utterly, and to break my covenant with them; for I am Yahweh their God;26:45 but I will for their sakes remember the covenant of their ancestors, whom I brought forth out of the land of Egypt in the sight of the nations, that I might be their God: I am Yahweh.26:46 These are the statutes and ordinances and laws, which Yahweh made between him and the children of Israel in mount Sinai by Moses.Chapter 2727:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,27:2 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When a man shall accomplish a vow, the persons shall be for Yahweh by your estimation.27:3 And your estimation shall be of the male from twenty years old even to sixty years old, even your estimation shall be fifty shekels of silver, after the shekel of the sanctuary.27:4 And if it be a female, then your estimation shall be thirty shekels.27:5 And if it be from five years old even to twenty years old, then your estimation shall be of the male twenty shekels, and for the female ten shekels.27:6 And if it be from a month old even to five years old, then your estimation shall be of the male five shekels of silver, and for the female your estimation shall be three shekels of silver.27:7 And if it be from sixty years old and upward; if it be a male, then your estimation shall be fifteen shekels, and for the female ten shekels.27:8 But if he be poorer than your estimation, then he shall be set before the priest, and the priest shall value him; according to the ability of him that vowed shall the priest value him.27:9 And if it be a beast, whereof men offer an oblation to Yahweh, all that any man gives of such to Yahweh shall be holy.27:10 He shall not alter it, nor change it, a good for a bad, or a bad for a good: and if he shall at all change beast for beast, then both it and that for which it is changed shall be holy.27:11 And if it be any unclean beast, of which they do not offer an oblation to Yahweh, then he shall set the beast before the priest;27:12 and the priest shall value it, whether it be good or bad: as you the priest value it, so shall it be.27:13 But if he will indeed redeem it, then he shall add the fifth part thereof to your estimation.27:14 And when a man shall sanctify his house to be holy to Yahweh, then the priest shall estimate it, whether it be good or bad: as the priest shall estimate it, so shall it stand.27:15 And if he that sanctified it will redeem his house, then he shall add the fifth part of the money of your estimation to it, and it shall be his.27:16 And if a man shall sanctify to Yahweh part of the field of his possession, then your estimation shall be according to the sowing thereof: the sowing of a homer of barley shall be valued at fifty shekels of silver.27:17 If he sanctify his field from the year of jubilee, according to your estimation it shall stand.27:18 But if he sanctify his field after the jubilee, then the priest shall reckon to him the money according to the years that remain to the year of jubilee; and an abatement shall be made from your estimation.27:19 And if he that sanctified the field will indeed redeem it, then he shall add the fifth part of the money of your estimation to it, and it shall be assured to him.27:20 And if he will not redeem the field, or if he have sold the field to another man, it shall not be redeemed any more:27:21 but the field, when it goes out in the jubilee, shall be holy to Yahweh, as a field devoted; the possession thereof shall be the priest's.27:22 And if he sanctify to Yahweh a field which he has bought, which is not of the field of his possession;27:23 then the priest shall reckon to him the worth of your estimation to the year of jubilee: and he shall give your estimation in that day, as a holy thing to Yahweh.27:24 In the year of jubilee the field shall return to him of whom it was bought, even to him to whom the possession of the land belongs.27:25 And all your estimations shall be according to the shekel of the sanctuary: twenty gerahs shall be the shekel.27:26 Only the firstling among beasts, which is made a firstling to Yahweh, no man shall sanctify it; whether it be ox or sheep, it is Yahweh's.27:27 And if it be of an unclean beast, then he shall ransom it according to your estimation, and shall add to it the fifth part thereof: or if it be not redeemed, then it shall be sold according to your estimation.27:28 Notwithstanding, no devoted thing, that a man shall devote to Yahweh of all that he has, whether of man or beast, or of the field of his possession, shall be sold or redeemed: every devoted thing is most holy to Yahweh.27:29 No one devoted, that shall be devoted from among men, shall be ransomed; he shall surely be put to death.27:30 And all the tithe of the land, whether of the seed of the land, or of the fruit of the tree, is Yahweh's: it is holy to Yahweh.27:31 And if a man will redeem anything of his tithe, he shall add to it the fifth part thereof.27:32 And all the tithe of the herd or the flock, whatsoever passes under the rod, the tenth shall be holy to Yahweh.27:33 He shall not search whether it be good or bad, neither shall he change it: and if he change it at all, then both it and that for which it is changed shall be holy; it shall not be redeemed.27:34 These are the commandments, which Yahweh commanded Moses for the children of Israel in mount Sinai.End of LeviticusNumbersChapter 11:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, in the tent of meeting, on the first day of the second month, in the second year after they were come out of the land of Egypt, saying,1:2 Take ye the sum of all the congregation of the children of Israel, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, every male, by their polls;1:3 from twenty years old and upward, all that are able to go forth to war in Israel, you and Aaron shall number them by their hosts.1:4 And with you there shall be a man of every tribe; every one head of his fathers' house.1:5 And these are the names of the men that shall stand with you.  Of Reuben: Elizur the son of Shedeur.1:6 Of Simeon: Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai.1:7 Of Judah: Nahshon the son of Amminadab.1:8 Of Issachar: Nethanel the son of Zuar.1:9 Of Zebulun: Eliab the son of Helon.1:10 Of the children of Joseph: Of Ephraim: Elishama the son of Ammihud.  Of Manasseh: Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur.1:11 Of Benjamin: Abidan the son of Gideoni.1:12 Of Dan: Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai.1:13 Of Asher: Pagiel the son of Ochran.1:14 Of Gad: Eliasaph the son of Deuel.1:15 Of Naphtali: Ahira the son of Enan.1:16 These are they that were called of the congregation, the princes of the tribes of their fathers; they were the heads of the thousands of Israel.1:17 And Moses and Aaron took these men that are mentioned by name:1:18 And they assembled all the congregation together on the first day of the second month; and they declared their pedigrees after their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, by their polls.1:19 As Yahweh commanded Moses, so he numbered them in the wilderness of Sinai.1:20 And the children of Reuben, Israel's first-born, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, by their polls, every male from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:21 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Reuben, were 46,500.1:22 Of the children of Simeon, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, those that were numbered thereof, according to the number of the names, by their polls, every male from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:23 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Simeon, were 59,300.1:24 Of the children of Gad, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:25 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Gad, were 45,650.1:26 Of the children of Judah, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:27 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Judah, were 74,600.1:28 Of the children of Issachar, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:29 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Issachar, were 54,400.1:30 Of the children of Zebulun, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:31 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Zebulun, were 57,400.1:32 Of the children of Joseph, namely, of the children of Ephraim, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:33 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Ephraim, were 45,500.1:34 Of the children of Manasseh, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:35 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Manasseh, were 32,200.1:36 Of the children of Benjamin, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:37 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Benjamin, were 35,400.1:38 Of the children of Dan, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:39 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Dan, were 62,700.1:40 Of the children of Asher, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:41 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Asher, were 41,500.1:42 Of the children of Naphtali, their generations, by their families, by their fathers' houses, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;1:43 those that were numbered of them, of the tribe of Naphtali, were 53,400.1:44 These are they that were numbered, whom Moses and Aaron numbered, and the princes of Israel, being twelve men: they were each one for his fathers' house.1:45 So all they that were numbered of the children of Israel by their fathers' houses, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war in Israel;1:46 even all they that were numbered were 603,550.1:47 But the Levites after the tribe of their fathers were not numbered among them.1:48 For Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,1:49 Only the tribe of Levi you shall not number, neither shall you take the sum of them among the children of Israel;1:50 but appoint you the Levites over the tabernacle of the testimony, and over all the furniture thereof, and over all that belongs to it: they shall carry the tabernacle, and all its furniture; and they shall minister to it, and shall encamp round about the tabernacle.1:51 And when the tabernacle sets forward, the Levites shall take it down; and when the tabernacle is to be pitched, the Levites shall set it up: and the stranger that comes near shall be put to death.1:52 And the children of Israel shall pitch their tents, every man by his own camp, and every man by his own standard, according to their hosts.1:53 But the Levites shall encamp round about the tabernacle of the testimony, that there be no wrath upon the congregation of the children of Israel: and the Levites shall keep the charge of the tabernacle of the testimony.1:54 This is what the children of Israel did.  According to all that Yahweh commanded Moses, so they did.Chapter 22:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,2:2 The children of Israel shall encamp every man by his own standard, with the ensigns of their fathers' houses: over against the tent of meeting shall they encamp round about.2:3 And those that encamp on the east side toward the sunrising shall be they of the standard of the camp of Judah, according to their hosts: and the prince of the children of Judah shall be Nahshon the son of Amminadab.2:4 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were 74,600.2:5 And those that encamp next to him shall be the tribe of Issachar: and the prince of the children of Issachar shall be Nethanel the son of Zuar.2:6 And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and four thousand and four hundred.2:7 And the tribe of Zebulun: and the prince of the children of Zebulun shall be Eliab the son of Helon.2:8 And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and seven thousand and four hundred.2:9 All that were numbered of the camp of Judah were a hundred thousand and eighty thousand and six thousand and four hundred, according to their hosts.  They shall set forth first.2:10 On the south side shall be the standard of the camp of Reuben according to their hosts: and the prince of the children of Reuben shall be Elizur the son of Shedeur.2:11 And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were forty and six thousand and five hundred.2:12 And those that encamp next to him shall be the tribe of Simeon: and the prince of the children of Simeon shall be Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai.2:13 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were fifty and nine thousand and three hundred.2:14 And the tribe of Gad: and the prince of the children of Gad shall be Eliasaph the son of Reuel.2:15 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were forty and five thousand and six hundred and fifty.2:16 All that were numbered of the camp of Reuben were a hundred thousand and fifty and one thousand and four hundred and fifty, according to their hosts.  And they shall set forth second.2:17 Then the tent of meeting shall set forward, with the camp of the Levites in the midst of the camps: as they encamp, so shall they set forward, every man in his place, by their standards.2:18 On the west side shall be the standard of the camp of Ephraim according to their hosts: and the prince of the children of Ephraim shall be Elishama the son of Ammihud.2:19 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were forty thousand and five hundred.2:20 And next to him shall be the tribe of Manasseh: and the prince of the children of Manasseh shall be Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur.2:21 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were thirty and two thousand and two hundred.2:22 And the tribe of Benjamin: and the prince of the children of Benjamin shall be Abidan the son of Gideoni.2:23 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were thirty and five thousand and four hundred.2:24 All that were numbered of the camp of Ephraim were a hundred thousand and eight thousand and a hundred, according to their hosts.  And they shall set forth third.2:25 On the north side shall be the standard of the camp of Dan according to their hosts: and the prince of the children of Dan shall be Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai.2:26 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were 62,700.2:27 And those that encamp next to him shall be the tribe of Asher: and the prince of the children of Asher shall be Pagiel the son of Ochran.2:28 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were forty and one thousand and five hundred.2:29 And the tribe of Naphtali: and the prince of the children of Naphtali shall be Ahira the son of Enan.2:30 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were fifty and three thousand and four hundred.2:31 All that were numbered of the camp of Dan were a hundred thousand and fifty and seven thousand and six hundred.  They shall set forth hindmost by their standards.2:32 These are they that were numbered of the children of Israel by their fathers' houses: all that were numbered of the camps according to their hosts were six hundred thousand and three thousand and five hundred and fifty.2:33 But the Levites were not numbered among the children of Israel; as Yahweh commanded Moses.2:34 Thus did the children of Israel; according to all that Yahweh commanded Moses, so they encamped by their standards, and so they set forward, every one by their families, according to their fathers' houses.Chapter 33:1 Now these are the generations of Aaron and Moses in the day that Yahweh spoke with Moses in mount Sinai.3:2 And these are the names of the sons of Aaron: Nadab the first-born, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar.3:3 These are the names of the sons of Aaron, the priests that were anointed, whom he consecrated to minister in the priest's office.3:4 And Nadab and Abihu died before Yahweh, when they offered strange fire before Yahweh, in the wilderness of Sinai, and they had no children; and Eleazar and Ithamar ministered in the priest's office in the presence of Aaron their father.3:5 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,3:6 Bring the tribe of Levi near, and set them before Aaron the priest, that they may minister to him.3:7 And they shall keep his charge, and the charge of the whole congregation before the tent of meeting, to do the service of the tabernacle.3:8 And they shall keep all the furniture of the tent of meeting, and the charge of the children of Israel, to do the service of the tabernacle.3:9 And you shall give the Levites to Aaron and to his sons: they are wholly given to him on the behalf of the children of Israel.3:10 And you shall appoint Aaron and his sons, and they shall keep their priesthood: and the stranger that comes near shall be put to death.3:11 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,3:12 And I, behold, I have taken the Levites from among the children of Israel instead of all the first-born that opens the womb among the children of Israel; and the Levites shall be mine:3:13 for all the first-born are mine; on the day that I smote all the first-born in the land of Egypt I hallowed to me all the first-born in Israel, both man and beast; mine they shall be: I am Yahweh.3:14 And Yahweh spoke to Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, saying,3:15 Number the children of Levi by their fathers' houses, by their families: every male from a month old and upward shall you number them.3:16 And Moses numbered them according to the word of Yahweh, as he was commanded.3:17 And these were the sons of Levi by their names: Gershon, and Kohath, and Merari.3:18 And these are the names of the sons of Gershon by their families: Libni and Shimei.3:19 And the sons of Kohath by their families: Amram, and Izhar, Hebron, and Uzziel.3:20 And the sons of Merari by their families: Mahli and Mushi.  These are the families of the Levites according to their fathers' houses.3:21 Of Gershon was the family of the Libnites, and the family of the Shimeites: these are the families of the Gershonites.3:22 Those that were numbered of them, according to the number of all the males, from a month old and upward, even those that were numbered of them were seven thousand and five hundred.3:23 The families of the Gershonites shall encamp behind the tabernacle westward.3:24 And the prince of the fathers' house of the Gershonites shall be Eliasaph the son of Lael.3:25 And the charge of the sons of Gershon in the tent of meeting shall be the tabernacle, and the Tent, the covering thereof, and the screen for the door of the tent of meeting,3:26 and the hangings of the court, and the screen for the door of the court, which is by the tabernacle, and by the altar round about, and the cords of it for all the service thereof.3:27 And of Kohath was the family of the Amramites, and the family of the Izharites, and the family of the Hebronites, and the family of the Uzzielites: these are the families of the Kohathites.3:28 According to the number of all the males, from a month old and upward, there were eight thousand and six hundred, keeping the charge of the sanctuary.3:29 The families of the sons of Kohath shall encamp on the side of the tabernacle southward.3:30 And the prince of the fathers' house of the families of the Kohathites shall be Elizaphan the son of Uzziel.3:31 And their charge shall be the ark, and the table, and the candlestick, and the altars, and the vessels of the sanctuary with which they minister, and the screen, and all the service thereof.3:32 And Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest shall be prince of the princes of the Levites, and have the oversight of them that keep the charge of the sanctuary.3:33 Of Merari was the family of the Mahlites, and the family of the Mushites: these are the families of Merari.3:34 And those that were numbered of them, according to the number of all the males, from a month old and upward, were six thousand and two hundred.3:35 And the prince of the fathers' house of the families of Merari was Zuriel the son of Abihail: they shall encamp on the side of the tabernacle northward.3:36 And the appointed charge of the sons of Merari shall be the boards of the tabernacle, and the bars thereof, and the pillars thereof, and the sockets thereof, and all the instruments thereof, and all the service thereof,3:37 and the pillars of the court round about, and their sockets, and their pins, and their cords.3:38 And those that encamp before the tabernacle eastward, before the tent of meeting toward the sunrising, shall be Moses, and Aaron and his sons, keeping the charge of the sanctuary for the charge of the children of Israel; and the stranger that comes near shall be put to death.3:39 All that were numbered of the Levites, whom Moses and Aaron numbered at the commandment of Yahweh, by their families, all the males from a month old and upward, were twenty and two thousand.3:40 And Yahweh said to Moses, Number all the first-born males of the children of Israel from a month old and upward, and take the number of their names.3:41 And you shall take the Levites for me (I am Yahweh) instead of all the first-born among the children of Israel; and the cattle of the Levites instead of all the firstlings among the cattle of the children of Israel:3:42 and Moses numbered, as Yahweh commanded him, all the first-born among the children of Israel.3:43 And all the first-born males according to the number of names, from a month old and upward, of those that were numbered of them, were 22,273.3:44 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,3:45 Take the Levites instead of all the first-born among the children of Israel, and the cattle of the Levites instead of their cattle; and the Levites shall be mine: I am Yahweh.3:46 And for the redemption of the 273 of the first-born of the children of Israel, that are over and above the number of the Levites,3:47 you shall take five shekels apiece by the poll; after the shekel of the sanctuary shall you take them (the shekel is twenty gerahs):3:48 and you shall give the money, with which the odd number of them is redeemed, to Aaron and to his sons.3:49 And Moses took the redemption-money from them that were over and above them that were redeemed by the Levites;3:50 from the first-born of the children of Israel took the the money, 1,365 shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary:3:51 and Moses gave the redemption-money to Aaron and to his sons, according to the word of Yahweh, as Yahweh commanded Moses.Chapter 44:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,4:2 Take the sum of the sons of Kohath from among the sons of Levi, by their families, by their fathers' houses,4:3 from thirty years old and upward even until fifty years old, all that enter upon the service, to do the work in the tent of meeting.4:4 This is the service of the sons of Kohath in the tent of meeting, about the most holy things:4:5 when the camp sets forward, aaron shall go in, and his sons, and they shall take down the veil of the screen, and cover the ark of the testimony with it,4:6 and shall put upon it a covering of sealskin, and shall spread over it a cloth all of blue, and shall put in the staves thereof.4:7 And upon the table of showbread they shall spread a cloth of blue, and put upon it the dishes, and the spoons, and the bowls and the cups with which to pour out; and the continual bread shall be upon it:4:8 and they shall spread upon them a cloth of scarlet, and cover the same with a covering of sealskin, and shall put in the staves thereof.4:9 And they shall take a cloth of blue, and cover the candlestick of the light, and its lamps, and its snuffers, and its snuffdishes, and all the oil vessels thereof, with which they minister to it:4:10 and they shall put it and all the vessels thereof within a covering of sealskin, and shall put it upon the frame.4:11 And upon the golden altar they shall spread a cloth of blue, and cover it with a covering of sealskin, and shall put in the staves thereof:4:12 and they shall take all the vessels of ministry, with which they minister in the sanctuary, and put them in a cloth of blue, and cover them with a covering of sealskin, and shall put them on the frame.4:13 And they shall take away the ashes from the altar, and spread a purple cloth upon it:4:14 and they shall put upon it all the vessels thereof, with which they minister about it, the firepans, the flesh-hooks, and the shovels, and the basins, all the vessels of the altar; and they shall spread upon it a covering of sealskin, and put in the staves thereof.4:15 And when Aaron and his sons have made an end of covering the sanctuary, and all the furniture of the sanctuary, as the camp is set forward; after that, the sons of Kohath shall come to bear it: but they shall not touch the sanctuary, lest they die.  These things are the burden of the sons of Kohath in the tent of meeting.4:16 And the charge of Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest shall be the oil for the light, and the sweet incense, and the continual meal offering, and the anointing oil, the charge of all the tabernacle, and of all that therein is, the sanctuary, and the furniture thereof.4:17 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,4:18 Cut ye not off the tribe of the families of the Kohathites from among the Levites;4:19 but thus do to them, that they may live, and not die, when they approach to the most holy things: Aaron and his sons shall go in, and appoint them every one to his service and to his burden;4:20 but they shall not go in to see the sanctuary even for a moment, lest they die.4:21 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,4:22 Take the sum of the sons of Gershon also, by their fathers' houses, by their families;4:23 from thirty years old and upward until fifty years old shall you number them; all that enter in to wait upon the service, to do the work in the tent of meeting.4:24 This is the service of the families of the Gershonites, in serving and in bearing burdens:4:25 they shall bear the curtains of the tabernacle, and the tent of meeting, its covering, and the covering of sealskin that is above upon it, and the screen for the door of the tent of meeting,4:26 and the hangings of the court, and the screen for the door of the gate of the court, which is by the tabernacle and by the altar round about, and their cords, and all the instruments of their service, and whatsoever shall be done with them: therein shall they serve.4:27 At the commandment of Aaron and his sons shall be all the service of the sons of the Gershonites, in all their burden, and in all their service; and ye shall appoint to them in charge all their burden.4:28 This is the service of the families of the sons of the Gershonites in the tent of meeting: and their charge shall be under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest.4:29 As for the sons of Merari, you shall number them by their families, by their fathers' houses;4:30 from thirty years old and upward even to fifty years old shall you number them, every one that enters upon the service, to do the work of the tent of meeting.4:31 And this is the charge of their burden, according to all their service in the tent of meeting: the boards of the tabernacle, and the bars thereof, and the pillars thereof, and the sockets thereof,4:32 and the pillars of the court round about, and their sockets, and their pins, and their cords, with all their instruments, and with all their service: and by name ye shall appoint the instruments of the charge of their burden.4:33 This is the service of the families of the sons of Merari, according to all their service, in the tent of meeting, under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest.4:34 And Moses and Aaron and the princes of the congregation numbered the sons of the Kohathites by their families, and by their fathers' houses,4:35 from thirty years old and upward even to fifty years old, every one that entered upon the service, for work in the tent of meeting:4:36 and those that were numbered of them by their families were 2,750.4:37 These are they that were numbered of the families of the Kohathites, all that did serve in the tent of meeting, whom Moses and Aaron numbered according to the commandment of Yahweh by Moses.4:38 And those that were numbered of the sons of Gershon, their families, and by their fathers' houses,4:39 from thirty years old and upward even to fifty years old, every one that entered upon the service, for work in the tent of meeting,4:40 even those that were numbered of them, by their families, by their fathers' houses, were 2,630.4:41 These are they that were numbered of the families of the sons of Gershon, all that did serve in the tent of meeting, whom Moses and Aaron numbered according to the commandment of Yahweh.4:42 And those that were numbered of the families of the sons of Merari, by their families, by their fathers' houses,4:43 from thirty years old and upward even to fifty years old, every one that entered upon the service, for work in the tent of meeting,4:44 even those that were numbered of them by their families, were 3,200.4:45 These are they that were numbered of the families of the sons of Merari, whom Moses and Aaron numbered according to the commandment of Yahweh by Moses.4:46 All those that were numbered of the Levites, whom Moses and Aaron and the princes of Israel numbered, by their families, and by their fathers' houses,4:47 from thirty years old and upward even to fifty years old, every one that entered in to do the work of service, and the work of bearing burdens in the tent of meeting,4:48 even those that were numbered of them, were 8,580.4:49 According to the commandment of Yahweh they were numbered by Moses, every one according to his service, and according to his burden: thus were they numbered of him, as Yahweh commanded Moses.Chapter 55:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,5:2 Command the children of Israel, that they put out of the camp every leper, and every one that has an issue, and whosoever is unclean by the dead:5:3 both male and female ye shall put out, outside of the camp ye shall put them; that they defile not their camp, in the midst of which I dwell.5:4 And the children of Israel did so, and put them outside the camp.  As Yahweh spoke to Moses, so the children of Israel did.5:5 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,5:6 Speak to the children of Israel, When a man or woman shall commit any sin that men commit, so as to trespass against Yahweh, and that soul shall be guilty;5:7 then he shall confess his sin which he has done: and he shall make restitution for his guilt in full, and add to it the fifth part thereof, and give it to him in respect of whom he has been guilty.5:8 But if the man have no kinsman to whom restitution may be made for the guilt, the restitution for guilt which is made to Yahweh shall be the priest's; besides the ram of the atonement, by which atonement shall be made for him.5:9 And every heave-offering of all the holy things of the children of Israel, which they present to the priest, shall be his.5:10 And every man's hallowed things shall be his: whatsoever any man gives the priest, it shall be his.5:11 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,5:12 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, If any man's wife goes aside, and commits a trespass against him,5:13 and a man lies with her carnally, and it is hid from the eyes of her husband, and kept close, and she is defiled, and there is no witness against her, and she is not caught in the act;5:14 and the spirit of jealousy comes upon him, and he is jealous for his wife, and she is defiled: or if the spirit of jealousy comes upon him, and he becomes jealous for his wife, and she is not defiled:5:15 then shall the man bring his wife to the priest, and shall bring her oblation for her, one tenth of an ephah of barley meal; he shall pour no oil upon it, nor put frankincense on it; for it is a meal offering of jealousy, a meal offering of memorial, bringing iniquity to remembrance.5:16 And the priest shall bring her near, and set her before Yahweh:5:17 and the priest shall take holy water in an earthen vessel; and of the dust that is on the floor of the tabernacle the priest shall take, and put it into the water.5:18 And the priest shall set the woman before Yahweh, and let the hair of the woman's head go loose, and put the meal offering of memorial in her hands, which is the meal offering of jealousy: and the priest shall have in his hand the water of bitterness that causes the curse.5:19 And the priest shall cause her to swear, and shall say to the woman, If no man has lain with you, and if you have not gone aside to uncleanness, being under your husband, may you be free from this water of bitterness that causes the curse.5:20 But if you have gone aside, being under your husband, and if you are defiled, and some man has lain with you other than your husband:5:21 then the priest shall cause the woman to swear with the oath of cursing, and the priest shall say to the woman, May Yahweh make you a curse and an oath among your people, when Yahweh causes your thigh fall away, and your body to swell;5:22 and this water that causes the curse shall go into your bowels, and make your body swell, and your thigh fall away.  And the woman shall say, amen, amen.5:23 And the priest shall write these curses in a book, and he shall blot them out into the water of bitterness:5:24 and he shall make the woman drink the water of bitterness that causes the curse; and the water that causes the curse shall enter into her and become bitter.5:25 And the priest shall take the meal offering of jealousy out of the woman's hand, and shall wave the meal offering before Yahweh, and bring it to the altar:5:26 and the priest shall take a handful of the meal offering, as the memorial thereof, and burn it upon the altar, and afterward shall make the woman drink the water.5:27 And when he has made her drink the water, then it shall come to pass, that if she is defiled, and has committed a trespass against her husband, the water that causes the curse shall enter into her and become bitter, and her body shall swell, and her thigh shall fall away: and the woman shall be a curse among her people.5:28 And if the woman is not defiled, but is clean; then she shall be free, and shall conceive seed.5:29 This is the law of jealousy, when a wife, being under her husband, goes aside, and is defiled;5:30 or when the spirit of jealousy comes upon a man, and he is jealous for his wife; then shall he set the woman before Yahweh, and the priest shall execute upon her all this law.5:31 And the man shall be free from iniquity, and that woman shall bear her iniquity.Chapter 66:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,6:2 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When either a man or woman makes a special vow, the vow of a Nazirite, to separate himself to Yahweh,6:3 he shall separate himself from wine and strong drink; he shall drink no vinegar of wine, or vinegar of strong drink, neither shall he drink any juice of grapes, nor eat either fresh grapes or dried.6:4 All the days of his separation he shall eat nothing that is made from the grape-vine, from the seeds even to the husk.6:5 All the days of his vow of separation no razor shall come upon his head: until the days are fulfilled, in which he separates himself to Yahweh, he shall be holy; he shall let the locks of the hair of his head grow long.6:6 All the days that he separates himself to Yahweh he shall not come near to a dead body.6:7 He shall not make himself unclean for his father, or for his mother, for his brother, or for his sister, when they die; because his separation to God is upon his head.6:8 All the days of his separation he is holy to Yahweh.6:9 And if any man dies very suddenly beside him, and he defiles the head of his separation; then he shall shave his head in the day of his cleansing, on the seventh day shall he shave it.6:10 And on the eighth day he shall bring two turtle-doves, or two young pigeons, to the priest, to the door of the tent of meeting:6:11 and the priest shall offer one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, and make atonement for him, for that he sinned by reason of the dead, and shall hallow his head that same day.6:12 And he shall separate to Yahweh the days of his separation, and shall bring a he-lamb a year old for a trespass offering; but the former days shall be void, because his separation was defiled.6:13 And this is the law of the Nazirite, when the days of his separation are fulfilled: he shall be brought to the door of the tent of meeting:6:14 and he shall offer his oblation to Yahweh, one he-lamb a year old without blemish for a burnt offering, and one ewe-lamb a year old without blemish for a sin offering, and one ram without blemish for peace offerings,6:15 and a basket of unleavened bread, cakes of fine flour mingled with oil, and unleavened wafers anointed with oil, and their meal offering, and their drink offerings.6:16 And the priest shall present them before Yahweh, and shall offer his sin offering, and his burnt offering:6:17 and he shall offer the ram for a sacrifice of peace offerings to Yahweh, with the basket of unleavened bread: the priest shall offer also the meal offering thereof, and the drink offering thereof.6:18 And the Nazirite shall shave the head of his separation at the door of the tent of meeting, and shall take the hair of the head of his separation, and put it on the fire which is under the sacrifice of peace offerings.6:19 And the priest shall take the boiled shoulder of the ram, and one unleavened cake out of the basket, and one unleavened wafer, and shall put them upon the hands of the Nazirite, after he has shaven the head of his separation;6:20 and the priest shall wave them for a wave-offering before Yahweh; this is holy for the priest, together with the wave-breast and heave-thigh: and after that the Nazirite may drink wine.6:21 This is the law of the Nazirite who vows, and of his oblation to Yahweh for his separation, besides that which he is able to get: according to his vow which he vows, so he must do after the law of his separation.6:22 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,6:23 Speak to Aaron and to his sons, saying, On this wise ye shall bless the children of Israel: ye shall say to them,6:24 Yahweh bless you, and keep you:6:25 Yahweh make his face to shine upon you, and be gracious to you:6:26 Yahweh lift up his countenance upon you, and give you peace.6:27 So shall they put my name upon the children of Israel; and I will bless them.Chapter 77:1 And it came to pass on the day that Moses had made an end of setting up the tabernacle, and had anointed it and sanctified it, and all the furniture thereof, and the altar and all the vessels thereof, and had anointed them and sanctified them;7:2 that the princes of Israel, the heads of their fathers' houses, offered.  These were the princes of the tribes, these are they that were over them that were numbered:7:3 and they brought their oblation before Yahweh, six covered wagons, and twelve oxen; a wagon for every two of the princes, and for each one an ox: and they presented them before the tabernacle.7:4 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,7:5 Take it of them, that they may be used in doing the service of the tent of meeting; and you shall give them to the Levites, to every man according to his service.7:6 And Moses took the wagons and the oxen, and gave them to the Levites.7:7 Two wagons and four oxen he gave to the sons of Gershon, according to their service:7:8 and four wagons and eight oxen he gave to the sons of Merari, according to their service, under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest.7:9 But to the sons of Kohath he gave none, because the service of the sanctuary belonged to them; they bore it upon their shoulders.7:10 And the princes offered for the dedication of the altar in the day that it was anointed, even the princes offered their oblation before the altar.7:11 And Yahweh said to Moses, They shall offer their oblation, each prince on his day, for the dedication of the altar.7:12 And he that offered his oblation the first day was Nahshon the son of Amminadab, of the tribe of Judah:7:13 and his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:14 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:15 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:16 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:17 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Nahshon the son of Amminadab.7:18 On the second day Nethanel the son of Zuar, prince of Issachar, did offer:7:19 he offered for his oblation one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:20 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:21 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:22 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:23 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Nethanel the son of Zuar.7:24 On the third day Eliab the son of Helon, prince of the children of Zebulun.:7:25 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:26 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:27 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:28 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:29 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Eliab the son of Helon.7:30 On the fourth day Elizur the son of Shedeur, prince of the children of Reuben:7:31 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:32 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:33 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:34 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:35 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Elizur the son of Shedeur.7:36 On the fifth day Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai, prince of the children of Simeon:7:37 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:38 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:39 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:40 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:41 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai.7:42 On the sixth day Eliasaph the son of Deuel, prince of the children of Gad:7:43 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:44 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:45 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:46 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:47 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Eliasaph the son of Deuel.7:48 On the seventh day Elishama the son of Ammihud, prince of the children of Ephraim:7:49 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:50 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:51 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:52 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:53 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Elishama the son of Ammihud.7:54 On the eighth day Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur, prince of the children of Manasseh:7:55 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:56 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:57 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:58 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:59 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur.7:60 On the ninth day Abidan the son of Gideoni, prince of the children of Benjamin:7:61 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:62 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:63 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:64 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:65 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Abidan the son of Gideoni.7:66 On the tenth day Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai, prince of the children of Dan:7:67 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:68 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:69 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:70 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:71 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai.7:72 On the eleventh day Pagiel the son of Ochran, prince of the children of Asher:7:73 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:74 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:75 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:76 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:77 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Pagiel the son of Ochran.7:78 On the twelfth day Ahira the son of Enan, prince of the children of Naphtali:7:79 his oblation was one silver platter, the weight whereof was a hundred a thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering;7:80 one golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense;7:81 one young bullock, one ram, one he-lamb a year old, for a burnt offering;7:82 one male of the goats for a sin offering;7:83 and for the sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he-goats, five he-lambs a year old: this was the oblation of Ahira the son of Enan.7:84 This was the dedication of the altar, in the day when it was anointed, by the princes of Israel: twelve silver platters, twelve silver bowls, twelve golden spoons;7:85 each silver platter weighing a hundred and thirty shekels, and each bowl seventy; all the silver of the vessels two thousand and four hundred shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary;7:86 the twelve golden spoons, full of incense, weighing ten shekels apiece, after the shekel of the sanctuary; all the gold of the spoons a hundred and twenty shekels;7:87 all the oxen for the burnt offering twelve bullocks, the rams twelve, the he-lambs a year old twelve, and their meal offering; and the males of the goats for a sin offering twelve;7:88 and all the oxen for the sacrifice of peace offerings twenty and four bullocks, the rams sixty, the he-goats sixty, the he-lambs a year old sixty.  This was the dedication of the altar, after that it was anointed.7:89 And when Moses went into the tent of meeting to speak with him, then he heard the Voice speaking to him from above the mercy-seat that was upon the ark of the testimony, from between the two cherubim: and he spoke to him.Chapter 88:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,8:2 Speak to Aaron, and say to him, When you light the lamps, the seven lamps shall give light in front of the candlestick.8:3 And Aaron did so; he lighted the lamps thereof so as to give light in front of the candlestick, as Yahweh commanded Moses.8:4 And this was the work of the candlestick, beaten work of gold; to the base thereof, and to the flowers thereof, it was beaten work: according to the pattern which Yahweh had shown Moses, so he made the candlestick.8:5 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,8:6 Take the Levites from among the children of Israel, and cleanse them.8:7 And thus shall you do to them, to cleanse them: sprinkle the water of expiation upon them, and let them cause a razor to pass over all their flesh, and let them wash their clothes, and cleanse themselves.8:8 Then let them take a young bullock, and its meal offering, fine flour mingled with oil; and another young bullock shall you take for a sin offering.8:9 And you shall present the Levites before the tent of meeting: and you shall assemble the whole congregation of the children of Israel:8:10 and you shall present the Levites before Yahweh.  And the children of Israel shall lay their hands upon the Levites:8:11 and Aaron shall offer the Levites before Yahweh for a wave-offering, on the behalf of the children of Israel, that it may be theirs to do the service of Yahweh.8:12 And the Levites shall lay their hands upon the heads of the bullocks: and offer you the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, to Yahweh, to make atonement for the Levites.8:13 And you shall set the Levites before Aaron, and before his sons, and offer them for a wave-offering to Yahweh.8:14 Thus shall you separate the Levites from among the children of Israel; and the Levites shall be mine.8:15 And after that shall the Levites go in to do the service of the tent of meeting: and you shall cleanse them, and offer them for a wave-offering.8:16 For they are wholly given to me from among the children of Israel; instead of all that opens the womb, even the first-born of all the children of Israel, have I taken them to me.8:17 For all the first-born among the children of Israel are mine, both man and beast: on the day that I smote all the first-born in the land of Egypt I sanctified them for myself.8:18 And I have taken the Levites instead of all the first-born among the children of Israel.8:19 And I have given the Levites as a gift to Aaron and to his sons from among the children of Israel, to do the service of the children of Israel in the tent of meeting, and to make atonement for the children of Israel; that there be no plague among the children of Israel, when the children of Israel come near to the sanctuary.8:20 Thus did Moses, and Aaron, and all the congregation of the children of Israel, to the Levites: according to all that Yahweh commanded Moses touching the Levites, so did the children of Israel to them.8:21 And the Levites purified themselves from sin, and they washed their clothes: and Aaron offered them for a wave-offering before Yahweh; and Aaron made atonement for them to cleanse them.8:22 And after that went the Levites in to do their service in the tent of meeting before Aaron, and before his sons: as Yahweh had commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did they to them.8:23 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,8:24 This is that which belongs to the Levites: from twenty and five years old and upward they shall go in to wait upon the service in the work of the tent of meeting:8:25 and from the age of fifty years they shall cease waiting upon the work, and shall serve no more,8:26 but shall minister with their brethren in the tent of meeting, to keep the charge, and shall do no service.  Thus shall you do to the Levites touching their charges.Chapter 99:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, in the first month of the second year after they were come out of the land of Egypt, saying,9:2 Moreover let the children of Israel keep the passover in its appointed season.9:3 In the fourteenth day of this month, at even, ye shall keep it in its appointed season: according to all the statutes of it, and according to all the ordinances thereof, shall ye keep it.9:4 And Moses spoke to the children of Israel, that they should keep the passover.9:5 And they kept the passover in the first month, on the fourteenth day of the month, at even, in the wilderness of Sinai: according to all that Yahweh commanded Moses, so did the children of Israel.9:6 And there were certain men, who were unclean by reason of the dead body of a man, so that they could not keep the passover on that day: and they came before Moses and before Aaron on that day:9:7 and those men said to him, We are unclean by reason of the dead body of a man: why are we kept back, that we may not offer the oblation of Yahweh in its appointed season among the children of Israel?9:8 And Moses said to them, Stay ye, that I may hear what Yahweh will command concerning you.9:9 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,9:10 Speak to the children of Israel, saying, If any man of you or of your generations shall be unclean by reason of a dead body, or be on a journey afar off, yet he shall keep the passover to Yahweh.9:11 In the second month on the fourteenth day at even they shall keep it; they shall eat it with unleavened bread and bitter herbs:9:12 they shall leave none of it to the morning, nor break a bone thereof: according to all the statute of the passover they shall keep it.9:13 But the man that is clean, and is not on a journey, and forbears to keep the passover, that soul shall be cut off from his people; because he offered not the oblation of Yahweh in its appointed season, that man shall bear his sin.9:14 And if a stranger shall sojourn among you, and will keep the passover to Yahweh; according to the statute of the passover, and according to the ordinance thereof, so shall he do: ye shall have one statute, both for the sojourner, and for him that is born in the land.9:15 And on the day that the tabernacle was reared up the cloud covered the tabernacle, even the tent of the testimony: and at even it was upon the tabernacle as it were the appearance of fire, until morning.9:16 So it was alway: the cloud covered it, and the appearance of fire by night.9:17 And whenever the cloud was taken up from over the Tent, then after that the children of Israel journeyed: and in the place where the cloud abode, there the children of Israel encamped.9:18 At the commandment of Yahweh the children of Israel journeyed, and at the commandment of Yahweh they encamped: as long as the cloud abode upon the tabernacle they remained encamped.9:19 And when the cloud tarried upon the tabernacle many days, then the children of Israel kept the charge of Yahweh, and journeyed not.9:20 And sometimes the cloud was a few days upon the tabernacle; then according to the commandment of Yahweh they remained encamped, and according to the commandment of Yahweh they journeyed.9:21 And sometimes the cloud was from evening until morning; and when the cloud was taken up in the morning, they journeyed: or if it continued by day and by night, when the cloud was taken up, they journeyed.9:22 Whether it were two days, or a month, or a year, that the cloud tarried upon the tabernacle, remaining above it, the children of Israel remained encamped, and journeyed not; but when it was taken up, they journeyed.9:23 At the commandment of Yahweh they encamped, and at the commandment of Yahweh they journeyed: they kept the charge of Yahweh, at the commandment of Yahweh by Moses.Chapter 1010:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,10:2 Make you two trumpets of silver; of beaten work shall you make them: and you shall use them for the calling of the congregation, and for the journeying of the camps.10:3 And when they shall blow them, all the congregation shall gather themselves to you at the door of the tent of meeting.10:4 And if they blow but one, then the princes, the heads of the thousands of Israel, shall gather themselves to you.10:5 And when ye blow an alarm, the camps that lie on the east side shall take their journey.10:6 And when ye blow an alarm the second time, the camps that lie on the south side shall take their journey: they shall blow an alarm for their journeys.10:7 But when the assembly is to be gathered together, ye shall blow, but ye shall not sound an alarm.10:8 And the sons of Aaron, the priests, shall blow the trumpets; and they shall be to you for a statute for ever throughout your generations.10:9 And when ye go to war in your land against the adversary that oppresses you, then ye shall sound an alarm with the trumpets; and ye shall be remembered before Yahweh your God, and ye shall be saved from your enemies.10:10 Also in the day of your gladness, and in your set feasts, and in the beginnings of your months, ye shall blow the trumpets over your burnt offerings, and over the sacrifices of your peace offerings; and they shall be to you for a memorial before your God: I am Yahweh your God.10:11 And it came to pass in the second year, in the second month, on the twentieth day of the month, that the cloud was taken up from over the tabernacle of the testimony.10:12 And the children of Israel set forward according to their journeys out of the wilderness of Sinai; and the cloud abode in the wilderness of Paran.10:13 And they first took their journey according to the commandment of Yahweh by Moses.10:14 And in the first place the standard of the camp of the children of Judah set forward according to their hosts: and over his host was Nahshon the son of Amminadab.10:15 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Issachar was Nethanel the son of Zuar.10:16 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Zebulun was Eliab the son of Helon.10:17 And the tabernacle was taken down; and the sons of Gershon and the sons of Merari, who bore the tabernacle, set forward.10:18 And the standard of the camp of Reuben set forward according to their hosts: and over his host was Elizur the son of Shedeur.10:19 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Simeon was Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai.10:20 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Gad was Eliasaph the son of Deuel.10:21 And the Kohathites set forward, bearing the sanctuary: and the others did set up the tabernacle against their coming.10:22 And the standard of the camp of the children of Ephraim set forward according to their hosts: and over his host was Elishama the son of Ammihud.10:23 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Manasseh was Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur.10:24 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Benjamin was Abidan the son of Gideoni.10:25 And the standard of the camp of the children of Dan, which was the rearward of all the camps, set forward according to their hosts: and over his host was Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai.10:26 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Asher was Pagiel the son of Ochran.10:27 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Naphtali was Ahira the son of Enan.10:28 Thus were the journeyings of the children of Israel according to their hosts; and they set forward.10:29 And Moses said to Hobab, the son of Reuel the Midianite, Moses' father-in-law, We are journeying to the place of which Yahweh said, I will give it you: come you with us, and we will do you good; for Yahweh has spoken good concerning Israel.10:30 And he said to him, I will not go; but I will depart to my own land, and to my kindred.10:31 And he said, Leave us not, I pray you; since you know how we should encamp in the wilderness, and you shall be to us instead of eyes.10:32 And it shall be, if you indeed go with us, it shall be, that whatever good Yahweh shall do to us, the same we will do to you.10:33 And they set forward from the mount of Yahweh three days' journey; and the ark of the covenant of Yahweh went before them three days' journey, to seek out a resting-place for them.10:34 And the cloud of Yahweh was over them by day, when they set forward from the camp.10:35 And it came to pass, when the ark set forward, that Moses said, Rise up, O Yahweh, and let your enemies be scattered; and let them that hate you flee before you.10:36 And when it rested, he said, Return, O Yahweh, to the ten thousands of the thousands of Israel.Chapter 1111:1 And the people were as murmurers, speaking evil in the ears of Yahweh: and when Yahweh heard it, his anger was kindled; and the fire of Yahweh burnt among them, and devoured in the uttermost part of the camp.11:2 And the people cried to Moses; and Moses prayed to Yahweh, and the fire abated.11:3 And the name of that place was called Taberah, because the fire of Yahweh burnt among them.11:4 And the mixed multitude that was among them lusted exceedingly: and the children of Israel also wept again, and said, Who shall give us flesh to eat?11:5 We remember the fish, which we did eat in Egypt for nought; the cucumbers, and the melons, and the leeks, and the onions, and the garlic:11:6 but now our soul is dried away; there is nothing at all save this manna to look upon.11:7 And the manna was like coriander seed, and the appearance thereof as the appearance of bdellium.11:8 The people went about, and gathered it, and ground it in mills, or beat it in mortars, and boiled it in pots, and made cakes of it: and the taste of it was as the taste of fresh oil.11:9 And when the dew fell upon the camp in the night, the manna fell upon it.11:10 And Moses heard the people weeping throughout their families, every man at the door of his tent: and the anger of Yahweh was kindled greatly; and Moses was displeased.11:11 And Moses said to Yahweh, Why have you dealt ill with your servant?  and why have I not found favor in your sight, that you lay the burden of all this people upon me?11:12 Have I conceived all this people?  have I brought them forth, that you should say to me, Carry them in your bosom, as a nursing-father carries the sucking child, to the land which you swore to their fathers?11:13 From where should I get flesh to give to all this people?  for they weep to me, saying, Give us flesh, that we may eat.11:14 I am not able to bear all this people alone, because it is too heavy for me.11:15 And if you deal thus with me, kill me, I pray you, out of hand, if I have found favor in your sight; and let me not see my wretchedness.11:16 And Yahweh said to Moses, Gather to me seventy men of the elders of Israel, whom you know to be the elders of the people, and officers over them; and bring them to the tent of meeting, that they may stand there with you.11:17 And I will come down and talk with you there: and I will take of the Spirit which is upon you, and will put it upon them; and they shall bear the burden of the people with you, that you bear it not yourself alone.11:18 And say you to the people, Sanctify yourselves against tomorrow, and ye shall eat flesh; for ye have wept in the ears of Yahweh, saying, Who shall give us flesh to eat?  for it was well with us in Egypt: therefore Yahweh will give you flesh, and ye shall eat.11:19 You shall not eat one day, nor two days, nor five days, neither ten days, nor twenty days,11:20 but a whole month, until it come out at your nostrils, and it be loathsome to you; because that ye have rejected Yahweh who is among you, and have wept before him, saying, Why came we forth out of Egypt?11:21 And Moses said, The people, among whom I am, are six hundred thousand footmen; and you have said, I will give them flesh, that they may eat a whole month.11:22 Shall flocks and herds be slain for them, to be enough them?  or shall all the fish of the sea be gathered together for them, to be enough for them?11:23 And Yahweh said to Moses, Is Yahweh's hand become short?  now you shall see whether my word shall come to pass to you or not.11:24 And Moses went out, and told the people the words of Yahweh: and he gathered seventy men of the elders of the people, and set them round about the Tent.11:25 And Yahweh came down in the cloud, and spoke to him, and took of the Spirit that was upon him, and put it upon the seventy elders: and it came to pass, that, when the Spirit rested upon them, they prophesied, but they did not keep on doing so.11:26 But there remained two men in the camp, the name of one was Eldad, and the name of the other Medad: and the Spirit rested upon them; and they were of them that were appointed, but had not gone out to the Tent; and they prophesied in the camp.11:27 And there ran a young man, and told Moses, and said, Eldad and Medad do prophesy in the camp.11:28 And Joshua the son of Nun, the attendant of Moses, one of his chosen men, answered and said, My lord Moses, forbid them.11:29 And Moses said to him, are you jealous for my sake?  I wish that all Yahweh's people were prophets, so that Yahweh would put his Spirit upon them!11:30 And Moses got himself into the camp, he and the elders of Israel.11:31 And there went forth a wind from Yahweh, and brought quails from the sea, and let them fall by the camp, about a day's journey on one side, and a day's journey on the other side, round about the camp, and about two cubits above the face of the earth.11:32 And the people rose up all that day, and all that night, and all the next day, and gathered the quails.  He that gathered least gathered ten homers: and they spread them all abroad for themselves round about the camp.11:33 While the flesh was still between their teeth, before it was chewed, the anger of Yahweh was kindled against the people, and Yahweh smote the people with a very great plague.11:34 And the name of that place was called Kibrothhattaavah, because there they buried the people that lusted.11:35 From Kibrothhattaavah the people journeyed to Hazeroth; and they abode at Hazeroth.Chapter 1212:1 And Miriam and Aaron spoke against Moses because of the Cushite woman whom he had married; for he had married a Cushite woman.12:2 And they said, Has Yahweh indeed spoken only with Moses?  has he not spoken also with us?  And Yahweh heard it.12:3 Now the man Moses was very meek, more than all the men that were upon the face of the earth.12:4 And Yahweh spoke suddenly to Moses, and to Aaron, and to Miriam, Come out ye three to the tent of meeting.  And they three came out.12:5 And Yahweh came down in a pillar of cloud, and stood at the door of the Tent, and called Aaron and Miriam; and they both came forward.12:6 And he said, Hear now my words: if there be a prophet among you, I Yahweh will make myself known to him in a vision, I will speak with him in a dream.12:7 My servant Moses is not so; he is faithful in all my house:12:8 with him will I speak face to face, even plainly, and not in dark speeches; and the form of Yahweh shall he behold.  Why then were ye not afraid to speak against my servant, against Moses?12:9 And the anger of Yahweh was kindled against them; and he departed.12:10 And the cloud removed from over the Tent; and, behold, Miriam was leprous, as white as snow: and Aaron looked upon Miriam, and, behold, she was leprous.12:11 And Aaron said to Moses, Oh, my lord, lay not punishment, I pray you, of our sin upon us, for the fact that we have done foolishly, and for the fact that we have sinned.12:12 Let her not, I pray, appear as one dead, like when he comes out of his mother's womb, of whom the flesh looks half consumed.12:13 And Moses did cry to Yahweh, saying, Heal her, O God, I beseech you.12:14 And Yahweh said to Moses, If her father had but spit in her face, should she not be ashamed seven days?  Let her be locked out of the camp for seven days, and after that she shall be brought in again.12:15 So Miriam was locked out of the camp for seven days: and the people journeyed not till Miriam was brought in again.12:16 And afterward the people journeyed from Hazeroth, and encamped in the wilderness of Paran.Chapter 1313:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,13:2 Send some men, that they may spy out the land of Canaan, which I give to the children of Israel: of every tribe of their fathers shall ye send a man, every one a prince among them.13:3 And Moses sent them from the wilderness of Paran according to the commandment of Yahweh: all of them men who were heads of the children of Israel.13:4 And these were their names: Of the tribe of Reuben, Shammua the son of Zaccur.13:5 Of the tribe of Simeon, Shaphat the son of Hori.13:6 Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb the son of Jephunneh.13:7 Of the tribe of Issachar, Igal the son of Joseph.13:8 Of the tribe of Ephraim, Hoshea the son of Nun.13:9 Of the tribe of Benjamin, Palti the son of Raphu.13:10 Of the tribe of Zebulun, Gaddiel the son of Sodi.13:11 Of the tribe of Joseph, namely, of the tribe of Manasseh, Gaddi the son of Susi.13:12 Of the tribe of Dan, ammiel the son of Gemalli.13:13 Of the tribe of Asher, Sethur the son of Michael.13:14 Of the tribe of Naphtali, Nahbi the son of Vophsi.13:15 Of the tribe of Gad, Geuel the son of Machi.13:16 These are the names of the men that Moses sent to spy out the land.  And Moses named Hoshea the son of Nun Joshua.13:17 And Moses sent them to spy out the land of Canaan, and said to them, Get you up this way by the South, and go up into the hill-country:13:18 and see the land, what it is; and the people that dwell in it, whether they are strong or weak, whether they are few or many;13:19 and what the land is that they dwell in, whether it is good or bad; and what cities they are that they dwell in, whether in camps, or in strongholds;13:20 and what the land is, whether it is fat or lean, whether there is wood in it, or not.  And be ye of good courage, and bring some of the fruit of the land.  Now the time was the time of the first-ripe grapes.13:21 So they went up, and spied out the land from the wilderness of Zin to Rehob, to the entrance of Hamath.13:22 And they went up by the South, and came to Hebron; and Ahiman, Sheshai, and Talmai, the children of Anak, were there.  (Now Hebron was built seven years before Zoan in Egypt.)13:23 And they came to the valley of Eshcol, and cut down from there a branch with one cluster of grapes, and they bore it upon a staff between two; they brought also of the pomegranates, and of the figs.13:24 That place was called the valley of Eshcol, because of the cluster which the children of Israel cut down from there.13:25 And they returned from spying out the land at the end of forty days.13:26 And they went and came to Moses, and to Aaron, and to all the congregation of the children of Israel, to the wilderness of Paran, to Kadesh; and brought back word to them, and to all the congregation, and showed them the fruit of the land.13:27 And they told him, and said, We went to the land to which you sent us; and surely it flows with milk and honey; and this is the fruit of it.13:28 But the people that dwell in the land are strong, and the cities are fortified, and very great: and moreover we saw the children of Anak there.13:29 Amalek dwells in the land of the South: and the Hittite, and the Jebusite, and the Amorite, dwell in the hill-country; and the Canaanite dwells by the sea, and along by the side of the Jordan.13:30 And Caleb stilled the people before Moses, and said, Let us go up at once, and possess it; for we are well able to overcome it.13:31 But the men that went up with him said, We are not able to go up against the people; for they are stronger than we are.13:32 And they brought up an evil report of the land which they had spied out to the children of Israel, saying, The land, through which we have gone to spy it out, is a land that eats up the inhabitants thereof; and all the people that we saw in it are men of great stature.13:33 And there we saw the Nephilim, the sons of Anak, who come of the Nephilim: and we were in our own sight as grasshoppers, and so we were in their sight.Chapter 1414:1 And all the congregation lifted up their voice, and cried; and the people wept that night.14:2 And all the children of Israel grumbled against Moses and against Aaron: and the whole congregation said to them, Would that we had died in the land of Egypt! or would that we had died in this wilderness!14:3 And why does Yahweh bring us to this land, to fall by the sword?  Our wives and our little ones will be a prey: would it not be better for us to return into Egypt?14:4 And they said one to another, Let us make a captain, and let us return into Egypt.14:5 Then Moses and Aaron fell on their faces before all the assembly of the congregation of the children of Israel.14:6 And Joshua the son of Nun and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, who were of them that spied out the land, rent their clothes:14:7 and they spoke to all the congregation of the children of Israel, saying, The land, which we passed through to spy it out, is an exceedingly good land.14:8 If Yahweh delights in us, then he will bring us into this land, and give it to us; a land which flows with milk and honey.14:9 Only do not rebel against Yahweh, neither fear ye the people of the land; for they are bread for us: their defence is removed from over them, and Yahweh is with us: do not fear them.14:10 But all the congregation said to stone them with stones.  Then the glory of Yahweh appeared in the tent of meeting to all the children of Israel.14:11 And Yahweh said to Moses, How long will this people despise me?  and how long will they not believe in me, for all the signs which I have wrought among them?14:12 I will strike them with the pestilence, and disinherit them, and will make of you a nation greater and mightier than they.14:13 And Moses said to Yahweh, Then the Egyptians will hear it; for you brought up this people in your might from among them;14:14 and they will tell it to the inhabitants of this land.  They have heard that you O Yahweh are in the midst of this people; for you O Yahweh are seen face to face, and your cloud stands over them, and you go before them, in a pillar of cloud by day, and in a pillar of fire by night.14:15 Now if you shall kill this people as one man, then the nations that have heard the fame of you will speak, saying,14:16 It is because Yahweh was not able to bring this people into the land which he swore to them, that he has slain them in the wilderness.14:17 And now, I pray you, let the power of the Lord be great, according as you have spoken, saying,14:18 Yahweh is slow to anger, and abundant in lovingkindness, forgiving iniquity and transgression; but will by no means clear the guilty, visiting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children, upon the third and upon the fourth generation.14:19 Pardon, I pray you, the iniquity of this people according to the greatness of your lovingkindness, and according as you have forgiven this people, from Egypt even until now.14:20 And Yahweh said, I have pardoned according to your word:14:21 but in very deed, as I live, and as all the earth shall be filled with the glory of Yahweh;14:22 because all those men that have seen my glory, and my signs, which I wrought in Egypt and in the wilderness, yet have tempted me these ten times, and have not hearkened to my voice,14:23 surely they shall not see the land which I swore to their fathers, neither shall any of those who despised me see it:14:24 but my servant Caleb, because he had another spirit with him, and has followed me fully, him will I bring into the land into which he went; and his seed shall possess it.14:25 Now the Amalekite and the Canaanite dwell in the valley: tomorrow turn ye, and go into the wilderness by the way to the Red Sea.14:26 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,14:27 How long shall I bear with this evil congregation, that grumble against me?  I have heard the grumblings of the children of Israel, which they grumble against me.14:28 Say to them, as I live, says Yahweh, surely as ye have spoken in my ears, so will I do to you:14:29 your dead bodies shall fall in this wilderness; and all who were numbered of you, according to your whole number, from twenty years old and upward, that have grumbled against me,14:30 surely ye shall not come into the land about which I swore that I would make you dwell in except Caleb the son of Jephunneh, and Joshua the son of Nun.14:31 But your little ones, that ye said should be a prey, them will I bring in, and they shall experience the land that ye have rejected.14:32 But as for you, your dead bodies shall fall in this wilderness.14:33 And your children shall be wanderers in the wilderness forty years, and shall bear your whoredoms, until your dead bodies be consumed in the wilderness.14:34 After the number of the days in which ye spied out the land, even forty days, for every day a year, shall ye bear your iniquities, even forty years, and ye shall know my alienation.14:35 I, Yahweh, have spoken, surely this will I do to all this evil congregation, that are gathered together against me: in this wilderness they shall be consumed, and there they shall die.14:36 And the men, whom Moses had sent to spy out the land, who returned, and made all the congregation to grumble against him, by bringing up an evil report against the land,14:37 even those men that brought up an evil report of the land, they died by the plague before Yahweh.14:38 But Joshua the son of Nun, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, remained alive of those men that went to spy out the land.14:39 And Moses told these words to all the children of Israel: and the people mourned greatly.14:40 And they rose up early in the morning, and gat them up to the top of the mountain, saying, Lo, we are here, and will go up to the place which Yahweh has promised: for we have sinned.14:41 And Moses said, Why now do ye transgress the commandment of Yahweh, seeing it shall not prosper?14:42 Do not go up, for Yahweh is not among you; so that ye are not smitten down before your enemies.14:43 For there the Amalekite and the Canaanite are before you, and ye shall fall by the sword: because ye are turned back from following Yahweh, therefore Yahweh will not be with you.14:44 But they presumed to go up to the top of the mountain: nevertheless the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, and Moses, departed not out of the camp.14:45 Then the Amalekite came down, and the Canaanite who dwelt in that mountain, and smote them and beat them down, even to Hormah.Chapter 1515:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,15:2 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When ye are come into the land of your habitations, which I give to you,15:3 and will make an offering by fire to Yahweh, a burnt offering, or a sacrifice, to accomplish a vow, or as a freewill-offering, or in your set feasts, to make a sweet savor to Yahweh, of the herd, or of the flock;15:4 then shall he that offers his oblation offer to Yahweh a meal offering of a tenth part of an ephah of fine flour mingled with the fourth part of a hin of oil:15:5 and wine for the drink offering, the fourth part of a hin, shall you prepare with the burnt offering, or for the sacrifice, for each lamb.15:6 Or for a ram, you shall prepare for a meal offering two tenth parts of an ephah of fine flour mingled with the third part of a hin of oil:15:7 and for the drink offering you shall offer the third part of a hin of wine, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.15:8 And when you prepare a bullock for a burnt offering, or for a sacrifice, to accomplish a vow, or for peace offerings to Yahweh;15:9 then shall he offer with the bullock a meal offering of three tenth parts of an ephah of fine flour mingled with half a hin of oil:15:10 and you shall offer for the drink offering half a hin of wine, for an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.15:11 Thus shall it be done for each bullock, or for each ram, or for each of the he-lambs, or of the kids.15:12 According to the number that ye shall prepare, so shall ye do to every one according to their number.15:13 All that are home-born shall do these things after this manner, in offering an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.15:14 And if a stranger sojourn with you, or whosoever may be among you throughout your generations, and will offer an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh; as ye do, so he shall do.15:15 For the assembly, there shall be one statute for you, and for the stranger that sojourns with you, a statute for ever throughout your generations: as ye are, so shall the sojourner be before Yahweh.15:16 One law and one ordinance shall be for you, and for the stranger that sojourns with you.15:17 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,15:18 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When ye come into the land whither I bring you,15:19 then it shall be, that, when ye eat of the bread of the land, ye shall offer up a heave-offering to Yahweh.15:20 Of the first of your dough ye shall offer up a cake for a heave-offering: as the heave-offering of the threshing-floor, so shall ye heave it.15:21 Of the first of your dough ye shall give to Yahweh a heave-offering throughout your generations.15:22 And when ye shall err, and not observe all these commandments, which Yahweh has spoken to Moses,15:23 even all that Yahweh has commanded you by Moses, from the day that Yahweh gave commandment, and onward throughout your generations;15:24 then it shall be, if it be done unwittingly, without the knowledge of the congregation, that all the congregation shall offer one young bullock for a burnt offering, for a sweet savor to Yahweh, with the meal offering thereof, and the drink offering thereof, according to the ordinance, and one he-goat for a sin offering.15:25 And the priest shall make atonement for all the congregation of the children of Israel, and they shall be forgiven; for it was an error, and they have brought their oblation, an offering made by fire to Yahweh, and their sin offering before Yahweh, for their error:15:26 and all the congregation of the children of Israel shall be forgiven, and the stranger that sojourns among them; for in respect of all the people it was done unwittingly.15:27 And if one person sin unwittingly, then he shall offer a she-goat a year old for a sin offering.15:28 And the priest shall make atonement for the soul that errs, when he sins unwittingly, before Yahweh, to make atonement for him; and he shall be forgiven.15:29 You shall have one law for him that does anything unwittingly, for him that is home-born among the children of Israel, and for the stranger that sojourns among them.15:30 But the soul that does anything with a high hand, whether he be home-born or a sojourner, the same blasphemes Yahweh; and that soul shall be cut off from among his people.15:31 Because he has despised the word of Yahweh, and has broken his commandment, that soul shall utterly be cut off; his iniquity shall be upon him.15:32 And while the children of Israel were in the wilderness, they found a man gathering sticks upon the sabbath day.15:33 And they that found him gathering sticks brought him to Moses and Aaron, and to all the congregation.15:34 And they put him in ward, because it had not been declared what should be done to him.15:35 And Yahweh said to Moses, The man shall surely be put to death: all the congregation shall stone him with stones without the camp.15:36 And all the congregation brought him without the camp, and stoned him to death with stones; as Yahweh commanded Moses.15:37 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,15:38 Speak to the children of Israel, and bid them that they make them fringes in the borders of their garments throughout their generations, and that they put upon the fringe of each border a cord of blue:15:39 and it shall be to you for a fringe, that ye may look upon it, and remember all the commandments of Yahweh, and do them; and that ye follow not after your own heart and your own eyes, after which ye use to play the harlot;15:40 that ye may remember and do all my commandments, and be holy to your God.15:41 I am Yahweh your God, who brought you out of the land of Egypt, to be your God: I am Yahweh your God.Chapter 1616:1 Now Korah, the son of Izhar, the son of Kohath, the son of Levi, with Dathan and Abiram, the sons of Eliab, and On, the son of Peleth, sons of Reuben, took men:16:2 and they rose up before Moses, with certain of the children of Israel, two hundred and fifty princes of the congregation, called to the assembly, men of renown;16:3 and they assembled themselves together against Moses and against Aaron, and said to them, You take too much upon you, seeing all the congregation are holy, every one of them, and Yahweh is among them: why then lift ye up yourselves above the assembly of Yahweh?16:4 And when Moses heard it, he fell upon his face:16:5 and he spoke to Korah and to all his company, saying, In the morning Yahweh will show who are his, and who is holy, and will cause him to come near to him: even him whom he shall choose will he cause to come near to him.16:6 This do: take you censers, Korah, and all his company;16:7 and put fire in them, and put incense upon them before Yahweh tomorrow: and it shall be that the man whom Yahweh does choose, he shall be holy: ye take too much upon you, ye sons of Levi.16:8 And Moses said to Korah, Hear now, ye sons of Levi:16:9 seems it but a small thing to you, that the God of Israel has separated you from the congregation of Israel, to bring you near to himself, to do the service of the tabernacle of Yahweh, and to stand before the congregation to minister to them;16:10 and that he has brought you near, and all your brethren the sons of Levi with you?  and seek ye the priesthood also?16:11 Therefore you and all your company are gathered together against Yahweh: and Aaron, what is he that ye murmur against him?16:12 And Moses sent to call Dathan and Abiram, the sons of Eliab; and they said, We will not come up:16:13 is it too a small thing that you have brought us up out of a land flowing with milk and honey, to kill us in the wilderness, that you also must make yourself also a prince over us?16:14 Moreover you have not brought us into a land flowing with milk and honey, nor given us inheritance of fields and vineyards: will you put out the eyes of these men?  we will not come up.16:15 And Moses was very angry, and said to Yahweh, Respect not you their offering: I have not taken one donkey from them, neither have I hurt one of them.16:16 And Moses said to Korah, Be you and all your company before Yahweh, you, and they, and Aaron, tomorrow:16:17 and take ye every man his censer, and put incense upon them, and bring ye before Yahweh every man his censer, two hundred and fifty censers; you also, and Aaron, each his censer.16:18 And they took every man his censer, and put fire in them, and laid incense upon it, and stood at the door of the tent of meeting with Moses and Aaron.16:19 And Korah assembled all the congregation against them to the door of the tent of meeting: and the glory of Yahweh appeared to all the congregation.16:20 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,16:21 Separate yourselves from among this congregation, that I may consume them in a moment.16:22 And they fell upon their faces, and said, O God, the God of the spirits of all flesh, shall one man sin, and will you be angry with all the congregation?16:23 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,16:24 Speak to the congregation, saying, Get you up from about the tabernacle of Korah, Dathan, and Abiram.16:25 And Moses rose up and went to Dathan and Abiram; and the elders of Israel followed him.16:26 And he spoke to the congregation, saying, Depart, I pray you, from the tents of these wicked men, and touch nothing of theirs, lest ye be consumed in all their sins.16:27 So they gat them up from the tabernacle of Korah, Dathan, and Abiram, on every side: and Dathan and Abiram came out, and stood at the door of their tents, and their wives, and their sons, and their little ones.16:28 And Moses said, Hereby ye shall know that Yahweh has sent me to do all these works; for I have not done them of my own mind.16:29 If these men die the common death of all men, or if they be visited after the visitation of all men; then Yahweh has not sent me.16:30 But if Yahweh make a new thing, and the ground open its mouth, and swallow them up, with all that appertain to them, and they go down alive into Sheol; then ye shall understand that these men have despised Yahweh.16:31 And it came to pass, as he made an end of speaking all these words, that the ground clave asunder that was under them;16:32 and the earth opened its mouth, and swallowed them up, and their households, and all the men that appertained to Korah, and all their goods.16:33 So they, and all that appertained to them, went down alive into Sheol: and the earth closed upon them, and they perished from among the assembly.16:34 And all Israel that were round about them fled at the cry of them; for they said, Lest the earth swallow us up.16:35 And fire came forth from Yahweh, and devoured the two hundred and fifty men that offered the incense.16:36 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,16:37 Speak to Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest, that he take up the censers out of the burning, and scatter you the fire yonder; for they are holy,16:38 even the censers of these sinners against their own lives; and let them be made beaten plates for a covering of the altar: for they offered them before Yahweh; therefore they are holy; and they shall be a sign to the children of Israel.16:39 And Eleazar the priest took the brazen censers, which they that were burnt had offered; and they beat them out for a covering of the altar,16:40 to be a memorial to the children of Israel, to the end that no stranger, that is not of the seed of Aaron, come near to burn incense before Yahweh; that he be not as Korah, and as his company: as Yahweh spoke to him by Moses.16:41 But on the morrow all the congregation of the children of Israel murmured against Moses and against Aaron, saying, You have killed the people of Yahweh.16:42 And it came to pass, when the congregation was assembled against Moses and against Aaron, that they looked toward the tent of meeting: and, behold, the cloud covered it, and the glory of Yahweh appeared.16:43 And Moses and Aaron came to the front of the tent of meeting.16:44 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,16:45 Get you up from among this congregation, that I may consume them in a moment.  And they fell upon their faces.16:46 And Moses said to Aaron, Take they censer, and put fire therein from off the altar, and lay incense upon it, and carry it quickly to the congregation, and make atonement for them: for there is wrath gone out from Yahweh; the plague is begun.16:47 And Aaron took it as Moses said, and ran into the midst of the assembly; and, behold, the plague was begun among the people: and he put on the incense, and made atonement for the people.16:48 And he stood between the dead and the living; and the plague was stayed.16:49 Now they that died by the plague were fourteen thousand and seven hundred, besides them that died about the matter of Korah.16:50 And Aaron returned to Moses to the door of the tent of meeting: and the plague was stayed.Chapter 1717:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,17:2 Speak to the children of Israel, and take of them rods, one for each fathers' house, of all their princes according to their fathers' houses, twelve rods: write you every man's name upon his rod.17:3 And you shall write Aaron's name upon the rod of Levi; for there shall be one rod for each head of their fathers' houses.17:4 And you shall lay them up in the tent of meeting before the testimony, where I meet with you.17:5 And it shall come to pass, that the rod of the man whom I shall choose shall bud: and I will make to cease from me the murmurings of the children of Israel, which they murmur against you.17:6 And Moses spoke to the children of Israel; and all their princes gave him rods, for each prince one, according to their fathers' houses, even twelve rods: and the rod of Aaron was among their rods.17:7 And Moses laid up the rods before Yahweh in the tent of the testimony.17:8 And it came to pass on the morrow, that Moses went into the tent of the testimony; and, behold, the rod of Aaron for the house of Levi was budded, and put forth buds, and produced blossoms, and bore ripe almonds.17:9 And Moses brought out all the rods from before Yahweh to all the children of Israel: and they looked, and took every man his rod.17:10 And Yahweh said to Moses, Put back the rod of Aaron before the testimony, to be kept for a token against the children of rebellion; that you may make an end of their murmurings against me, that they die not.17:11 Thus did Moses: as Yahweh commanded him, so did he.17:12 And the children of Israel spoke to Moses, saying, Behold, we perish, we are undone, we are all undone.17:13 Every one that comes near, that comes near to the tabernacle of Yahweh, dies: shall we perish all of us?Chapter 1818:1 And Yahweh said to Aaron, You and your sons and your fathers' house with you shall bear the iniquity of the sanctuary; and you and your sons with you shall bear the iniquity of your priesthood.18:2 And your brethren also, the tribe of Levi, the tribe of your father, bring you near with you, that they may be joined to you, and minister to you: but you and your sons with you shall be before the tent of the testimony.18:3 And they shall keep your charge, and the charge of all the Tent: only they shall not come near to the vessels of the sanctuary and to the altar, that they die not, neither they, nor ye.18:4 And they shall be joined to you, and keep the charge of the tent of meeting, for all the service of the Tent: and a stranger shall not come near to you.18:5 And ye shall keep the charge of the sanctuary, and the charge of the altar; that there be wrath no more upon the children of Israel.18:6 And I, behold, I have taken your brethren the Levites from among the children of Israel: to you they are a gift, given to Yahweh, to do the service of the tent of meeting.18:7 And you and your sons with you shall keep your priesthood for everything of the altar, and for that within the veil; and ye shall serve: I give you the priesthood as a service of gift: and the stranger that comes near shall be put to death.18:8 And Yahweh spoke to Aaron, and I, behold, I have given you the charge of my heave-offerings, even all the hallowed things of the children of Israel; to you have I given them by reason of the anointing, and to your sons, as a portion for ever.18:9 This shall be yours of the most holy things, reserved from the fire: every oblation of theirs, even every meal offering of theirs, and every sin offering of theirs, and every trespass offering of theirs, which they shall render to me, shall be most holy for you and for your sons.18:10 As the most holy things shall you eat thereof; every male shall eat thereof: it shall be holy to you.18:11 And this is yours: the heave-offering of their gift, even all the wave-offerings of the children of Israel; I have given them to you, and to your sons and to your daughters with you, as a portion for ever; every one that is clean in your house shall eat thereof.18:12 All the best of the oil, and all the best of the vintage, and of the grain, the first-fruits of them which they give to Yahweh, to you have I given them.18:13 The first-ripe fruits of all that is in their land, which they bring to Yahweh, shall be yours; every one that is clean in your house shall eat thereof.18:14 Everything devoted in Israel shall be yours.18:15 Everything that opens the womb, of all flesh which they offer to Yahweh, both of man and beast shall be yours: nevertheless the first-born of man shall you surely redeem, and the firstling of unclean beasts shall you redeem.18:16 And those that are to be redeemed of them from a month old shall you redeem, according to your estimation, for the money of five shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary (the same is twenty gerahs).18:17 But the firstling of a cow, or the firstling of a sheep, or the firstling of a goat, you shall not redeem; they are holy: you shall sprinkle their blood upon the altar, and shall burn their fat for an offering made by fire, for a sweet savor to Yahweh.18:18 And the flesh of them shall be yours, as the wave-breast and as the right thigh, it shall be yours.18:19 All the heave-offerings of the holy things, which the children of Israel offer to Yahweh, have I given you, and your sons and your daughters with you, as a portion for ever: it is a covenant of salt for ever before Yahweh to you and to your seed with you.18:20 And Yahweh said to Aaron, You shall have no inheritance in their land, neither shall you have any portion among them: I am your portion and your inheritance among the children of Israel.18:21 And to the children of Levi, behold, I have given all the tithe in Israel for an inheritance, in return for their service which they serve, even the service of the tent of meeting.18:22 And from now on the children of Israel shall not come near the tent of meeting, lest they bear sin, and die.18:23 But the Levites shall do the service of the tent of meeting, and they shall bear their iniquity: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations; and among the children of Israel they shall have no inheritance.18:24 For the tithe of the children of Israel, which they offer as a heave-offering to Yahweh, I have given to the Levites for an inheritance: therefore I have said to them, among the children of Israel they shall have no inheritance.18:25 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,18:26 Moreover you shall speak to the Levites, and say to them, When ye take of the children of Israel the tithe which I have given you from them for your inheritance, then ye shall offer up a heave-offering of it for Yahweh, a tithe of the tithe.18:27 And your heave-offering shall be reckoned to you, as though it were the grain of the threshing-floor, and as the fulness of the winepress.18:28 Thus ye also shall offer a heave-offering to Yahweh of all your tithes, which ye receive of the children of Israel; and thereof ye shall give Yahweh's heave-offering to Aaron the priest.18:29 Out of all your gifts ye shall offer every heave-offering of Yahweh, of all the best thereof, even the hallowed part thereof out of it.18:30 Therefore you shall say to them, When ye heave the best thereof from it, then it shall be reckoned to the Levites as the increase of the threshing-floor, and as the increase of the wine-press.18:31 And ye shall eat it in every place, ye and your households: for it is your reward in return for your service in the tent of meeting.18:32 And ye shall bear no sin by reason of it, when ye have heaved from it the best thereof: and ye shall not profane the holy things of the children of Israel, that ye die not.Chapter 1919:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Aaron, saying,19:2 This is the statute of the law which Yahweh has commanded, saying, Speak to the children of Israel, that they bring you a red heifer without spot, in which is no blemish, and upon which never came yoke.19:3 And ye shall give her to Eleazar the priest, and he shall bring her forth without the camp, and one shall slay her before his face:19:4 and Eleazar the priest shall take of her blood with his finger, and sprinkle her blood toward the front of the tent of meeting seven times.19:5 And one shall burn the heifer in his sight; her skin, and her flesh, and her blood, with her dung, shall he burn:19:6 and the priest shall take cedar-wood, and hyssop, and scarlet, and cast it into the midst of the burning of the heifer.19:7 Then the priest shall wash his clothes, and he shall bathe his flesh in water, and afterward he shall come into the camp, and the priest shall be unclean until the even.19:8 And he that burns her shall wash his clothes in water, and bathe his flesh in water, and shall be unclean until the even.19:9 And a man that is clean shall gather up the ashes of the heifer, and lay them up without the camp in a clean place; and it shall be kept for the congregation of the children of Israel for a water for impurity: it is a sin offering.19:10 And he that gathers the ashes of the heifer shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even: and it shall be to the children of Israel, and to the stranger that sojourns among them, for a statute for ever.19:11 He that touches the dead body of any man shall be unclean seven days:19:12 the same shall purify himself with it on the third day, and on the seventh day he shall be clean: but if he purify not himself the third day, then the seventh day he shall not be clean.19:13 Whosoever touches a dead person, the body of a man that has died, and purifies not himself, defiles the tabernacle of Yahweh; and that soul shall be cut off from Israel: because the water for impurity was not sprinkled upon him, he shall be unclean; his uncleanness is yet upon him.19:14 This is the law when a man dies in a tent: every one that comes into the tent, and every one that is in the tent, shall be unclean seven days.19:15 And every open vessel, which has no covering bound upon it, is unclean.19:16 And whosoever in the open field touches one that is slain with a sword, or a dead body, or a bone of a man, or a grave, shall be unclean seven days.19:17 And for the unclean they shall take of the ashes of the burning of the sin offering; and running water shall be put thereto in a vessel:19:18 and a clean person shall take hyssop, and dip it in the water, and sprinkle it upon the tent, and upon all the vessels, and upon the persons that were there, and upon him that touched the bone, or the slain, or the dead, or the grave:19:19 and the clean person shall sprinkle upon the unclean on the third day, and on the seventh day: and on the seventh day he shall purify him; and he shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and shall be clean at even.19:20 But the man that shall be unclean, and shall not purify himself, that soul shall be cut off from the midst of the assembly, because he has defiled the sanctuary of Yahweh: the water for impurity has not been sprinkled upon him; he is unclean.19:21 And it shall be a perpetual statute to them: and he that sprinkles the water for impurity shall wash his clothes, and he that touches the water for impurity shall be unclean until even.19:22 And whatsoever the unclean person touches shall be unclean; and the soul that touches it shall be unclean until even.Chapter 2020:1 And the children of Israel, even the whole congregation, came into the wilderness of Zin in the first month: and the people abode in Kadesh; and Miriam died there, and was buried there.20:2 And there was no water for the congregation: and they assembled themselves together against Moses and against Aaron.20:3 And the people strove with Moses, and spoke, saying, Would that we had died when our brethren died before Yahweh!20:4 And why have ye brought the assembly of Yahweh into this wilderness, that we should die there, we and our beasts?20:5 And why have ye made us to come up out of Egypt, to bring us in to this evil place?  it is no place of seed, or of figs, or of vines, or of pomegranates; neither is there any water to drink.20:6 And Moses and Aaron went from the presence of the assembly to the door of the tent of meeting, and fell upon their faces: and the glory of Yahweh appeared to them.20:7 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,20:8 Take the rod, and assemble the congregation, you, and Aaron your brother, and speak ye to the rock before their eyes, that it give forth its water; and you shall bring forth to them water out of the rock; so you shall give the congregation and their cattle drink.20:9 And Moses took the rod from before Yahweh, as he commanded him.20:10 And Moses and Aaron gathered the assembly together before the rock, and he said to them, Hear now, ye rebels; shall we bring you forth water out of this rock?20:11 And Moses lifted up his hand, and smote the rock with his rod twice: and water came forth abundantly, and the congregation drank, and their cattle.20:12 And Yahweh said to Moses and Aaron, Because ye believed not in me, to sanctify me in the eyes of the children of Israel, therefore ye shall not bring this assembly into the land which I have given them.20:13 These are the waters of Meribah; because the children of Israel strove with Yahweh, and he was sanctified in them.20:14 And Moses sent messengers from Kadesh to the king of Edom, Thus says your brother Israel, You know all the travail that has befallen us:20:15 how our fathers went down into Egypt, and we dwelt in Egypt a long time; and the Egyptians dealt ill with us, and our fathers:20:16 and when we cried to Yahweh, he heard our voice, and sent an angel, and brought us forth out of Egypt: and, behold, we are in Kadesh, a city in the uttermost of your border.20:17 Let us pass, I pray you, through your land: we will not pass through field or through vineyard, neither will we drink of the water of the wells: we will go along the king's highway; we will not turn aside to the right hand nor to the left, until we have passed your border.20:18 And Edom said to him, You shall not pass through me, lest I come out with the sword against you.20:19 And the children of Israel said to him, We will go up by the highway; and if we drink of your water, I and my cattle, then will I give the price thereof: let me only, without doing anything else, pass through on my feet.20:20 And he said, You shall not pass through.  And Edom came out against him with much people, and with a strong hand.20:21 Thus Edom refused to give Israel passage through his border: therefore Israel turned away from him.20:22 And they journeyed from Kadesh: and the children of Israel, even the whole congregation, came to mount Hor.20:23 And Yahweh spoke to Moses and Aaron in mount Hor, by the border of the land of Edom, saying,20:24 Aaron shall be gathered to his people; for he shall not enter into the land which I have given to the children of Israel, because ye rebelled against my word at the waters of Meribah.20:25 Take Aaron and Eleazar his son, and bring them up to mount Hor;20:26 and strip Aaron of his garments, and put them upon Eleazar his son: and Aaron shall be gathered to his people, and shall die there.20:27 And Moses did as Yahweh commanded: and they went up into mount Hor in the sight of all the congregation.20:28 And Moses stripped Aaron of his garments, and put them upon Eleazar his son; and Aaron died there on the top of the mount: and Moses and Eleazar came down from the mount.20:29 And when all the congregation saw that Aaron was dead, they wept for Aaron thirty days, even all the house of Israel.Chapter 2121:1 And the Canaanite, the king of Arad, who dwelt in the South, heard tell that Israel came by the way of Atharim; and he fought against Israel, and took some of them captive.21:2 And Israel vowed a vow to Yahweh, and said, If you will indeed deliver this people into my hand, then I will utterly destroy their cities.21:3 And Yahweh hearkened to the voice of Israel, and delivered up the Canaanites; and they utterly destroyed them and their cities: and the name of the place was called Hormah.21:4 And they journeyed from mount Hor by the way to the Red Sea, to compass the land of Edom: and the soul of the people was much discouraged because of the way.21:5 And the people spoke against God, and against Moses, Why have ye brought us up out of Egypt to die in the wilderness?  for there is no bread, and there is no water; and our soul loathes this light bread.21:6 And Yahweh sent fiery serpents among the people, and they bit the people; and much people of Israel died.21:7 And the people came to Moses, and said, We have sinned, because we have spoken against Yahweh, and against you; pray to Yahweh, that he take away the serpents from us.  And Moses prayed for the people.21:8 And Yahweh said to Moses, Make you a fiery serpent, and set it upon a standard: and it shall come to pass, that every one that is bitten, when he sees it, shall live.21:9 And Moses made a serpent of brass, and set it upon the standard: and it came to pass, that if a serpent had bitten any man, when he looked to the serpent of brass, he lived.21:10 And the children of Israel journeyed, and encamped in Oboth.21:11 And they journeyed from Oboth, and encamped at Iyeabarim, in the wilderness which is before Moab, toward the sunrising.21:12 From there they journeyed, and encamped in the valley of Zered.21:13 From there they journeyed, and encamped on the other side of the Arnon, which is in the wilderness, that comes out of the border of the Amorites: for the Arnon is the border of Moab, between Moab and the Amorites.21:14 Wherefore it is said in the book of the Wars of Yahweh, Vaheb in Suphah, and the valleys of the Arnon,21:15 And the slope of the valleys That inclines toward the dwelling of Ar, and leans upon the border of Moab.21:16 And from there they journeyed to Beer: that is the well whereof Yahweh said to Moses, Gather the people together, and I will give them water.21:17 Then sang Israel this song: Spring up, O well; sing ye to it:21:18 The well, which the princes dug, Which the nobles of the people delved, With the scepter, and with their staves.  And from the wilderness they journeyed to Mattanah;21:19 and from Mattanah to Nahaliel; and from Nahaliel to Bamoth;21:20 and from Bamoth to the valley that is in the field of Moab, to the top of Pisgah, which looks down upon the desert.21:21 And Israel sent messengers to Sihon king of the Amorites, saying,21:22 Let me pass through your land: we will not turn aside into field, or into vineyard; we will not drink of the water of the wells: we will go by the king's highway, until we have passed your border.21:23 And Sihon would not allow Israel to pass through his border: but Sihon gathered all his people together, and went out against Israel into the wilderness, and came to Jahaz; and he fought against Israel.21:24 And Israel smote him with the edge of the sword, and possessed his land from the Arnon to the Jabbok, even to the children of Ammon; for the border of the children of Ammon was strong.21:25 And Israel took all these cities: and Israel dwelt in all the cities of the Amorites, in Heshbon, and in all the towns thereof.21:26 For Heshbon was the city of Sihon the king of the Amorites, who had fought against the former king of Moab, and taken all his land out of his hand, even to the Arnon.21:27 Wherefore they that speak in proverbs say, Come ye to Heshbon; Let the city of Sihon be built and established:21:28 For a fire is gone out of Heshbon, a flame from the city of Sihon: It has devoured Ar of Moab, The lords of the high places of the Arnon.21:29 Woe to you, Moab! You are undone, O people of Chemosh: He has given his sons as fugitives, and his daughters into captivity, To Sihon king of the Amorites.21:30 We have shot at them; Heshbon is perished even to Dibon, and we have laid waste even to Nophah, Which reaches to medeba.21:31 Thus Israel dwelt in the land of the Amorites.21:32 And Moses sent to spy out Jazer; and they took the towns thereof, and drove out the Amorites that were there.21:33 And they turned and went up by the way of Bashan: and Og the king of Bashan went out against them, he and all his people, to battle at Edrei.21:34 And Yahweh said to Moses, Fear him not: for I have delivered him into your hand, and all his people, and his land; and you shall do to him as you did to Sihon king of the Amorites, who dwelt at Heshbon.21:35 So they smote him, and his sons and all his people, until there was none left him remaining: and they possessed his land.Chapter 2222:1 And the children of Israel journeyed, and encamped in the plains of Moab beyond the Jordan at Jericho.22:2 And Balak the son of Zippor saw all that Israel had done to the Amorites.22:3 And Moab was sore afraid of the people, because they were many: and Moab was distressed because of the children of Israel.22:4 And Moab said to the elders of Midian, Now will this multitude lick up all that is round about us, as the ox licks up the grass of the field.  And Balak the son of Zippor was king of Moab at that time.22:5 And he sent messengers to Balaam the son of Beor, to Pethor, which is by the River, to the land of the children of his people, to call him, saying, Behold, there is a people come out from Egypt: behold, they cover the face of the earth, and they abide over against me.22:6 Come now therefore, I pray you, curse me this people; for they are too mighty for me.  Perhaps I shall prevail in attacking them, and drive them out of the land; for I know that he whom you bless is blessed, and he whom you curse is cursed.22:7 And the elders of Moab and the elders of Midian departed with the rewards of divination in their hand; and they came to Balaam, and spoke to him the words of Balak.22:8 And he said to them, Lodge here this night, and I will bring back word to you, as Yahweh shall speak to me: and the princes of Moab abode with Balaam.22:9 And God came to Balaam, and said, What men are these with you?22:10 And Balaam said to God, Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab, has sent to me, saying,22:11 Behold, the people that is come out of Egypt, it covers the face of the earth: now, come curse them for me; peradventure I shall be able to fight against them, and shall drive them out.22:12 And God said to Balaam, You shall not go with them; you shall not curse the people; for they are blessed.22:13 And Balaam rose up in the morning, and said to the princes of Balak, Get you into your land; for Yahweh refuses to give me leave to go with you.22:14 And the princes of Moab rose up, and they went to Balak, and said, Balaam refuses to come with us.22:15 And Balak sent yet again princes, more, and more honorable than they.22:16 And they came to Balaam, and said to him, Thus says Balak the son of Zippor, Let nothing, I pray you, hinder you from coming to me:22:17 for I will promote you to very great honor, and whatsoever you say to me I will do: come therefore, I pray you, curse this people for me.22:18 And Balaam answered and said to the servants of Balak, If Balak would give me his house full of silver and gold, I cannot go beyond the word of Yahweh my God, to do less or more.22:19 Now therefore, I pray you, wait also here this night, that I may know what Yahweh will speak to me more.22:20 And God came to Balaam at night, and said to him, If the men are come to call you, rise up, go with them; but only the word which I speak to you, that shall you do.22:21 And Balaam rose up in the morning, and saddled his donkey, and went with the princes of Moab.22:22 And God's anger was kindled because he went; and the angel of Yahweh placed himself in the way as an adversary against him.  Now he was riding upon his donkey, and his two servants were with him.22:23 And the donkey saw the angel of Yahweh standing in the way, with his sword drawn in his hand; and the donkey turned aside out of the way, and went into the field: and Balaam struck the donkey, to turn it into the way.22:24 Then the angel of Yahweh stood in a narrow path between the vineyards, a wall being on this side, and a wall on that side.22:25 And the donkey saw the angel of Yahweh, and it thrust itself toward the wall, and crushed Balaam's foot against the wall: and he struck it again.22:26 And the angel of Yahweh went further, and stood in a narrow place, where there was no way to turn either to the right hand or to the left.22:27 And the donkey saw the angel of Yahweh, and it lay down under Balaam: and Balaam's anger was kindled, and he struck the donkey with his staff.22:28 And Yahweh opened the mouth of the donkey, and it said to Balaam, What have I done to you, that you have struck me these three times?22:29 And Balaam said to the donkey, Because you have mocked me, I wish there were a sword in my hand, for now I would kill you.22:30 And the donkey said to Balaam, am I not your donkey, upon which you have ridden all your life long up until this day?  Was I ever in the habit to do this to you?  and he said, No.22:31 Then Yahweh opened the eyes of Balaam, and he saw the angel of Yahweh standing in the way, with his sword drawn in his hand; and he bowed his head, and fell on his face.22:32 And the angel of Yahweh said to him, Why have you struck your donkey these three times?  behold, I am come forth as an adversary, because your way is perverse before me:22:33 and the donkey saw me, and turned aside before me these three times: unless it had turned aside from me, surely now I would have even slain you, and saved it alive.22:34 And Balaam said to the angel of Yahweh, I have sinned; for I knew not that you stood in the way against me: now therefore, if it displeases you, I will get me back again.22:35 And the angel of Yahweh said to Balaam, Go with the men; but only the word that I shall speak to you, that you shall speak.  So Balaam went with the princes of Balak.22:36 And when Balak heard that Balaam was arrived, he went out to meet him toward the City of Moab, which is on the border of the Arnon, which is in the utmost part of the border.22:37 And Balak said to Balaam, Did I not earnestly send to you to call you?  Why did you not come to me?  am I not able indeed to promote you to honor?22:38 And Balaam said to Balak, Lo, I am come to you: have I now any power at all to speak anything?  the word that God puts in my mouth, that shall I speak.22:39 And Balaam went with Balak, and they came to Kiriath-huzoth.22:40 And Balak sacrificed oxen and sheep, and sent to Balaam, and to the princes that were with him.22:41 And it came to pass in the morning, that Balak took Balaam, and brought him up into the high places of Baal; and he saw from there the utmost part of the people.Chapter 2323:1 And Balaam said to Balak, Build me here seven altars, and prepare me here seven bullocks and seven rams.23:2 And Balak did as Balaam had spoken; and Balak and Balaam offered on every altar a bullock and a ram.23:3 And Balaam said to Balak, Stand by your burnt offering, and I will go: peradventure Yahweh will come to meet me; and whatsoever he shows me I will tell you.  And he went to a bare height.23:4 And God met Balaam: and he said to him, I have prepared the seven altars, and I have offered up a bullock and a ram on every altar.23:5 And Yahweh put a word in Balaam's mouth, and said, Return to Balak, and thus you shall speak.23:6 And he returned to him, and, lo, he was standing by his burnt offering, he, and all the princes of Moab.23:7 And he took up his parable, and said, From Aram has Balak brought me, The king of Moab from the mountains of the East: Come, curse for me Jacob, and come, defy Israel.23:8 How shall I curse, whom God has not cursed?  And how shall I defy, whom Yahweh has not defied?23:9 For from the top of the rocks I see him, and from the hills I behold him: lo, it is a people that dwells alone, and shall not be reckoned among the nations.23:10 Who can count the dust of Jacob, Or number the fourth part of Israel?  Let me die the death of the righteous, and let my last end be like his!23:11 And Balak said to Balaam, What have you done to me?  I took you to curse my enemies, and, behold, you have blessed them altogether.23:12 And he answered and said, Must I not take heed to speak that which Yahweh puts in my mouth?23:13 And Balak said to him, Come, I pray you, with me to another place, from where you may see them; you shall see but the utmost part of them, and shall not see them all: and curse them for me from there.23:14 And he took him into the field of Zophim, to the top of Pisgah, and built seven altars, and offered up a bullock and a ram on every altar.23:15 And he said to Balak, Stand here by your burnt offering, while I meet Yahweh over there.23:16 And Yahweh met Balaam, and put a word in his mouth, and said, Return to Balak, and thus you shall speak.23:17 And he came to him, and, lo, he was standing by his burnt offering, and the princes of Moab with him.  And Balak said to him, What has Yahweh spoken?23:18 And he took up his parable, and said, Rise up, Balak, and hear; Listen to me, you son of Zippor:23:19 God is not a man, that he should lie, Neither the son of man, that he should repent: Has he said something, to not do it?  Or has he spoken, only to not make it good?23:20 Behold, I have received commandment to bless: And he has blessed, and I cannot reverse it.23:21 He has not beheld iniquity in Jacob; Neither has he seen perverseness in Israel: Yahweh his God is with him, and the shout of a king is among them.23:22 God brings them forth out of Egypt; He has as it were the strength of the wild ox.23:23 Surely there is no enchantment with Jacob; Neither is there any divination with Israel: Now shall it be said of Jacob and of Israel, What has God wrought!23:24 Behold, the people rises up as a lioness, and as a lion does he lift himself up: He shall not lie down until he eats of the prey, and drink the blood of the slain.23:25 And Balak said to Balaam, Neither curse them at all, nor bless them at all.23:26 But Balaam answered and said to Balak, Did I not inform you, saying: All that Yahweh speaks, that I must do?23:27 And Balak said to Balaam, Come now, I will take you to another place; peradventure it will please God that you may curse them for me from there.23:28 And Balak took Balaam to the top of Peor, that looks down upon the desert.23:29 And Balaam said to Balak, Build me here seven altars, and prepare me here seven bullocks and seven rams.23:30 And Balak did as Balaam had said, and offered up a bullock and a ram on every altar.Chapter 2424:1 And when Balaam saw that it pleased Yahweh to bless Israel, he went not, as at the other times, to meet with enchantments, but he set his face toward the wilderness.24:2 And Balaam lifted up his eyes, and he saw Israel dwelling according to their tribes; and the Spirit of God came upon him.24:3 And he took up his parable, and said, Balaam the son of Beor says, and the man whose eye was closed says;24:4 He says, who hears the words of God, Who sees the vision of the Almighty, Falling down, and having his eyes open:24:5 How attractive are your tents, O Jacob, Your encampments, O Israel!24:6 As valleys are they spread forth, as gardens by the riverside, as aloes which Yahweh has planted, as cedar trees beside the waters.24:7 Water shall flow from his buckets, and his seed shall be in many waters, and his king shall be higher than Agag, and his kingdom shall be exalted.24:8 God brings him forth out of Egypt; He has as it were the strength of the wild ox: He shall eat up the nations his adversaries, and shall break their bones in pieces, and strike them through with his arrows.24:9 He crouched, he lay down as a lion, and as a lioness; who shall rouse him up?  Blessed be every one that blesses you, and cursed be every one that curses you.24:10 And Balak's anger was kindled against Balaam, and he struck his hands together; and Balak said to Balaam, I called you to curse my enemies, and, behold, you have altogether blessed them these three times.24:11 Therefore now flee to your place: I thought to promote you to great honor; but, lo, Yahweh has kept you back from honor.24:12 And Balaam said to Balak, Did I not also inform your messengers that you sent to me, saying,24:13 If Balak would give me his house full of silver and gold, I cannot go beyond the word of Yahweh, to do either good or bad of my own mind; what Yahweh speaks, that will I speak?24:14 And now, behold, I go to my people: come, and I will warn you what this people shall do to your people in the latter days.24:15 And he took up his parable, and said, Balaam the son of Beor says, and the man whose eye was closed says;24:16 He says, who hears the words of God, and knows the knowledge of the Most High, Who sees the vision of the Almighty, Falling down, and having his eyes open:24:17 I see him, but not now; I behold him, but not near: There shall come forth a star out of Jacob, and a scepter shall rise out of Israel, and shall strike through the corners of Moab, and break down all the sons of tumult.24:18 And Edom shall be a possession, Seir also shall be a possession, those who were his enemies; While Israel does valiantly.24:19 And out of Jacob someone shall have dominion, and shall destroy the remnant from the city.24:20 And he looked on Amalek, and took up his parable, and said, amalek was the first of the nations; But his latter end shall come to destruction.24:21 And he looked on the Kenite, and took up his parable, and said, Strong is your dwelling-place, and your nest is set in the rock.24:22 Nevertheless Kain shall be wasted, Until Asshur shall carry you away a captive.24:23 And he took up his parable, and said, alas, who shall live when God does this?24:24 But ships shall come from the coast of Kittim, and they shall afflict Asshur, and shall afflict Eber; And he also shall come to destruction.24:25 And Balaam rose up, and went and returned to his place; and Balak also went his way.Chapter 2525:1 And Israel abode in Shittim; and the people began to play the harlot with the daughters of Moab:25:2 for they called the people to the sacrifices of their gods; and the people did eat, and bowed down to their gods.25:3 And Israel joined himself to Baal-peor: and the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Israel.25:4 And Yahweh said to Moses, Take all the chiefs of the people, and hang them up to Yahweh before the sun, that the fierce anger of Yahweh may turn away from Israel.25:5 And Moses said to the judges of Israel, Slay ye every one his men that have joined themselves to Baal-peor.25:6 And, behold, one of the children of Israel came and brought to his brethren a Midianite woman in the sight of Moses, and in the sight of all the congregation of the children of Israel, while they were weeping at the door of the tent of meeting.25:7 And when Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the priest, saw it, he rose up from the midst of the congregation, and took a spear in his hand;25:8 and he went after the man of Israel into the pavilion, and thrust both of them through, the man of Israel, and the woman through her body.  So the plague was stayed from the children of Israel.25:9 And those that died by the plague were 24,000.25:10 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,25:11 Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the priest, has turned my wrath away from the children of Israel, in that he was jealous with my jealousy among them, so that I consumed not the children of Israel in my jealousy.25:12 Wherefore say, Behold, I give to him my covenant of peace:25:13 and it shall be to him, and to his seed after him, the covenant of an everlasting priesthood; because he was jealous for his God, and made atonement for the children of Israel.25:14 Now the name of the man of Israel that was slain, who was slain with the Midianite woman, was Zimri, the son of Salu, a prince of a fathers' house among the Simeonites.25:15 And the name of the Midianite woman that was slain was Cozbi, the daughter of Zur; he was head of the people of a fathers' house in Midian.25:16 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,25:17 Harass the Midianites, and strike them down;25:18 for they harass you with their wiles, with which they have beguiled you in the matter of Peor, and in the matter of Cozbi, the daughter of the prince of Midian, their sister, who was slain on the day of the plague in the matter of Peor.Chapter 2626:1 And it came to pass after the plague, that Yahweh spoke to Moses and to Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest, saying,26:2 Take the sum of all the congregation of the children of Israel, from twenty years old and upward, by their fathers' houses, all that are able to go forth to war in Israel.26:3 And Moses and Eleazar the priest spoke with them in the plains of Moab by the Jordan at Jericho, saying,26:4 Take the sum of the people, from twenty years old and upward; as Yahweh commanded Moses and the children of Israel, that came forth out of the land of Egypt.26:5 Reuben, the first-born of Israel; the sons of Reuben: of Hanoch, the family of the Hanochites; of Pallu, the family of the Palluites;26:6 of Hezron, the family of the Hezronites; of Carmi, the family of the Carmites.26:7 These are the families of the Reubenites; and they that were numbered of them were 43,730.26:8 And the sons of Pallu: Eliab.26:9 And the sons of Eliab: Nemuel, and Dathan, and Abiram.  These are that Dathan and Abiram, who were called of the congregation, who strove against Moses and against Aaron in the company of Korah, when they strove against Yahweh,26:10 and the earth opened its mouth, and swallowed them up together with Korah, when that company died; what time the fire devoured 250 men, and they became a sign.26:11 Notwithstanding, the sons of Korah died not.26:12 The sons of Simeon after their families: of Nemuel, the family of the Nemuelites; of Jamin, the family of the Jaminites; of Jachin, the family of the Jachinites;26:13 of Zerah, the family of the Zerahites; of Shaul, the family of the Shaulites.26:14 These are the families of the Simeonites, 22,200.26:15 The sons of Gad after their families: of Zephon, the family of the Zephonites; of Haggi, the family of the Haggites; of Shuni, the family of the Shunites;26:16 of Ozni, the family of the Oznites; of Eri, the family of the Erites;26:17 of Arod, the family of the Arodites; of Areli, the family of the Arelites.26:18 These are the families of the sons of Gad according to those that were numbered of them, 40,500.26:19 The sons of Judah: Er and Onan; and Er and Onan died in the land of Canaan.26:20 And the sons of Judah after their families were: of Shelah, the family of the Shelanites; of Perez, the family of the Perezites; of Zerah, the family of the Zerahites.26:21 And the sons of Perez were: of Hezron, the family of the Hezronites; of Hamul, the family of the Hamulites.26:22 These are the families of Judah according to those that were numbered of them, 76,500.26:23 The sons of Issachar after their families: of Tola, the family of the Tolaites; of Puvah, the family of the Punites;26:24 of Jashub, the family of the Jashubites; of Shimron, the family of the Shimronites.26:25 These are the families of Issachar according to those that were numbered of them, 64,300.26:26 The sons of Zebulun after their families: of Sered, the family of the Seredites; of Elon, the family of the Elonites; of Jahleel, the family of the Jahleelites.26:27 These are the families of the Zebulunites according to those that were numbered of them, 60,500.26:28 The sons of Joseph after their families: Manasseh and Ephraim.26:29 The sons of Manasseh: of Machir, the family of the Machirites; and Machir begat Gilead; of Gilead, the family of the Gileadites.26:30 These are the sons of Gilead: of Iezer, the family of the Iezerites; of Helek, the family of the Helekites;26:31 and of Asriel, the family of the Asrielites; and of Shechem, the family of the Shechemites;26:32 and of Shemida, the family of the Shemidaites; and of Hepher, the family of the Hepherites.26:33 And Zelophehad the son of Hepher had no sons, but daughters: and the names of the daughters of Zelophehad were Mahlah, and Noah, Hoglah, Milcah, and Tirzah.26:34 These are the families of Manasseh; and they that were numbered of them were 52,700.26:35 These are the sons of Ephraim after their families: of Shuthelah, the family of the Shuthelahites; of Becher, the family of the Becherites; of Tahan, the family of the Tahanites.26:36 And these are the sons of Shuthelah: of Eran, the family of the Eranites.26:37 These are the families of the sons of Ephraim according to those that were numbered of them, 32,500.  These are the sons of Joseph after their families.26:38 The sons of Benjamin after their families: of Bela, the family of the Belaites; of Ashbel, the family of the Ashbelites; of Ahiram, the family of the Ahiramites;26:39 of Shephupham, the family of the Shuphamites; of Hupham, the family of the Huphamites.26:40 And the sons of Bela were Ard and Naaman: of Ard, the family of the Ardites; of Naaman, the family of the Naamites.26:41 These are the sons of Benjamin after their families; and they that were numbered of them were 45,600.26:42 These are the sons of Dan after their families: of Shuham, the family of the Shuhamites.  These are the families of Dan after their families.26:43 All the families of the Shuhamites, according to those that were numbered of them, were 64,400.26:44 The sons of Asher after their families: of Imnah, the family of the Imnites; of Ishvi, the family of the Ishvites; of Beriah, the family of the Berites.26:45 Of the sons of Beriah: of Heber, the family of the Heberites; of Malchiel, the family of the Malchielites.26:46 And the name of the daughter of Asher was Serah.26:47 These are the families of the sons of Asher according to those that were numbered of them, 53,400.26:48 The sons of Naphtali after their families: of Jahzeel, the family of the Jahzeelites; of Guni, the family of the Gunites;26:49 of Jezer, the family of the Jezerites; of Shillem, the family of the Shillemites.26:50 These are the families of Naphtali according to their families; and they that were numbered of them were 45,400.26:51 These are they that were numbered of the children of Israel, 601,730.26:52 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,26:53 To these the land shall be divided for an inheritance according to the number of names.26:54 To the more you shall give the more inheritance, and to the fewer you shall give the less inheritance: to every one according to those that were numbered of him shall his inheritance be given.26:55 Notwithstanding, the land shall be divided by lot: according to the names of the tribes of their fathers they shall inherit.26:56 According to the lot shall their inheritance be divided between the more and the fewer.26:57 And these are they that were numbered of the Levites after their families: of Gershon, the family of the Gershonites; of Kohath, the family of the Kohathites; of Merari, the family of the Merarites.26:58 These are the families of Levi: the family of the Libnites, the family of the Hebronites, the family of the Mahlites, the family of the Mushites, the family of the Korahites.  And Kohath begat Amram.26:59 And the name of Amram's wife was Jochebed, the daughter of Levi, who was born to Levi in Egypt: and she bore to Amram Aaron and Moses, and Miriam their sister.26:60 And to Aaron were born Nadab and Abihu, Eleazar and Ithamar.26:61 And Nadab and Abihu died, when they offered strange fire before Yahweh.26:62 And they that were numbered of them were 23,000, every male from a month old and upward: for they were not numbered among the children of Israel, because there was no inheritance given them among the children of Israel.26:63 These are they that were numbered by Moses and Eleazar the priest, who numbered the children of Israel in the plains of Moab by the Jordan at Jericho.26:64 But among these there was not a man of them that were numbered by Moses and Aaron the priest, who numbered the children of Israel in the wilderness of Sinai.26:65 For Yahweh had said of them, They shall surely die in the wilderness.  And there was not left a man of them, save Caleb the son of Jephunneh, and Joshua the son of Nun.Chapter 2727:1 Then drew near the daughters of Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, of the families of Manasseh the son of Joseph; and these are the names of his daughters: Mahlah, Noah, and Hoglah, and Milcah, and Tirzah.27:2 And they stood before Moses, and before Eleazar the priest, and before the princes and all the congregation, at the door of the tent of meeting, saying,27:3 Our father died in the wilderness, and he was not among the company of them that gathered themselves together against Yahweh in the company of Korah: but he died in his own sin; and he had no sons.27:4 Why should the name of our father be taken away from among his family, because he had no son?  Give to us a possession among the brethren of our father.27:5 And Moses brought their cause before Yahweh.27:6 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,27:7 The daughters of Zelophehad speak right: you shall surely give them a possession of an inheritance among their father's brethren; and you shall cause the inheritance of their father to pass to them.27:8 And you shall speak to the children of Israel, saying, If a man dies, and has no son, then ye shall cause his inheritance to pass to his daughter.27:9 And if he has no daughter, then ye shall give his inheritance to his brethren.27:10 And if he has no brethren, then ye shall give his inheritance to his father's brethren.27:11 And if his father has no brethren, then ye shall give his inheritance to his kinsman that is next to him of his family, and he shall possess it: and it shall be to the children of Israel a statute and ordinance, as Yahweh commanded Moses.27:12 And Yahweh said to Moses, Get you up into this mountain of Abarim, and behold the land which I have given to the children of Israel.27:13 And when you have seen it, you also shall be gathered to your people, as Aaron your brother was gathered;27:14 because ye rebelled against my word in the wilderness of Zin, in the strife of the congregation, to sanctify me at the waters before their eyes.  (These are the waters of Meribah of Kadesh in the wilderness of Zin.)27:15 And Moses spoke to Yahweh, saying,27:16 Let Yahweh, the God of the spirits of all flesh, appoint a man over the congregation,27:17 who may go out before them, and who may come in before them, and who may lead them out, and who may bring them in; that the congregation of Yahweh be not as sheep which have no shepherd.27:18 And Yahweh said to Moses, Take you Joshua the son of Nun, a man in whom is the Spirit, and lay your hand upon him;27:19 and set him before Eleazar the priest, and before all the congregation; and give him a charge in their sight.27:20 And you shall put of your honor upon him, that all the congregation of the children of Israel may obey.27:21 And he shall stand before Eleazar the priest, who shall inquire for him by the judgment of the Urim before Yahweh: at his word shall they go out, and at his word they shall come in, both he, and all the children of Israel with him, even all the congregation.27:22 And Moses did as Yahweh commanded him; and he took Joshua, and set him before Eleazar the priest, and before all the congregation:27:23 and he laid his hands upon him, and gave him a charge, as Yahweh spoke by Moses.Chapter 2828:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,28:2 Command the children of Israel, and say to them, My oblation, my food for my offerings made by fire, of a sweet savor to me, shall ye observe to offer to me in their due season.28:3 And you shall say to them, This is the offering made by fire which ye shall offer to Yahweh: he-lambs a year old without blemish, two day by day, for a continual burnt offering.28:4 The one lamb shall you offer in the morning, and the other lamb shall you offer at even;28:5 and the tenth part of an ephah of fine flour for a meal offering, mingled with the fourth part of a hin of beaten oil.28:6 It is a continual burnt offering, which was ordained in mount Sinai for a sweet savor, an offering made by fire to Yahweh.28:7 And the drink offering thereof shall be the fourth part of a hin for the one lamb: in the holy place shall you pour out a drink offering of strong drink to Yahweh.28:8 And the other lamb shall you offer at even: as the meal offering of the morning, and as the drink offering thereof, you shall offer it, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh.28:9 And on the sabbath day two he-lambs a year old without blemish, and two tenth parts of an ephah of fine flour for a meal offering, mingled with oil, and the drink offering thereof:28:10 this is the burnt offering of every sabbath, besides the continual burnt offering, and the drink offering thereof.28:11 And in the beginnings of your months ye shall offer a burnt offering to Yahweh: two young bullocks, and one ram, seven he-lambs a year old without blemish;28:12 and three tenth parts of an ephah of fine flour for a meal offering, mingled with oil, for each bullock; and two tenth parts of fine flour for a meal offering, mingled with oil, for the one ram;28:13 and a tenth part of fine flour mingled with oil for a meal offering to every lamb; for a burnt offering of a sweet savor, an offering made by fire to Yahweh.28:14 And their drink offerings shall be half a hin of wine for a bullock, and the third part of a hin for the ram, and the fourth part of a hin for a lamb: this is the burnt offering of every month throughout the months of the year.28:15 And one he-goat for a sin offering to Yahweh; it shall be offered besides the continual burnt offering, and the drink offering thereof.28:16 And in the first month, on the fourteenth day of the month, is Yahweh's passover.28:17 And on the fifteenth day of this month shall be a feast: seven days shall unleavened bread be eaten.28:18 In the first day shall be a holy convocation: ye shall do no servile work;28:19 but ye shall offer an offering made by fire, a burnt offering to Yahweh: two young bullocks, and one ram, and seven he-lambs a year old; they shall be to you without blemish;28:20 and their meal offering, fine flour mingled with oil: three tenth parts shall ye offer for a bullock, and two tenth parts for the ram;28:21 a tenth part shall you offer for every lamb of the seven lambs;28:22 and one he-goat for a sin offering, to make atonement for you.28:23 You shall offer these besides the burnt offering of the morning, which is for a continual burnt offering.28:24 After this manner ye shall offer daily, for seven days, the food of the offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh: it shall be offered besides the continual burnt offering, and the drink offering thereof.28:25 And on the seventh day ye shall have a holy convocation: ye shall do no servile work.28:26 Also in the day of the first-fruits, when ye offer a new meal offering to Yahweh in your feast of weeks, ye shall have a holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work;28:27 but ye shall offer a burnt offering for a sweet savor to Yahweh: two young bullocks, one ram, seven he-lambs a year old;28:28 and their meal offering, fine flour mingled with oil, three tenth parts for each bullock, two tenth parts for the one ram,28:29 a tenth part for every lamb of the seven lambs;28:30 one he-goat, to make atonement for you.28:31 Besides the continual burnt offering, and the meal offering thereof, ye shall offer them (they shall be to you without blemish), and their drink offerings.Chapter 2929:1 And in the seventh month, on the first day of the month, ye shall have a holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work: it is a day of blowing of trumpets to you.29:2 And ye shall offer a burnt offering for a sweet savor to Yahweh: one young bullock, one ram, seven he-lambs a year old without blemish;29:3 and their meal offering, fine flour mingled with oil, three tenth parts for the bullock, two tenth parts for the ram,29:4 and one tenth part for every lamb of the seven lambs;29:5 and one he-goat for a sin offering, to make atonement for you;29:6 besides the burnt offering of the new moon, and the meal offering thereof, and the continual burnt offering and the meal offering thereof, and their drink offerings, according to their ordinance, for a sweet savor, an offering made by fire to Yahweh.29:7 And on the tenth day of this seventh month ye shall have a holy convocation; and ye shall afflict your souls: ye shall do no manner of work;29:8 but ye shall offer a burnt offering to Yahweh for a sweet savor: one young bullock, one ram, seven he-lambs a year old; they shall be to you without blemish;29:9 and their meal offering, fine flour mingled with oil, three tenth parts for the bullock, two tenth parts for the one ram,29:10 a tenth part for every lamb of the seven lambs:29:11 one he-goat for a sin offering; besides the sin offering of atonement, and the continual burnt offering, and the meal offering thereof, and their drink offerings.29:12 And on the fifteenth day of the seventh month ye shall have a holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work, and ye shall keep a feast to Yahweh seven days:29:13 and ye shall offer a burnt offering, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh; thirteen young bullocks, two rams, fourteen he-lambs a year old; they shall be without blemish;29:14 and their meal offering, fine flour mingled with oil, three tenth parts for every bullock of the thirteen bullocks, two tenth parts for each ram of the two rams,29:15 and a tenth part for every lamb of the fourteen lambs;29:16 and one he-goat for a sin offering, besides the continual burnt offering, the meal offering thereof, and the drink offering thereof.29:17 And on the second day ye shall offer twelve young bullocks, two rams, fourteen he-lambs a year old without blemish;29:18 and their meal offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, according to their number, after the ordinance;29:19 and one he-goat for a sin offering; besides the continual burnt offering, and the meal offering thereof, and their drink offerings.29:20 And on the third day eleven bullocks, two rams, fourteen he-lambs a year old without blemish;29:21 and their meal offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, according to their number, after the ordinance;29:22 and one he-goat for a sin offering; besides the continual burnt offering, and the meal offering thereof, and the drink offering thereof.29:23 And on the fourth day ten bullocks, two rams, fourteen he-lambs a year old without blemish;29:24 their meal offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, according to their number, after the ordinance;29:25 and one he-goat for a sin offering; besides the continual burnt offering, the meal offering thereof, and the drink offering thereof.29:26 And on the fifth day nine bullocks, two rams, fourteen he-lambs a year old without blemish;29:27 and their meal offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, according to their number, after the ordinance;29:28 and one he-goat for a sin offering, besides the continual burnt offering, and the meal offering thereof, and the drink offering thereof.29:29 And on the sixth day eight bullocks, two rams, fourteen he-lambs a year old without blemish;29:30 and their meal offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, according to their number, after the ordinance;29:31 and one he-goat for a sin offering; besides the continual burnt offering, the meal offering thereof, and the drink offerings thereof.29:32 And on the seventh day seven bullocks, two rams, fourteen he-lambs a year old without blemish;29:33 and their meal offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, according to their number, after the ordinance;29:34 and one he-goat for a sin offering; besides the continual burnt offering, the meal offering thereof, and the drink offering thereof.29:35 On the eighth day ye shall have a solemn assembly: ye shall do no servile work;29:36 but ye shall offer a burnt offering, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savor to Yahweh: one bullock, one ram, seven he-lambs a year old without blemish;29:37 their meal offering and their drink offerings for the bullock, for the ram, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the ordinance:29:38 and one he-goat for a sin offering, besides the continual burnt offering, and the meal offering thereof, and the drink offering thereof.29:39 These ye shall offer to Yahweh in your set feasts, besides your vows, and your freewill-offerings, for your burnt offerings, and for your meal offerings, and for your drink offerings, and for your peace offerings.29:40 And Moses told the children of Israel according to all that Yahweh commanded Moses.Chapter 3030:1 And Moses spoke to the heads of the tribes of the children of Israel, saying, This is the thing which Yahweh has commanded.30:2 When a man vows a vow to Yahweh, or swears an oath to bind his soul with a bond, he shall not break his word; he shall do according to all that proceeds out of his mouth.30:3 Also when a woman vows a vow to Yahweh, and binds herself by a bond, being in her father's house, in her youth,30:4 and her father hears her vow, and her bond with which she has bound her soul, and her father holds his peace at her; then all her vows shall stand, and every bond with which she has bound her soul shall stand.30:5 But if her father disallow her in the day that he hears, none of her vows, or of her bonds with which she has bound her soul, shall stand: and Yahweh will forgive her, because her father disallowed her.30:6 And if she be married to a husband, while her vows are upon her, or the rash utterance of her lips, with which she has bound her soul,30:7 and her husband hear it, and hold his peace at her in the day that he hears it; then her vows shall stand, and her bonds with which she has bound her soul shall stand.30:8 But if her husband disallow her in the day that he hears it, then he shall make void her vow which is upon her, and the rash utterance of her lips, with which she has bound her soul: and Yahweh will forgive her.30:9 But the vow of a widow, or of her that is divorced, even everything with which she has bound her soul, shall stand against her.30:10 And if she vowed in her husband's house, or bound her soul by a bond with an oath,30:11 and her husband heard it, and held his peace at her, and disallowed her not; then all her vows shall stand, and every bond with which she bound her soul shall stand.30:12 But if her husband made them null and void in the day that he heard them, then whatsoever proceeded out of her lips concerning her vows, or concerning the bond of her soul, shall not stand: her husband has made them void; and Yahweh will forgive her.30:13 Every vow, and every binding oath to afflict the soul, her husband may establish it, or her husband may make it void.30:14 But if her husband altogether hold his peace at her from day to day, then he establishes all her vows, or all her bonds, which are upon her: he has established them, because he held his peace at her in the day that he heard them.30:15 But if he shall make them null and void after that he has heard them, then he shall bear her iniquity.30:16 These are the statutes, which Yahweh commanded Moses, between a man and his wife, between a father and his daughter, being in her youth, in her father's house.Chapter 3131:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,31:2 Avenge the children of Israel of the Midianites: afterward shall you be gathered to your people.31:3 And Moses spoke to the people, saying, arm ye men from among you for the war, that they may go against Midian, to execute Yahweh's vengeance on Midian.31:4 Of every tribe a thousand, throughout all the tribes of Israel, shall ye send to the war.31:5 So there were delivered, out of the thousands of Israel, a thousand of every tribe, twelve thousand armed for war.31:6 And Moses sent them, a thousand of every tribe, to the war, them and Phinehas the son of Eleazar the priest, to the war, with the vessels of the sanctuary and the trumpets for the alarm in his hand.31:7 And they warred against Midian, as Yahweh commanded Moses; and they slew every male.31:8 And they slew the kings of Midian with the rest of their slain: Evi, and Rekem, and Zur, and Hur, and Reba, the five kings of Midian: Balaam also the son of Beor they slew with the sword.31:9 And the children of Israel took captive the women of Midian and their little ones; and all their cattle, and all their flocks, and all their goods, they took for a prey.31:10 And all their cities in the places in which they dwelt, and all their encampments, they burnt with fire.31:11 And they took all the spoil, and all the prey, both of man and of beast.31:12 And they brought the captives, and the prey, and the spoil, to Moses, and to Eleazar the priest, and to the congregation of the children of Israel, to the camp at the plains of Moab, which are by the Jordan at Jericho.31:13 And Moses, and Eleazar the priest, and all the princes of the congregation, went forth to meet them without the camp.31:14 And Moses was angry with the officers of the host, the captains of thousands and the captains of hundreds, who came from the service of the war.31:15 And Moses said to them, Have ye saved all the women alive?31:16 Behold, these caused the children of Israel, through the counsel of Balaam, to commit trespass against Yahweh in the matter of Peor, and so the plague was among the congregation of Yahweh.31:17 Now therefore kill every male among the little ones, and kill every woman that has known man by lying with him.31:18 But all the women-children, that have not known man by lying with him, keep alive for yourselves.31:19 And encamp ye without the camp seven days: whosoever has killed any person, and whosoever has touched any slain, purify yourselves on the third day and on the seventh day, ye and your captives.31:20 And as to every garment, and all that is made of skin, and all work of goats' hair, and all things made of wood, ye shall purify yourselves.31:21 And Eleazar the priest said to the men of war that went to the battle, This is the statute of the law which Yahweh has commanded Moses:31:22 as for the gold, and the silver, the brass, the iron, the tin, and the lead,31:23 everything that may abide the fire, ye shall make to go through the fire, and it shall be clean; nevertheless it shall be purified with the water for impurity: and all that abides not the fire ye shall make to go through the water.31:24 And ye shall wash your clothes on the seventh day, and ye shall be clean; and afterward ye shall come into the camp.31:25 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,31:26 Take the sum of the prey that was taken, both of man and of beast, you, and Eleazar the priest, and the heads of the fathers' houses of the congregation;31:27 and divide the prey into two parts: between the men skilled in war, that went out to battle, and all the congregation.31:28 And levy a tribute to Yahweh of the men of war that went out to battle: one soul of five hundred, both of the persons, and of the oxen, and of the asses, and of the flocks:31:29 take it of their half, and give it to Eleazar the priest, for Yahweh's heave-offering.31:30 And of the children of Israel's half, you shall take one drawn out of every fifty, of the persons, of the oxen, of the asses, and of the flocks, even of all the cattle, and give them to the Levites, that keep the charge of the tabernacle of Yahweh.31:31 And Moses and Eleazar the priest did as Yahweh commanded Moses.31:32 Now the prey, over and above the booty which the men of war took, was 675,000 sheep,31:33 and 72,000 oxen,31:34 and 71,000 asses,31:35 and 32,000 persons in all, of the women that had not known man by lying with him.31:36 And the half, which was the portion of them that went out to war, was in number 337,500 sheep:31:37 and Yahweh's tribute of the sheep was 675.31:38 And the oxen were 36,000; of which Yahweh's tribute was 72.31:39 And the asses were 30,500; of which Yahweh's tribute was 61.31:40 And the persons were 16,000; of whom Yahweh's tribute was 32 persons.31:41 And Moses gave the tribute, which was Yahweh's heave-offering, to Eleazar the priest, as Yahweh commanded Moses.31:42 And of the children of Israel's half, which Moses divided off from the men that warred31:43 (now the congregation's half was 337,500 sheep,31:44 and 36,000 oxen,31:45 and 30,500 asses,31:46 and 16,000 persons),31:47 even of the children of Israel's half, Moses took one drawn out of every fifty, both of man and of beast, and gave them to the Levites, that kept the charge of the tabernacle of Yahweh; as Yahweh commanded Moses.31:48 And the officers that were over the thousands of the host, the captains of thousands, and the captains of hundreds, came near to Moses;31:49 and they said to Moses, Your servants have taken the sum of the men of war that are under our charge, and there lacks not one man of us.31:50 And we have brought Yahweh's oblation, what every man has gotten, of jewels of gold, ankle-chains, and bracelets, signet-rings, ear-rings, and armlets, to make atonement for our souls before Yahweh.31:51 And Moses and Eleazar the priest took the gold of them, even all wrought jewels.31:52 And all the gold of the heave-offering that they offered up to Yahweh, of the captains of thousands, and of the captains of hundreds, was 16,750 shekels.31:53 (For the men of war had taken booty, every man for himself.)31:54 And Moses and Eleazar the priest took the gold of the captains of thousands and of hundreds, and brought it into the tent of meeting, for a memorial for the children of Israel before Yahweh.Chapter 3232:1 Now the children of Reuben and the children of Gad had a very great multitude of cattle: and when they saw the land of Jazer, and the land of Gilead, that, behold, the place was a place for cattle;32:2 the children of Gad and the children of Reuben came and spoke to Moses, and to Eleazar the priest, and to the princes of the congregation, saying,32:3 Ataroth, and Dibon, and Jazer, and Nimrah, and Heshbon, and Elealeh, and Sebam, and Nebo, and Beon,32:4 the land which Yahweh smote before the congregation of Israel, is a land for cattle; and your servants have cattle.32:5 And they said, If we have found favor in your sight, let this land be given to your servants for a possession; bring us not over the Jordan.32:6 And Moses said to the children of Gad, and to the children of Reuben, Shall your brethren go to the war, and shall ye sit here?32:7 And why discourage ye the heart of the children of Israel from going over into the land which Yahweh has given them?32:8 Thus did your fathers, when I sent them from Kadesh-barnea to see the land.32:9 For when they went up to the valley of Eshcol, and saw the land, they discouraged the heart of the children of Israel, that they should not go into the land which Yahweh had given them.32:10 And Yahweh's anger was kindled in that day, and he swore, saying,32:11 Surely none of the men that came up out of Egypt, from twenty years old and upward, shall see the land which I swore to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob; because they have not wholly followed me:32:12 save Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenizzite, and Joshua the son of Nun; because they have wholly followed Yahweh.32:13 And Yahweh's anger was kindled against Israel, and he made them wander to and fro in the wilderness forty years, until all the generation, that had done evil in the sight of Yahweh, was consumed.32:14 And, behold, ye are risen up in your fathers' stead, an increase of sinful men, to augment yet the fierce anger of Yahweh toward Israel.32:15 For if ye turn away from after him, he will yet again leave them in the wilderness; and ye will destroy all this people.32:16 And they came near to him, and said, We will build sheepfolds here for our cattle, and cities for our little ones:32:17 but we ourselves will be ready armed to go before the children of Israel, until we have brought them to their place: and our little ones shall dwell in the fortified cities because of the inhabitants of the land.32:18 We will not return to our houses, until the children of Israel have inherited every man his inheritance.32:19 For we will not inherit with them on the other side of the Jordan, and forward; because our inheritance is fallen to us on this side of the Jordan eastward.32:20 And Moses said to them, If ye will do this thing, if ye will arm yourselves to go before Yahweh to the war,32:21 and every armed man of you will pass over the Jordan before Yahweh, until he has driven out his enemies from before him,32:22 and the land is subdued before Yahweh; then afterward ye shall return, and be guiltless towards Yahweh, and towards Israel; and this land shall be to you for a possession before Yahweh.32:23 But if ye will not do so, behold, ye have sinned against Yahweh; and be sure your sin will find you out.32:24 Build you cities for your little ones, and folds for your sheep; and do that which has proceeded out of your mouth.32:25 And the children of Gad and the children of Reuben spoke to Moses, saying, Your servants will do as my lord commands.32:26 Our little ones, our wives, our flocks, and all our cattle, shall be there in the cities of Gilead;32:27 but your servants will pass over, every man that is armed for war, before Yahweh to battle, as my lord says.32:28 So Moses gave charge concerning them to Eleazar the priest, and to Joshua the son of Nun, and to the heads of the fathers' houses of the tribes of the children of Israel.32:29 And Moses said to them, If the children of Gad and the children of Reuben will pass with you over the Jordan, every man that is armed to battle, before Yahweh, and the land shall be subdued before you; then ye shall give them the land of Gilead for a possession:32:30 but if they will not pass over with you armed, they shall have possessions among you in the land of Canaan.32:31 And the children of Gad and the children of Reuben answered, saying, as Yahweh has said to your servants, so will we do.32:32 We will pass over armed before Yahweh into the land of Canaan, and the possession of our inheritance shall remain with us beyond the Jordan.32:33 And Moses gave to them, even to the children of Gad, and to the children of Reuben, and to the half-tribe of Manasseh the son of Joseph, the kingdom of Sihon king of the Amorites, and the kingdom of Og king of Bashan, the land, according to the cities thereof with their borders, even the cities of the land round about.32:34 And the children of Gad built Dibon, and Ataroth, and Aroer,32:35 and Atrothshophan, and Jazer, and Jogbehah,32:36 and Beth-nimrah, and Beth-haran: fortified cities, and folds for sheep.32:37 And the children of Reuben built Heshbon, and Elealeh, and Kiriathaim,32:38 and Nebo, and Baal-meon, (their names being changed,) and Sibmah: and they gave other names to the cities which they built.32:39 And the children of Machir the son of Manasseh went to Gilead, and took it, and dispossessed the Amorites that were therein.32:40 And Moses gave Gilead to Machir the son of Manasseh; and he dwelt therein.32:41 And Jair the son of Manasseh went and took the towns thereof, and called them Havvoth-jair.32:42 And Nobah went and took Kenath, and the villages thereof, and called it Nobah, after his own name.Chapter 3333:1 These are the journeys of the children of Israel, when they went forth out of the land of Egypt by their hosts under the hand of Moses and Aaron.33:2 And Moses wrote their goings out according to their journeys by the commandment of Yahweh: and these are their journeys according to their goings out.33:3 And they journeyed from Rameses in the first month, on the fifteenth day of the first month; on the morrow after the passover the children of Israel went out with a high hand in the sight of all the Egyptians,33:4 while the Egyptians were burying all their first-born, whom Yahweh had smitten among them: upon their gods also Yahweh executed judgments.33:5 And the children of Israel journeyed from Rameses, and encamped in Succoth.33:6 And they journeyed from Succoth, and encamped in Etham, which is in the edge of the wilderness.33:7 And they journeyed from Etham, and turned back to Pihahiroth, which is before Baal-zephon: and they encamped before Migdol.33:8 And they journeyed from before Hahiroth, and passed through the midst of the sea into the wilderness: and they went three days' journey in the wilderness of Etham, and encamped in Marah.33:9 And they journeyed from Marah, and came to Elim: and in Elim were twelve springs of water, and 70 palm-trees; and they encamped there.33:10 And they journeyed from Elim, and encamped by the Red Sea.33:11 And they journeyed from the Red Sea, and encamped in the wilderness of Sin.33:12 And they journeyed from the wilderness of Sin, and encamped in Dophkah.33:13 And they journeyed from Dophkah, and encamped in Alush.33:14 And they journeyed from Alush, and encamped in Rephidim, where was no water for the people to drink.33:15 And they journeyed from Rephidim, and encamped in the wilderness of Sinai.33:16 And they journeyed from the wilderness of Sinai, and encamped in Kibroth-hattaavah.33:17 And they journeyed from Kibroth-hattaavah, and encamped in Hazeroth.33:18 And they journeyed from Hazeroth, and encamped in Rithmah.33:19 And they journeyed from Rithmah, and encamped in Rimmon-perez.33:20 And they journeyed from Rimmon-perez, and encamped in Libnah.33:21 And they journeyed from Libnah, and encamped in Rissah.33:22 And they journeyed from Rissah, and encamped in Kehelathah.33:23 And they journeyed from Kehelathah, and encamped in mount Shepher.33:24 And they journeyed from mount Shepher, and encamped in Haradah.33:25 And they journeyed from Haradah, and encamped in Makheloth.33:26 And they journeyed from Makheloth, and encamped in Tahath.33:27 And they journeyed from Tahath, and encamped in Terah.33:28 And they journeyed from Terah, and encamped in Mithkah.33:29 And they journeyed from Mithkah, and encamped in Hashmonah.33:30 And they journeyed from Hashmonah, and encamped in Moseroth.33:31 And they journeyed from Moseroth, and encamped in Bene-jaakan.33:32 And they journeyed from Bene-jaakan, and encamped in Hor-haggidgad.33:33 And they journeyed from Hor-haggidgad, and encamped in Jotbathah.33:34 And they journeyed from Jotbathah, and encamped in Abronah.33:35 And they journeyed from Abronah, and encamped in Ezion-geber.33:36 And they journeyed from Ezion-geber, and encamped in the wilderness of Zin (the same is Kadesh).33:37 And they journeyed from Kadesh, and encamped in mount Hor, in the edge of the land of Edom.33:38 And Aaron the priest went up into mount Hor at the commandment of Yahweh, and died there, in the fortieth year after the children of Israel were come out of the land of Egypt, in the fifth month, on the first day of the month.33:39 And Aaron was a hundred and twenty and three years old when he died in mount Hor.33:40 And the Canaanite, the king of Arad, who dwelt in the South in the land of Canaan, heard of the coming of the children of Israel.33:41 And they journeyed from mount Hor, and encamped in Zalmonah.33:42 And they journeyed from Zalmonah, and encamped in Punon.33:43 And they journeyed from Punon, and encamped in Oboth.33:44 And they journeyed from Oboth, and encamped in Iye-abarim, in the border of Moab.33:45 And they journeyed from Iyim, and encamped in Dibon-gad.33:46 And they journeyed from Dibon-gad, and encamped in Almon-diblathaim.33:47 And they journeyed from Almon-diblathaim, and encamped in the mountains of Abarim, before Nebo.33:48 And they journeyed from the mountains of Abarim, and encamped in the plains of Moab by the Jordan at Jericho.33:49 And they encamped by the Jordan, from Beth-jeshimoth even to Abel-shittim in the plains of Moab.33:50 And Yahweh spoke to Moses in the plains of Moab by the Jordan at Jericho, saying,33:51 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When ye pass over the Jordan into the land of Canaan,33:52 then ye shall drive out all the inhabitants of the land from before you, and destroy all their figured stones, and destroy all their molten images, and demolish all their high places:33:53 and ye shall take possession of the land, and dwell therein; for to you have I given the land to possess it.33:54 And ye shall inherit the land by lot according to your families; to the more ye shall give the more inheritance, and to the fewer you shall give the less inheritance: wheresoever the lot falls to any man, that shall be his; according to the tribes of your fathers shall ye inherit.33:55 But if ye will not drive out the inhabitants of the land from before you, then shall those that ye let remain of them be as pricks in your eyes, and as thorns in your sides, and they shall vex you in the land in which ye dwell.33:56 And it shall come to pass, that, as I thought to do to them, so will I do to you.Chapter 3434:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,34:2 Command the children of Israel, and say to them, When ye come into the land of Canaan (this is the land that shall fall to you for an inheritance, even the land of Canaan according to the borders thereof),34:3 then your south quarter shall be from the wilderness of Zin along by the side of Edom, and your south border shall be from the end of the Salt Sea eastward;34:4 and your border shall turn about southward of the ascent of Akrabbim, and pass along to Zin; and the goings out thereof shall be southward of Kadesh-barnea; and it shall go forth to Hazar-addar, and pass along to Azmon;34:5 and the border shall turn about from Azmon to the brook of Egypt, and the goings out thereof shall be at the sea.34:6 And for the western border, ye shall have the great sea and the border thereof: this shall be your west border.34:7 And this shall be your north border: from the great sea ye shall mark out for you mount Hor;34:8 from mount Hor ye shall mark out to the entrance of Hamath; and the goings out of the border shall be at Zedad;34:9 and the border shall go forth to Ziphron, and the goings out thereof shall be at Hazar-enan: this shall be your north border.34:10 And ye shall mark out your east border from Hazar-enan to Shepham;34:11 and the border shall go down from Shepham to Riblah, on the east side of Ain; and the border shall go down, and shall reach to the side of the sea of Chinnereth eastward;34:12 and the border shall go down to the Jordan, and the goings out thereof shall be at the Salt Sea.  This shall be your land according to the borders thereof round about.34:13 And Moses commanded the children of Israel, saying, This is the land which ye shall inherit by lot, which Yahweh has commanded to give to the nine tribes, and to the half-tribe;34:14 for the tribe of the children of Reuben according to their fathers' houses, and the tribe of the children of Gad according to their fathers' houses, have received, and the half-tribe of Manasseh have received, their inheritance:34:15 the two tribes and the half-tribe have received their inheritance beyond the Jordan at Jericho eastward, toward the sunrising.34:16 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,34:17 These are the names of the men that shall divide the land to you for inheritance: Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun.34:18 And ye shall take one prince of every tribe, to divide the land for inheritance.34:19 And these are the names of the men: Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb the son of Jephunneh.34:20 And of the tribe of the children of Simeon, Shemuel the son of Ammihud.34:21 Of the tribe of Benjamin, Elidad the son of Chislon.34:22 And of the tribe of the children of Dan a prince, Bukki the son of Jogli.34:23 Of the children of Joseph: of the tribe of the children of Manasseh a prince, Hanniel the son of Ephod.34:24 And of the tribe of the children of Ephraim a prince, Kemuel the son of Shiphtan.34:25 And of the tribe of the children of Zebulun a prince, Elizaphan the son of Parnach.34:26 And of the tribe of the children of Issachar a prince, Paltiel the son of Azzan.34:27 And of the tribe of the children of Asher a prince, ahihud the son of Shelomi.34:28 And of the tribe of the children of Naphtali a prince, Pedahel the son of Ammihud.34:29 These are they whom Yahweh commanded to divide the inheritance to the children of Israel in the land of Canaan.Chapter 3535:1 And Yahweh spoke to Moses in the plains of Moab by the Jordan at Jericho, saying,35:2 Command the children of Israel, that they give to the Levites of the inheritance of their possession cities to dwell in; and suburbs for the cities round about them shall ye give to the Levites.35:3 And the cities shall they have to dwell in; and their suburbs shall be for their cattle, and for their substance, and for all their beasts.35:4 And the suburbs of the cities, which ye shall give to the Levites, shall be from the wall of the city and outward a thousand cubits round about.35:5 And ye shall measure without the city for the east side two thousand cubits, and for the south side two thousand cubits, and for the west side two thousand cubits, and for the north side two thousand cubits, the city being in the midst.  This shall be to them the suburbs of the cities.35:6 And the cities which ye shall give to the Levites, they shall be the six cities of refuge, which ye shall give for the manslayer to flee to: and besides them ye shall give forty-two cities.35:7 All the cities which ye shall give to the Levites shall be forty-eight cities; them shall ye give with their suburbs.35:8 And concerning the cities which ye shall give of the possession of the children of Israel, from the many ye shall take many; and from the few ye shall take few: every one according to his inheritance which he inherits shall give of his cities to the Levites.35:9 And Yahweh spoke to Moses, saying,35:10 Speak to the children of Israel, and say to them, When ye pass over the Jordan into the land of Canaan,35:11 then ye shall appoint you cities to be cities of refuge for you, that the manslayer that kills any person unwittingly may flee there.35:12 And the cities shall be to you for refuge from the avenger, that the manslayer die not, until he stand before the congregation for judgment.35:13 And the cities which ye shall give shall be for you six cities of refuge.35:14 You shall give three cities beyond the Jordan, and three cities shall ye give in the land of Canaan; they shall be cities of refuge.35:15 For the children of Israel, and for the stranger and for the sojourner among them, shall these six cities be for refuge; that every one that kills any person unwittingly may flee there.35:16 But if he smote him with an instrument of iron, so that he died, he is a murderer: the murderer shall surely be put to death.35:17 And if he smote him with a stone in the hand, whereby a man may die, and he died, he is a murderer: the murderer shall surely be put to death.35:18 Or if he smote him with a weapon of wood in the hand, whereby a man may die, and he died, he is a murderer: the murderer shall surely be put to death.35:19 The avenger of blood shall himself put the murderer to death: when he meets him, he shall put him to death.35:20 And if he thrust him out of hatred, or hurled at him, lying in wait, such that he died,35:21 or in enmity struck him with his hand, such that he died; he that struck him shall surely be put to death; he is a murderer: the avenger of blood shall put the murderer to death, when he meets him.35:22 But if he thrust him suddenly without enmity, or hurled upon him anything without lying in wait,35:23 or with any stone, whereby a man may die, without seeing him, and cast it upon him, such that he died, and he was not his enemy, neither sought his harm;35:24 then the congregation shall judge between the striker and the avenger of blood according to these ordinances;35:25 and the congregation shall deliver the manslayer out of the hand of the avenger of blood, and the congregation shall restore him to his city of refuge, whither he was fled: and he shall dwell therein until the death of the high priest, who was anointed with the holy oil.35:26 But if the manslayer shall at any time go beyond the border of his city of refuge, whither he flees,35:27 and the avenger of blood find him without the border of his city of refuge, and the avenger of blood slay the manslayer; he shall not be guilty of blood,35:28 because he should have remained in his city of refuge until the death of the high priest: but after the death of the high priest the manslayer shall return into the land of his possession.35:29 And these things shall be for a statute and ordinance to you throughout your generations in all your dwellings.35:30 Whoso kills any person, the murderer shall be slain at the mouth of witnesses: but one witness shall not testify against any person that he die.35:31 Moreover ye shall take no ransom for the life of a murderer, that is guilty of death; but he shall surely be put to death.35:32 And ye shall take no ransom for him that is fled to his city of refuge, that he may come again to dwell in the land, until the death of the priest.35:33 So ye shall not pollute the land in which ye are: for blood, it pollutes the land; and no expiation can be made for the land for the blood that is shed therein, but by the blood of him that shed it.35:34 And you shall not defile the land which ye inhabit, in the midst of which I dwell: for I, Yahweh, dwell in the midst of the children of Israel.Chapter 3636:1 And the heads of the fathers' houses of the family of the children of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, of the families of the sons of Joseph, came near, and spoke before Moses, and before the princes, the heads of the fathers' houses of the children of Israel:36:2 and they said, Yahweh commanded my lord to give the land for inheritance by lot to the children of Israel: and my lord was commanded by Yahweh to give the inheritance of Zelophehad our brother to his daughters.36:3 And if they be married to any of the sons of the other tribes of the children of Israel, then will their inheritance be taken away from the inheritance of our fathers, and will be added to the inheritance of the tribe whereto they shall belong: so will it be taken away from the lot of our inheritance.36:4 And when the jubilee of the children of Israel shall be, then will their inheritance be added to the inheritance of the tribe whereto they shall belong: so will their inheritance be taken away from the inheritance of the tribe of our fathers.36:5 And Moses commanded the children of Israel according to the word of Yahweh, saying, The tribe of the sons of Joseph speaks right.36:6 This is the thing which Yahweh commands concerning the daughters of Zelophehad, saying, Let them be married to whom they think best; only into the family of the tribe of their father shall they be married.36:7 So shall no inheritance of the children of Israel remove from tribe to tribe; for the children of Israel shall cleave every one to the inheritance of the tribe of his fathers.36:8 And every daughter, that possesses an inheritance in any tribe of the children of Israel, shall be wife to one of the family of the tribe of her father, that the children of Israel may possess every man the inheritance of his fathers.36:9 So shall no inheritance remove from one tribe to another tribe; for the tribes of the children of Israel shall cleave every one to his own inheritance.36:10 Even as Yahweh commanded Moses, so did the daughters of Zelophehad:36:11 for Mahlah, Tirzah, and Hoglah, and Milcah, and Noah, the daughters of Zelophehad, were married to their father's brothers' sons.36:12 They were married into the families of the sons of Manasseh the son of Joseph; and their inheritance remained in the tribe of the family of their father.36:13 These are the commandments and the ordinances which Yahweh commanded by Moses to the children of Israel in the plains of Moab by the Jordan at Jericho.End of NumbersDeuteronomyChapter 11:1 These are the words which Moses spoke to all Israel beyond the Jordan in the wilderness, in the Arabah over against Suph, between Paran, and Tophel, and Laban, and Hazeroth, and Di-zahab.1:2 It is eleven days' journey from Horeb by the way of mount Seir to Kadesh-barnea.1:3 And it came to pass in the fortieth year, in the eleventh month, on the first day of the month, that Moses spoke to the children of Israel, according to all that Yahweh had given him in commandment to them;1:4 after he had smitten Sihon the king of the Amorites, who dwelt in Heshbon, and Og the king of Bashan, who dwelt in Ashtaroth, at Edrei.1:5 Beyond the Jordan, in the land of Moab, began Moses to declare this law, saying,1:6 Yahweh our God spoke to us in Horeb, saying, You have dwelt long enough in this mountain:1:7 turn you, and take your journey, and go to the hill-country of the Amorites, and to all the places neighboring it, in the Arabah, in the hill-country, and in the lowland, and in the South, and by the sea-shore, the land of the Canaanites, and Lebanon, as far as the great river, the river Euphrates.1:8 Behold, I have set the land before you: go in and possess the land which Yahweh swore to your fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, to give to them and to their seed after them.1:9 And I spoke to you at that time, saying, I am not able to bear you myself alone:1:10 Yahweh your God has multiplied you, and, behold, ye are this day as the stars of heaven for multitude.1:11 Yahweh, the God of your fathers, make you a thousand times as many as ye are, and bless you, as he has promised you!1:12 How can I myself alone bear your cumbrance, and your burden, and your strife?1:13 Take you wise men, and understanding, and known, according to your tribes, and I will make them heads over you.1:14 And ye answered me, and said, The thing which you have spoken is good for us to do.1:15 So I took the heads of your tribes, wise men, and known, and made them heads over you, captains of thousands, and captains of hundreds, and captains of fifties, and captains of tens, and officers, according to your tribes.1:16 And I charged your judges at that time, saying, Hear the causes between your brethren, and judge righteously between a man and his brother, and the sojourner that is with him.1:17 You shall not respect persons in judgment; ye shall hear the small and the great alike; ye shall not be afraid of the face of man; for the judgment is God's: and the cause that is too hard for you ye shall bring to me, and I will hear it.1:18 And I commanded you at that time all the things which ye should do.1:19 And we journeyed from Horeb, and went through all that great and terrible wilderness which ye saw, by the way to the hill-country of the Amorites, as Yahweh our God commanded us; and we came to Kadesh-barnea.1:20 And I said to you, You are come to the hill-country of the Amorites, which Yahweh our God gives to us.1:21 Behold, Yahweh your God has set the land before you: go up, take possession, as Yahweh, the God of your fathers, has spoken to you; fear not, neither be dismayed.1:22 And ye came near to me every one of you, and said, Let us send men before us, that they may search the land for us, and bring us word again of the way by which we must go up, and the cities to which we shall come.1:23 And the thing pleased me well; and I took twelve men of you, one man for every tribe:1:24 and they turned and went up into the hill-country, and came to the valley of Eshcol, and spied it out.1:25 And they took of the fruit of the land in their hands, and brought it down to us, and brought us word again, and said, It is a good land which Yahweh our God gives to us.1:26 Yet ye would not go up, but rebelled against the commandment of Yahweh your God:1:27 and ye murmured in your tents, and said, Because Yahweh hated us, he has brought us forth out of the land of Egypt, to deliver us into the hand of the Amorites, to destroy us.1:28 Whither are we going up?  our brethren have made our heart to melt, saying, The people are greater and taller than we; the cities are great and fortified up to heaven; and moreover we have seen the sons of the Anakim there.1:29 Then I said to you, Dread not, neither be afraid of them.1:30 Yahweh your God who goes before you, he will fight for you, according to all that he did for you in Egypt before your eyes,1:31 and in the wilderness, where you have seen how that Yahweh your God bore you, as a man bears his son, in all the way that ye went, until ye came to this place.1:32 Yet in this thing ye did not believe Yahweh your God,1:33 who went before you in the way, to seek you out a place to pitch your tents in, in fire by night, to show you by what way ye should go, and in the cloud by day.1:34 And Yahweh heard the voice of your words, and was angry, and swore, saying,1:35 Surely there shall not one of these men of this evil generation see the good land, which I swore to give to your fathers,1:36 save Caleb the son of Jephunneh: he shall see it; and to him will I give the land that he has trodden upon, and to his children, because he has wholly followed Yahweh.1:37 Also Yahweh was angry with me for your sakes, saying, You also shall not go in there:1:38 Joshua the son of Nun, who stands before you, he shall go in there: encourage you him; for he shall cause Israel to inherit it.1:39 Moreover your little ones, that ye said should be a prey, and your children, that this day have no knowledge of good or evil, they shall go in there, and to them will I give it, and they shall possess it.1:40 But as for you, turn you, and take your journey into the wilderness by the way to the Red Sea.1:41 Then ye answered and said to me, We have sinned against Yahweh, we will go up and fight, according to all that Yahweh our God commanded us.  And ye girded on every man his weapons of war, and were forward to go up into the hill-country.1:42 And Yahweh said to me, Say to them, Go not up, neither fight; for I am not among you; lest ye be smitten before your enemies.1:43 So I spoke to you, and ye hearkened not; but ye rebelled against the commandment of Yahweh, and were presumptuous, and went up into the hill-country.1:44 And the Amorites, that dwelt in that hill-country, came out against you, and chased you, as bees do, and beat you down in Seir, even to Hormah.1:45 And ye returned and wept before Yahweh; but Yahweh hearkened not to your voice, nor gave ear to you.1:46 So ye abode in Kadesh many days, according to the days that ye abode there.Chapter 22:1 Then we turned, and took our journey into the wilderness by the way to the Red Sea, as Yahweh spoke to me; and we circled mount Seir many days.2:2 And Yahweh spoke to me, saying,2:3 You have circled this mountain long enough: turn you northward.2:4 And command you the people, saying, You are to pass through the border of your brethren the children of Esau, that dwell in Seir; and they will be afraid of you: take ye good heed to yourselves therefore;2:5 contend not with them; for I will not give you of their land, no, not so much as for the sole of the foot to tread on; because I have given mount Seir to Esau for a possession.2:6 You shall purchase food of them for money, that ye may eat; and ye shall also buy water of them for money, that ye may drink.2:7 For Yahweh your God has blessed you in all the work of your hand; he has known your walking through this great wilderness: these forty years Yahweh your God has been with you; you have lacked nothing.2:8 So we passed by from our brethren the children of Esau, that dwell in Seir, from the way of the Arabah from Elath and from Ezion-geber.  And we turned and passed by the way of the wilderness of Moab.2:9 And Yahweh said to me, Vex not Moab, neither contend with them in battle; for I will not give you of his land for a possession; because I have given Ar to the children of Lot for a possession.2:10 (The Emim dwelt therein aforetime, a people great, and many, and tall, as the Anakim:2:11 these also are accounted Rephaim, as the Anakim; but the Moabites call them Emim.2:12 The Horites also dwelt in Seir aforetime, but the children of Esau succeeded them; and they destroyed them from before them, and dwelt in their stead; as Israel did to the land of his possession, which Yahweh gave to them.)2:13 Now rise up, and go over the brook Zered.  And we went over the brook Zered.2:14 And the days in which we came from Kadesh-barnea, until we were come over the brook Zered, were thirty and eight years; until all the generation of the men of war were consumed from the midst of the camp, as Yahweh swore to them.2:15 Moreover the hand of Yahweh was against them, to destroy them from the midst of the camp, until they were consumed.2:16 So it came to pass, when all the men of war were consumed and dead from among the people,2:17 that Yahweh spoke to me, saying,2:18 You are this day to pass over Ar, the border of Moab:2:19 and when you come near over against the children of Ammon, vex them not, nor contend with them; for I will not give you of the land of the children of Ammon for a possession; because I have given it to the children of Lot for a possession.2:20 (That also is accounted a land of Rephaim: Rephaim dwelt therein aforetime; but the Ammonites call them Zamzummim,2:21 a people great, and many, and tall, as the Anakim; but Yahweh destroyed them before them; and they succeeded them, and dwelt in their stead;2:22 as he did for the children of Esau, that dwell in Seir, when he destroyed the Horites from before them; and they succeeded them, and dwelt in their stead even to this day:2:23 and the Avvim, that dwelt in villages as far as Gaza, the Caphtorim, that came forth out of Caphtor, destroyed them, and dwelt in their stead.)2:24 Rise ye up, take your journey, and pass over the valley of the Arnon: behold, I have given into your hand Sihon the Amorite, king of Heshbon, and his land; begin to possess it, and contend with him in battle.2:25 This day will I begin to put the dread of you and the fear of you upon the peoples that are under the whole heaven, who shall hear the report of you, and shall tremble, and be in anguish because of you.2:26 And I sent messengers out of the wilderness of Kedemoth to Sihon king of Heshbon with words of peace, saying,2:27 Let me pass through your land: I will go along by the highway, I will turn neither to the right hand nor to the left.2:28 You shall sell me food for money, that I may eat; and give me water for money, that I may drink: only let me pass through on my feet,2:29 as the children of Esau that dwell in Seir, and the Moabites that dwell in Ar, did to me; until I shall pass over the Jordan into the land which Yahweh our God gives us.2:30 But Sihon king of Heshbon would not let us pass by him; for Yahweh your God hardened his spirit, and made his heart obstinate, that he might deliver him into your hand, as at this day.2:31 And Yahweh said to me, Behold, I have begun to deliver up Sihon and his land before you: begin to possess, that you may inherit his land.2:32 Then Sihon came out against us, he and all his people, to battle at Jahaz.2:33 And Yahweh our God delivered him up before us; and we smote him, and his sons, and all his people.2:34 And we took all his cities at that time, and utterly destroyed every inhabited city, with the women and the little ones; we left none remaining:2:35 only the cattle we took for a prey to ourselves, with the spoil of the cities which we had taken.2:36 From Aroer, which is on the edge of the valley of the Arnon, and from the city that is in the valley, even to Gilead, there was not a city too high for us; Yahweh our God delivered up all before us:2:37 only to the land of the children of Ammon you came not near; all the side of the river Jabbok, and the cities of the hill-country, and wheresoever Yahweh our God forbade us.Chapter 33:1 Then we turned, and went up the way to Bashan: and Og the king of Bashan came out against us, he and all his people, to battle at Edrei.3:2 And Yahweh said to me, Fear him not; for I have delivered him, and all his people, and his land, into your hand; and you shall do to him as you did to Sihon king of the Amorites, who dwelt at Heshbon.3:3 So Yahweh our God delivered into our hand Og also, the king of Bashan, and all his people: and we smote him until none was left to him remaining.3:4 And we took all his cities at that time; there was not a city which we took not from them; 60 cities, all the region of Argob, the kingdom of Og in Bashan.3:5 All these were cities fortified with high walls, gates, and bars; besides the unwalled towns a great many.3:6 And we utterly destroyed them, as we did to Sihon king of Heshbon, utterly destroying every inhabited city, with the women and the little ones.3:7 But all the cattle, and the spoil of the cities, we took for a prey to ourselves.3:8 And we took the land at that time out of the hand of the two kings of the Amorites that were beyond the Jordan, from the valley of the Arnon to mount Hermon;3:9 (which Hermon the Sidonians call Sirion, and the Amorites call it Senir;)3:10 all the cities of the plain, and all Gilead, and all Bashan, to Salecah and Edrei, cities of the kingdom of Og in Bashan.3:11 (For only Og king of Bashan remained of the remnant of the Rephaim; behold, his bedstead was a bedstead of iron; is it not in Rabbah of the children of Ammon?  nine cubits was the length thereof, and four cubits the breadth of it, after the cubit of a man.)3:12 And this land we took in possession at that time: from Aroer, which is by the valley of the Arnon, and half the hill-country of Gilead, and the cities thereof, gave I to the Reubenites and to the Gadites:3:13 and the rest of Gilead, and all Bashan, the kingdom of Og, gave I to the half-tribe of Manasseh; all the region of Argob, even all Bashan.  (The same is called the land of Rephaim.3:14 Jair the son of Manasseh took all the region of Argob, to the border of the Geshurites and the Maacathites, and called them, even Bashan, after his own name, Havvoth-jair, to this day.)3:15 And I gave Gilead to Machir.3:16 And to the Reubenites and to the Gadites I gave from Gilead even to the valley of the Arnon, the middle of the valley, and the border of it, even to the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon;3:17 the Arabah also, and the Jordan and the border of it, from Chinnereth even to the sea of the Arabah, the Salt Sea, under the slopes of Pisgah eastward.3:18 And I commanded you at that time, saying, Yahweh your God has given you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over armed before your brethren the children of Israel, all the men of valor.3:19 But your wives, and your little ones, and your cattle, (I know that ye have much cattle,) shall abide in your cities which I have given you,3:20 until Yahweh give rest to your brethren, as to you, and they also possess the land which Yahweh your God gives them beyond the Jordan: then shall ye return every man to his possession, which I have given you.3:21 And I commanded Joshua at that time, saying, Your eyes have seen all that Yahweh your God has done to these two kings: so shall Yahweh do to all the kingdoms where you go over.3:22 You shall not fear them; for Yahweh your God, he it is that fights for you.3:23 And I besought Yahweh at that time, saying,3:24 O Lord Yahweh, you have begun to show your servant your greatness, and your strong hand: for what god is there in heaven or in earth, that can do according to your works, and according to your mighty acts?3:25 Let me go over, I pray you, and see the good land that is beyond the Jordan, that goodly mountain, and Lebanon.3:26 But Yahweh was angry with me for your sakes, and hearkened not to me; and Yahweh said to me, Let it suffice you; speak no more to me of this matter.3:27 Get you up to the top of Pisgah, and lift up your eyes westward, and northward, and southward, and eastward, and behold with your eyes: for you shall not go over this Jordan.3:28 But charge Joshua, and encourage him, and strengthen him; for he shall go over before this people, and he shall cause them to inherit the land which you shall see.3:29 So we abode in the valley over against Beth-peor.Chapter 44:1 And now, O Israel, hearken to the statutes and to the ordinances, which I teach you, to do them; that ye may live, and go in and possess the land which Yahweh, the God of your fathers, gives you.4:2 You shall not add to the word which I command you, neither shall ye diminish from it, that ye may keep the commandments of Yahweh your God which I command you.4:3 Your eyes have seen what Yahweh did because of Baal-peor; for all the men that followed Baal-peor, Yahweh your God has destroyed them from the midst of you.4:4 But ye that did cleave to Yahweh your God are alive every one of you this day.4:5 Behold, I have taught you statutes and ordinances, even as Yahweh my God commanded me, that ye should do so in the midst of the land whither ye go in to possess it.4:6 Keep therefore and do them; for this is your wisdom and your understanding in the sight of the peoples, that shall hear all these statutes, and say, Surely this great nation is a wise and understanding people.4:7 For what great nation is there, that has a god so near to them, as Yahweh our God is whensoever we call upon him?4:8 And what great nation is there, that has statutes and ordinances so righteous as all this law, which I set before you this day?4:9 Only take heed to yourself, and keep your soul diligently, lest you forget the things which your eyes saw, and lest they depart from your heart all the days of your life; but make them known to your children and your children's children;4:10 the day that you stood before Yahweh your God in Horeb, when Yahweh said to me, assemble me the people, and I will make them hear my words, that they may learn to fear me all the days that they live upon the earth, and that they may teach their children.4:11 And ye came near and stood under the mountain; and the mountain burned with fire to the heart of heaven, with darkness, cloud, and thick darkness.4:12 And Yahweh spoke to you out of the midst of the fire: ye heard the voice of words, but ye saw no form; only ye heard a voice.4:13 And he declared to you his covenant, which he commanded you to perform, even the ten commandments; and he wrote them upon two tables of stone.4:14 And Yahweh commanded me at that time to teach you statutes and ordinances, that ye might do them in the land whither ye go over to possess it.4:15 Take ye therefore good heed to yourselves; for ye saw no manner of form on the day that Yahweh spoke to you in Horeb out of the midst of the fire.4:16 Lest ye corrupt yourselves, and make you a graven image in the form of any figure, the likeness of male or female,4:17 the likeness of any beast that is on the earth, the likeness of any winged bird that flies in the heavens,4:18 the likeness of anything that creeps on the ground, the likeness of any fish that is in the water under the earth;4:19 and lest you lift up your eyes to heaven, and when you see the sun and the moon and the stars, even all the host of heaven, you be drawn away and worship them, and serve them, which Yahweh your God has allotted to all the peoples under the whole heaven.4:20 But Yahweh has taken you, and brought you forth out of the iron furnace, out of Egypt, to be to him a people of inheritance, as at this day.4:21 Furthermore Yahweh was angry with me for your sakes, and swore that I should not go over the Jordan, and that I should not go in to that good land, which Yahweh your God gives you for an inheritance:4:22 but I must die in this land, I must not go over the Jordan; but ye shall go over, and possess that good land.4:23 Take heed to yourselves, lest ye forget the covenant of Yahweh your God, which he made with you, and make you a graven image in the form of anything which Yahweh your God has forbidden you.4:24 For Yahweh your God is a devouring fire, a jealous God.4:25 When you shall beget children, and children's children, and ye shall have been long in the land, and shall corrupt yourselves, and make a graven image in the form of anything, and shall do that which is evil in the sight of Yahweh your God, to provoke him to anger;4:26 I call heaven and earth to witness against you this day, that ye shall soon utterly perish from off the land whereto ye go over the Jordan to possess it; ye shall not prolong your days upon it, but shall utterly be destroyed.4:27 And Yahweh will scatter you among the peoples, and ye shall be left few in number among the nations, whither Yahweh shall lead you away.4:28 And there ye shall serve gods, the work of men's hands, wood and stone, which neither see, nor hear, nor eat, nor smell.4:29 But from there ye shall seek Yahweh your God, and you shall find him, when you search after him with all your heart and with all your soul.4:30 When you are in tribulation, and all these things are come upon you, in the latter days you shall return to Yahweh your God, and hearken to his voice:4:31 for Yahweh your God is a merciful God; he will not fail you, neither destroy you, nor forget the covenant of your fathers which he swore to them.4:32 For ask now of the days that are past, which were before you, since the day that God created man upon the earth, and from the one end of heaven to the other, whether there has been any such thing as this great thing is, or has been heard like it?4:33 Did ever a people hear the voice of God speaking out of the midst of the fire, as you have heard, and live?4:34 Or has God assayed to go and take him a nation from the midst of another nation, by trials, by signs, and by wonders, and by war, and by a mighty hand, and by an outstretched arm, and by great terrors, according to all that Yahweh your God did for you in Egypt before your eyes?4:35 To you it was shown, that you might know that Yahweh he is God; there is none else besides him.4:36 Out of heaven he made you to hear his voice, that he might instruct you: and upon earth he made you to see his great fire; and you heard his words out of the midst of the fire.4:37 And because he loved your fathers, therefore he chose their seed after them, and brought you out with his presence, with his great power, out of Egypt;4:38 to drive out nations from before you greater and mightier than you, to bring you in, to give you their land for an inheritance, as at this day.4:39 Know therefore this day, and lay it to your heart, that Yahweh he is God in heaven above and upon the earth beneath; there is none else.4:40 And you shall keep his statutes, and his commandments, which I command you this day, that it may go well with you, and with your children after you, and that you may prolong your days in the land, which Yahweh your God gives you, for ever.4:41 Then Moses set apart three cities beyond the Jordan toward the sunrising;4:42 that the manslayer might flee there, that slays his neighbor unawares, and hated him not in time past; and that fleeing to one of these cities he might live:4:43 namely, Bezer in the wilderness, in the plain country, for the Reubenites; and Ramoth in Gilead, for the Gadites; and Golan in Bashan, for the Manassites.4:44 And this is the law which Moses set before the children of Israel:4:45 these are the testimonies, and the statutes, and the ordinances, which Moses spoke to the children of Israel, when they came forth out of Egypt,4:46 beyond the Jordan, in the valley over against Beth-peor, in the land of Sihon king of the Amorites, who dwelt at Heshbon, whom Moses and the children of Israel smote, when they came forth out of Egypt.4:47 And they took his land in possession, and the land of Og king of Bashan, the two kings of the Amorites, who were beyond the Jordan toward the sunrising;4:48 from Aroer, which is on the edge of the valley of the Arnon, even to mount Sion (the same is Hermon),4:49 and all the Arabah beyond the Jordan eastward, even to the sea of the Arabah, under the slopes of Pisgah.Chapter 55:1 And Moses called to all Israel, and said to them, Hear, O Israel, the statutes and the ordinances which I speak in your ears this day, that ye may learn them, and observe to do them.5:2 Yahweh our God made a covenant with us in Horeb.5:3 Yahweh made not this covenant with our fathers, but with us, even us, who are all of us here alive this day.5:4 Yahweh spoke with you face to face in the mount out of the midst of the fire,5:5 (I stood between Yahweh and you at that time, to show you the word of Yahweh: for ye were afraid because of the fire, and went not up into the mount;) saying,5:6 I am Yahweh your God, who brought you out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondage.5:7 You shall have no other gods before me.5:8 You shall not make to you a graven image, nor any likeness of anything that is in heaven above, or that is in the earth beneath, or that is in the water under the earth:5:9 you shall not bow down yourself to them, nor serve them; for I, Yahweh, your God, am a jealous God, visiting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children, and upon the third and upon the fourth generation of them that hate me;5:10 and showing lovingkindness to thousands of them that love me and keep my commandments.5:11 You shall not take the name of Yahweh your God in vain: for Yahweh will not hold him guiltless that takes his name in vain.5:12 Observe the sabbath day, to keep it holy, as Yahweh your God commanded you.5:13 Six days shall you labor, and do all your work;5:14 but the seventh day is a sabbath to Yahweh your God: during it you shall not do any work, you, nor your son, nor your daughter, nor your man-servant, nor your maid-servant, nor your ox, nor your donkey, nor any of your cattle, nor your stranger that is within your gates; that your man-servant and your maid-servant may rest as well as you.5:15 And you shall remember that you were a servant in the land of Egypt, and Yahweh your God brought you out there by a mighty hand and by an outstretched arm: therefore Yahweh your God commanded you to keep the sabbath day.5:16 Honor your father and your mother, as Yahweh your God commanded you; that your days may be long, and that it may go well with you, in the land which Yahweh your God gives you.5:17 You shall not murder.5:18 Neither shall you commit adultery.5:19 Neither shall you steal.5:20 Neither shall you bear false witness against your neighbor.5:21 Neither shall you covet your neighbor's wife; neither shall you desire your neighbor's house, his field, or his man-servant, or his maid-servant, his ox, or his donkey, or anything that is your neighbor's.5:22 These words Yahweh spoke to all your assembly in the mount out of the midst of the fire, of the cloud, and of the thick darkness, with a great voice: and he added no more.  And he wrote them upon two tables of stone, and gave them to me.5:23 And it came to pass, when ye heard the voice out of the midst of the darkness, while the mountain was burning with fire, that ye came near to me, even all the heads of your tribes, and your elders;5:24 and ye said, Behold, Yahweh our God has shown us his glory and his greatness, and we have heard his voice out of the midst of the fire: we have seen this day that God does speak with man, and he lives.5:25 Now therefore why should we die?  for this great fire will consume us: if we hear the voice of Yahweh our God any more, then we shall die.5:26 For who is there of all flesh, that has heard the voice of the living God speaking out of the midst of the fire, as we have, and lived?5:27 Go you near, and hear all that Yahweh our God shall say: and speak to us all that Yahweh our God shall speak to you; and we will hear it, and do it.5:28 And Yahweh heard the voice of your words, when ye spoke to me; and Yahweh said to me, I have heard the voice of the words of this people, which they have spoken to you: they have well said all that they have spoken.5:29 Oh that there were such a heart in them, that they would fear me, and keep all my commandments always, that it might be well with them, and with their children for ever!5:30 Go say to them, Return ye to your tents.5:31 But as for you, stand you here by me, and I will speak to you all the commandment, and the statutes, and the ordinances, which you shall teach them, that they may do them in the land which I give them to possess it.5:32 You shall observe to do therefore as Yahweh your God has commanded you: ye shall not turn aside to the right hand or to the left.5:33 You shall walk in all the way which Yahweh your God has commanded you, that ye may live, and that it may be well with you, and that ye may prolong your days in the land which ye shall possess.Chapter 66:1 Now this is the commandment, the statutes, and the ordinances, which Yahweh your God commanded to teach you, that ye might do them in the land whither ye go over to possess it;6:2 that you might fear Yahweh your God, to keep all his statutes and his commandments, which I command you, you, and your son, and your son's son, all the days of your life; and that your days may be prolonged.6:3 Hear therefore, O Israel, and observe to do it; that it may be well with you, and that ye may increase mightily, as Yahweh, the God of your fathers, has promised to you, in a land flowing with milk and honey.6:4 Hear, O Israel: Yahweh our God is one Yahweh:6:5 and you shall love Yahweh your God with all your heart, and with all your soul, and with all your might.6:6 And these words, which I command you this day, shall be upon your heart;6:7 and you shall teach them diligently to your children, and shall talk of them when you sit in your house, and when you walk by the way, and when you lie down, and when you rise up.6:8 And you shall bind them for a sign upon your hand, and they shall be for frontlets between your eyes.6:9 And you shall write them upon the door-posts of your house, and upon your gates.6:10 And it shall be, when Yahweh your God shall bring you into the land which he swore to your fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, to give you, great and goodly cities, which you build not,6:11 and houses full of all good things, which you filled not, and cisterns hewn out, which you hewed not, vineyards and olive-trees, which you planted not, and you shall eat and be full;6:12 then beware lest you forget Yahweh, who brought you forth out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondage.6:13 You shall fear Yahweh your God; and him shall you serve, and shall swear by his name.6:14 You shall not go after other gods, of the gods of the peoples that are round about you;6:15 for Yahweh your God in the midst of you is a jealous God; lest the anger of Yahweh your God be kindled against you, and he destroy you from off the face of the earth.6:16 You shall not tempt Yahweh your God, as ye tempted him in Massah.6:17 You shall diligently keep the commandments of Yahweh your God, and his testimonies, and his statutes, which he has commanded you.6:18 And you shall do that which is right and good in the sight of Yahweh; that it may be well with you, and that you may go in and possess the good land which Yahweh swore to your fathers,6:19 to thrust out all your enemies from before you, as Yahweh has spoken.6:20 When your son asks you in time to come, saying, What mean the testimonies, and the statutes, and the ordinances, which Yahweh our God has commanded you?6:21 then you shall say to your son, We were Pharaoh's bondmen in Egypt: and Yahweh brought us out of Egypt with a mighty hand;6:22 and Yahweh showed signs and wonders, great and sore, upon Egypt, upon Pharaoh, and upon all his house, before our eyes;6:23 and he brought us out from there, that he might bring us in, to give us the land which he swore to our fathers.6:24 And Yahweh commanded us to do all these statutes, to fear Yahweh our God, for our good always, that he might preserve us alive, as at this day.6:25 And it shall be righteousness to us, if we observe to do all this commandment before Yahweh our God, as he has commanded us.Chapter 77:1 When Yahweh your God shall bring you into the land where you are going to possess it, and shall cast out many nations before you, the Hittite, and the Girgashite, and the Amorite, and the Canaanite, and the Perizzite, and the Hivite, and the Jebusite, seven nations greater and mightier than you;7:2 and when Yahweh your God shall deliver them up before you, and you shall strike them down; then you shall utterly destroy them: you shall make no covenant with them, nor show mercy to them;7:3 neither shall you make marriages with them; your daughter you shall not give to his son, nor his daughter shall you take to your son.7:4 For he will turn away your son from following me, that they may serve other gods: so will the anger of Yahweh be kindled against you, and he will destroy you quickly.7:5 But thus shall ye deal with them: ye shall break down their altars, and dash in pieces their pillars, and hew down their Asherim, and burn their graven images with fire.7:6 For you are a holy people to Yahweh your God: Yahweh your God has chosen you to be a people for his own possession, above all peoples that are upon the face of the earth.7:7 Yahweh did not set his love upon you, nor choose you, because ye were more in number than any people; for ye were the fewest of all peoples:7:8 but because Yahweh loves you, and because he would keep the oath which he swore to your fathers, has Yahweh brought you out with a mighty hand, and redeemed you out of the house of bondage, from the hand of Pharaoh king of Egypt.7:9 Know therefore that Yahweh your God, he is God, the faithful God, who keeps covenant and lovingkindness with them that love him and keep his commandments to a thousand generations,7:10 and repays them that hate him to their face, to destroy them: he will not be slack to him that hates him, he will repay him to his face.7:11 You shall therefore keep the commandment, and the statutes, and the ordinances, which I command you this day, to do them.7:12 And it shall come to pass, because ye hearken to these ordinances, and keep and do them, that Yahweh your God will keep with you the covenant and the lovingkindness which he swore to your fathers:7:13 and he will love you, and bless you, and multiply you; he will also bless the fruit of your body and the fruit of your ground, your grain and your new wine and your oil, the increase of your cattle and the young of your flock, in the land which he swore to your fathers to give you.7:14 You shall be blessed above all peoples: there shall not be male or female barren among you, or among your cattle.7:15 And Yahweh will take away from you all sickness; and none of the evil diseases of Egypt, which you know, will he put upon you, but will lay them upon all them that hate you.7:16 And you shall consume all the peoples that Yahweh your God shall deliver to you; your eye shall not pity them: neither shall you serve their gods; for that will be a snare to you.7:17 If you shall say in your heart, These nations are more than I; how can I dispossess them?7:18 you shall not be afraid of them: you shall well remember what Yahweh your God did to Pharaoh, and to all Egypt;7:19 the great trials which your eyes saw, and the signs, and the wonders, and the mighty hand, and the outstretched arm, whereby Yahweh your God brought you out: so shall Yahweh your God do to all the peoples of whom you are afraid.7:20 Moreover Yahweh your God will send the hornet among them, until they that are left, and hide themselves, perish from before you.7:21 You shall not be affrighted at them; for Yahweh your God is in the midst of you, a great God and a terrible.7:22 And Yahweh your God will cast out those nations before you by little and little: you may not consume them at once, lest the beasts of the field increase upon you.7:23 But Yahweh your God will deliver them up before you, and will discomfit them with a great discomfiture, until they be destroyed.7:24 And he will deliver their kings into your hand, and you shall make their name to perish from under heaven: there shall no man be able to stand before you, until you have destroyed them.7:25 The graven images of their gods shall ye burn with fire: you shall not covet the silver or the gold that is on them, nor take it to you, lest you be snared therein; for it is an abomination to Yahweh your God.7:26 And you shall not bring an abomination into your house, and become a devoted thing like to it: you shall utterly detest it, and you shall utterly abhor it; for it is a devoted thing.Chapter 88:1 All the commandment which I command you this day shall ye observe to do, that ye may live, and multiply, and go in and possess the land which Yahweh swore to your fathers.8:2 And you shall remember all the way which Yahweh your God has led you these forty years in the wilderness, that he might humble you, to prove you, to know what was in your heart, whether you would keep his commandments, or not.8:3 And he humbled you, and allowed you to hunger, and fed you with manna, which you knew not, neither did your fathers know; that he might make you know that man does not live by bread only, but by everything that proceeds out of the mouth of Yahweh does man live.8:4 Your raiment became not old upon you, neither did your foot swell, these forty years.8:5 And you shall consider in your heart, that, as a man chastens his son, so Yahweh your God chastens you.8:6 And you shall keep the commandments of Yahweh your God, to walk in his ways, and to fear him.8:7 For Yahweh your God brings you into a good land, a land of brooks of water, of fountains and springs, flowing forth in valleys and hills;8:8 a land of wheat and barley, and vines and fig-trees and pomegranates; a land of olive-trees and honey;8:9 a land in which you shall eat bread without scarceness, you shall not lack anything in it; a land whose stones are iron, and out of whose hills you may dig copper.8:10 And you shall eat and be full, and you shall bless Yahweh your God for the good land which he has given you.8:11 Beware lest you forget Yahweh your God, in not keeping his commandments, and his ordinances, and his statutes, which I command you this day:8:12 lest, when you have eaten and are full, and have built goodly houses, and dwelt therein;8:13 and when your herds and your flocks multiply, and your silver and your gold is multiplied, and all that you have is multiplied;8:14 then your heart be lifted up, and you forget Yahweh your God, who brought you forth out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondage;8:15 who led you through the great and terrible wilderness, in which were fiery serpents and scorpions, and thirsty ground where was no water; who brought you forth water out of the rock of flint;8:16 who fed you in the wilderness with manna, which your fathers knew not; that he might humble you, and that he might prove you, to do you good at your latter end:8:17 and lest you say in your heart, My power and the might of my hand has gotten me this wealth.8:18 But you shall remember Yahweh your God, for it is he that gives you power to get wealth; that he may establish his covenant which he swore to your fathers, as at this day.8:19 And it shall be, if you shall forget Yahweh your God, and walk after other gods, and serve them, and worship them, I testify against you this day that ye shall surely perish.8:20 As the nations that Yahweh makes to perish before you, so shall ye perish; because ye would not hearken to the voice of Yahweh your God.Chapter 99:1 Hear, O Israel: you are to pass over the Jordan this day, to go in to dispossess nations greater and mightier than yourself, cities great and fortified up to heaven,9:2 a people great and tall, the sons of the Anakim, whom you know, and of whom you have heard say, Who can stand before the sons of Anak?9:3 Know therefore this day, that Yahweh your God is he who goes over before you as a devouring fire; he will destroy them, and he will bring them down before you: so shall you drive them out, and make them to perish quickly, as Yahweh has spoken to you.9:4 Speak not you in your heart, after that Yahweh your God has thrust them out from before you, saying, For my righteousness Yahweh has brought me in to possess this land; but rather it is for the wickedness of these nations that Yahweh drives them out from before you.9:5 Not for your righteousness, or for the uprightness of your heart, do you go in to possess their land; but for the wickedness of these nations Yahweh your God drives them out from before you, and that he may establish the word which Yahweh swore to your fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob.9:6 Know therefore, that Yahweh your God gives you not this good land to possess it for your righteousness; for you are a stiffnecked people.9:7 Remember, forget you not, how you provoked Yahweh your God to wrath in the wilderness: from the day that you went forth out of the land of Egypt, until ye came to this place, ye have been rebellious against Yahweh.9:8 Also in Horeb ye provoked Yahweh to wrath, and Yahweh was angry with you to destroy you.9:9 When I was gone up into the mount to receive the tables of stone, even the tables of the covenant which Yahweh made with you, then I abode in the mount forty days and forty nights; I did neither eat bread nor drink water.9:10 And Yahweh delivered to me the two tables of stone written with the finger of God; and on them was written according to all the words, which Yahweh speak with you in the mount out of the midst of the fire in the day of the assembly.9:11 And it came to pass at the end of forty days and forty nights, that Yahweh gave me the two tables of stone, even the tables of the covenant.9:12 And Yahweh said to me, arise, go down quickly from from here; for your people that you have brought forth out of Egypt have corrupted themselves; they are quickly turned aside out of the way which I commanded them; they have made them a molten image.9:13 Furthermore Yahweh spoke to me, saying, I have seen this people, and, behold, it is a stiffnecked people:9:14 let me alone, that I may destroy them, and blot out their name from under heaven; and I will make of you a nation mightier and greater than they.9:15 So I turned and came down from the mount, and the mount was burning with fire: and the two tables of the covenant were in my two hands.9:16 And I looked, and, behold, ye had sinned against Yahweh your God; ye had made you a molten calf: ye had turned aside quickly out of the way which Yahweh had commanded you.9:17 And I took hold of the two tables, and cast them out of my two hands, and broke them before your eyes.9:18 And I fell down before Yahweh, as at the first, forty days and forty nights; I did neither eat bread nor drink water; because of all your sin which ye sinned, in doing that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, to provoke him to anger.9:19 For I was afraid of the anger and hot displeasure, with which Yahweh was angry against you to destroy you.  But Yahweh hearkened to me that time also.9:20 And Yahweh was very angry with Aaron to destroy him: and I prayed for Aaron also at the same time.9:21 And I took your sin, the calf which ye had made, and burnt it with fire, and stamped it, grinding it very small, until it was as fine as dust: and I cast the dust thereof into the brook that descended out of the mount.9:22 And at Taberah, and at Massah, and at Kibroth-hattaavah, ye provoked Yahweh to wrath.9:23 And when Yahweh sent you from Kadesh-barnea, saying, Go up and possess the land which I have given you; then ye rebelled against the commandment of Yahweh your God, and ye believed him not, nor hearkened to his voice.9:24 You have been rebellious against Yahweh from the day that I knew you.9:25 So I fell down before Yahweh the forty days and forty nights that I fell down, because Yahweh had said he would destroy you.9:26 And I prayed to Yahweh, and said, O Lord Yahweh, destroy not your people and your inheritance, that you have redeemed through your greatness, that you have brought forth out of Egypt with a mighty hand.9:27 Remember your servants, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob; look not to the stubbornness of this people, nor to their wickedness, nor to their sin,9:28 lest the land from where you brought us out say, Because Yahweh was not able to bring them into the land which he promised to them, and because he hated them, he has brought them out to slay them in the wilderness.9:29 Yet they are your people and your inheritance, which you brought out by your great power and by your outstretched arm.Chapter 1010:1 At that time Yahweh said to me, Hew you two tables of stone like to the first, and come up to me into the mount, and make you an ark of wood.10:2 And I will write on the tables the words that were on the first tables which you broke, and you shall put them in the ark.10:3 So I made an ark of acacia wood, and hewed two tables of stone like to the first, and went up into the mount, having the two tables in my hand.10:4 And he wrote on the tables, according to the first writing, the ten commandments, which Yahweh spoke to you in the mount out of the midst of the fire in the day of the assembly: and Yahweh gave them to me.10:5 And I turned and came down from the mount, and put the tables in the ark which I had made; and there they are as Yahweh commanded me.10:6 (And the children of Israel journeyed from Beeroth Bene-jaakan to Moserah.  There Aaron died, and there he was buried; and Eleazar his son ministered in the priest's office in his stead.10:7 From there they journeyed to Gudgodah; and from Gudgodah to Jotbathah, a land of brooks of water.10:8 At that time Yahweh set apart the tribe of Levi, to bear the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, to stand before Yahweh to minister to him, and to bless in his name, to this day.10:9 Wherefore Levi has no portion nor inheritance with his brethren; Yahweh is his inheritance, according as Yahweh your God spoke to him.)10:10 And I stayed in the mount, as at the first time, forty days and forty nights: and Yahweh hearkened to me that time also; Yahweh would not destroy you.10:11 And Yahweh said to me, arise, take your journey before the people; and they shall go in and possess the land, which I swore to their fathers to give to them.10:12 And now, O Israel, what does Yahweh your God require of you, but to fear Yahweh your God, to walk in all his ways, and to love him, and to serve Yahweh your God with all your heart and with all your soul,10:13 to keep the commandments of Yahweh, and his statutes, which I command you this day for your good?10:14 Behold, to Yahweh your God belongs heaven and the heaven of heavens, the earth, with all that exists therein.10:15 Only Yahweh had a delight in your fathers to love them, and he chose their seed after them, even you above all peoples, as at this day.10:16 Circumcise therefore the foreskin of your heart, and be no longer stiffnecked.10:17 For Yahweh your God, he is God of gods, and Lord of lords, the great God, the mighty, and the terrible, who regards not persons, nor takes reward.10:18 He does execute justice for the fatherless and widow, and loves the sojourner, in giving him food and raiment.10:19 Love ye therefore the sojourner; for ye were sojourners in the land of Egypt.10:20 You shall fear Yahweh your God; him shall you serve; and to him shall you cleave, and by his name shall you swear.10:21 He is your praise, and he is your God, that has done for you these great and terrible things, which your eyes have seen.10:22 Your fathers went down into Egypt with 70 persons; and now Yahweh your God has made you as the stars of heaven for multitude.Chapter 1111:1 Therefore you shall love Yahweh your God, and keep his charge, and his statutes, and his ordinances, and his commandments, alway.11:2 And know ye this day: for I speak not with your children that have not known, and that have not seen the chastisement of Yahweh your God, his greatness, his mighty hand, and his outstretched arm,11:3 and his signs, and his works, which he did in the midst of Egypt to Pharaoh the king of Egypt, and to all his land;11:4 and what he did to the army of Egypt, to their horses, and to their chariots; how he made the water of the Red Sea to overflow them as they pursued after you, and how Yahweh has destroyed them to this day;11:5 and what he did to you in the wilderness, until ye came to this place;11:6 and what he did to Dathan and Abiram, the sons of Eliab, the son of Reuben; how the earth opened its mouth, and swallowed them up, and their households, and their tents, and every living thing that followed them, in the midst of all Israel:11:7 but your eyes have seen all the great work of Yahweh which he did.11:8 Therefore shall ye keep all the commandment which I command you this day, that ye may be strong, and go in and possess the land, whither ye go over to possess it;11:9 and that ye may prolong your days in the land, which Yahweh swore to your fathers to give to them and to their seed, a land flowing with milk and honey.11:10 For the land, where you are going in to possess it, it is not like the land of Egypt, from where ye came out, where you sowed your seed, and watered it on foot, as a garden of herbs;11:11 but the land, where ye are going over to possess it, it is a land of hills and valleys, and drinks water of the rain of heaven,11:12 a land which Yahweh your God cares for: the eyes of Yahweh your God are always upon it, from the beginning of the year even to the end of the year.11:13 And it shall come to pass, if ye shall hearken diligently to my commandments which I command you this day, to love Yahweh your God, and to serve him with all your heart and with all your soul,11:14 that I will give the rain of your land in its season, the former rain and the latter rain, that you may gather in your grain, and your new wine, and your oil.11:15 And I will give grass in your fields for your cattle, and you shall eat and be full.11:16 Take heed to yourselves, lest your heart be deceived, and ye turn aside, and serve other gods, and worship them;11:17 and the anger of Yahweh be kindled against you, and he shut up the heavens, so that there shall be no rain, and the land shall not yield its fruit; and ye perish quickly from off the good land which Yahweh gives you.11:18 Therefore shall ye lay up these my words in your heart and in your soul; and ye shall bind them for a sign upon your hand, and they shall be for frontlets between your eyes.11:19 And ye shall teach them your children, talking of them, when you sit in your house, and when you walk by the way, and when you lie down, and when you rise up.11:20 And you shall write them upon the door-posts of your house, and upon your gates;11:21 that your days may be multiplied, and the days of your children, in the land which Yahweh swore to your fathers to give them, as the days of the heavens above the earth.11:22 For if ye shall diligently keep all this commandment which I command you, to do it, to love Yahweh your God, to walk in all his ways, and to cleave to him;11:23 then will Yahweh drive out all these nations from before you, and ye shall dispossess nations greater and mightier than yourselves.11:24 Every place whereon the sole of your foot shall tread shall be yours: from the wilderness, and Lebanon, from the river, the river Euphrates, even to the hinder sea shall be your border.11:25 There shall no man be able to stand before you: Yahweh your God shall lay the fear of you and the dread of you upon all the land that ye shall tread upon, as he has spoken to you.11:26 Behold, I set before you this day a blessing and a curse:11:27 the blessing, if ye shall hearken to the commandments of Yahweh your God, which I command you this day;11:28 and the curse, if ye shall not hearken to the commandments of Yahweh your God, but turn aside out of the way which I command you this day, to go after other gods, which ye have not known.11:29 And it shall come to pass, when Yahweh your God shall bring you into the land to which you are going topossess it, that you shall set the blessing upon mount Gerizim, and the curse upon mount Ebal.11:30 Are they not beyond the Jordan, behind the way of the going down of the sun, in the land of the Canaanites that dwell in the Arabah, over against Gilgal, beside the oaks of Moreh?11:31 For ye are to pass over the Jordan to go in to possess the land which Yahweh your God gives you, and ye shall possess it, and dwell therein.11:32 And ye shall observe to do all the statutes and the ordinances which I set before you this day.Chapter 1212:1 These are the statutes and the ordinances which ye shall observe to do in the land which Yahweh, the God of your fathers, has given you to possess it, all the days that ye live upon the earth.12:2 You shall surely destroy all the places in which the nations that ye shall dispossess served their gods, upon the high mountains, and upon the hills, and under every green tree:12:3 and ye shall break down their altars, and dash in pieces their pillars, and burn their Asherim with fire; and ye shall hew down the graven images of their gods; and ye shall destroy their name out of that place.12:4 You shall not do so to Yahweh your God.12:5 But to the place which Yahweh your God shall choose out of all your tribes, to put his name there, even to his habitation shall ye seek, and there you shall come;12:6 and there ye shall bring your burnt offerings, and your sacrifices, and your tithes, and the heave-offering of your hand, and your vows, and your freewill-offerings, and the firstlings of your herd and of your flock:12:7 and there ye shall eat before Yahweh your God, and ye shall rejoice in all that ye put your hand to, ye and your households, in which Yahweh your God has blessed you.12:8 You shall not do after all the things that we do here this day: every man doing whatever is right in his own eyes;12:9 for ye are not as yet come to the rest and to the inheritance, which Yahweh your God gives you.12:10 But when ye go over the Jordan, and dwell in the land which Yahweh your God causes you to inherit, and he gives you rest from all your enemies round about, so that ye dwell in safety;12:11 then it shall come to pass that to the place which Yahweh your God shall choose, to cause his name to dwell there, there shall ye bring all that I command you: your burnt offerings, and your sacrifices, your tithes, and the heave-offering of your hand, and all your choice vows which ye vow to Yahweh.12:12 And ye shall rejoice before Yahweh your God, ye, and your sons, and your daughters, and your men-servants, and your maid-servants, and the Levite that is within your gates, forasmuch as he has no portion nor inheritance with you.12:13 Take heed to yourself that you offer not your burnt offerings in every place that you see;12:14 but in the place which Yahweh shall choose in one of your tribes, there you shall offer your burnt offerings, and there you shall do all that I command you.12:15 Notwithstanding, you may kill and eat flesh within all your gates, after all the desire of your soul, according to the blessing of Yahweh your God which he has given you: the unclean and the clean may eat thereof, as of the gazelle, and as of the deer.12:16 Only ye shall not eat the blood; you shall pour it out upon the earth as water.12:17 You may not eat within your gates the tithe of your grain, or of your new wine, or of your oil, or the firstlings of your herd or of your flock, nor any of your vows which you vowest, nor your freewill-offerings, nor the heave-offering of your hand;12:18 but you shall eat them before Yahweh your God in the place which Yahweh your God shall choose, you, and your son, and your daughter, and your man-servant, and your maid-servant, and the Levite that is within your gates: and you shall rejoice before Yahweh your God in all that you put your hand to.12:19 Take heed to yourself that you forsake not the Levite as long as you live in your land.12:20 When Yahweh your God shall enlarge your border, as he has promised you, and you shall say, I will eat flesh, because your soul desires to eat flesh; you may eat flesh, after all the desire of your soul.12:21 If the place which Yahweh your God shall choose, to put his name there, be too far from you, then you shall kill of your herd and of your flock, which Yahweh has given you, as I have commanded you; and you may eat within your gates, after all the desire of your soul.12:22 Even as the gazelle and as the deer is eaten, so you shall eat thereof: the unclean and the clean may eat thereof alike.12:23 Only be sure that you eat not the blood: for the blood is the life; and you shall not eat the life with the flesh.12:24 You shall not eat it; you shall pour it out upon the earth as water.12:25 You shall not eat it; that it may go well with you, and with your children after you, when you shall do that which is right in the eyes of Yahweh.12:26 Only your holy things which you have, and your vows, you shall take, and go to the place which Yahweh shall choose:12:27 and you shall offer your burnt offerings, the flesh and the blood, upon the altar of Yahweh your God; and the blood of your sacrifices shall be poured out upon the altar of Yahweh your God; and you shall eat the flesh.12:28 Observe and hear all these words which I command you, that it may go well with you, and with your children after you for ever, when you do that which is good and right in the eyes of Yahweh your God.12:29 When Yahweh your God shall cut off the nations from before you, whither you go in to dispossess them, and you dispossess them, and dwell in their land;12:30 take heed to yourself that you be not ensnared to follow them, after that they are destroyed from before you; and that you inquire not after their gods, saying, How do these nations serve their gods?  even so will I do likewise.12:31 You shall not do so to Yahweh your God: for every abomination to Yahweh, which he hates, have they done to their gods; for even their sons and their daughters do they burn in the fire to their gods.12:32 What thing soever I command you, that shall ye observe to do: you shall not add thereto, nor diminish from it.Chapter 1313:1 If there arise in the midst of you a prophet, or a dreamer of dreams, and he give you a sign or a wonder,13:2 and the sign or the wonder come to pass, whereof he spoke to you, saying, Let us go after other gods, which you have not known, and let us serve them;13:3 you shall not hearken to the words of that prophet, or to that dreamer of dreams: for Yahweh your God proves you, to know whether ye love Yahweh your God with all your heart and with all your soul.13:4 You shall walk after Yahweh your God, and fear him, and keep his commandments, and obey his voice, and ye shall serve him, and cleave to him.13:5 And that prophet, or that dreamer of dreams, shall be put to death, because he has spoken rebellion against Yahweh your God, who brought you out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed you out of the house of bondage, to draw you aside out of the way which Yahweh your God commanded you to walk in.  So shall you put away the evil from the midst of you.13:6 If your brother, the son of your mother, or your son, or your daughter, or the wife of your bosom, or your friend, that is as your own soul, entice you secretly, saying, Let us go and serve other gods, which you have not known, you, nor your fathers;13:7 of the gods of the peoples that are round about you, near to you, or far off from you, from the one end of the earth even to the other end of the earth;13:8 you shall not consent to him, nor hearken to him; neither shall your eye pity him, neither shall you spare, neither shall you conceal him:13:9 but you shall surely kill him; your hand shall be first upon him to put him to death, and afterwards the hand of all the people.13:10 And you shall stone him to death with stones, because he has sought to draw you away from Yahweh your God, who brought you out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondage.13:11 And all Israel shall hear, and fear, and shall do not more any such wickedness as this is in the midst of you.13:12 If you shall hear tell concerning one of your cities, which Yahweh your God gives you to dwell there, saying,13:13 Certain base fellows are gone out from the midst of you, and have drawn away the inhabitants of their city, saying, Let us go and serve other gods, which ye have not known;13:14 then shall you inquire, and make search, and ask diligently; and, behold, if it be truth, and the thing certain, that such abomination is wrought in the midst of you,13:15 you shall surely attack the inhabitants of that city with the edge of the sword, destroying it utterly, and all that is therein and the cattle thereof, with the edge of the sword.13:16 And you shall gather all the spoil of it into the midst of the street thereof, and shall burn with fire the city, and all the spoil thereof every whit, to Yahweh your God: and it shall be a heap for ever; it shall not be built again.13:17 And there shall cleave nought of the devoted thing to your hand; that Yahweh may turn from the fierceness of his anger, and show you mercy, and have compassion upon you, and multiply you, as he has sworn to your fathers;13:18 when you shall hearken to the voice of Yahweh your God, to keep all his commandments which I command you this day, to do that which is right in the eyes of Yahweh your God.Chapter 1414:1 You are the children of Yahweh your God: ye shall not cut yourselves, nor make any baldness between your eyes for the dead.14:2 For you are a holy people to Yahweh your God, and Yahweh has chosen you to be a people for his own possession, above all peoples that are upon the face of the earth.14:3 You shall not eat any abominable thing.14:4 These are the beasts which ye may eat: the ox, the sheep, and the goat,14:5 the deer, and the gazelle, and the roebuck, and the wild goat, and the pygarg, and the antelope, and the chamois.14:6 And every beast that parts the hoof, and has the hoof cloven in two, and chews the cud, among the beasts, that may ye eat.14:7 Nevertheless these ye shall not eat of them that chew the cud, or of them that have the hoof cloven: the camel, and the hare, and the coney; because they chew the cud but part not the hoof, they are unclean to you.14:8 And the swine, because he parts the hoof but chews not the cud, he is unclean to you: of their flesh ye shall not eat, and their carcasses ye shall not touch.14:9 These ye may eat of all that are in the waters: whatsoever has fins and scales may ye eat;14:10 and whatsoever has not fins and scales ye shall not eat; it is unclean to you.14:11 Of all clean birds ye may eat.14:12 But these are they of which ye shall not eat: the eagle, and the gier-eagle, and the ospray,14:13 and the glede, and the falcon, and the kite after its kind,14:14 and every raven after its kind,14:15 and the ostrich, and the night-hawk, and the sea-mew, and the hawk after its kind,14:16 the little owl, and the great owl, and the horned owl,14:17 and the pelican, and the vulture, and the cormorant,14:18 and the stork, and the heron after its kind, and the hoopoe, and the bat.14:19 And all winged creeping things are unclean to you: they shall not be eaten.14:20 Of all clean birds ye may eat.14:21 You shall not eat of anything that dies of itself: you may give it to the sojourner that is within your gates, that he may eat it; or you may sell it to a foreigner: for you are a holy people to Yahweh your God.  You shall not boil a kid in its mother's milk.14:22 You shall surely tithe all the increase of your seed, that which comes forth from the field year by year.14:23 And you shall eat before Yahweh your God, in the place which he shall choose, to cause his name to dwell there, the tithe of your grain, of your new wine, and of your oil, and the firstlings of your herd and of your flock; that you may learn to fear Yahweh your God always.14:24 And if the way be too long for you, so that you are not able to carry it, because the place is too far from you, which Yahweh your God shall choose, to set his name there, when Yahweh your God shall bless you;14:25 then shall you turn it into money, and bind up the money in your hand, and shall go to the place which Yahweh your God shall choose:14:26 and you shall bestow the money for whatsoever your soul desires, for oxen, or for sheep, or for wine, or for strong drink, or for whatsoever your soul asks of you; and you shall eat there before Yahweh your God, and you shall rejoice, you and your household.14:27 And the Levite that is within your gates, you shall not forsake him; for he has no portion nor inheritance with you.14:28 At the end of every three years you shall bring forth all the tithe of your increase in the same year, and shall lay it up within your gates:14:29 and the Levite, because he has no portion nor inheritance with you, and the sojourner, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are within your gates, shall come, and shall eat and be satisfied; that Yahweh your God may bless you in all the work of your hand which you do.Chapter 1515:1 At the end of every seven years you shall make a release.15:2 And this is the manner of the release: every creditor shall release that which he has lent to his neighbor; he shall not exact it of his neighbor and his brother; because Yahweh's release has been proclaimed.15:3 Of a foreigner you may exact it: but whatsoever of yours is with your brother your hand shall release.15:4 But there shall be no poor with you; (for Yahweh will surely bless you in the land which Yahweh your God gives you for an inheritance to possess it;)15:5 if only you diligently hearken to the voice of Yahweh your God, to observe to do all this commandment which I command you this day.15:6 For Yahweh your God will bless you, as he promised you: and you shall lend to many nations, but you shall not borrow; and you shall rule over many nations, but they shall not rule over you.15:7 If there be with you a poor man, one of your brethren, within any of your gates in your land which Yahweh your God gives you, you shall not harden your heart, nor shut your hand from your poor brother ;15:8 but you shall surely open your hand to him, and shall surely lend him sufficient for his need in that which he lacks.15:9 Beware that there be not a base thought in your heart, saying, The seventh year, the year of release, is at hand; and your eye be evil against your poor brother, and you give him nothing; and he cries to Yahweh against you, and it be sin to you.15:10 You shall surely give him, and your heart shall not be grieved when you give to him; because that for this thing Yahweh your God will bless you in all your work, and in all that you put your hand to.15:11 For the poor will never cease out of the land: therefore I command you, saying, You shall surely open your hand to your brother, to your needy, and to your poor, in your land.15:12 If your brother, a Hebrew man, or a Hebrew woman, is sold to you, and serves you six years; then in the seventh year you shall let him go free from you.15:13 And when you let him go free from you, you shall not let him go empty:15:14 you shall furnish him liberally out of your flock, and out of your threshing-floor, and out of your winepress; as Yahweh your God has blessed you, you shall give to him.15:15 And you shall remember that you were a bondman in the land of Egypt, and Yahweh your God redeemed you: therefore I command you this thing today.15:16 And it shall be, if he says to you, I will not go out from you; because he loves you and your house, because he is well with you;15:17 then you shall take an awl, and thrust it through his ear to the door, and he shall be your servant for ever.  And also to your maid-servant you shall do likewise.15:18 It shall not seem hard to you, when you let him go free from you; for at half the cost of a hireling has he served you six years: and Yahweh your God will bless you in all that you do.15:19 All the firstling males that are born of your herd and of your flock you shall sanctify to Yahweh your God: you shall do no work with the firstling of your herd, nor shear the firstling of your flock.15:20 You shall eat it before Yahweh your God year by year in the place which Yahweh shall choose, you and your household.15:21 And if it have any blemish, as if it be lame or blind, any ill blemish whatsoever, you shall not sacrifice it to Yahweh your God.15:22 You shall eat it within your gates: the unclean and the clean shall eat it alike, as the gazelle, and as the deer.15:23 Only you shall not eat the blood thereof; you shall pour it out upon the ground as water.Chapter 1616:1 Observe the month of Abib, and keep the passover to Yahweh your God; for in the month of Abib Yahweh your God brought you forth out of Egypt by night.16:2 And you shall sacrifice the passover to Yahweh your God, of the flock and the herd, in the place which Yahweh shall choose, to cause his name to dwell there.16:3 You shall eat no leavened bread with it; seven days shall you eat unleavened bread with it, even the bread of affliction; for you came forth out of the land of Egypt in haste: that you may remember the day when you came forth out of the land of Egypt all the days of your life.16:4 And there shall be no leaven seen with you in all your borders seven days; neither shall any of the flesh, which you sacrifice the first day at even, remain all night until the morning.16:5 You may not sacrifice the passover within any of your gates, which Yahweh your God gives you;16:6 but at the place which Yahweh your God shall choose, to cause his name to dwell in, there you shall sacrifice the passover at even, at the going down of the sun, at the season that you came forth out of Egypt.16:7 And you shall roast and eat it in the place which Yahweh your God shall choose: and you shall turn in the morning, and go to your tents.16:8 Six days you shall eat unleavened bread; and on the seventh day shall be a solemn assembly to Yahweh your God; you shall do no work during it.16:9 Seven weeks shall you number to you: from the time you begin to put the sickle to the standing grain shall you begin to number seven weeks.16:10 And you shall keep the feast of weeks to Yahweh your God with a tribute of a freewill-offering of your hand, which you shall give, according as Yahweh your God blesses you:16:11 and you shall rejoice before Yahweh your God, you, and your son, and your daughter, and your man-servant, and your maid-servant, and the Levite that is within your gates, and the sojourner, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are in the midst of you, in the place which Yahweh your God shall choose, to cause his name to dwell there.16:12 And you shall remember that you were a bondman in Egypt: and you shall observe and do these statutes.16:13 You shall keep the feast of tabernacles seven days, after that you have gathered in from your threshing-floor and from your winepress:16:14 and you shall rejoice in your feast, you, and your son, and your daughter, and your man-servant, and your maid-servant, and the Levite, and the sojourner, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are within your gates.16:15 Seven days shall you keep a feast to Yahweh your God in the place which Yahweh shall choose; because Yahweh your God will bless you in all your increase, and in all the work of your hands, and you shall be altogether joyful.16:16 Three times in a year shall all your males appear before Yahweh your God in the place which he shall choose: in the feast of unleavened bread, and in the feast of weeks, and in the feast of tabernacles; and they shall not appear before Yahweh empty:16:17 every man shall give as he is able, according to the blessing of Yahweh your God which he has given you.16:18 Judges and officers shall you make you in all your gates, which Yahweh your God gives you, according to your tribes; and they shall judge the people with righteous judgment.16:19 You shall not wrest justice: you shall not respect persons; neither shall you take a bribe; for a bribe does blind the eyes of the wise, and pervert the words of the righteous.16:20 That which is altogether just shall you follow, that you may live, and inherit the land which Yahweh your God gives you.16:21 You shall not plant you an Asherah of any kind of tree beside the altar of Yahweh your God, which you shall make you.16:22 Neither shall you set you up a pillar; which Yahweh your God hates.Chapter 1717:1 You shall not sacrifice to Yahweh your God an ox, or a sheep, in which is a blemish, or anything evil; for that is an abomination to Yahweh your God.17:2 If there be found in the midst of you, within any of your gates which Yahweh your God gives you, man or woman, that does that which is evil in the sight of Yahweh your God, in transgressing his covenant,17:3 and has gone and served other gods, and worshipped them, or the sun, or the moon, or any of the host of heaven, which I have not commanded;17:4 and it be told you, and you have heard of it, then shall you inquire diligently; and, behold, if it be true, and the thing certain, that such abomination is wrought in Israel,17:5 then shall you bring forth that man or that woman, who has done this evil thing, to your gates, even the man or the woman; and you shall stone them to death with stones.17:6 At the mouth of two witnesses, or three witnesses, shall he that is to die be put to death; at the mouth of one witness he shall not be put to death.17:7 The hand of the witnesses shall be first upon him to put him to death, and afterward the hand of all the people.  So you shall put away the evil from the midst of you.17:8 If there arise a matter too hard for you in judgment, between blood and blood, between plea and plea, and between stroke and stroke, being matters of controversy within your gates; then shall you arise, and go up to the place which Yahweh your God shall choose;17:9 and you shall come to the priests the Levites, and to the judge that shall be in those days: and you shall inquire; and they shall show you the sentence of judgment.17:10 And you shall do according to the tenor of the sentence which they shall show you from that place which Yahweh shall choose; and you shall observe to do according to all that they shall teach you:17:11 according to the tenor of the law which they shall teach you, and according to the judgment which they shall tell you, you shall do; you shall not turn aside from the sentence which they shall show you, to the right hand, nor to the left.17:12 And the man that does presumptuously, in not hearkening to the priest that stands to minister there before Yahweh your God, or to the judge, even that man shall die: and you shall put away the evil from Israel.17:13 And all the people shall hear, and fear, and do no more presumptuously.17:14 When you are come to the land which Yahweh your God gives you, and shall possess it, and shall dwell therein, and shall say, I will set a king over me, like all the nations that are round about me;17:15 you shall surely set him king over you, whom Yahweh your God shall choose: one from among your brethren shall you set king over you; you may not put a foreigner over you, who is not your brother.17:16 Only he shall not multiply horses to himself, nor cause the people to return to Egypt, to the end that he may multiply horses; forasmuch as Yahweh has said to you, You shall from now on return no more that way.17:17 Neither shall he multiply wives to himself, that his heart turn not away: neither shall he greatly multiply to himself silver and gold.17:18 And it shall be, when he sits upon the throne of his kingdom, that he shall write him a copy of this law in a book, out of that which is before the priests the Levites:17:19 and it shall be with him, and he shall read therein all the days of his life; that he may learn to fear Yahweh his God, to keep all the words of this law and these statutes, to do them;17:20 that his heart be not lifted up above his brethren, and that he turn not aside from the commandment, to the right hand, or to the left: to the end that he may prolong his days in his kingdom, he and his children, in the midst of Israel.Chapter 1818:1 The priests the Levites, even all the tribe of Levi, shall have no portion nor inheritance with Israel: they shall eat the offerings of Yahweh made by fire, and his inheritance.18:2 And they shall have no inheritance among their brethren: Yahweh is their inheritance, as he has spoken to them.18:3 And this shall be the priests' due from the people, from them that offer a sacrifice, whether it be ox or sheep, that they shall give to the priest the shoulder, and the two cheeks, and the maw.18:4 The first-fruits of your grain, of your new wine, and of your oil, and the first of the fleece of your sheep, shall you give him.18:5 For Yahweh your God has chosen him out of all your tribes, to stand to minister in the name of Yahweh, him and his sons for ever.18:6 And if a Levite come from any of your gates out of all Israel, where he sojourns, and come with all the desire of his soul to the place which Yahweh shall choose;18:7 then he shall minister in the name of Yahweh his God, as all his brethren the Levites do, who stand there before Yahweh.18:8 They shall have like portions to eat, besides that which comes of the sale of his patrimony.18:9 When you are come into the land which Yahweh your God gives you, you shall not learn to do after the abominations of those nations.18:10 There shall not be found with you anyone that makes his son or his daughter to pass through the fire, one that uses divination, one that practices augury, or an enchanter, or a sorcerer,18:11 or a charmer, or a consulter with a familiar spirit, or a wizard, or a necromancer.18:12 For whosoever does these things is an abomination to Yahweh: and because of these abominations Yahweh your God does drive them out from before you.18:13 You shall be perfect with Yahweh your God.18:14 For these nations, that you shall dispossess, hearken to them that practise augury, and to diviners; but as for you, Yahweh your God has not allowed you so to do.18:15 Yahweh your God will raise up to you a prophet from the midst of you, of your brethren, like to me; to him ye shall hearken;18:16 according to all that you desired of Yahweh your God in Horeb in the day of the assembly, saying, Let me not hear again the voice of Yahweh my God, neither let me see this great fire any more, that I die not.18:17 And Yahweh said to me, They have well said that which they have spoken.18:18 I will raise them up a prophet from among their brethren, like to you; and I will put my words in his mouth, and he shall speak to them all that I shall command him.18:19 And it shall come to pass, that whosoever will not hearken to my words which he shall speak in my name, I will require it of him.18:20 But the prophet, that shall speak a word presumptuously in my name, which I have not commanded him to speak, or that shall speak in the name of other gods, that same prophet shall die.18:21 And if you say in your heart, How shall we know the word which Yahweh has not spoken?18:22 when a prophet speaks in the name of Yahweh, if the thing follow not, nor come to pass, that is the thing which Yahweh has not spoken: the prophet has spoken it presumptuously, you shall not be afraid of him.Chapter 1919:1 When Yahweh your God shall cut off the nations, whose land Yahweh your God gives you, and you succeed them, and dwell in their cities, and in their houses;19:2 you shall set apart three cities for you in the midst of your land, which Yahweh your God gives you to possess it.19:3 You shall prepare you the way, and divide the borders of your land, which Yahweh your God causes you to inherit, into three parts, that every manslayer may flee there.19:4 And this is the case of the manslayer, that shall flee there and live: whoso kills his neighbor unawares, and hated him not in time past;19:5 as when a man goes into the forest with his neighbor to hew wood, and his hand fetches a stroke with the axe to cut down the tree, and the head slips from the helve, and lights upon his neighbor, so that he dies; he shall flee to one of these cities and live:19:6 lest the avenger of blood pursue the manslayer, while his heart is hot, and overtake him, because the way is long, and strike him mortally; whereas he was not worthy of death, inasmuch as he hated him not in time past.19:7 Therefore I command you, saying, You shall set apart three cities for you.19:8 And if Yahweh your God enlarge your border, as he has sworn to your fathers, and give you all the land which he promised to give to your fathers;19:9 if you shall keep all this commandment to do it, which I command you this day, to love Yahweh your God, and to walk ever in his ways; then shall you add three cities more for you, besides these three:19:10 that innocent blood be not shed in the midst of your land, which Yahweh your God gives you for an inheritance, and so blood be upon you.19:11 But if any man hate his neighbor, and lie in wait for him, and rise up against him, and strike him mortally so that he dies, and he flee into one of these cities;19:12 then the elders of his city shall send and fetch him there, and deliver him into the hand of the avenger of blood, that he may die.19:13 Your eye shall not pity him, but you shall put away the innocent blood from Israel, that it may go well with you.19:14 You shall not remove your neighbor's landmark, which they of old time have set, in your inheritance which you shall inherit, in the land that Yahweh your God gives you to possess it.19:15 One witness shall not rise up against a man for any iniquity, or for any sin, in any sin that he sins: at the mouth of two witnesses, or at the mouth of three witnesses, shall a matter be established.19:16 If an unrighteous witness rise up against any man to testify against him of wrong-doing,19:17 then both the men, between whom the controversy is, shall stand before Yahweh, before the priests and the judges that shall be in those days;19:18 and the judges shall make diligent inquisition: and, behold, if the witness be a false witness, and have testified falsely against his brother;19:19 then shall ye do to him, as he had thought to do to his brother: so shall you put away the evil from the midst of you.19:20 And those that remain shall hear, and fear, and shall from now on commit no more any such evil in the midst of you.19:21 And your eyes shall not pity; life shall go for life, eye for eye, tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot.Chapter 2020:1 When you go forth to battle against your enemies, and see horses, and chariots, and a people more than you, you shall not be afraid of them; for Yahweh your God is with you, who brought you up out of the land of Egypt.20:2 And it shall be, when ye draw near to the battle, that the priest shall approach and speak to the people,20:3 and shall say to them, Hear, O Israel, ye draw near this day to battle against your enemies: let not your heart faint; fear not, nor tremble, neither be ye affrighted at them;20:4 for Yahweh your God is he that goes with you, to fight for you against your enemies, to save you.20:5 And the officers shall speak to the people, saying, What man is there that has built a new house, and has not dedicated it?  let him go and return to his house, lest he die in the battle, and another man dedicate it.20:6 And what man is there that has planted a vineyard, and has not used the fruit thereof?  let him go and return to his house, lest he die in the battle, and another man use the fruit thereof.20:7 And what man is there that has betrothed a wife, and has not taken her?  let him go and return to his house, lest he die in the battle, and another man take her.20:8 And the officers shall speak further to the people, and they shall say, What man is there that is fearful and faint-hearted?  let him go and return to his house, lest his brethren's heart melt as his heart.20:9 And it shall be, when the officers have made an end of speaking to the people, that they shall appoint captains of hosts at the head of the people.20:10 When you draw near to a city to fight against it, then proclaim peace to it.20:11 And it shall be, if it make you answer of peace, and open to you, then it shall be, that all the people that are found therein shall become tributary to you, and shall serve you.20:12 And if it will make no peace with you, but will make war against you, then you shall besiege it:20:13 and when Yahweh your God delivers it into your hand, you shall strike every male thereof with the edge of the sword:20:14 but the women, and the little ones, and the cattle, and all that is in the city, even all the spoil thereof, shall you take for a prey to yourself; and you shall eat the spoil of your enemies, which Yahweh your God has given you.20:15 Thus shall you do to all the cities which are very far off from you, which are not of the cities of these nations.20:16 But of the cities of these peoples, that Yahweh your God gives you for an inheritance, you shall save alive nothing that breathes;20:17 but you shall utterly destroy them: the Hittite, and the Amorite, the Canaanite, and the Perizzite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite; as Yahweh your God has commanded you;20:18 that they teach you not to do after all their abominations, which they have done to their gods; so would ye sin against Yahweh your God.20:19 When you shall besiege a city a long time, in making war against it to take it, you shall not destroy the trees thereof by wielding an axe against them; for you may eat of them, and you shall not cut them down; for is the tree of the field man, that it should be besieged of you?20:20 Only the trees of which you know that they are not trees for food, you shall destroy and cut them down; and you shall build bulwarks against the city that makes war with you, until it fall.Chapter 2121:1 If one be found slain in the land which Yahweh your God gives you to possess it, lying in the field, and it be not known who has smitten him;21:2 then your elders and your judges shall come forth, and they shall measure to the cities which are round about him that is slain:21:3 and it shall be, that the city which is nearest to the slain man, even the elders of that city shall take a heifer of the herd, which has not been wrought with, and which has not drawn in the yoke;21:4 and the elders of that city shall bring down the heifer to a valley with running water, which is neither plowed nor sown, and shall break the heifer's neck there in the valley.21:5 And the priests the sons of Levi shall come near; for them Yahweh your God has chosen to minister to him, and to bless in the name of Yahweh; and according to their word shall every controversy and every stroke be.21:6 And all the elders of that city, who are nearest to the slain man, shall wash their hands over the heifer whose neck was broken in the valley;21:7 and they shall answer and say, Our hands have not shed this blood, neither have our eyes seen it.21:8 Forgive, O Yahweh, your people Israel, whom you have redeemed, and allow not guilt of innocent blood to remain in the midst of your people Israel.  And the blood shall be forgiven them.21:9 So shall you put away the innocent blood from the midst of you, when you shall do that which is right in the eyes of Yahweh.21:10 When you go forth to battle against your enemies, and Yahweh your God delivers them into your hands, and you carry them away captive,21:11 and see among the captives a beautiful woman, and you have a desire to her, and would take her to you to wife;21:12 then you shall bring her home to your house; and she shall shave her head, and pare her nails;21:13 and she shall put the raiment of her captivity from off her, and shall remain in your house, and bewail her father and her mother a full month: and after that you shall go in to her, and be her husband, and she shall be your wife.21:14 And it shall be, if you have no delight in her, then you shall let her go where she will; but you shall not sell her at all for money, you shall not deal with her as a slave, because you have humbled her.21:15 If a man have two wives, the one beloved, and the other hated, and they have borne him children, both the beloved and the hated; and if the first-born son be hers that was hated;21:16 then it shall be, in the day that he causes his sons to inherit that which he has, that he may not make the son of the beloved the first-born before the son of the hated, who is the first-born:21:17 but he shall acknowledge the first-born, the son of the hated, by giving him a double portion of all that he has; for he is the beginning of his strength; the right of the first-born is his.21:18 If a man have a stubborn and rebellious son, that will not obey the voice of his father, or the voice of his mother, and, though they chasten him, will not hearken to them;21:19 then shall his father and his mother lay hold on him, and bring him out to the elders of his city, and to the gate of his place;21:20 and they shall say to the elders of his city, This our son is stubborn and rebellious, he will not obey our voice; he is a glutton, and a drunkard.21:21 And all the men of his city shall stone him to death with stones: so shall you put away the evil from the midst of you; and all Israel shall hear, and fear.21:22 And if a man have committed a sin worthy of death, and he be put to death, and you hang him on a tree;21:23 his body shall not remain all night upon the tree, but you shall surely bury him the same day; for he that is hanged is accursed of God; that you defile not your land which Yahweh your God gives you for an inheritance.Chapter 2222:1 You shall not see your brother's ox or his sheep go astray, and hide yourself from them: you shall surely bring them again to your brother.22:2 And if your brother be not near to you, or if you know him not, then you shall bring it home to your house, and it shall be with you until your brother seek after it, and you shall restore it to him.22:3 And so shall you do with his donkey; and so shall you do with his garment; and so shall you do with every lost thing of your brother's, which he has lost, and you have found: you may not hide yourself.22:4 You shall not see your brother's donkey or his ox fallen down by the way, and hide yourself from them: you shall surely help him to lift them up again.22:5 A woman shall not wear that which pertains to a man, neither shall a man put on a woman's garment; for whosoever does these things is an abomination to Yahweh your God.22:6 If a bird's nest chance to be before you in the way, in any tree or on the ground, with young ones or eggs, and the dam sitting upon the young, or upon the eggs, you shall not take the dam with the young:22:7 you shall surely let the dam go, but the young you may take to yourself; that it may be well with you, and that you may prolong your days.22:8 When you build a new house, then you shall make a battlement for your roof, that you bring not blood upon your house, if any man fall from there.22:9 You shall not sow your vineyard with two kinds of seed, lest the whole fruit be forfeited, the seed which you have sown, and the increase of the vineyard.22:10 You shall not plow with an ox and a donkey together.22:11 You shall not wear a mingled stuff, wool and linen together.22:12 You shall make you fringes upon the four borders of your vesture, with which you cover yourself.22:13 If any man take a wife, and go in to her, and hate her,22:14 and lay shameful things to her charge, and bring up an evil name upon her, and say, I took this woman, and when I came near to her, I found not in her the tokens of virginity;22:15 then shall the father of the damsel, and her mother, take and bring forth the tokens of the damsel's virginity to the elders of the city in the gate;22:16 and the damsel's father shall say to the elders, I gave my daughter to this man to wife, and he hates her;22:17 and, lo, he has laid shameful things to her charge, saying, I found not in your daughter the tokens of virginity; and yet these are the tokens of my daughter's virginity.  And they shall spread the garment before the elders of the city.22:18 And the elders of that city shall take the man and chastise him;22:19 and they shall fine him a hundred shekels of silver, and give them to the father of the damsel, because he has brought up an evil name upon a virgin of Israel: and she shall be his wife; he may not put her away all his days.22:20 But if this thing be true, that the tokens of virginity were not found in the damsel;22:21 then they shall bring out the damsel to the door of her father's house, and the men of her city shall stone her to death with stones, because she has wrought folly in Israel, to play the harlot in her father's house: so shall you put away the evil from the midst of you.22:22 If a man be found lying with a woman married to a husband, then they shall both of them die, the man that lay with the woman, and the woman: so shall you put away the evil from Israel.22:23 If there be a damsel that is a virgin betrothed to a husband, and a man find her in the city, and lie with her;22:24 then ye shall bring them both out to the gate of that city, and ye shall stone them to death with stones; the damsel, because she cried not, being in the city; and the man, because he has humbled his neighbor's wife: so you shall put away the evil from the midst of you.22:25 But if the man find the damsel that is betrothed in the field, and the man force her, and lie with her; then the man only that lay with her shall die:22:26 but to the damsel you shall do nothing; there is in the damsel no sin worthy of death: for as when a man rises against his neighbor, and slays him, even so is this matter;22:27 for he found her in the field, the betrothed damsel cried, and there was no one to save her.22:28 If a man finds a damsel that is a virgin who is not betrothed, and lays hold on her, and lies with her, and they are found;22:29 then the man that lay with her shall give to the damsel's father fifty shekels of silver, and she shall be his wife, because he has humbled her; he may not put her away all his days.22:30 A man shall not take his father's wife, and uncover his father's nakedness.Chapter 2323:1 He that is wounded in the testicles, or has his private member cut off, shall not enter into the assembly of Yahweh.23:2 A bastard shall not enter into the assembly of Yahweh; even to the tenth generation shall none of his enter into the assembly of Yahweh.23:3 An Ammonite or a Moabite shall not enter into the assembly of Yahweh; even to the tenth generation shall none belonging to them enter into the assembly of Yahweh for ever:23:4 because they met you not with bread and with water in the way, when ye came forth out of Egypt, and because they hired against you Balaam the son of Beor from Pethor of Mesopotamia, to curse you.23:5 Nevertheless Yahweh your God would not hearken to Balaam; but Yahweh your God turned the curse into a blessing to you, because Yahweh your God loved you.23:6 You shall not seek their peace nor their prosperity all your days for ever.23:7 You shall not abhor an Edomite; for he is your brother: you shall not abhor an Egyptian, because you were a sojourner in his land.23:8 The children of the third generation that are born to them shall enter into the assembly of Yahweh.23:9 When you go forth in camp against your enemies, then you shall keep you from every evil thing.23:10 If there be among you any man, that is not clean by reason of that which chances him by night, then shall he go abroad out of the camp, he shall not come within the camp:23:11 but it shall be, when evening comes on, he shall bathe himself in water; and when the sun is down, he shall come within the camp.23:12 You shall have a place also without the camp, whither you shall go forth abroad:23:13 and you shall have a paddle among your weapons; and it shall be, when you sit down abroad,  you shall dig with it, and shall turn back and cover that which comes from you:23:14 for Yahweh your God walks in the midst of your camp, to deliver you, and to give up your enemies before you; therefore shall your camp be holy, that he may not see an unclean thing in you, and turn away from you.23:15 You shall not deliver to his master a servant that is escaped from his master to you:23:16 he shall dwell with you, in the midst of you, in the place which he shall choose within one of your gates, where it pleases him best: you shall not oppress him.23:17 There shall be no prostitute of the daughters of Israel, neither shall there be a sodomite of the sons of Israel.23:18 You shall not bring the fee of a prostitute, or the wages of a dog, into the house of Yahweh your God for any vow: for even both these are an abomination to Yahweh your God.23:19 You shall not lend upon interest to your brother; interest of money, interest of victuals, interest of anything that is lent upon interest:23:20 to a foreigner you may lend upon interest; but to your brother you shall not lend upon interest, that Yahweh your God may bless you in all that you put your hand to, in the land whither you go in to possess it.23:21 When you shall vow a vow to Yahweh your God, you shall not be slack to pay it: for Yahweh your God will surely require it of you; and it would be sin in you.23:22 But if you shall forbear to vow, it shall be no sin in you.23:23 That which is gone out of your lips you shall observe and do; according as you have vowed to Yahweh your God, a freewill-offering, which you have promised with your mouth.23:24 When you come into your neighbor's vineyard, then you may eat of grapes your fill at your own pleasure; but you shall not put any in your container.23:25 When you come into your neighbor's standing grain, then you may pluck the heads with your hand; but you shall not move a sickle to your neighbor's standing grain.Chapter 2424:1 When a man takes a wife, and marries her, then it shall be, if she find no favor in his eyes, because he has found some unseemly thing in her, that he shall write her a bill of divorce, and give it in her hand, and send her out of his house.24:2 And when she is departed out of his house, she may go and be another man's wife.24:3 And if the latter husband hate her, and write her a bill of divorce, and give it in her hand, and send her out of his house; or if the latter husband die, who took her to be his wife;24:4 her former husband, who sent her away, may not take her again to be his wife, after that she is defiled; for that is abomination before Yahweh: and you shall not cause the land to sin, which Yahweh your God gives you for an inheritance.24:5 When a man takes a new wife, he shall not go out in the army, neither shall he be charged with any business: he shall be free at home one year, and shall cheer his wife whom he has taken.24:6 No man shall take the mill or the upper millstone to pledge; for he takes a man's life to pledge.24:7 If a man is found stealing any of his brethren of the children of Israel, and he deals with him as a slave, or sells him; then that thief shall die: so shall you put away the evil from the midst of you.24:8 Take heed in the plague of leprosy, that you observe diligently, and do according to all that the Levite priests shall teach you: as I commanded them, so ye shall observe to do.24:9 Remember what Yahweh your God did to Miriam, by the way as ye came forth out of Egypt.24:10 When you lend your neighbor any manner of loan, you shall not go into his house to fetch his pledge.24:11 You shall stand outside, and the man to whom you are lending shall bring forth the pledge outside to you.24:12 And if he be a poor man, you shall not sleep with his pledge;24:13 you shall surely restore to him the pledge when the sun goes down, that he may sleep in his garment, and bless you: and it shall be righteousness to you before Yahweh your God.24:14 You shall not oppress a hired servant that is poor and needy, whether he be of your brethren, or of your sojourners that are in your land within your gates:24:15 in his day you shall give him his wages, neither shall the sun go down upon it; for he is poor, and sets his heart upon it: lest he cry against you to Yahweh, and it be sin to you.24:16 The fathers shall not be put to death for the children, neither shall the children be put to death for the fathers: every man shall be put to death for his own sin.24:17 You shall not wrest the justice due to the sojourner, or to the fatherless, nor take the widow's raiment to pledge;24:18 but you shall remember that you were a bondman in Egypt, and Yahweh your God redeemed you there: therefore I command you to do this thing.24:19 When you reap your harvest in your field, and have forgot a sheaf in the field, you shall not go again to fetch it: it shall be for the sojourner, for the fatherless, and for the widow; that Yahweh your God may bless you in all the work of your hands.24:20 When you beat your olive-tree, you shall not go over the boughs again: it shall be for the sojourner, for the fatherless, and for the widow.24:21 When you gather the grapes of your vineyard, you shall not glean it after you: it shall be for the sojourner, for the fatherless, and for the widow.24:22 And you shall remember that you were a bondman in the land of Egypt: therefore I command you to do this thing.Chapter 2525:1 If there be a controversy between men, and they come to judgment, and the judges judge them; then they shall justify the righteous, and condemn the wicked;25:2 and it shall be, if the wicked man be worthy to be beaten, that the judge shall cause him to lie down, and to be beaten before his face, according to his wickedness, by number.25:3 Forty stripes he may give him, he shall not exceed; lest, if he should exceed, and beat him above these with many stripes, then your brother should seem vile to you.25:4 You shall not muzzle the ox when he treads out the grain.25:5 If brethren dwell together, and one of them die, and have no son, the wife of the dead shall not be married without to a stranger: her husband's brother shall go in to her, and take her to him to wife, and perform the duty of a husband's brother to her.25:6 And it shall be, that the first-born that she bears shall succeed in the name of his brother that is dead, that his name be not blotted out of Israel.25:7 And if the man like not to take his brother's wife, then his brother's wife shall go up to the gate to the elders, and say, My husband's brother refuses to raise up to his brother a name in Israel; he will not perform the duty of a husband's brother to me.25:8 Then the elders of his city shall call him, and speak to him: and if he stand, and say, I like not to take her;25:9 then shall his brother's wife come to him in the presence of the elders, and loose his shoe from off his foot, and spit in his face; and she shall answer and say, So shall it be done to the man that does not build up his brother's house.25:10 And his name shall be called in Israel, The house of him that has his shoe loosed.25:11 When men fight one with another, and the wife of the one draws near to rescue her husband out of the hand of him that is striking him, and she puts forth her hand, and takes him by the privates;25:12 then you shall cut off her hand, your eye shall have no pity.25:13 You shall not have in your bag differing weights, a large and a small.25:14 You shall not have in your house differing measures, a large and a small.25:15 A perfect and just weight shall you have; a perfect and just measure shall you have: that your days may be long in the land which Yahweh your God gives you.25:16 For all that do such things, even all that do unrighteously, are an abomination to Yahweh your God.25:17 Remember what Amalek did to you by the way as ye came forth out of Egypt;25:18 how he met you by the way, and attacked the rearmost of you, all that were feeble behind you, when you were faint and weary; and he feared not God.25:19 Therefore it shall be, when Yahweh your God has given you rest from all your enemies round about, in the land which Yahweh your God is giving you for an inheritance to possess it, that you shall blot out the remembrance of Amalek from under heaven; you shall not forget.Chapter 2626:1 And it shall be, when you are come in to the land which Yahweh your God is giving you for an inheritance, and possess it, and dwell in it,26:2 that you shall take of the first of all the fruit of the ground, which you shall bring in from your land that Yahweh your God gives you; and you shall put it in a basket, and shall go to the place which Yahweh your God shall choose, to cause his name to dwell there.26:3 And you shall come to the priest that shall be in those days, and say to him, I profess this day to Yahweh your God, that I am come to the land which Yahweh swore to our fathers to give us.26:4 And the priest shall take the basket out of your hand, and set it down before the altar of Yahweh your God.26:5 And you shall answer and say before Yahweh your God, a Syrian ready to perish was my father; and he went down into Egypt, and sojourned there, few in number; and he became there a nation, great, mighty, and populous.26:6 And the Egyptians dealt ill with us, and afflicted us, and laid upon us hard bondage:26:7 and we cried to Yahweh, the God of our fathers, and Yahweh heard our voice, and saw our affliction, and our toil, and our oppression;26:8 and Yahweh brought us forth out of Egypt with a mighty hand, and with an outstretched arm, and with great terribleness, and with signs, and with wonders;26:9 and he has brought us into this place, and has given us this land, a land flowing with milk and honey.26:10 And now, behold, I have brought the first of the fruit of the ground, which you, O Yahweh, have given me.  And you shall set it down before Yahweh your God, and worship before Yahweh your God:26:11 and you shall rejoice in all the good which Yahweh your God has given to you, and to your house, you, and the Levite, and the sojourner that is in the midst of you.26:12 When you have made an end of tithing all the tithe of your increase in the third year, which is the year of tithing, then you shall give it to the Levite, to the sojourner, to the fatherless, and to the widow, that they may eat within your gates, and be filled.26:13 And you shall say before Yahweh your God, I have put away the hallowed things out of my house, and also have given them to the Levite, and to the sojourner, to the fatherless, and to the widow, according to all your commandment which you have commanded me: I have not transgressed any of your commandments, neither have I forgotten them:26:14 I have not eaten thereof in my mourning, neither have I put away thereof, being unclean, nor given thereof for the dead: I have hearkened to the voice of Yahweh my God; I have done according to all that you have commanded me.26:15 Look down from your holy habitation, from heaven, and bless your people Israel, and the ground which you have given us, as you swore to our fathers, a land flowing with milk and honey.26:16 This day Yahweh your God commands you to do these statutes and ordinances: you shall therefore keep and do them with all your heart, and with all your soul.26:17 You have avouched Yahweh this day to be your God, and that you would walk in his ways, and keep his statutes, and his commandments, and his ordinances, and hearken to his voice:26:18 and Yahweh has avouched you this day to be a people for his own possession, as he has promised you, and that you should keep all his commandments;26:19 and to make you high above all nations that he has made, in praise, and in name, and in honor; and that you may be a holy people to Yahweh your God, as he has spoken.Chapter 2727:1 And Moses and the elders of Israel commanded the people, saying, Keep all the commandment which I command you this day.27:2 And it shall be on the day when ye shall pass over the Jordan to the land which Yahweh your God gives you, that you shall set you up great stones, and plaster them with plaster:27:3 and you shall write upon them all the words of this law, when you are passed over; that you may go in to the land which Yahweh your God gives you, a land flowing with milk and honey, as Yahweh, the God of your fathers, has promised you.27:4 And it shall be, when ye are passed over the Jordan, that ye shall set up these stones, which I command you this day, in mount Ebal, and you shall plaster them with plaster.27:5 And there shall you build an altar to Yahweh your God, an altar of stones: you shall lift up no iron tool upon them.27:6 You shall build the altar of Yahweh your God of unhewn stones; and you shall offer burnt offerings upon it to Yahweh your God:27:7 and you shall sacrifice peace offerings, and shall eat there; and you shall rejoice before Yahweh your God.27:8 And you shall write upon the stones all the words of this law very plainly.27:9 And Moses and the priests the Levites spoke to all Israel, saying, Keep silence, and hearken, O Israel: this day you are become the people of Yahweh your God.27:10 You shall therefore obey the voice of Yahweh your God, and do his commandments and his statutes, which I command you this day.27:11 And Moses charged the people the same day, saying,27:12 These shall stand upon mount Gerizim to bless the people, when ye are passed over the Jordan: Simeon, and Levi, and Judah, and Issachar, and Joseph, and Benjamin.27:13 And these shall stand upon mount Ebal for the curse: Reuben, Gad, and Asher, and Zebulun, Dan, and Naphtali.27:14 And the Levites shall answer, and say to all the men of Israel with a loud voice,27:15 Cursed be the man that makes a graven or molten image, an abomination to Yahweh, the work of the hands of the craftsman, and sets it up in secret.  And all the people shall answer and say, amen.27:16 Cursed be he that sets light by his father or his mother.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:17 Cursed be he that removes his neighbor's landmark.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:18 Cursed be he that makes the blind to wander out of the way.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:19 Cursed be he that wrests the justice due to the sojourner, fatherless, and widow.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:20 Cursed be he that lies with his father's wife, because he has uncovered his father's skirt.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:21 Cursed be he that lies with any manner of beast.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:22 Cursed be he that lies with his sister, the daughter of his father, or the daughter of his mother.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:23 Cursed be he that lies with his mother-in-law.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:24 Cursed be he that attacks his neighbor in secret.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:25 Cursed be he that takes a bribe to slay an innocent person.  And all the people shall say, amen.27:26 Cursed be he that confirms not the words of this law to do them.  And all the people shall say, amen.Chapter 2828:1 And it shall come to pass, if you shall hearken diligently to the voice of Yahweh your God, to observe to do all his commandments which I command you this day, that Yahweh your God will set you on high above all the nations of the earth:28:2 and all these blessings shall come upon you, and overtake you, if you shall hearken to the voice of Yahweh your God.28:3 Blessed shall you be in the city, and blessed shall you be in the field.28:4 Blessed shall be the fruit of your body, and the fruit of your ground, and the fruit of your beasts, the increase of your cattle, and the young of your flock.28:5 Blessed shall be your basket and your kneading-trough.28:6 Blessed shall you be when you come in, and blessed shall you be when you go out.28:7 Yahweh will cause your enemies that rise up against you to be smitten before you: they shall come out against you one way, and shall flee before you seven ways.28:8 Yahweh will command the blessing upon you in your barns, and in all that you put your hand to; and he will bless you in the land which Yahweh your God gives you.28:9 Yahweh will establish you for a holy people to himself, as he has sworn to you; if you shall keep the commandments of Yahweh your God, and walk in his ways.28:10 And all the peoples of the earth shall see that you are called by the name of Yahweh; and they shall be afraid of you.28:11 And Yahweh will make you plenteous for good, in the fruit of your body, and in the fruit of your cattle, and in the fruit of your ground, in the land which Yahweh swore to your fathers to give you.28:12 Yahweh will open to you his good treasure the heavens, to give the rain of your land in its season, and to bless all the work of your hand: and you shall lend to many nations, and you shall not borrow.28:13 And Yahweh will make you the head, and not the tail; and you shall be above only, and you shall not be beneath; if you shall hearken to the commandments of Yahweh your God, which I command you this day, to observe and to do them,28:14 and shall not turn aside from any of the words which I command you this day, to the right hand, or to the left, to go after other gods to serve them.28:15 But it shall come to pass, if you will not hearken to the voice of Yahweh your God, to observe to do all his commandments and his statutes which I command you this day, that all these curses shall come upon you, and overtake you.28:16 Cursed shall you be in the city, and cursed shall you be in the field.28:17 Cursed shall be your basket and your kneading-trough.28:18 Cursed shall be the fruit of your body, and the fruit of your ground, the increase of your cattle, and the young of your flock.28:19 Cursed shall you be when you come in, and cursed shall you be when you go out.28:20 Yahweh will send upon you cursing, discomfiture, and rebuke, in all that you put your hand to to do, until you be destroyed, and until you perish quickly; because of the evil of your doings, whereby you have forsaken me.28:21 Yahweh will make the pestilence cleave to you, until he have consumed you from off the land, whither you go in to possess it.28:22 Yahweh will strike you with consumption, and with fever, and with inflammation, and with fiery heat, and with the sword, and with blasting, and with mildew; and they shall pursue you until you perish.28:23 And your heaven that is over your head shall be brass, and the earth that is under you shall be iron.28:24 Yahweh will make the rain of your land powder and dust: from heaven shall it come down upon you, until you be destroyed.28:25 Yahweh will cause you to be smitten before your enemies; you shall go out one way against them, and shall flee seven ways before them: and you shall be tossed to and from among all the kingdoms of the earth.28:26 And your dead body shall be food to all birds of the heavens, and to the beasts of the earth; and there shall be none to frighten them away.28:27 Yahweh will strike you with the boil of Egypt, and with the emerods, and with the scurvy, and with the itch, whereof you cannot be healed.28:28 Yahweh will strike you with madness, and with blindness, and with astonishment of heart;28:29 and you shall grope at noonday, as the blind gropes in darkness, and you shall not prosper in your ways: and you shall be only oppressed and robbed alway, and there shall be none to save you.28:30 You shall betroth a wife, and another man shall lie with her: you shall build a house, and you shall not dwell therein: you shall plant a vineyard, and shall not use the fruit thereof.28:31 Your ox shall be slain before your eyes, and you shall not eat thereof: your donkey shall be violently taken away from before your face, and shall not be restored to you: your sheep shall be given to your enemies, and you shall have none to save you.28:32 Your sons and your daughters shall be given to another people; and your eyes shall look, and fail with longing for them all the day: and there shall be nought in the power of your hand.28:33 The fruit of your ground, and all your labors, shall a nation which you know not eat up; and you shall be only oppressed and crushed alway;28:34 so that you shall be mad for the sight of your eyes which you shall see.28:35 Yahweh will strike you in the knees, and in the legs, with a sore boil, from which you cannot be healed, from the sole of your foot to the crown of your head.28:36 Yahweh will bring you, and your king whom you shall set over you, to a nation that you have not known, you nor your fathers; and there shall you serve other gods, wood and stone.28:37 And you shall become an astonishment, a proverb, and a byword, among all the peoples whither Yahweh shall lead you away.28:38 You shall carry much seed out into the field, and shall gather little in; for the locust shall consume it.28:39 You shall plant vineyards and dress them, but you shall neither drink of the wine, nor gather the grapes; for the worm shall eat them.28:40 You shall have olive-trees throughout all your borders, but you shall not anoint yourself with the oil; for your olive shall cast its fruit.28:41 You shall beget sons and daughters, but they shall not be yours; for they shall go into captivity.28:42 All your trees and the fruit of your ground shall the locust possess.28:43 The sojourner that is in the midst of you shall mount up above you higher and higher; and you shall come down lower and lower.28:44 He shall lend to you, and you shall not lend to him: he shall be the head, and you shall be the tail.28:45 And all these curses shall come upon you, and shall pursue you, and overtake you, till you be destroyed; because you hearkened not to the voice of Yahweh your God, to keep his commandments and his statutes which he commanded you:28:46 and they shall be upon you for a sign and for a wonder, and upon your seed for ever.28:47 Because you served not Yahweh your God with joyfulness, and with gladness of heart, by reason of the abundance of all things;28:48 therefore shall you serve your enemies that Yahweh shall send against you, in hunger, and in thirst, and in nakedness, and in want of all things: and he shall put a yoke of iron upon your neck, until he have destroyed you.28:49 Yahweh will bring a nation against you from far, from the end of the earth, as the eagle flies; a nation whose tongue you shall not understand;28:50 a nation of fierce countenance, that shall not regard the person of the old, nor show favor to the young,28:51 and shall eat the fruit of your cattle, and the fruit of your ground, until you be destroyed; that also shall not leave you grain, new wine, or oil, the increase of your cattle, or the young of your flock, until they have caused you to perish.28:52 And they shall besiege you in all your gates, until your high and fortified walls come down, in which you have trusted, throughout all your land; and they shall besiege you in all your gates throughout all your land, which Yahweh your God has given you.28:53 And you shall eat the fruit of your own body, the flesh of your sons and of your daughters, whom Yahweh your God has given you, in the siege and in the distress with which your enemies shall distress you.28:54 The man that is tender among you, and very delicate, his eye shall be evil toward his brother, and toward the wife of his bosom, and toward the remnant of his children whom he has remaining;28:55 so that he will not give to any of them of the flesh of his children whom he shall eat, because he has nothing left to him, in the siege and in the distress with which your enemy shall distress you in all your gates.28:56 The tender and delicate woman among you, who would not adventure to set the sole of her foot upon the ground for delicateness and tenderness, her eye shall be evil toward the husband of her bosom, and toward her son, and toward her daughter,28:57 and toward her young one that comes out from between her feet, and toward her children whom she shall bear; for she shall eat them for want of all things secretly, in the siege and in the distress with which your enemy shall distress you in your gates.28:58 If you will not observe to do all the words of this law that are written in this book, that you may fear this glorious and fearful name, YAHWEH YOUR GOD;28:59 then Yahweh will make your plagues extraordinary, and the plagues of your seed, even great plagues, and of long continuance, and sore sicknesses, and of long continuance.28:60 And he will bring upon you again all the diseases of Egypt, which you were afraid of; and they shall cleave to you.28:61 Also every sickness, and every plague, which is not written in the book of this law, them will Yahweh bring upon you, until you be destroyed.28:62 And ye shall be left few in number, whereas ye were as the stars of heaven for multitude; because you did not hearken to the voice of Yahweh your God.28:63 And it shall come to pass, that, as Yahweh rejoiced over you to do you good, and to multiply you, so Yahweh will rejoice over you to cause you to perish, and to destroy you; and ye shall be plucked from off the land whither you go in to possess it.28:64 And Yahweh will scatter you among all peoples, from the one end of the earth even to the other end of the earth; and there you shall serve other gods, which you have not known, you nor your fathers, even wood and stone.28:65 And among these nations shall you find no ease, and there shall be no rest for the sole of your foot: but Yahweh will give you there a trembling heart, and failing of eyes, and pining of soul;28:66 and your life shall hang in doubt before you; and you shall fear night and day, and shall have no assurance of your life.28:67 In the morning you shall say, Would it were even! and at even you shall say, Would it were morning! for the fear of your heart which you shall fear, and for the sight of your eyes which you shall see.28:68 And Yahweh will bring you into Egypt again with ships, by the way whereof I said to you, You shall see it no more again: and there ye shall sell yourselves to your enemies for bondmen and for bondwomen, and no man shall buy you.Chapter 2929:1 These are the words of the covenant which Yahweh commanded Moses to make with the children of Israel in the land of Moab, besides the covenant which he made with them in Horeb.29:2 And Moses called to all Israel, and said to them, You have seen all that Yahweh did before your eyes in the land of Egypt to Pharaoh, and to all his servants, and to all his land;29:3 the great trials which your eyes saw, the signs, and those great wonders:29:4 but Yahweh has not given you a heart to know, and eyes to see, and ears to hear, to this day.29:5 And I have led you forty years in the wilderness: your clothes are not become old upon you, and your shoe is not become old upon your foot.29:6 You have not eaten bread, neither have ye drunk wine or strong drink; that ye may know that I am Yahweh your God.29:7 And when ye came to this place, Sihon the king of Heshbon, and Og the king of Bashan, came out against us to battle, and we smote them:29:8 and we took their land, and gave it for an inheritance to the Reubenites, and to the Gadites, and to the half-tribe of the Manassites.29:9 Keep therefore the words of this covenant, and do them, that ye may prosper in all that ye do.29:10 You stand this day all of you before Yahweh your God; your heads, your tribes, your elders, and your officers, even all the men of Israel,29:11 your little ones, your wives, and your sojourner that is in the midst of your camps, from the hewer of your wood to the drawer of your water;29:12 that you may enter into the covenant of Yahweh your God, and into his oath, which Yahweh your God makes with you this day;29:13 that he may establish you this day to himself for a people, and that he may be to you a God, as he spoke to you, and as he swore to your fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob.29:14 Neither with you only do I make this covenant and this oath,29:15 but with him that stands here with us this day before Yahweh our God, and also with him that is not here with us this day29:16 (for ye know how we dwelt in the land of Egypt, and how we came through the midst of the nations through which ye passed;29:17 and ye have seen their abominations, and their idols, wood and stone, silver and gold, which were among them);29:18 lest there should be among you man, or woman, or family, or tribe, whose heart turns away this day from Yahweh our God, to go to serve the gods of those nations; lest there should be among you a root that bears gall and wormwood;29:19 and it come to pass, when he hears the words of this curse, that he bless himself in his heart, saying, I shall have peace, though I walk in the stubbornness of my heart, to destroy the moist with the dry.29:20 Yahweh will not pardon him, but then the anger of Yahweh and his jealousy will smoke against that man, and all the curse that is written in this book shall lie upon him, and Yahweh will blot out his name from under heaven.29:21 And Yahweh will set him apart to evil out of all the tribes of Israel, according to all the curses of the covenant that is written in this book of the law.29:22 And the generation to come, your children that shall rise up after you, and the foreigner that shall come from a far land, shall say, when they see the plagues of that land, and the sicknesses with which Yahweh has made it sick;29:23 and that the whole land thereof is brimstone, and salt, and a burning, that it is not sown, nor bears, nor any grass grows therein, like the overthrow of Sodom and Gomorrah, admah and Zeboiim, which Yahweh overthrew in his anger, and in his wrath:29:24 even all the nations shall say, Why has Yahweh done thus to this land?  what means the heat of this great anger?29:25 Then men shall say, Because they forsook the covenant of Yahweh, the God of their fathers, which he made with them when he brought them forth out of the land of Egypt,29:26 and went and served other gods, and worshipped them, gods that they knew not, and that he had not given to them:29:27 therefore the anger of Yahweh was kindled against this land, to bring upon it all the curse that is written in this book;29:28 and Yahweh rooted them out of their land in anger, and in wrath, and in great indignation, and cast them into another land, as at this day.29:29 The secret things belong to Yahweh our God; but the things that are revealed belong to us and to our children for ever, that we may do all the words of this law.Chapter 3030:1 And it shall come to pass, when all these things are come upon you, the blessing and the curse, which I have set before you, and you shall call them to mind among all the nations, whither Yahweh your God has driven you,30:2 and shall return to Yahweh your God, and shall obey his voice according to all that I command you this day, you and your children, with all your heart, and with all your soul;30:3 that then Yahweh your God will turn your captivity, and have compassion upon you, and will return and gather you from all the peoples, whither Yahweh your God has scattered you.30:4 If any of your outcasts be in the uttermost parts of heaven, from there will Yahweh your God gather you, and from there will he fetch you:30:5 and Yahweh your God will bring you into the land which your fathers possessed, and you shall possess it; and he will do you good, and multiply you above your fathers.30:6 And Yahweh your God will circumcise your heart, and the heart of your seed, to love Yahweh your God with all your heart, and with all your soul, that you may live.30:7 And Yahweh your God will put all these curses upon your enemies, and on them that hate you, that persecuted you.30:8 And you shall return and obey the voice of Yahweh, and do all his commandments which I command you this day.30:9 And Yahweh your God will make you plenteous in all the work of your hand, in the fruit of your body, and in the fruit of your cattle, and in the fruit of your ground, for good: for Yahweh will again rejoice over you for good, as he rejoiced over your fathers;30:10 if you shall obey the voice of Yahweh your God, to keep his commandments and his statutes which are written in this book of the law; if you turn to Yahweh your God with all your heart, and with all your soul.30:11 For this commandment which I command you this day, it is not too hard for you, neither is it far off.30:12 It is not in heaven, that you should say, Who shall go up for us to heaven, and bring it to us, and make us to hear it, that we may do it?30:13 Neither is it beyond the sea, that you should say, Who shall go over the sea for us, and bring it to us, and make us to hear it, that we may do it?30:14 But the word is very near to you, in your mouth, and in your heart, that you may do it.30:15 See, I have set before you this day life and good, and death and evil;30:16 in that I command you this day to love Yahweh your God, to walk in his ways, and to keep his commandments and his statutes and his ordinances, that you may live and multiply, and that Yahweh your God may bless you in the land whither you go in to possess it.30:17 But if your heart turn away, and you will not hear, but shall be drawn away, and worship other gods, and serve them;30:18 I denounce to you this day, that ye shall surely perish; ye shall not prolong your days in the land, whither you pass over the Jordan to go in to possess it.30:19 I call heaven and earth to witness against you this day, that I have set before you life and death, the blessing and the curse: therefore choose life, that you may live, you and your seed;30:20 to love Yahweh your God, to obey his voice, and to cleave to him; for he is your life, and the length of your days; that you may dwell in the land which Yahweh swore to your fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, to give them.Chapter 3131:1 And Moses went and spoke these words to all Israel.31:2 And he said to them, I am a hundred and twenty years old this day; I can no more go out and come in: and Yahweh has said to me, You shall not go over this Jordan.31:3 Yahweh your God, he will go over before you; he will destroy these nations from before you, and you shall dispossess them: and Joshua, he shall go over before you, as Yahweh has spoken.31:4 And Yahweh will do to them as he did to Sihon and to Og, the kings of the Amorites, and to their land; whom he destroyed.31:5 And Yahweh will deliver them up before you, and ye shall do to them according to all the commandment which I have commanded you.31:6 Be strong and of good courage, fear not, nor be affrighted at them: for Yahweh your God, he it is that does go with you; he will not fail you, nor forsake you.31:7 And Moses called to Joshua, and said to him in the sight of all Israel, Be strong and of good courage: for you shall go with this people into the land which Yahweh has sworn to their fathers to give them; and you shall cause them to inherit it.31:8 And Yahweh, he it is that does go before you; he will be with you, he will not fail you, neither forsake you: fear not, neither be dismayed.31:9 And Moses wrote this law, and delivered it to the priests the sons of Levi, that bore the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, and to all the elders of Israel.31:10 And Moses commanded them, saying, at the end of every seven years, in the set time of the year of release, in the feast of tabernacles,31:11 when all Israel is come to appear before Yahweh your God in the place which he shall choose, you shall read this law before all Israel in their hearing.31:12 Assemble the people, the men and the women and the little ones, and your sojourner that is within your gates, that they may hear, and that they may learn, and fear Yahweh your God, and observe to do all the words of this law;31:13 and that their children, who have not known, may hear, and learn to fear Yahweh your God, as long as ye live in the land whither ye go over the Jordan to possess it.31:14 And Yahweh said to Moses, Behold, your days approach that you must die: call Joshua, and present yourselves in the tent of meeting, that I may give him a charge.  And Moses and Joshua went, and presented themselves in the tent of meeting.31:15 And Yahweh appeared in the Tent in a pillar of cloud: and the pillar of cloud stood over the door of the Tent.31:16 And Yahweh said to Moses, Behold, you shall sleep with your fathers; and this people will rise up, and play the harlot after the strange gods of the land, whither they go to be among them, and will forsake me, and break my covenant which I have made with them.31:17 Then my anger shall be kindled against them in that day, and I will forsake them, and I will hide my face from them, and they shall be devoured, and many evils and troubles shall come upon them; so that they will say in that day, are not these evils come upon us because our God is not among us?31:18 And I will surely hide my face in that day for all the evil which they shall have wrought, in that they are turned to other gods.31:19 Now therefore write ye this song for you, and teach it to the children of Israel: put it in their mouths, that this song may be a witness for me against the children of Israel.31:20 For when I shall have brought them into the land which I swore to their fathers, flowing with milk and honey, and they shall have eaten and filled themselves, and become fat; then will they turn to other gods, and serve them, and despise me, and break my covenant.31:21 And it shall come to pass, when many evils and troubles are come upon them, that this song shall testify before them as a witness; for it shall not be forgotten out of the mouths of their seed: for I know their imagination which they frame this day, before I have brought them into the land which I swore.31:22 So Moses wrote this song the same day, and taught it the children of Israel.31:23 And he gave Joshua the son of Nun a charge, and said, Be strong and of good courage; for you shall bring the children of Israel into the land which I swore to them: and I will be with you.31:24 And it came to pass, when Moses had made an end of writing the words of this law in a book, until they were finished,31:25 that Moses commanded the Levites, that bore the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, saying,31:26 Take this book of the law, and put it by the side of the ark of the covenant of Yahweh your God, that it may be there for a witness against you.31:27 For I know your rebellion, and your stiff neck: behold, while I am yet alive with you this day, ye have been rebellious against Yahweh; and how much more after my death?31:28 Assemble to me all the elders of your tribes, and your officers, that I may speak these words in their ears, and call heaven and earth to witness against them.31:29 For I know that after my death ye will utterly corrupt yourselves, and turn aside from the way which I have commanded you; and evil will befall you in the latter days; because ye will do that which is evil in the sight of Yahweh, to provoke him to anger through the work of your hands.31:30 And Moses spoke in the ears of all the assembly of Israel the words of this song, until they were finished.Chapter 3232:1 Give ear, ye heavens, and I will speak; And let the earth hear the words of my mouth.32:2 My doctrine shall drop as the rain; My speech shall distill as the dew, as the small rain upon the tender grass, and as the showers upon the herb.32:3 For I will proclaim the name of Yahweh: Ascribe ye greatness to our God.32:4 The Rock, his work is perfect; For all his ways are justice: A God of faithfulness and without iniquity, Just and right is he.32:5 They have dealt corruptly with him, they are not his children, it is their blemish; They are a perverse and crooked generation.32:6 In this way ye repay Yahweh, O foolish people and unwise?  Is he not your father who has bought you?  He has made you, and established you.32:7 Remember the days of old, Consider the years of many generations: Ask your father, and he will show you; Your elders, and they will tell you.32:8 When the Most High gave to the nations their inheritance, When he separated the children of men, He set the bounds of the peoples According to the number of the children of Israel.32:9 For Yahweh's portion is his people; Jacob is the lot of his inheritance.32:10 He found him in a desert land, and in the howling wilderness waste; He encircled him, he cared for him, He kept him as the apple of his eye.32:11 As an eagle that stirs up her nest, That flutters over her young, He spread abroad his wings, he took them, He bore them on his pinions.32:12 Yahweh alone did lead him, and there was no foreign god with him.32:13 He caused him to ride on the high places of the earth, and he did eat the increase of the field; And he made him to suck honey out of the rock, and oil out of the flinty rock;32:14 Butter of the herd, and milk of the flock, with fat of lambs, and rams of the breed of Bashan, and goats, with the finest of the wheat; And of the blood of the grape you drank wine.32:15 But Jeshurun became fat, and kicked: You are become fat, you are grown thick, you are become sleek; Then he forsook God who made him, and lightly esteemed the Rock of his salvation.32:16 They moved him to jealousy with strange gods; With abominations provoked they him to anger.32:17 They sacrificed to demons, which were no God, To gods that they knew not, To new gods that came up of late, Which your fathers dreaded not.32:18 Of the Rock that begat you you are unmindful, and have forgotten God that gave you birth.32:19 And Yahweh saw it, and abhorred them, Because of the provocation of his sons and his daughters.32:20 And he said, I will hide my face from them, I will see what their end shall be: For they are a very perverse generation, Children in whom is no faithfulness.32:21 They have moved me to jealousy with that which is not God; They have provoked me to anger with their vanities: And I will move them to jealousy with those that are not a people; I will provoke them to anger with a foolish nation.32:22 For a fire is kindled in my anger, and burns to the lowest Sheol, and devours the earth with its increase, and sets on fire the foundations of the mountains.32:23 I will heap evils upon them; I will spend my arrows upon them:32:24 They shall be wasted with hunger, and devoured with burning heat and bitter destruction; And the teeth of beasts will I send upon them, With the poison of crawling things of the dust.32:25 Outside shall the sword bereave, and inside the chambers terror; It shall destroy both young man and virgin, the suckling with the man of gray hairs.32:26 I said, I would scatter them afar, I would make the remembrance of them to cease from among men,32:27 Were it not that I feared the provocation of the enemy, Lest their adversaries judge amiss, Lest they might say, Our hand is exalted, and Yahweh has not done all this.32:28 For they are a nation void of counsel, and there is no understanding in them.32:29 Oh that they were wise, that they understood this, That they would consider their latter end!32:30 How should one man chase a thousand, and two put ten thousand to flight, except their Rock had sold them, and Yahweh had delivered them up?32:31 For their rock is not as our Rock, Even our enemies themselves being judges.32:32 For their vine is of the vine of Sodom, and of the fields of Gomorrah: Their grapes are grapes of gall, Their clusters are bitterness:32:33 Their wine is the poison of serpents, and the cruel venom of asps.32:34 Is this not laid up in store with me, Sealed up among my treasures?32:35 Vengeance is mine, and recompense, at the time when their foot shall slide: For the day of their calamity is at hand, and the things that are to come upon them shall make haste.32:36 For Yahweh will judge his people, yet feel sorry for his servants; When he sees that their power is gone, and there is no one remaining, shut up or left at large.32:37 And he will say, Where are their gods, The rock in which they took refuge;32:38 Which ate the fat of their sacrifices, and drank the wine of their drink offering?  Let them rise up and help you, Let them be your protection.32:39 See now that I, even I, am he, and there is no god with me: I kill, and I make alive; I wound, and I heal; And there is none that can deliver out of my hand.32:40 For I lift up my hand to heaven, and say, as I live for ever,32:41 If I whet my glittering sword, and my hand take hold on judgment; I will render vengeance to my adversaries, and will recompense those who hate me.32:42 I will make my arrows drunk with blood, and my sword shall devour flesh; With the blood of the slain and the captives, From the head of the leaders of the enemy.32:43 Rejoice, O ye nations, with his people: For he will avenge the blood of his servants,  And will render vengeance to his adversaries, and will make expiation for his land, for his people.32:44 And Moses came and spoke all the words of this song in the ears of the people, he, and Hoshea the son of Nun.32:45 And Moses made an end of speaking all these words to all Israel;32:46 And he said to them, Set your heart to all the words which I testify to you this day, which ye shall command your children to observe to do, that is, all the words of this law.32:47 For it is no vain thing for you; because it is your life, and through this thing ye shall prolong your days in the land, where ye are going over the Jordan to possess it.32:48 And Yahweh spoke to Moses that very same day, saying,32:49 Get you up into this mountain of Abarim, to mount Nebo, which is in the land of Moab, that is over against Jericho; and behold the land of Canaan, which I give to the children of Israel for a possession;32:50 and die in the mount whither you go up, and be gathered to your people, as Aaron your brother died in mount Hor, and was gathered to his people:32:51 because ye trespassed against me in the midst of the children of Israel at the waters of Meribah of Kadesh, in the wilderness of Zin; because ye sanctified me not in the midst of the children of Israel.32:52 For you shall see the land before you; but you shall not go there into the land which I give the children of Israel.Chapter 3333:1 And this is the blessing, with which Moses the man of God blessed the children of Israel before his death.33:2 And he said, Yahweh came from Sinai, and rose from Seir to them; He shined forth from mount Paran, and he came from the ten thousands of holy ones: At his right hand was a fiery law for them.33:3 Yes, he loves the people; All his saints are in your hand: And they sat down at your feet; Every one shall receive of your words.33:4 Moses commanded us a law, an inheritance for the assembly of Jacob.33:5 And he was king in Jeshurun, When the heads of the people were gathered, all the tribes of Israel together.33:6 Let Reuben live, and not die; Nor let his men be few.33:7 And this is the blessing of Judah: and he said, Hear, Yahweh, the voice of Judah, and bring him in to his people.  With his hands he contended for himself; And you shall be a help against his adversaries.33:8 And of Levi he said, Your Thummim and your Urim are with your godly one, Whom you did prove at Massah, With whom you did strive at the waters of Meribah;33:9 Who said of his father, and of his mother, I have not seen him; Neither did he acknowledge his brethren, Nor knew he his own children: For they have observed your word, and keep your covenant.33:10 They shall teach Jacob your ordinances, and Israel your law: They shall put incense before you, and whole burnt offering upon your altar.33:11 Bless, Yahweh, his substance, and accept the work of his hands: Strike through the loins of them that rise up against him, and of them that hate him, that they rise not again.33:12 Of Benjamin he said, The beloved of Yahweh shall dwell in safety by him; He covers him all the day long, and he dwells between his shoulders.33:13 And of Joseph he said, Blessed of Yahweh be his land, For the precious things of heaven, for the dew, and for the deep that crouches beneath,33:14 And for the precious things of the fruits of the sun, and for the precious things of the growth of the moons,33:15 And for the chief things of the ancient mountains, and for the precious things of the everlasting hills,33:16 And for the precious things of the earth and the fulness thereof, and the good will of him that dwelt in the bush.  Let the blessing come upon the head of Joseph, and upon the crown of the head of him that was separate from his brethren.33:17 The firstling of his herd, majesty is his; And his horns are the horns of the wild-ox: With them he shall push the peoples all of them, even the ends of the earth: And they are the ten thousands of Ephraim, and they are the thousands of Manasseh.33:18 And of Zebulun he said, Rejoice, Zebulun, in your going out; And, Issachar, in your tents.33:19 They shall call the peoples to the mountain; There shall they offer sacrifices of righteousness: For they shall suck the abundance of the seas, and the hidden treasures of the sand.33:20 And of Gad he said, Blessed be he that enlarges Gad: He dwells as a lioness, and tears the arm, and the crown of the head as well.33:21 And he provided the first part for himself, For there was the lawgiver's portion reserved; And he came with the heads of the people; He executed the righteousness of Yahweh, and his ordinances with Israel.33:22 And of Dan he said, Dan is a lion's whelp, That leaps forth from Bashan.33:23 And of Naphtali he said, O Naphtali, satisfied with favor, and full with the blessing of Yahweh, Possess you the west and the south.33:24 And of Asher he said, Blessed be Asher with children; Let him be acceptable to his brethren, and let him dip his foot in oil.33:25 Your bars shall be iron and brass; And as your days, so shall your strength be.33:26 There is none like to God, O Jeshurun, Who rides upon the heavens for your help, and in his excellency on the skies.33:27 The eternal God is your dwelling-place, and underneath are the everlasting arms.  And he thrust out the enemy from before you, and said, Destroy.33:28 And Israel dwells in safety, The fountain of Jacob alone, In a land of grain and new wine; Yes, his heavens drop down dew.33:29 Happy are you, O Israel: Who is like to you, a people saved by Yahweh, The shield of your help, and the sword of your excellency! And your enemies shall submit themselves to you; And you shall tread upon their high places.Chapter 3434:1 And Moses went up from the plains of Moab to mount Nebo, to the top of Pisgah, that is over against Jericho.  And Yahweh showed him all the land of Gilead, to Dan,34:2 and all Naphtali, and the land of Ephraim and Manasseh, and all the land of Judah, to the hinder sea,34:3 and the South, and the Plain of the valley of Jericho the city of palm-trees, to Zoar.34:4 And Yahweh said to him, This is the land which I swore to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, saying, I will give it to your seed: I have caused you to see it with your eyes, but you shall not go over there.34:5 So Moses the servant of Yahweh died there in the land of Moab, according to the word of Yahweh.34:6 And he buried him in the valley in the land of Moab over against Beth-peor: but no man knows of his sepulchre to this day.34:7 And Moses was a hundred and twenty years old when he died: his eye was not dim, nor his natural force abated.34:8 And the children of Israel wept for Moses in the plains of Moab thirty days: so the days of weeping in the mourning for Moses were ended.34:9 And Joshua the son of Nun was full of the spirit of wisdom; for Moses had laid his hands upon him: and the children of Israel hearkened to him, and did as Yahweh commanded Moses.34:10 And there has not arisen a prophet since in Israel like to Moses, whom Yahweh knew face to face,34:11 in all the signs and the wonders, which Yahweh sent him to do in the land of Egypt, to Pharaoh, and to all his servants, and to all his land,34:12 and in all the mighty hand, and in all the great terror, which Moses wrought in the sight of all Israel.End of DeuteronomyJoshuaChapter 11:1 Now it came to pass after the death of Moses the servant of Yahweh, that Yahweh spoke to Joshua the son of Nun, Moses' minister, saying,1:2 Moses my servant is dead; now therefore arise, go over this Jordan, you, and all this people, to the land which I do give to them, even to the children of Israel.1:3 Every place that the sole of your foot shall tread upon, to you have I given it, as I spoke to Moses.1:4 From the wilderness, and this Lebanon, even to the great river, the river Euphrates, all the land of the Hittites, and to the great sea toward the going down of the sun, shall be your border.1:5 There shall not any man be able to stand before you all the days of your life.  As I was with Moses, so I will be with you; I will not fail you, nor forsake you.1:6 Be strong and of good courage; for you shall cause this people to inherit the land which I swore to their fathers to give them.1:7 Only be strong and very courageous, to observe to do according to all the law, which Moses my servant commanded you: turn not from it to the right hand or to the left, that you may have good success wherever you go.1:8 This book of the law shall not depart out of your mouth, but you shall meditate upon it day and night, that you may observe to do according to all that is written therein: for then you shall make your way prosperous, and then you shall have good success.1:9 Have not I commanded you?  Be strong and of good courage; be not be afraid, neither be you dismayed: for Yahweh your God is with you wherever you go.1:10 Then Joshua commanded the officers of the people, saying,1:11 Pass through the midst of the camp, and command the people, saying, Prepare you victuals; for within three days ye are to pass over this Jordan, to go in to possess the land, which Yahweh your God gives you to possess it.1:12 And to the Reubenites, and to the Gadites, and to the half-tribe of Manasseh, spoke Joshua, saying,1:13 Remember the word which Moses the servant of Yahweh commanded you, saying, Yahweh your God gives you rest, and will give you this land.1:14 Your wives, your little ones, and your cattle, shall abide in the land which Moses gave you beyond the Jordan; but ye shall pass over before your brethren armed, all the mighty men of valor, and shall help them;1:15 until Yahweh have given your brethren rest, as he has given you, and they also have possessed the land which Yahweh your God gives them: then ye shall return to the land of your possession, and possess it, which Moses the servant of Yahweh gave you beyond the Jordan toward the sunrising.1:16 And they answered Joshua, saying, all that you have commanded us we will do, and wherever you send us we will go.1:17 According as we hearkened to Moses in all things, so will we hearken to you: only Yahweh your God be with you, as he was with Moses.1:18 Whosoever he be that shall rebel against your commandment, and shall not hearken to your words in all that you command him, he shall be put to death: only be strong and of good courage.Chapter 22:1 And Joshua the son of Nun sent out of Shittim two men as spies secretly, saying, Go, view the land, and Jericho.  And they went and came into the house of a harlot whose name was Rahab, and lay there.2:2 And it was told the king of Jericho, saying, Behold, there came men in here to-night of the children of Israel to search out the land.2:3 And the king of Jericho sent to Rahab, saying, Bring forth the men that are come to you, that are entered into your house; for they are come to search out all the land.2:4 And the woman took the two men, and hid them; and she said, Yes, the men came to me, but I knew not where they were from:2:5 and it came to pass about the time of the shutting of the gate, when it was dark, that the men went out; where the men went I know not: pursue them quickly; for ye will overtake them.2:6 But she had brought them up to the roof, and hid them with the stalks of flax, which she had laid in order upon the roof.2:7 And the men pursued after them the way to the Jordan to the fords: and as soon as they that pursued after them were gone out, they shut the gate.2:8 And before they were laid down, she came up to them upon the roof;2:9 and she said to the men, I know that Yahweh has given you the land, and that the fear of you is fallen upon us, and that all the inhabitants of the land melt away before you.2:10 For we have heard how Yahweh dried up the water of the Red Sea before you, when ye came out of Egypt; and what ye did to the two kings of the Amorites, that were beyond the Jordan, to Sihon and to Og, whom ye utterly destroyed.2:11 And as soon as we had heard it, our hearts did melt, neither did there remain any more spirit in any man, because of you: for Yahweh your God, he is God in heaven above, and on earth beneath.2:12 Now therefore, I pray you, swear to me by Yahweh, since I have dealt kindly with you, that ye also will deal kindly with my father's house, and give me a true token;2:13 and that ye will save alive my father, and my mother, and my brethren, and my sisters, and all that they have, and will deliver our lives from death.2:14 And the men said to her, Our life for yours, if ye utter not this our business; and it shall be, when Yahweh gives us the land, that we will deal kindly and truly with you.2:15 Then she let them down by a cord through the window: for her house was upon the side of the wall, and she dwelt upon the wall.2:16 And she said to them, Get you to the mountain, lest the pursuers light upon you; and hide yourselves there three days, until the pursuers be returned: and afterward may ye go your way.2:17 And the men said to her, We will be guiltless of this your oath which you have made us to swear.2:18 Behold, when we come into the land, you shall bind this line of scarlet thread in the window which you did let us down by: and you shall gather to you into the house your father, and your mother, and your brethren, and all your father's household.2:19 And it shall be, that whosoever shall go out of the doors of your house into the street, his blood shall be upon his head, and we shall be guiltless: and whosoever shall be with you in the house, his blood shall be on our head, if any hand be upon him.2:20 But if you utter this our business, then we shall be guiltless of your oath which you have made us to swear.2:21 And she said, according to your words, so be it.  And she sent them away, and they departed: and she bound the scarlet line in the window.2:22 And they went, and came to the mountain, and abode there three days, until the pursuers were returned: and the pursuers sought them throughout all the way, but found them not.2:23 Then the two men returned, and descended from the mountain, and passed over, and came to Joshua the son of Nun; and they told him all that had befallen them.2:24 And they said to Joshua, Truly Yahweh has delivered into our hands all the land; and moreover all the inhabitants of the land do melt away before us.Chapter 33:1 And Joshua rose up early in the morning; and they removed from Shittim, and came to the Jordan, he and all the children of Israel; and they lodged there before they passed over.3:2 And it came to pass after three days, that the officers went through the midst of the camp;3:3 and they commanded the people, saying, When ye see the ark of the covenant of Yahweh your God, and the priests the Levites bearing it, then ye shall remove from your place, and go after it.3:4 Yet there shall be a space between you and it, about two thousand cubits by measure: come not near to it, that ye may know the way by which ye must go; for ye have not passed this way heretofore.3:5 And Joshua said to the people, Sanctify yourselves; for tomorrow Yahweh will do wonders among you.3:6 And Joshua spoke to the priests, saying, Take up the ark of the covenant, and pass over before the people.  And they took up the ark of the covenant, and went before the people.3:7 And Yahweh said to Joshua, This day will I begin to magnify you in the sight of all Israel, that they may know that, as I was with Moses, so I will be with you.3:8 And you shall command the priests that bear the ark of the covenant, saying, When ye are come to the brink of the waters of the Jordan, ye shall stand still in the Jordan.3:9 And Joshua said to the children of Israel, Come here, and hear the words of Yahweh your God.3:10 And Joshua said, Hereby ye shall know that the living God is among you, and that he will without fail drive out from before you the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and the Hivite, and the Perizzite, and the Girgashite, and the Amorite, and the Jebusite.3:11 Behold, the ark of the covenant of the Lord of all the earth passes over before you into the Jordan.3:12 Now therefore take you twelve men out of the tribes of Israel, for every tribe a man.3:13 And it shall come to pass, when the soles of the feet of the priests that bear the ark of Yahweh, the Lord of all the earth, shall rest in the waters of the Jordan, that the waters of the Jordan shall be cut off, even the waters that come down from above; and they shall stand in one heap.3:14 And it came to pass, when the people removed from their tents, to pass over the Jordan, the priests that bore the ark of the covenant being before the people;3:15 and when they that bore the ark were come to the Jordan, and the feet of the priests that bore the ark were dipped in the brink of the water (for the Jordan overflows all its banks all the time of harvest,)3:16 that the waters which came down from above stood, and rose up in one heap, a great way off, at Adam, the city that is beside Zarethan; and those that went down toward the sea of the Arabah, even the Salt Sea, were wholly cut off: and the people passed over right against Jericho.3:17 And the priests that bore the ark of the covenant of Yahweh stood firm on dry ground in the midst of the Jordan; and all Israel passed over on dry ground, until all the nation were passed clean over the Jordan.Chapter 44:1 And it came to pass, when all the nation were clean passed over the Jordan, that Yahweh spoke to Joshua, saying,4:2 Take you twelve men out of the people, out of every tribe a man,4:3 and command ye them, saying, Get yourselves out of here, out of the midst of the Jordan, out of the place where the priests' feet stood firm, twelve stones, and carry them over with you, and lay them down in the lodging-place, where ye shall lodge this night.4:4 Then Joshua called the twelve men, whom he had prepared of the children of Israel, out of every tribe a man:4:5 and Joshua said to them, Pass over before the ark of Yahweh your God into the midst of the Jordan, and take you up every man of you a stone upon his shoulder, according to the number of the tribes of the children of Israel;4:6 that this may be a sign among you, that, when your children ask in time to come, saying, What mean ye by these stones?4:7 then ye shall say to them, Because the waters of the Jordan were cut off before the ark of the covenant of Yahweh; when it passed over the Jordan, the waters of the Jordan were cut off: and these stones shall be for a memorial to the children of Israel for ever.4:8 And the children of Israel did so as Joshua commanded, and took up twelve stones out of the midst of the Jordan, as Yahweh spoke to Joshua, according to the number of the tribes of the children of Israel; and they carried them over with them to the place where they lodged, and laid them down there.4:9 And Joshua set up twelve stones in the midst of the Jordan, in the place where the feet of the priests that bore the ark of the covenant stood: and they are there to this day.4:10 For the priests that bore the ark stood in the midst of the Jordan, until everything was finished that Yahweh commanded Joshua to speak to the people, according to all that Moses commanded Joshua: and the people hasted and passed over.4:11 And it came to pass, when all the people were clean passed over, that the ark of Yahweh passed over, and the priests, in the presence of the people.4:12 And the children of Reuben, and the children of Gad, and the half-tribe of Manasseh, passed over armed before the children of Israel, as Moses spoke to them:4:13 about forty thousand ready armed for war passed over before Yahweh to battle, to the plains of Jericho.4:14 On that day Yahweh magnified Joshua in the sight of all Israel; and they feared him, as they feared Moses, all the days of his life.4:15 And Yahweh spoke to Joshua, saying,4:16 Command the priests that bear the ark of the testimony, that they come up out of the Jordan.4:17 Joshua therefore commanded the priests, saying, Come ye up out of the Jordan.4:18 And it came to pass, when the priests that bore the ark of the covenant of Yahweh were come up out of the midst of the Jordan, and the soles of the priests' feet were lifted up to the dry ground, that the waters of the Jordan returned to their place, and went over all its banks, as aforetime.4:19 And the people came up out of the Jordan on the tenth day of the first month, and encamped in Gilgal, on the east border of Jericho.4:20 And those twelve stones, which they took out of the Jordan, did Joshua set up in Gilgal.4:21 And he spoke to the children of Israel, saying, When your children shall ask their fathers in time to come, saying, What mean these stones?4:22 Then ye shall let your children know, saying, Israel came over this Jordan on dry land.4:23 For Yahweh your God dried up the waters of the Jordan from before you, until ye were passed over, as Yahweh your God did to the Red Sea, which he dried up from before us, until we were passed over;4:24 that all the peoples of the earth may know the hand of Yahweh, that it is mighty; that ye may fear Yahweh your God for ever.Chapter 55:1 And it came to pass, when all the kings of the Amorites, that were beyond the Jordan westward, and all the kings of the Canaanites, that were by the sea, heard how that Yahweh had dried up the waters of the Jordan from before the children of Israel, until we were passed over, that their heart melted, neither was there spirit in them any more, because of the children of Israel.5:2 At that time Yahweh said to Joshua, Make you knives of flint, and circumcise again the children of Israel the second time.5:3 And Joshua made him knives of lint, and circumcised the children of Israel at the hill of the foreskins.5:4 And this is the cause why Joshua did circumcise: all the people that came forth out of Egypt, that were males, even all the men of war, died in the wilderness by the way, after they came forth out of Egypt.5:5 For all the people that came out were circumcised; but all the people that were born in the wilderness by the way as they came forth out of Egypt, they had not circumcised.5:6 For the children of Israel walked forty years in the wilderness, till all the nation, even the men of war that came forth out of Egypt, were consumed, because they hearkened not to the voice of Yahweh: to whom Yahweh swore that he would not let them see the land which Yahweh swore to their fathers that he would give us, a land flowing with milk and honey.5:7 And their children, whom he raised up in their stead, them did Joshua circumcise: for they were uncircumcised, because they had not circumcised them by the way.5:8 And it came to pass, when they had done circumcising all the nation, that they abode in their places in the camp, till they were whole.5:9 And Yahweh said to Joshua, This day have I rolled away the reproach of Egypt from off you.  Wherefore the name of that place was called Gilgal, to this day.5:10 And the children of Israel encamped in Gilgal; and they kept the passover on the fourteenth day of the month at even in the plains of Jericho.5:11 And they did eat of the produce of the land on the morrow after the passover, unleavened cakes and parched grain, in the selfsame day.5:12 And the manna ceased on the morrow, after they had eaten of the produce of the land; neither had the children of Israel manna any more; but they did eat of the fruit of the land of Canaan that year.5:13 And it came to pass, when Joshua was by Jericho, that he lifted up his eyes and looked, and, behold, there stood a man over against him with his sword drawn in his hand: and Joshua went to him, and said to him, are you for us, or for our adversaries?5:14 And he said, Nay; but as prince of the host of Yahweh am I now come.  And Joshua fell on his face to the earth, and did worship, and said to him, What says my lord to his servant?5:15 And the prince of Yahweh's host said to Joshua, Put off your shoe from off your foot; for the place whereon you stand is holy.  And Joshua did so.Chapter 66:1 Now Jericho was straitly shut up because of the children of Israel: none went out, and none came in.6:2 And Yahweh said to Joshua, See, I have given into your hand Jericho, and the king thereof, and the mighty men of valor.6:3 And ye shall compass the city, all the men of war, going about the city once.  Thus shall you do six days.6:4 And seven priests shall bear seven trumpets of rams' horns before the ark: and the seventh day ye shall compass the city seven times, and the priests shall blow the trumpets.6:5 And it shall be, that, when they make a long blast with the ram's horn, and when ye hear the sound of the trumpet, all the people shall shout with a great shout; and the wall of the city shall fall down flat, and the people shall go up every man straight before him.6:6 And Joshua the son of Nun called the priests, and said to them, Take up the ark of the covenant, and let seven priests bear seven trumpets of rams' horns before the ark of Yahweh.6:7 And they said to the people, Pass on, and compass the city, and let the armed men pass on before the ark of Yahweh.6:8 And it was so, that, when Joshua had spoken to the people, the seven priests bearing the seven trumpets of rams' horns before Yahweh passed on, and blew the trumpets: and the ark of the covenant of Yahweh followed them.6:9 And the armed men went before the priests that blew the trumpets, and the rearward went after the ark, the priests blowing the trumpets as they went.6:10 And Joshua commanded the people, saying, You shall not shout, nor let your voice be heard, neither shall any word proceed out of your mouth, until the day I bid you shout; then shall ye shout.6:11 So he caused the ark of Yahweh to compass the city, going about it once: and they came into the camp, and lodged in the camp.6:12 And Joshua rose early in the morning, and the priests took up the ark of Yahweh.6:13 And the seven priests bearing the seven trumpets of rams' horns before the ark of Yahweh went on continually, and blew the trumpets: and the armed men went before them; and the rearward came after the ark of Yahweh, the priests blowing the trumpets as they went.6:14 And the second day they circled the city once, and returned into the camp: this they did six days.6:15 And it came to pass on the seventh day, that they rose early at the dawning of the day, and circled the city after the same manner seven times.  Only on that day they circled the city seven times.6:16 And it came to pass at the seventh time, when the priests blew the trumpets, Joshua said to the people, Shout; for Yahweh has given you the city.6:17 And the city shall be devoted, even it and all that is therein, to Yahweh: only Rahab the harlot shall live, she and all that are with her in the house, because she hid the messengers that we sent.6:18 But as for you, only keep yourselves from the devoted thing, lest when ye have devoted it, ye take of the devoted thing; so would ye make the camp of Israel accursed, and trouble it.6:19 But all the silver, and gold, and vessels of brass and iron, are holy to Yahweh: they shall come into the treasury of Yahweh.6:20 So the people shouted, and the priests blew the trumpets; and it came to pass, that when the people heard the sound of the trumpet, they shouted with a great shout, and the wall fell down flat, so that the people went up into the city, every man straight before him, and they took the city.6:21 And they utterly destroyed all that was in the city, both man and woman, both young and old, and ox, and sheep, and donkey, with the edge of the sword.6:22 And Joshua said to the two men that had spied out the land, Go into the harlot's house, and bring out there the woman, and all that she has, as ye swore to her.6:23 And the young men the spies went in, and brought out Rahab, and her father, and her mother, and her brethren, and all that she had; all her relatives also they brought out; and they set them outside the camp of Israel.6:24 And they burnt the city with fire, and all that was in it; only the silver, and the gold, and the vessels of brass and of iron, they put into the treasury of the house of Yahweh.6:25 But Rahab the harlot, and her father's household, and all that she had, Joshua saved alive; and she dwelt in the midst of Israel to this day, because she hid the messengers, whom Joshua sent to spy out Jericho.6:26 And Joshua charged them with an oath at that time, saying, Cursed be the man before Yahweh, that rises up and builds this city Jericho: with the loss of his first-born shall he lay the foundation thereof, and with the loss of his youngest son shall he set up the gates of it.6:27 So Yahweh was with Joshua; and his fame was in all the land.Chapter 77:1 But the children of Israel committed a trespass in the matter of the devoted thing; for Achan, the son of Carmi, the son of Zabdi, the son of Zerah, of the tribe of Judah, took of the devoted thing: and the anger of Yahweh was kindled against the children of Israel.7:2 And Joshua sent men from Jericho to Ai, which is beside Beth-aven, on the east side of Beth-el, and spoke to them, saying, Go up and spy out the land.  And the men went up and spied out Ai.7:3 And they returned to Joshua, and said to him, Let not all the people go up; but let about two or three thousand men go up and attack Ai; make not all the people to toil there; for they are but few.7:4 So there went up there of the people about three thousand men: and they fled before the men of Ai.7:5 And the men of Ai struck down about thirty-six men of them; and they chased them from before the gate to as far as Shebarim, and attacked them at the descent.  And the hearts of the people melted, and became as water.7:6 And Joshua ripped his clothes, and fell to the earth upon his face before the ark of Yahweh until the evening, he and the elders of Israel; and they put dust on their heads.7:7 And Joshua said, alas, O Lord Yahweh, why have you brought this people over the Jordan at all? To deliver us into the hand of the Amorites, to cause us to perish?  Wvould that we had been content and dwelt on the other side of the Jordan!7:8 Oh, Lord, what shall I say, when Israel has turned their backs before their enemies!7:9 For the Canaanites and all the inhabitants of the land will hear of it, and will circle us round, and cut off our name from the earth: and what will you do for your great name?7:10 And Yahweh said to Joshua, Get up; why are you fallen this way upon your face?7:11 Israel has sinned; they have also transgressed my covenant which I commanded them: yes, they have even taken of the devoted thing, and have also stolen, and lied about it as well; and they have even put it among their own stuff.7:12 This is why the children of Israel cannot stand before their enemies.  They turn their backs before their enemies, because they are become accursed: I will not be with you any more, unless ye destroy the devoted thing from among you.7:13 Up, sanctify the people, and say, Sanctify yourselves against tomorrow: for thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, There is a devoted thing in the midst of you, O Israel; you cannot stand before your enemies, until ye take away the devoted thing from among you.7:14 In the morning therefore ye shall be brought near by your tribes: and it shall be, that the tribe which Yahweh takes by lot shall come near by families; and the family which Yahweh shall take shall come near by households; and the household which Yahweh shall take shall come near man by man.7:15 And it shall be, that he that is taken with the devoted thing shall be burnt with fire, he and all that he has; because he has transgressed the covenant of Yahweh, and because he has committed an infamy in Israel.7:16 So Joshua rose up early in the morning, and brought Israel near by their tribes; and the tribe of Judah was taken:7:17 and he brought near the family of Judah; and he took the family of the Zerahites: and he brought near the family of the Zerahites man by man; and Zabdi was taken:7:18 and he brought near his household man by man; and Achan, the son of Carmi, the son of Zabdi, the son of Zerah, of the tribe of Judah, was taken.7:19 And Joshua said to Achan, My son, give, I pray you, glory to Yahweh, the God of Israel, and make confession to him; and tell me now what you have done; do not hide it from me.7:20 And Achan answered Joshua, and said, Of a truth I have sinned against Yahweh, the God of Israel, and thus and thus have I done:7:21 when I saw among the spoil a beautiful Babylonish mantle, and two hundred shekels of silver, and a wedge of gold fifty shekels in weight, then I coveted them, and took them; and, behold, they are hidden in the ground in the midst of my tent, and the silver under it.7:22 So Joshua sent messengers, and they ran to the tent; and, behold, it was hidden in his tent, and the silver under it.7:23 And they took them from the midst of the tent, and brought them to Joshua, and to all the children of Israel; and they laid them down before Yahweh.7:24 And Joshua, and all Israel with him, took Achan the son of Zerah, and the silver, and the mantle, and the wedge of gold, and his sons, and his daughters, and his oxen, and his asses, and his sheep, and his tent, and all that he had: and they brought them up to the valley of Achor.7:25 And Joshua said, Why have you troubled us?  Yahweh shall trouble you this day.  And all Israel stoned him with stones; and they burned them with fire, and stoned them with stones.7:26 And they raised over him a great heap of stones, to this day; and Yahweh turned from the fierceness of his anger.  Therefore the name of that place was called, The valley of Achor, to this day.Chapter 88:1 And Yahweh said to Joshua, Fear not, neither be dismayed: take all the people of war with you, and arise, go up to Ai; see, I have given into your hand the king of Ai, and his people, and his city, and his land;8:2 And you shall do to Ai and her king as you did to Jericho and her king: only the spoil thereof, and the cattle thereof, shall ye take for a prey to yourselves: set you an ambush for the city behind it.8:3 So Joshua arose, and all the people of war, to go up to Ai: and Joshua chose out thirty thousand men, the mighty men of valor, and sent them forth by night.8:4 And he commanded them, saying, Behold, ye shall lie in ambush against the city, behind the city; go not very far from the city, but be ye all ready:8:5 and I, and all the people that are with me, will approach to the city.  And it shall come to pass, when they come out against us, as at the first, that we will flee before them;8:6 and they will come out after us, till we have drawn them away from the city; for they will say, They flee before us, as at the first: so we will flee before them;8:7 and ye shall rise up from the ambush, and take possession of the city: for Yahweh your God will deliver it into your hand.8:8 And it shall be, when ye have seized upon the city, that ye shall set the city on fire; according to the word of Yahweh shall ye do: see, I have commanded you.8:9 And Joshua sent them forth; and they went to the ambushment, and abode between Beth-el and Ai, on the west side of Ai: but Joshua lodged that night among the people.8:10 And Joshua arose up early in the morning, and mustered the people, and went up, he and the elders of Israel, before the people to Ai.8:11 And all the people, even the men of war that were with him, went up, and drew near, and came before the city, and encamped on the north side of Ai: now there was a valley between him and Ai.8:12 And he took about five thousand men, and set them in ambush between Beth-el and Ai, on the west side of the city.8:13 So they set the people, even all the host that was on the north of the city, and their liers-in-wait that were on the west of the city; and Joshua went that night into the midst of the valley.8:14 And it came to pass, when the king of Ai saw it, that they hasted and rose up early, and the men of the city went out against Israel to battle, he and all his people, at the time appointed, before the Arabah; but he knew not that there was an ambush against him behind the city.8:15 And Joshua and all Israel made as if they were beaten before them, and fled by the way of the wilderness.8:16 And all the people that were in the city were called together to pursue after them: and they pursued after Joshua, and were drawn away from the city.8:17 And there was not a man left in Ai or Beth-el, that went not out after Israel: and they left the city open, and pursued after Israel.8:18 And Yahweh said to Joshua, Stretch out the javelin that is in your hand toward Ai; for I will give it into your hand.  And Joshua stretched out the javelin that was in his hand toward the city.8:19 And the ambush arose quickly out of their place, and they ran as soon as he had stretched out his hand, and entered into the city, and took it; and they hasted and set the city on fire.8:20 And when the men of Ai looked behind them, they saw, and, behold, the smoke of the city ascended up to heaven, and they had no power to flee this way or that way: and the people that fled to the wilderness turned back upon the pursuers.8:21 And when Joshua and all Israel saw that the ambush had taken the city, and that the smoke of the city ascended, then they turned again, and slew the men of Ai.8:22 And the others came forth out of the city against them; so they were in the midst of Israel, some on this side, and some on that side: and they smote them, so that they let none of them remain or escape.8:23 And the king of Ai they took alive, and brought him to Joshua.8:24 And it came to pass, when Israel had made an end of slaying all the inhabitants of Ai in the field, in the wilderness in which they pursued them, and they were all fallen by the edge of the sword, until they were consumed, that all Israel returned to Ai, and smote it with the edge of the sword.8:25 And all that fell that day, both of men and women, were twelve thousand, even all the men of Ai.8:26 For Joshua drew not back his hand, with which he stretched out the javelin, until he had utterly destroyed all the inhabitants of Ai.8:27 Only the cattle and the spoil of that city Israel took for prey to themselves, according to the word of Yahweh which he commanded Joshua.8:28 So Joshua burnt Ai, and made it a heap for ever, even a desolation, to this day.8:29 And the king of Ai, he hung on a tree until the evening: and at the going down of the sun Joshua gave the order, and they took his body down from the tree, and cast it at the entrance of the gate of the city, and raised on top of it a great heap of stones, to this day.8:30 Then Joshua built an altar to Yahweh, the God of Israel, in mount Ebal,8:31 as Moses the servant of Yahweh commanded the children of Israel, as it is written in the book of the law of Moses, an altar of unhewn stones, upon which no man had lifted up any iron: and they offered upon it burnt offerings to Yahweh, and sacrificed peace offerings.8:32 And he wrote there upon the stones a copy of the law of Moses, which he wrote, in the presence of the children of Israel.8:33 And all Israel, and their elders and officers, and their judges, stood on this side of the ark and on that side before the priests the Levites, that bore the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, as well the sojourner as the homeborn; half of them in front of mount Gerizim, and half of them in front of mount Ebal; as Moses the servant of Yahweh had commanded at the first, that they should bless the people of Israel.8:34 And afterward he read all the words of the law, the blessing and the curse, according to all that is written in the book of the law.8:35 There was not a word of all that Moses commanded, which Joshua read not before all the assembly of Israel, and the women, and the little ones, and the sojourners that were among them.Chapter 99:1 And it came to pass, when all the kings that were beyond the Jordan, in the hill-country, and in the lowland, and on all the shore of the great sea in front of Lebanon, the Hittite, and the Amorite, the Canaanite, the Perizzite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite, heard thereof;9:2 that they gathered themselves together, to fight with Joshua and with Israel, with one accord.9:3 But when the inhabitants of Gibeon heard what Joshua had done to Jericho and to Ai,9:4 they also did work wilily, and went and made as if they had been ambassadors, and took old sacks upon their asses, and wine-skins, old and rent and bound up,9:5 and old and patched shoes upon their feet, and old garments upon them; and all the bread of their provision was dry and was become mouldy.9:6 And they went to Joshua to the camp at Gilgal, and said to him, and to the men of Israel, We are come from a far country: now therefore make ye a covenant with us.9:7 And the men of Israel said to the Hivites, Peradventure ye dwell among us; and how shall we make a covenant with you?9:8 And they said to Joshua, We are your servants.  And Joshua said to them, Who are ye?  and from where come ye?9:9 And they said to him, From a very far country your servants are come because of the name of Yahweh your God: for we have heard the fame of him, and all that he did in Egypt,9:10 and all that he did to the two kings of the Amorites, that were beyond the Jordan, to Sihon king of Heshbon, and to Og king of Bashan, who was at Ashtaroth.9:11 And our elders and all the inhabitants of our country spoke to us, saying, Take provision in your hand for the journey, and go to meet them, and say to them, We are your servants: and now make ye a covenant with us.9:12 This our bread we took hot for our provision out of our houses on the day we came forth to go to you; but now, behold, it is dry, and is become mouldy:9:13 and these wine-skins, which we filled, were new; and, behold, they are rent: and these our garments and our shoes are become old by reason of the very long journey.9:14 And the men took of their provision, and asked not counsel at the mouth of Yahweh.9:15 And Joshua made peace with them, and made a covenant with them, to let them live: and the princes of the congregation swore to them.9:16 And it came to pass at the end of three days after they had made a covenant with them, that they heard that they were their neighbors, and that they dwelt among them.9:17 And the children of Israel journeyed, and came to their cities on the third day.  Now their cities were Gibeon, and Chephirah, and Beeroth, and Kiriath-jearim.9:18 And the children of Israel smote them not, because the princes of the congregation had sworn to them by Yahweh, the God of Israel.  And all the congregation murmured against the princes.9:19 But all the princes said to all the congregation, We have sworn to them by Yahweh, the God of Israel: now therefore we may not touch them.9:20 This we will do to them, and let them live; lest wrath be upon us, because of the oath which we swore to them.9:21 And the princes said to them, Let them live: so they became hewers of wood and drawers of water to all the congregation, as the princes had spoken to them.9:22 And Joshua called for them, and he spoke to them, saying, Why have ye beguiled us, saying, We are very far from you; when ye dwell among us?9:23 Now therefore ye are cursed, and there shall never fail to be of you bondmen, both hewers of wood and drawers of water for the house of my God.9:24 And they answered Joshua, and said, Because it was certainly told your servants, how that Yahweh your God commanded his servant Moses to give you all the land, and to destroy all the inhabitants of the land from before you; therefore we were sore afraid for our lives because of you, and have done this thing.9:25 And now, behold, we are in your hand: as it seems good and right to you to do to us, do.9:26 And so did he to them, and delivered them out of the hand of the children of Israel, that they slew them not.9:27 And Joshua made them that day hewers of wood and drawers of water for the congregation, and for the altar of Yahweh, to this day, in the place which he should choose.Chapter 1010:1 Now it came to pass, when Adoni-zedek king of Jerusalem heard how Joshua had taken Ai, and had utterly destroyed it; as he had done to Jericho and her king, so he had done to Ai and her king; and how the inhabitants of Gibeon had made peace with Israel, and were among them;10:2 that they feared greatly, because Gibeon was a great city, as one of the royal cities, and because it was greater than Ai, and all the men thereof were mighty.10:3 Wherefore Adoni-zedek king of Jerusalem sent to Hoham king of Hebron, and to Piram king of Jarmuth, and to Japhia king of Lachish, and to Debir king of Eglon, saying,10:4 Come up to me, and help me, and let us attack Gibeon; for it has made peace with Joshua and with the children of Israel.10:5 Therefore the five kings of the Amorites, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, the king of Eglon, gathered themselves together, and went up, they and all their hosts, and encamped against Gibeon, and made war against it.10:6 And the men of Gibeon sent to Joshua to the camp to Gilgal, saying, Slack not your hand from your servants;  come up to us quickly, and save us, and help us: for all the kings of the Amorites that dwell in the hill-country are gathered together against us.10:7 So Joshua went up from Gilgal, he, and all the people of war with him, and all the mighty men of valor.10:8 And Yahweh said to Joshua, Fear them not: for I have delivered them into your hands; there shall not a man of them stand before you.10:9 Joshua therefore came upon them suddenly; for he went up from Gilgal all the night.10:10 And Yahweh discomfited them before Israel, and he slew them with a great slaughter at Gibeon, and chased them by the way of the ascent of Beth-horon, and smote them to Azekah, and to Makkedah.10:11 And it came to pass, as they fled from before Israel, while they were at the descent of Beth-horon, that Yahweh cast down great stones from heaven upon them to Azekah, and they died: they were more who died with the hailstones than they whom the children of Israel slew with the sword.10:12 Then spoke Joshua to Yahweh in the day when Yahweh delivered up the Amorites before the children of Israel; and he said in the sight of Israel, Sun, stand you still upon Gibeon; And you, Moon, in the valley of Aijalon.10:13 And the sun stood still, and the moon stayed, Until the nation had avenged themselves of their enemies.  Is not this written in the book of Jashar?  And the sun stayed in the midst of heaven, and hasted not to go down about a whole day.10:14 And there was no day like that before it or after it, that Yahweh hearkened to the voice of a man: for Yahweh fought for Israel.10:15 And Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, to the camp to Gilgal.10:16 And these five kings fled, and hid themselves in the cave at Makkedah.10:17 And it was told Joshua, saying, The five kings are found, hidden in the cave at Makkedah.10:18 And Joshua said, Roll great stones to the mouth of the cave, and set men by it to keep them:10:19 but stay not ye; pursue after your enemies, and strike the rearmost of them; do not allow them to enter into their cities: for Yahweh your God has delivered them into your hand.10:20 And it came to pass, when Joshua and the children of Israel had made an end of slaying them with a very great slaughter, till they were consumed, and the remnant which remained of them had entered into the fortified cities,10:21 that all the people returned to the camp to Joshua at Makkedah in peace: none moved his tongue against any of the children of Israel.10:22 Then said Joshua, Open the mouth of the cave, and bring forth those five kings to me out of the cave.10:23 And they did so, and brought forth those five kings to him out of the cave, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, the king of Eglon.10:24 And it came to pass, when they brought forth those kings to Joshua, that Joshua called for all the men of Israel, and said to the chiefs of the men of war that went with him, Come near, put your feet upon the necks of these kings.  And they came near, and put their feet upon the necks of them.10:25 And Joshua said to them, Fear not, nor be dismayed; be strong and of good courage: for thus shall Yahweh do to all your enemies against whom ye fight.10:26 And afterward Joshua smote them, and put them to death, and hanged them on five trees: and they were hanging upon the trees until the evening.10:27 And it came to pass at the time of the going down of the sun, that Joshua commanded, and they took them down off the trees, and cast them into the cave in which they had hidden themselves, and laid great stones on the mouth of the cave, to this very day.10:28 And Joshua took Makkedah on that day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and the king thereof: he utterly destroyed them and all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining; and he did to the king of Makkedah as he had done to the king of Jericho.10:29 And Joshua passed from Makkedah, and all Israel with him, to Libnah, and fought against Libnah:10:30 and Yahweh delivered it also, and the king thereof, into the hand of Israel; and he smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining in it; and he did to the king thereof as he had done to the king of Jericho.10:31 And Joshua passed from Libnah, and all Israel with him, to Lachish, and encamped against it, and fought against it:10:32 and Yahweh delivered Lachish into the hand of Israel; and he took it on the second day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein, according to all that he had done to Libnah.10:33 Then Horam king of Gezer came up to help Lachish; and Joshua smote him and his people, until he had left him none remaining.10:34 And Joshua passed from Lachish, and all Israel with him, to Eglon; and they encamped against it, and fought against it;10:35 and they took it on that day, and smote it with the edge of the sword; and all the souls that were therein he utterly destroyed that day, according to all that he had done to Lachish.10:36 And Joshua went up from Eglon, and all Israel with him, to Hebron; and they fought against it:10:37 and they took it, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and the king thereof, and all the cities thereof, and all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining, according to all that he had done to Eglon; but he utterly destroyed it, and all the souls that were therein.10:38 And Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, to Debir, and fought against it:10:39 and he took it, and the king thereof, and all the cities thereof; and they smote them with the edge of the sword, and utterly destroyed all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining: as he had done to Hebron, so he did to Debir, and to the king thereof; as he had done also to Libnah, and to the king thereof.10:40 So Joshua smote all the land, the hill-country, and the South, and the lowland, and the slopes, and all their kings: he left none remaining, but he utterly destroyed all that breathed, as Yahweh, the God of Israel, commanded.10:41 And Joshua smote them from Kadesh-barnea even to Gaza, and all the country of Goshen, even to Gibeon.10:42 And all these kings and their land did Joshua take at one time, because Yahweh, the God of Israel, fought for Israel.10:43 And Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, to the camp to Gilgal.Chapter 1111:1 And it came to pass, when Jabin king of Hazor heard thereof, that he sent to Jobab king of Madon, and to the king of Shimron, and to the king of Achshaph,11:2 and to the kings that were on the north, in the hill-country, and in the Arabah south of Chinneroth, and in the lowland, and in the heights of Dor on the west,11:3 to the Canaanite on the east and on the west, and the Amorite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, and the Jebusite in the hill-country, and the Hivite under Hermon in the land of Mizpah.11:4 And they went out, they and all their hosts with them, much people, even as the sand that is upon the sea-shore in multitude, with horses and chariots very many.11:5 And all these kings met together; and they came and encamped together at the waters of Merom, to fight with Israel.11:6 And Yahweh said to Joshua, Be not afraid because of them; for tomorrow at this time will I deliver them up all slain before Israel: you shall hock their horses, and burn their chariots with fire.11:7 So Joshua came, and all the people of war with him, against them by the waters of Merom suddenly, and fell upon them.11:8 And Yahweh delivered them into the hand of Israel, and they smote them, and chased them to great Sidon, and to Misrephoth-maim, and to the valley of Mizpeh eastward; and they smote them, until they left them none remaining.11:9 And Joshua did to them as Yahweh commanded him: he hocked their horses, and burnt their chariots with fire.11:10 And Joshua turned back at that time, and took Hazor, and smote the king thereof with the sword: for Hazor beforetime was the head of all those kingdoms.11:11 And they smote all the souls that were therein with the edge of the sword, utterly destroying them; there was none left that breathed: and he burnt Hazor with fire.11:12 And all the cities of those kings, and all the kings of them, did Joshua take, and he smote them with the edge of the sword, and utterly destroyed them; as Moses the servant of Yahweh commanded.11:13 But as for the cities that stood on their mounds, Israel burned none of them, save Hazor only; that did Joshua burn.11:14 And all the spoil of these cities, and the cattle, the children of Israel took for a prey to themselves; but every man they smote with the edge of the sword, until they had destroyed them, neither left they any that breathed.11:15 As Yahweh commanded Moses his servant, so did Moses command Joshua: and so did Joshua; he left nothing undone of all that Yahweh commanded Moses.11:16 So Joshua took all that land, the hill-country, and all the South, and all the land of Goshen, and the lowland, and the Arabah, and the hill-country of Israel, and the lowland of the same;11:17 from mount Halak, that goes up to Seir, even to Baal-gad in the valley of Lebanon under mount Hermon: and all their kings he took, and smote them, and put them to death.11:18 Joshua made war a long time with all those kings.11:19 There was not a city that made peace with the children of Israel, save the Hivites the inhabitants of Gibeon: they took all in battle.11:20 For it was of Yahweh to harden their hearts, to come against Israel in battle, that he might utterly destroy them, that they might have no favor, but that he might destroy them, as Yahweh commanded Moses.11:21 And Joshua came at that time, and cut off the Anakim from the hill-country, from Hebron, from Debir, from Anab, and from all the hill-country of Judah, and from all the hill-country of Israel: Joshua utterly destroyed them with their cities.11:22 There was none of the Anakim left in the land of the children of Israel: only in Gaza, in Gath, and in Ashdod, did some remain.11:23 So Joshua took the whole land, according to all that Yahweh spoke to Moses; and Joshua gave it for an inheritance to Israel according to their divisions by their tribes.  And the land had rest from war.Chapter 1212:1 Now these are the kings of the land, whom the children of Israel smote, and possessed their land beyond the Jordan toward the sunrising, from the valley of the Arnon to mount Hermon, and all the Arabah eastward:12:2 Sihon king of the Amorites, who dwelt in Heshbon, and ruled from Aroer, which is on the edge of the valley of the Arnon, and the city that is in the middle of the valley, and half Gilead, even to the river Jabbok, the border of the children of Ammon;12:3 and the Arabah to the sea of Chinneroth, eastward, and to the sea of the Arabah, even the Salt Sea, eastward, the way to Beth-jeshimoth; and on the south, under the slopes of Pisgah:12:4 and the border of Og king of Bashan, of the remnant of the Rephaim, who dwelt at Ashtaroth and at Edrei,12:5 and ruled in mount Hermon, and in Salecah, and in all Bashan, to the border of the Geshurites and the Maacathites, and half Gilead, the border of Sihon king of Heshbon.12:6 Moses the servant of Yahweh and the children of Israel smote them: and Moses the servant of Yahweh gave it for a possession to the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half-tribe of Manasseh.12:7 And these are the kings of the land whom Joshua and the children of Israel smote beyond the Jordan westward, from Baal-gad in the valley of Lebanon even to mount Halak, that goes up to Seir; and Joshua gave it to the tribes of Israel for a possession according to their divisions;12:8 in the hill-country, and in the lowland, and in the Arabah, and in the slopes, and in the wilderness, and in the South; the Hittite, the Amorite, and the Canaanite, the Perizzite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite:12:9 the king of Jericho, one; the king of Ai, which is beside Bethel, one;12:10 the king of Jerusalem, one; the king of Hebron, one;12:11 the king of Jarmuth, one; the king of Lachish, one;12:12 the king of Eglon, one; the king of Gezer, one;12:13 the king of Debir, one; the king of Geder, one;12:14 the king of Hormah, one; the king of Arad, one;12:15 the king of Libnah, one; the king of Adullam, one;12:16 the king of Makkedah, one; the king of Bethel, one;12:17 the king of Tappuah, one; the king of Hepher, one;12:18 the king of Aphek, one; the king of Lassharon, one;12:19 the king of Madon, one; the king of Hazor, one;12:20 the king of Shimron-meron, one; the king of Achshaph, one;12:21 the king of Taanach, one; the king of Megiddo, one;12:22 the king of Kedesh, one; the king of Jokneam in Carmel, one;12:23 the king of Dor in the height of Dor, one; the king of Goiim in Gilgal, one;12:24 the king of Tirzah, one: all the kings thirty and one.Chapter 1313:1 Now Joshua was old and well stricken in years; and Yahweh said to him, You are old and well stricken in years, and there remains yet very much land to be possessed.13:2 This is the land that yet remains: all the regions of the Philistines, and all the Geshurites;13:3 from the Shihor, which is before Egypt, even to the border of Ekron northward, which is reckoned to the Canaanites; the five lords of the Philistines; the Gazites, and the Ashdodites, the Ashkelonites, the Gittites, and the Ekronites; also the Avvim,13:4 on the south; all the land of the Canaanites, and Mearah that belongs to the Sidonians, to Aphek, to the border of the Amorites;13:5 and the land of the Gebalites, and all Lebanon, toward the sunrising, from Baal-gad under mount Hermon to the entrance of Hamath;13:6 all the inhabitants of the hill-country from Lebanon to Misrephoth-maim, even all the Sidonians; them will I drive out from before the children of Israel: only allot you it to Israel for an inheritance, as I have commanded you.13:7 Now therefore divide this land for an inheritance to the nine tribes, and the half-tribe of Manasseh.13:8 With him the Reubenites and the Gadites received their inheritance, which Moses gave them, beyond the Jordan eastward, even as Moses the servant of Yahweh gave them:13:9 from Aroer, that is on the edge of the valley of the Arnon, and the city that is in the middle of the valley, and all the plain of Medeba to Dibon;13:10 and all the cities of Sihon king of the Amorites, who reigned in Heshbon, to the border of the children of Ammon;13:11 and Gilead, and the border of the Geshurites and Maacathites, and all mount Hermon, and all Bashan to Salecah;13:12 all the kingdom of Og in Bashan, who reigned in Ashtaroth and in Edrei (the same was left of the remnant of the Rephaim); for these did Moses attack, and drove them out.13:13 Nevertheless the children of Israel drove not out the Geshurites, nor the Maacathites: but Geshur and Maacath dwell in the midst of Israel to this day.13:14 Only to the tribe of Levi he gave no inheritance; the offerings of Yahweh, the God of Israel, made by fire are his inheritance, as he spoke to him.13:15 And Moses gave to the tribe of the children of Reuben according to their families.13:16 And their border was from Aroer, that is on the edge of the valley of the Arnon, and the city that is in the middle of the valley, and all the plain by Medeba;13:17 Heshbon, and all its cities that are in the plain; Dibon, and Bamoth-baal, and Beth-baal-meon,13:18 and Jahaz, and Kedemoth, and Mephaath,13:19 and Kiriathaim, and Sibmah, and Zereth-shahar in the mount of the valley,13:20 and Beth-peor, and the slopes of Pisgah, and Beth-jeshimoth,13:21 and all the cities of the plain, and all the kingdom of Sihon king of the Amorites, who reigned in Heshbon, whom Moses smote with the chiefs of Midian, Evi, and Rekem, and Zur, and Hur, and Reba, the princes of Sihon, that dwelt in the land.13:22 Balaam also the son of Beor, the soothsayer, did the children of Israel slay with the sword among the rest of their slain.13:23 And the border of the children of Reuben was the Jordan, and the border of it.  This was the inheritance of the children of Reuben according to their families, the cities and the villages thereof.13:24 And Moses gave to the tribe of Gad, to the children of Gad, according to their families.13:25 And their border was Jazer, and all the cities of Gilead, and half the land of the children of Ammon, to Aroer that is before Rabbah;13:26 and from Heshbon to Ramath-mizpeh, and Betonim; and from Mahanaim to the border of Debir;13:27 and in the valley, Beth-haram, and Beth-nimrah, and Succoth, and Zaphon, the rest of the kingdom of Sihon king of Heshbon, the Jordan and the border of it, to the uttermost part of the sea of Chinnereth beyond the Jordan eastward.13:28 This is the inheritance of the children of Gad according to their families, the cities and the villages thereof.13:29 And Moses gave inheritance to the half-tribe of Manasseh: and it was for the half-tribe of the children of Manasseh according to their families.13:30 And their border was from Mahanaim, all Bashan, all the kingdom of Og king of Bashan, and all the towns of Jair, which are in Bashan, 60 cities:13:31 and half Gilead, and Ashtaroth, and Edrei, the cities of the kingdom of Og in Bashan, were for the children of Machir the son of Manasseh, even for the half of the children of Machir according to their families.13:32 These are the inheritances which Moses distributed in the plains of Moab, beyond the Jordan at Jericho, eastward.13:33 But to the tribe of Levi Moses gave no inheritance: Yahweh, the God of Israel, is their inheritance, as he spoke to them.Chapter 1414:1 And these are the inheritances which the children of Israel took in the land of Canaan, which Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun, and the heads of the fathers' houses of the tribes of the children of Israel, distributed to them,14:2 by the lot of their inheritance, as Yahweh commanded by Moses, for the nine tribes, and for the half-tribe.14:3 For Moses had given the inheritance of the two tribes and the half-tribe beyond the Jordan: but to the Levites he gave no inheritance among them.14:4 For the children of Joseph were two tribes, Manasseh and Ephraim: and they gave no portion to the Levites in the land, save cities to dwell in, with the suburbs thereof for their cattle and for their substance.14:5 As Yahweh commanded Moses, so the children of Israel did; and they divided the land.14:6 Then the children of Judah drew near to Joshua in Gilgal: and Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenizzite said to him, You know the thing that Yahweh spoke to Moses the man of God concerning me and concerning you in Kadesh-barnea.14:7 Forty years old was I when Moses the servant of Yahweh sent me from Kadesh-barnea to spy out the land; and I brought him word again as it was in my heart.14:8 Nevertheless my brethren that went up with me made the heart of the people melt; but I wholly followed Yahweh my God.14:9 And Moses swore on that day, saying, Surely the land whereon your foot has trodden shall be an inheritance to you and to your children for ever, because you have wholly followed Yahweh my God.14:10 And now, behold, Yahweh has kept me alive, as he spoke, these forty and five years, from the time that Yahweh spoke this word to Moses, while Israel walked in the wilderness: and now, lo, I am this day eighty-five years old.14:11 As yet I am as strong this day as I as in the day that Moses sent me: as my strength was then, even so is my strength now, for war, and to go out and to come in.14:12 Now therefore give me this hill-country, whereof Yahweh spoke in that day; for you heard in that day how the Anakim were there, and cities great and fortified: it may be that Yahweh will be with me, and I shall drive them out, as Yahweh spoke.14:13 And Joshua blessed him; and he gave Hebron to Caleb the son of Jephunneh for an inheritance.14:14 Therefore Hebron became the inheritance of Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenizzite to this day; because that he wholly followed Yahweh, the God of Israel.14:15 Now the name of Hebron beforetime was Kiriath-arba; which Arba was the greatest man among the Anakim.  And the land had rest from war.Chapter 1515:1 And the lot for the tribe of the children of Judah according to their families was to the border of Edom, even to the wilderness of Zin southward, at the uttermost part of the south.15:2 And their south border was from the uttermost part of the Salt Sea, from the bay that looks southward;15:3 and it went out southward of the ascent of Akrabbim, and passed along to Zin, and went up by the south of Kadesh-barnea, and passed along by Hezron, and went up to Addar, and turned about to Karka;15:4 and it passed along to Azmon, and went out at the brook of Egypt; and the goings out of the border were at the sea: this shall be your south border.15:5 And the east border was the Salt Sea, even to the end of the Jordan.  And the border of the north quarter was from the bay of the sea at the end of the Jordan;15:6 and the border went up to Beth-hoglah, and passed along by the north of Beth-arabah; and the border went up to the stone of Bohan the son of Reuben;15:7 and the border went up to Debir from the valley of Achor, and so northward, looking toward Gilgal, that is over against the ascent of Adummim, which is on the south side of the river; and the border passed along to the waters of En-shemesh, and the goings out thereof were at En-rogel;15:8 and the border went up by the valley of the son of Hinnom to the side of the Jebusite southward (the same is Jerusalem); and the border went up to the top of the mountain that lies before the valley of Hinnom westward, which is at the uttermost part of the valley of Rephaim northward;15:9 and the border extended from the top of the mountain to the fountain of the waters of Nephtoah, and went out to the cities of mount Ephron; and the border extended to Baalah (the same is Kiriath-jearim);15:10 and the border turned about from Baalah westward to mount Seir, and passed along to the side of mount Jearim on the north (the same is Chesalon), and went down to Beth-shemesh, and passed along by Timnah;15:11 and the border went out to the side of Ekron northward; and the border extended to Shikkeron, and passed along to mount Baalah, and went out at Jabneel; and the goings out of the border were at the sea.15:12 And the west border was to the great sea, and the border of it.  This is the border of the children of Judah round about according to their families.15:13 And to Caleb the son of Jephunneh he gave a portion among the children of Judah, according to the commandment of Yahweh to Joshua, even Kiriath-arba, which Arba was the father of Anak (the same is Hebron).15:14 And Caleb drove out there the three sons of Anak: Sheshai, and Ahiman, and Talmai, the children of Anak.15:15 And he went up there against the inhabitants of Debir: now the name of Debir beforetime was Kiriath-sepher.15:16 And Caleb said, He that attacks Kiriath-sepher, and captures it, to him will I give Achsah my daughter as wife.15:17 And Othniel the son of Kenaz, the brother of Caleb, captured it: and he gave him Achsah his daughter to wife.15:18 And it came to pass, when she came to him, that she moved him to ask of her father a field: and she alighted from off her donkey; and Caleb said, What would you?15:19 And she said, Give me a blessing; for that you have set me in the land of the South, give me also springs of water.  And he gave her the upper springs and the nether springs.15:20 This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Judah according to their families.15:21 And the uttermost cities of the tribe of the children of Judah toward the border of Edom in the South were Kabzeel, and Eder, and Jagur,15:22 and Kinah, and Dimonah, and Adadah,15:23 and Kedesh, and Hazor, and Ithnan,15:24 Ziph, and Telem, and Bealoth,15:25 and Hazor-hadattah, and Kerioth-hezron (the same is Hazor),15:26 Amam, and Shema, and Moladah,15:27 and Hazar-gaddah, and Heshmon, and Beth-pelet,15:28 and Hazar-shual, and Beer-sheba, and Biziothiah,15:29 Baalah, and Iim, and Ezem,15:30 and Eltolad, and Chesil, and Hormah,15:31 and Ziklag, and Madmannah, and Sansannah,15:32 and Lebaoth, and Shilhim, and Ain, and Rimmon: all the cities are twenty and nine, with their villages.15:33 In the lowland, Eshtaol, and Zorah, and Ashnah,15:34 and Zanoah, and En-gannim, Tappuah, and Enam,15:35 Jarmuth, and Adullam, Socoh, and Azekah,15:36 and Shaaraim, and Adithaim, and Gederah, and Gederothaim; fourteen cities with their villages.15:37 Zenan, and Hadashah, and Migdal-gad,15:38 and Dilean, and Mizpeh, and Jokyoul,15:39 Lachish, and Bozkath, and Eglon,15:40 and Cabbon, and Lahmam, and Chitlish,15:41 and Gederoth, Beth-dagon, and Naamah, and Makkedah; sixteen cities with their villages.15:42 Libnah, and Ether, and Ashan,15:43 and Iphtah, and Ashnah, and Nezib,15:44 and Keilah, and Achzib, and Mareshah; nine cities with their villages.15:45 Ekron, with its towns and its villages;15:46 from Ekron even to the sea, all that were by the side of Ashdod, with their villages.15:47 Ashdod, its towns and its villages; Gaza, its towns and its villages; to the brook of Egypt, and the great sea, and the border of it.15:48 And in the hill-country, Shamir, and Jattir, and Socoh,15:49 and Dannah, and Kiriath-sannah (the same is Debir),15:50 and Anab, and Eshtemoh, and Anim,15:51 and Goshen, and Holon, and Giloh; eleven cities with their villages.15:52 Arab, and Dumah, and Eshan,15:53 and Janim, and Beth-tappuah, and Aphekah,15:54 and Humtah, and Kiriath-arba (the same is Hebron), and Zior; nine cities with their villages.15:55 Maon, Carmel, and Ziph, and Jutah,15:56 and Jezreel, and Jokdeam, and Zanoah,15:57 Kain, Gibeah, and Timnah; ten cities with their villages.15:58 Halhul, Beth-zur, and Gedor,15:59 and Maarath, and Beth-anoth, and Eltekon; six cities with their villages.15:60 Kiriath-baal (the same is Kiriath-jearim), and Rabbah; two cities with their villages.15:61 In the wilderness, Beth-arabah, Middin, and Secacah,15:62 and Nibshan, and the City of Salt, and En-gedi; six cities with their villages.15:63 And as for the Jebusites, the inhabitants of Jerusalem, the children of Judah could not drive them out: but the Jebusites dwell with the children of Judah at Jerusalem to this day.Chapter 1616:1 And the lot came out for the children of Joseph from the Jordan at Jericho, at the waters of Jericho on the east, even the wilderness, going up from Jericho through the hill-country to Beth-el;16:2 and it went out from Beth-el to Luz, and passed along to the border of the Archites to Ataroth;16:3 and it went down westward to the border of the Japhletites, to the border of Beth-horon the nether, even to Gezer; and the goings out thereof were at the sea.16:4 And the children of Joseph, Manasseh and Ephraim, took their inheritance.16:5 And the border of the children of Ephraim according to their families was thus: the border of their inheritance eastward was Ataroth-addar, to Beth-horon the upper;16:6 and the border went out westward at Michmethath on the north; and the border turned about eastward to Taanath-shiloh, and passed along it on the east of Janoah;16:7 and it went down from Janoah to Ataroth, and to Naarah, and reached to Jericho, and went out at the Jordan.16:8 From Tappuah the border went along westward to the brook of Kanah; and the goings out thereof were at the sea.  This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Ephraim according to their families;16:9 together with the cities which were set apart for the children of Ephraim in the midst of the inheritance of the children of Manasseh, all the cities with their villages.16:10 And they drove not out the Canaanites that dwelt in Gezer: but the Canaanites dwell in the midst of Ephraim to this day, and are become servants to do taskwork.Chapter 1717:1 And this was the lot for the tribe of Manasseh; for he was the first-born of Joseph.  As for Machir the first-born of Manasseh, the father of Gilead, because he was a man of war, therefore he had Gilead and Bashan.17:2 So the lot was for the rest of the children of Manasseh according to their families: for the children of Abiezer, and for the children of Helek, and for the children of Asriel, and for the children of Shechem, and for the children of Hepher, and for the children of Shemida: these were the male children of Manasseh the son of Joseph according to their families.17:3 But Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, had no sons, but daughters: and these are the names of his daughters: Mahlah, and Noah, Hoglah, Milcah, and Tirzah.17:4 And they came near before Eleazar the priest, and before Joshua the son of Nun, and before the princes, saying, Yahweh commanded Moses to give us an inheritance among our brethren: therefore according to the commandment of Yahweh he gave them an inheritance among the brethren of their father.17:5 And there fell ten parts to Manasseh, besides the land of Gilead and Bashan, which is beyond the Jordan;17:6 because the daughters of Manasseh had an inheritance among his sons.  And the land of Gilead belonged to the rest of the sons of Manasseh.17:7 And the border of Manasseh was from Asher to Michmethath, which is before Shechem; and the border went along to the right hand, to the inhabitants of En-tappuah.17:8 The land of Tappuah belonged to Manasseh; but Tappuah on the border of Manasseh belonged to the children of Ephraim.17:9 And the border went down to the brook of Kanah, southward of the brook: these cities belonged to Ephraim among the cities of Manasseh: and the border of Manasseh was on the north side of the brook, and the goings out thereof were at the sea:17:10 southward it was Ephraim's, and northward it was Manasseh's, and the sea was his border; and they reached to Asher on the north, and to Issachar on the east.17:11 And Manasseh had in Issachar and in Asher Beth-shean and its towns, and Ibleam and its towns, and the inhabitants of Dor and its towns, and the inhabitants of En-dor and its towns, and the inhabitants of Taanach and its towns, and the inhabitants of Megiddo and its towns, even the three heights.17:12 Yet the children of Manasseh could not drive out the inhabitants of those cities; but the Canaanites would dwell in that land.17:13 And it came to pass, when the children of Israel were become strong, that they put the Canaanites to taskwork, and did not utterly drive them out.17:14 And the children of Joseph spoke to Joshua, saying, Why have you given me but one lot and one part for an inheritance, seeing I am a great people, forasmuch as hitherto Yahweh has blessed me?17:15 And Joshua said to them, If you be a great people, go up to the forest, and cut down for yourself there in the land of the Perizzites and of the Rephaim; since the hill-country of Ephraim is too narrow for you.17:16 And the children of Joseph said, The hill-country is not enough for us: and all the Canaanites that dwell in the land of the valley have chariots of iron, both they who are in Beth-shean and its towns, and they who are in the valley of Jezreel.17:17 And Joshua spoke to the house of Joseph, even to Ephraim and to Manasseh, saying, You are a great people, and have great power; you shall not have one lot only:17:18 but the hill-country shall be yours; for though it is a forest, you shall cut it down, and the goings out thereof shall be yours; for you shall drive out the Canaanites, though they have chariots of iron, and though they are strong.Chapter 1818:1 And the whole congregation of the children of Israel assembled themselves together at Shiloh, and set up the tent of meeting there: and the land was subdued before them.18:2 And there remained among the children of Israel seven tribes, which had not yet divided their inheritance.18:3 And Joshua said to the children of Israel, How long are ye slack to go in to possess the land, which Yahweh, the God of your fathers, has given you?18:4 Appoint for you three men of each tribe: and I will send them, and they shall arise, and walk through the land, and describe it according to their inheritance; and they shall come to me.18:5 And they shall divide it into seven portions: Judah shall abide in his border on the south, and the house of Joseph shall abide in their border on the north.18:6 And ye shall describe the land into seven portions, and bring the description here to me; and I will cast lots for you here before Yahweh our God.18:7 For the Levites have no portion among you; for the priesthood of Yahweh is their inheritance: and Gad and Reuben and the half-tribe of Manasseh have received their inheritance beyond the Jordan eastward, which Moses the servant of Yahweh gave them.18:8 And the men arose, and went: and Joshua charged them that went to describe the land, saying, Go and walk through the land, and describe it, and come again to me; and I will cast lots for you here before Yahweh in Shiloh.18:9 And the men went and passed through the land, and described it by cities into seven portions in a book; and they came to Joshua to the camp at Shiloh.18:10 And Joshua cast lots for them in Shiloh before Yahweh: and there Joshua divided the land to the children of Israel according to their divisions.18:11 And the lot of the tribe of the children of Benjamin came up according to their families: and the border of their lot went out between the children of Judah and the children of Joseph.18:12 And their border on the north quarter was from the Jordan; and the border went up to the side of Jericho on the north, and went up through the hill-country westward; and the goings out thereof were at the wilderness of Beth-aven.18:13 And the border passed along from there to Luz, to the side of Luz (the same is Beth-el), southward; and the border went down to Ataroth-addar, by the mountain that lies on the south of Beth-horon the nether.18:14 And the border extended there, and turned about on the west quarter southward, from the mountain that lies before Beth-horon southward; and the goings out thereof were at Kiriath-baal (the same is Kiriath-jearim), a city of the children of Judah: this was the west quarter.18:15 And the south quarter was from the uttermost part of Kiriath-jearim; and the border went out westward, and went out to the fountain of the waters of Nephtoah;18:16 and the border went down to the uttermost part of the mountain that lies before the valley of the son of Hinnom, which is in the valley of Rephaim northward; and it went down to the valley of Hinnom, to the side of the Jebusite southward, and went down to En-rogel;18:17 and it extended northward, and went out at En-shemesh, and went out to Geliloth, which is over against the ascent of Adummim; and it went down to the stone of Bohan the son of Reuben;18:18 and it passed along to the side over against the Arabah northward, and went down to the Arabah;18:19 and the border passed along to the side of Beth-hoglah northward; and the goings out of the border were at the north bay of the Salt Sea, at the south end of the Jordan: this was the south border.18:20 And the Jordan was the border of it on the east quarter.  This was the inheritance of the children of Benjamin, by the borders thereof round about, according to their families.18:21 Now the cities of the tribe of the children of Benjamin according to their families were Jericho, and Beth-hoglah, and Emek-keziz,18:22 and Beth-arabah, and Zemaraim, and Beth-el,18:23 and Avvim, and Parah, and Ophrah,18:24 and Chephar-ammoni, and Ophni, and Geba; twelve cities with their villages:18:25 Gibeon, and Ramah, and Beeroth,18:26 and Mizpeh, and Chephirah, and Mozah,18:27 and Rekem, and Irpeel, and Taralah,18:28 and Zelah, Eleph, and the Jebusite (the same is Jerusalem), Gibeath, and Kiriath; fourteen cities with their villages.  This is the inheritance of the children of Benjamin according to their families.Chapter 1919:1 And the second lot came out for Simeon, even for the tribe of the children of Simeon according to their families: and their inheritance was in the midst of the inheritance of the children of Judah.19:2 And they had for their inheritance Beer-sheba, or Sheba, and Moladah,19:3 and Hazar-shual, and Balah, and Ezem,19:4 and Eltolad, and Bethul, and Hormah,19:5 and Ziklag, and Beth-marcaboth, and Hazar-susah,19:6 and Beth-lebaoth, and Sharuhen; thirteen cities with their villages:19:7 Ain, Rimmon, and Ether, and Ashan; four cities with their villages:19:8 and all the villages that were round about these cities to Baalath-beer, Ramah of the South.  This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Simeon according to their families.19:9 Out of the part of the children of Judah was the inheritance of the children of Simeon; for the portion of the children of Judah was too much for them: therefore the children of Simeon had inheritance in the midst of their inheritance.19:10 And the third lot came up for the children of Zebulun according to their families; and the border of their inheritance was to Sarid;19:11 and their border went up westward, even to Maralah, and reached to Dabbesheth; and it reached to the brook that is before Jokneam;19:12 and it turned from Sarid eastward toward the sunrising to the border of Chisloth-tabor; and it went out to Daberath, and went up to Japhia;19:13 and from there it passed along eastward to Gath-hepher, to Eth-kazin; and it went out at Rimmon which stretches to Neah;19:14 and the border turned about it on the north to Hannathon; and the goings out thereof were at the valley of Iphtah-el;19:15 and Kattath, and Nahalal, and Shimron, and Idalah, and Bethlehem: twelve cities with their villages.19:16 This is the inheritance of the children of Zebulun according to their families, these cities with their villages.19:17 The fourth lot came out for Issachar, even for the children of Issachar according to their families.19:18 And their border was to Jezreel, and Chesulloth, and Shunem,19:19 and Hapharaim, and Shion, and Anaharath,19:20 and Rabbith, and Kishion, and Ebez,19:21 and Remeth, and Engannim, and En-haddah, and Beth-pazzez,19:22 and the border reached to Tabor, and Shahazumah, and Beth-shemesh; and the goings out of their border were at the Jordan: sixteen cities with their villages.19:23 This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Issachar according to their families, the cities with their villages.19:24 And the fifth lot came out for the tribe of the children of Asher according to their families.19:25 And their border was Helkath, and Hali, and Beten, and Achshaph,19:26 and Allammelech, and Amad, and Mishal; and it reached to Carmel westward, and to Shihor-libnath;19:27 and it turned toward the sunrising to Beth-dagon, and reached to Zebulun, and to the valley of Iphtah-el northward to Beth-emek and Neiel; and it went out to Cabul on the left hand,19:28 and Ebron, and Rehob, and Hammon, and Kanah, even to great Sidon;19:29 and the border turned to Ramah, and to the fortified city of Tyre; and the border turned to Hosah; and the goings out thereof were at the sea by the region of Achzib;19:30 Ummah also, and Aphek, and Rehob: twenty and two cities with their villages.19:31 This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Asher according to their families, these cities with their villages.19:32 The sixth lot came out for the children of Naphtali, even for the children of Naphtali according to their families.19:33 And their border was from Heleph, from the oak in Zaanannim, and Adaminekeb, and Jabneel, to Lakkum; and the goings out thereof were at the Jordan;19:34 and the border turned westward to Aznoth-tabor, and went out from there to Hukkok; and it reached to Zebulun on the south, and reached to Asher on the west, and to Judah at the Jordan toward the sunrising.19:35 And the fortified cities were Ziddim, Zer, and Hammath, Rakkath, and Chinnereth,19:36 and Adamah, and Ramah, and Hazor,19:37 and Kedesh, and Edrei, and En-hazor,19:38 And Iron, and Migdal-el, Horem, and Beth-anath, and Beth-shemesh; nineteen cities with their villages.19:39 This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Naphtali according to their families, the cities with their villages.19:40 The seventh lot came out for the tribe of the children of Dan according to their families.19:41 And the border of their inheritance was Zorah, and Eshtaol, and Ir-shemesh,19:42 and Shaalabbin, and Aijalon, and Ithlah,19:43 and Elon, and Timnah, and Ekron,19:44 and Eltekeh, and Gibbethon, and Baalath,19:45 and Jehud, and Bene-berak, and Gath-rimmon,19:46 and Me-jarkon, and Rakkon, with the border over against Joppa.19:47 And the border of the children of Dan went out beyond them; for the children of Dan went up and fought against Leshem, and took it, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and possessed it, and dwelt therein, and called Leshem, Dan, after the name of Dan their father.19:48 This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Dan according to their families, these cities with their villages.19:49 So they made an end of distributing the land for inheritance by the borders thereof; and the children of Israel gave an inheritance to Joshua the son of Nun in the midst of them:19:50 according to the commandment of Yahweh they gave him the city which he asked, even Timnath-serah in the hill-country of Ephraim; and he built the city, and dwelt therein.19:51 These are the inheritances, which Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun, and the heads of the fathers' houses of the tribes of the children of Israel, distributed for inheritance by lot in Shiloh before Yahweh, at the door of the tent of meeting.  So they made an end of dividing the land.Chapter 2020:1 And Yahweh spoke to Joshua, saying,20:2 Speak to the children of Israel, saying, assign you the cities of refuge, whereof I spoke to you by Moses,20:3 that the manslayer that kills any person unwittingly and unawares may flee there: and they shall be to you for a refuge from the avenger of blood.20:4 And he shall flee to one of those cities, and shall stand at the entrance of the gate of the city, and declare his cause in the ears of the elders of that city; and they shall take him into the city to them, and give him a place, that he may dwell among them.20:5 And if the avenger of blood pursue after him, then they shall not deliver up the manslayer into his hand; because he smote his neighbor unawares, and hated him not beforetime.20:6 And he shall dwell in that city, until he stand before the congregation for judgment, until the death of the high priest that shall be in those days: then shall the manslayer return, and come to his own city, and to his own house, to the city from which he fled.20:7 And they set apart Kedesh in Galilee in the hill-country of Naphtali, and Shechem in the hill-country of Ephraim, and Kiriath-arba (the same is Hebron) in the hill-country of Judah.20:8 And beyond the Jordan at Jericho eastward, they assigned Bezer in the wilderness in the plain out of the tribe of Reuben, and Ramoth in Gilead out of the tribe of Gad, and Golan in Bashan out of the tribe of Manasseh.20:9 These were the appointed cities for all the children of Israel, and for the stranger that sojourns among them, that whosoever kills any person unwittingly might flee there, and not die by the hand of the avenger of blood, until he stood before the congregation.Chapter 2121:1 Then came near the heads of fathers' houses of the Levites to Eleazar the priest, and to Joshua the son of Nun, and to the heads of fathers' houses of the tribes of the children of Israel;21:2 and they spoke to them at Shiloh in the land of Canaan, saying, Yahweh commanded Moses to give us cities to dwell in, with the suburbs thereof for our cattle.21:3 And the children of Israel gave to the Levites out of their inheritance, according to the commandment of Yahweh, these cities with their suburbs.21:4 And the lot came out for the families of the Kohathites: and the children of Aaron the priest, who were of the Levites, had by lot out of the tribe of Judah, and out of the tribe of the Simeonites, and out of the tribe of Benjamin, thirteen cities.21:5 And the rest of the children of Kohath had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out of the half-tribe of Manasseh, ten cities.21:6 And the children of Gershon had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe of Naphtali, and out of the half-tribe of Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen cities.21:7 The children of Merari according to their families had out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zebulun, twelve cities.21:8 And the children of Israel gave by lot to the Levites these cities with their suburbs, as Yahweh commanded by Moses.21:9 And they gave out of the tribe of the children of Judah, and out of the tribe of the children of Simeon, these cities which are here mentioned by name:21:10 and they were for the children of Aaron, of the families of the Kohathites, who were of the children of Levi; for theirs was the first lot.21:11 And they gave them Kiriath-arba, which Arba was the father of Anak (the same is Hebron), in the hill-country of Judah, with the suburbs thereof round about it.21:12 But the fields of the city, and the villages thereof, gave they to Caleb the son of Jephunneh for his possession.21:13 And to the children of Aaron the priest they gave Hebron with its suburbs, the city of refuge for the manslayer, and Libnah with its suburbs,21:14 and Jattir with its suburbs, and Eshtemoa with its suburbs,21:15 and Holon with its suburbs, and Debir with its suburbs,21:16 and Ain with its suburbs, and Juttah with its suburbs, and Beth-shemesh with its suburbs; nine cities out of those two tribes.21:17 And out of the tribe of Benjamin, Gibeon with its suburbs, Geba with its suburbs,21:18 Anathoth with its suburbs, and Almon with its suburbs; four cities.21:19 All the cities of the children of Aaron, the priests, were thirteen cities with their suburbs.21:20 And the families of the children of Kohath, the Levites, even the rest of the children of Kohath, they had the cities of their lot out of the tribe of Ephraim.21:21 And they gave them Shechem with its suburbs in the hill-country of Ephraim, the city of refuge for the manslayer, and Gezer with its suburbs,21:22 and Kibzaim with its suburbs, and Beth-horon with its suburbs; four cities.21:23 And out of the tribe of Dan, Elteke with its suburbs, Gibbethon with its suburbs,21:24 Aijalon with its suburbs, Gath-rimmon with its suburbs; four cities.21:25 And out of the half-tribe of Manasseh, Taanach with its suburbs, and Gath-rimmon with its suburbs; two cities.21:26 All the cities of the families of the rest of the children of Kohath were ten with their suburbs.21:27 And to the children of Gershon, of the families of the Levites, out of the half-tribe of Manasseh they gave Golan in Bashan with its suburbs, the city of refuge for the manslayer, and Be-eshterah with its suburbs; two cities.21:28 And out of the tribe of Issachar, Kishion with its suburbs, Daberath with its suburbs,21:29 Jarmuth with its suburbs, En-gannim with its suburbs; four cities.21:30 And out of the tribe of Asher, Mishal with its suburbs, abdon with its suburbs,21:31 Helkath with its suburbs, and Rehob with its suburbs; four cities.21:32 And out of the tribe of Naphtali, Kedesh in Galilee with its suburbs, the city of refuge for the manslayer, and Hammoth-dor with its suburbs, and Kartan with its suburbs; three cities.21:33 All the cities of the Gershonites according to their families were thirteen cities with their suburbs.21:34 And to the families of the children of Merari, the rest of the Levites, out of the tribe of Zebulun, Jokneam with its suburbs, and Kartah with its suburbs,21:35 Dimnah with its suburbs, Nahalal with its suburbs; four cities.21:36 And out of the tribe of Reuben, Bezer with its suburbs, and Jahaz with its suburbs,21:37 Kedemoth with its suburbs, and Mephaath with its suburbs; four cities.21:38 And out of the tribe of Gad, Ramoth in Gilead with its suburbs, the city of refuge for the manslayer, and Mahanaim with its suburbs,21:39 Heshbon with its suburbs, Jazer with its suburbs; four cities in all.21:40 All these were the cities of the children of Merari according to their families, even the rest of the families of the Levites; and their lot was twelve cities.21:41 All the cities of the Levites in the midst of the possession of the children of Israel were forty and eight cities with their suburbs.21:42 These cities were every one with their suburbs round about them: thus it was with all these cities.21:43 So Yahweh gave to Israel all the land which he swore to give to their fathers; and they possessed it, and dwelt therein.21:44 And Yahweh gave them rest round about, according to all that he swore to their fathers: and there stood not a man of all their enemies before them; Yahweh delivered all their enemies into their hand.21:45 There failed not anything of any good thing which Yahweh had spoken to the house of Israel; all came to pass.Chapter 2222:1 Then Joshua called the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half-tribe of Manasseh,22:2 and said to them, You have kept all that Moses the servant of Yahweh commanded you, and have hearkened to my voice in all that I commanded you:22:3 ye have not left your brethren these many days to this day, but have kept the charge of the commandment of Yahweh your God.22:4 And now Yahweh your God has given rest to your brethren, as he spoke to them: therefore now turn ye, and go to your tents, to the land of your possession, which Moses the servant of Yahweh gave you beyond the Jordan.22:5 Only take diligent heed to do the commandment and the law which Moses the servant of Yahweh commanded you, to love Yahweh your God, and to walk in all his ways, and to keep his commandments, and to cleave to him, and to serve him with all your heart and with all your soul.22:6 So Joshua blessed them, and sent them away; and they went to their tents.22:7 Now to the one half-tribe of Manasseh Moses had given inheritance in Bashan; but to the other half gave Joshua among their brethren beyond the Jordan westward; moreover when Joshua sent them away to their tents, he blessed them,22:8 and spoke to them, saying, Return with much wealth to your tents, and with very much cattle, with silver, and with gold, and with brass, and with iron, and with very much raiment: divide the spoil of your enemies with your brethren.22:9 And the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half-tribe of Manasseh returned, and departed from the children of Israel out of Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan, to go to the land of Gilead, to the land of their possession, whereof they were possessed, according to the commandment of Yahweh by Moses.22:10 And when they came to the region about the Jordan, that is in the land of Canaan, the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half-tribe of Manasseh built there an altar by the Jordan, a great altar to look upon.22:11 And the children of Israel heard say, Behold, the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half-tribe of Manasseh have built an altar in the forefront of the land of Canaan, in the region about the Jordan, on the side that belongs to the children of Israel.22:12 And when the children of Israel heard of it, the whole congregation of the children of Israel gathered themselves together at Shiloh, to go up against them to war.22:13 And the children of Israel sent to the children of Reuben, and to the children of Gad, and to the half-tribe of Manasseh, into the land of Gilead, Phinehas the son of Eleazar the priest,22:14 and with him ten princes, one prince of a fathers' house for each of the tribes of Israel; and they were every one of them head of their fathers' houses among the thousands of Israel.22:15 And they came to the children of Reuben, and to the children of Gad, and to the half-tribe of Manasseh, to the land of Gilead, and they spoke with them, saying,22:16 Thus says the whole congregation of Yahweh, What trespass is this that ye have committed against the God of Israel, to turn away this day from following Yahweh, in that ye have built you an altar, to rebel this day against Yahweh?22:17 Is the iniquity of Peor too little for us, from which we have not cleansed ourselves to this day, although there came a plague upon the congregation of Yahweh,22:18 that ye must turn away this day from following Yahweh?  and it will be, seeing ye rebel today against Yahweh, that tomorrow he will be angry with the whole congregation of Israel.22:19 But, if the land of your possession be unclean, then pass ye over to the land of the possession of Yahweh, in which Yahweh's tabernacle dwells, and take possession among us: but rebel not against Yahweh, nor rebel against us, in building you an altar besides the altar of Yahweh our God.22:20 Did not Achan the son of Zerah commit a trespass in the devoted thing, and wrath fell upon all the congregation of Israel?  and that man perished not alone in his iniquity.22:21 Then the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half-tribe of Manasseh answered, and spoke to the heads of the thousands of Israel,22:22 The Mighty One, God, Yahweh, the Mighty One, God, Yahweh, he knows; and Israel he shall know: if it be in rebellion, or if in trespass against Yahweh (save you us not this day,)22:23 that we have built us an altar to turn away from following Yahweh; or if to offer upon it burnt offering or meal offering, or if to offer sacrifices of peace offerings upon it, let Yahweh himself require it;22:24 and if we have not rather out of carefulness done this, and of purpose, saying, In time to come your children might speak to our children, saying, What have ye to do with Yahweh, the God of Israel?22:25 for Yahweh has made the Jordan a border between us and you, ye children of Reuben and children of Gad; ye have no portion in Yahweh: so might your children make our children cease from fearing Yahweh.22:26 Therefore we said, Let us now prepare to build us an altar, not for burnt offering, nor for sacrifice:22:27 but it shall be a witness between us and you, and between our generations after us, that we may do the service of Yahweh before him with our burnt offerings, and with our sacrifices, and with our peace offerings; that your children may not say to our children in time to come, You have no portion in Yahweh.22:28 Therefore said we, It shall be, when they so say to us or to our generations in time to come, that we shall say, Behold the pattern of the altar of Yahweh, which our fathers made, not for burnt offering, nor for sacrifice; but it is a witness between us and you.22:29 Far be it from us that we should rebel against Yahweh, and turn away this day from following Yahweh, to build an altar for burnt offering, for meal offering, or for sacrifice, besides the altar of Yahweh our God that is before his tabernacle.22:30 And when Phinehas the priest, and the princes of the congregation, even the heads of the thousands of Israel that were with him, heard the words that the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the children of Manasseh spoke, it pleased them well.22:31 And Phinehas the son of Eleazar the priest said to the children of Reuben, and to the children of Gad, and to the children of Manasseh, This day we know that Yahweh is in the midst of us, because ye have not committed this trespass against Yahweh: now have ye delivered the children of Israel out of the hand of Yahweh.22:32 And Phinehas the son of Eleazar the priest, and the princes, returned from the children of Reuben, and from the children of Gad, out of the land of Gilead, to the land of Canaan, to the children of Israel, and brought them word again.22:33 And the thing pleased the children of Israel; and the children of Israel blessed God, and spoke no more of going up against them to war, to destroy the land in which the children of Reuben and the children of Gad dwelt.22:34 And the children of Reuben and the children of Gad called the altar Ed: For, said they, it is a witness between us that Yahweh is God.Chapter 2323:1 And it came to pass after many days, when Yahweh had given rest to Israel from all their enemies round about, and Joshua was old and well stricken in years;23:2 that Joshua called for all Israel, for their elders and for their heads, and for their judges and for their officers, and said to them, I am old and well stricken in years:23:3 and ye have seen all that Yahweh your God has done to all these nations because of you; for Yahweh your God, he it is that has fought for you.23:4 Behold, I have allotted to you these nations that remain, to be an inheritance for your tribes, from the Jordan, with all the nations that I have cut off, even to the great sea toward the going down of the sun.23:5 And Yahweh your God, he will thrust them out from before you, and drive them from out of your sight; and ye shall possess their land, as Yahweh your God spoke to you.23:6 Therefore be ye very courageous to keep and to do all that is written in the book of the law of Moses, that ye turn not aside therefrom to the right hand or to the left;23:7 that ye come not among these nations, these that remain among you; neither make mention of the name of their gods, nor cause to swear by them, neither serve them, nor bow down yourselves to them;23:8 but cleave to Yahweh your God, as ye have done to this day.23:9 For Yahweh has driven out from before you great nations and strong: but as for you, no man has stood before you to this day.23:10 One man of you shall chase a thousand; for Yahweh your God, he it is that fights for you, as he spoke to you.23:11 Take good heed therefore to yourselves, that ye love Yahweh your God.23:12 Else if ye do at all go back, and cleave to the remnant of these nations, even these that remain among you, and make marriages with them, and go in to them, and they to you;23:13 know for a certainty that Yahweh your God will no more drive these nations from out of your sight; but they shall be a snare and a trap to you, and a scourge in your sides, and thorns in your eyes, until ye perish from off this good land which Yahweh your God has given you.23:14 And, behold, this day I am going the way of all the earth: and ye know in all your hearts and in all your souls, that not one thing has failed of all the good things which Yahweh your God spoke concerning you; all are come to pass to you, not one thing has failed thereof.23:15 And it shall come to pass, that as all the good things are come upon you of which Yahweh your God spoke to you, so will Yahweh bring upon you all the evil things, until he have destroyed you from off this good land which Yahweh your God has given you.23:16 When ye transgress the covenant of Yahweh your God, which he commanded you, and go and serve other gods, and bow down yourselves to them; then will the anger of Yahweh be kindled against you, and ye shall perish quickly from off the good land which he has given to you.Chapter 2424:1 And Joshua gathered all the tribes of Israel to Shechem, and called for the elders of Israel, and for their heads, and for their judges, and for their officers; and they presented themselves before God.24:2 And Joshua said to all the people, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Your fathers dwelt of old time beyond the River, even Terah, the father of Abraham, and the father of Nahor: and they served other gods.24:3 And I took your father Abraham from beyond the River, and led him throughout all the land of Canaan, and multiplied his seed, and gave him Isaac.24:4 And I gave to Isaac Jacob and Esau: and I gave to Esau mount Seir, to possess it: and Jacob and his children went down into Egypt.24:5 And I sent Moses and Aaron, and I plagued Egypt, according to that which I did in the midst thereof: and afterward I brought you out.24:6 And I brought your fathers out of Egypt: and ye came to the sea; and the Egyptians pursued after your fathers with chariots and with horsemen to the Red Sea.24:7 And when they cried out to Yahweh, he put darkness between you and the Egyptians, and brought the sea upon them, and covered them; and your eyes saw what I did in Egypt: and ye dwelt in the wilderness many days.24:8 And I brought you into the land of the Amorites, that dwelt beyond the Jordan: and they fought with you; and I gave them into your hand, and ye possessed their land; and I destroyed them from before you.24:9 Then Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab, arose and fought against Israel: and he sent and called Balaam the son of Beor to curse you;24:10 but I would not hearken to Balaam; therefore he blessed you still: so I delivered you out of his hand.24:11 And ye went over the Jordan, and came to Jericho: and the men of Jericho fought against you, the Amorite, and the Perizzite, and the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and the Girgashite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite; and I delivered them into your hand.24:12 And I sent the hornet before you, which drove them out from before you, even the two kings of the Amorites; not with your sword, nor with your bow.24:13 And I gave you a land whereon you had not labored, and cities which ye built not, and ye dwell therein; of vineyards and oliveyards which ye planted not do ye eat.24:14 Now therefore fear Yahweh, and serve him in sincerity and in truth; and put away the gods which your fathers served beyond the River, and in Egypt; and serve ye Yahweh.24:15 And if it seem evil to you to serve Yahweh, choose you this day whom ye will serve; whether the gods which your fathers served that were beyond the River, or the gods of the Amorites, in whose land ye dwell: but as for me and my house, we will serve Yahweh.24:16 And the people answered and said, Far be it from us that we should forsake Yahweh, to serve other gods;24:17 for Yahweh our God, he it is that brought us and our fathers up out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage, and that did those great signs in our sight, and preserved us in all the way in which we went, and among all the peoples through the midst of whom we passed;24:18 and Yahweh drove out from before us all the peoples, even the Amorites that dwelt in the land: therefore we also will serve Yahweh; for he is our God.24:19 And Joshua said to the people, You cannot serve Yahweh; for he is a holy God; he is a jealous God; he will not forgive your transgression nor your sins.24:20 If ye forsake Yahweh, and serve foreign gods, then he will turn and do you evil, and consume you, after that he has done you good.24:21 And the people said to Joshua, Nay; but we will serve Yahweh.24:22 And Joshua said to the people, You are witnesses against yourselves that ye have chosen you Yahweh, to serve him.  And they said, We are witnesses.24:23 Now therefore put away, said he, the foreign gods which are among you, and incline your heart to Yahweh, the God of Israel.24:24 And the people said to Joshua, Yahweh our God will we serve, and to his voice will we hearken.24:25 So Joshua made a covenant with the people that day, and set them a statute and an ordinance in Shechem.24:26 And Joshua wrote these words in the book of the law of God; and he took a great stone, and set it up there under the oak that was by the sanctuary of Yahweh.24:27 And Joshua said to all the people, Behold, this stone shall be a witness against us; for it has heard all the words of Yahweh which he spoke to us: it shall be therefore a witness against you, lest ye deny your God.24:28 So Joshua sent the people away, every man to his inheritance.24:29 And it came to pass after these things, that Joshua the son of Nun, the servant of Yahweh, died, being a hundred and ten years old.24:30 And they buried him in the border of his inheritance in Timnathserah, which is in the hill-country of Ephraim, on the north of the mountain of Gaash.24:31 And Israel served Yahweh all the days of Joshua, and all the days of the elders that outlived Joshua, and had known all the work of Yahweh, that he had wrought for Israel.24:32 And the bones of Joseph, which the children of Israel brought up out of Egypt, buried they in Shechem, in the parcel of ground which Jacob bought of the sons of Hamor the father of Shechem for a hundred pieces of money: and they became the inheritance of the children of Joseph.24:33 And Eleazar the son of Aaron died; and they buried him in the hill of Phinehas his son, which was given him in the hill-country of Ephraim.End of JoshuaJudgesChapter 11:1 And it came to pass after the death of Joshua, that the children of Israel asked of Yahweh, saying, Who shall go up for us first against the Canaanites, to fight against them?1:2 And Yahweh said, Judah shall go up: behold, I have delivered the land into his hand.1:3 And Judah said to Simeon his brother, Come up with me into my lot, that we may fight against the Canaanites; and I likewise will go with you into your lot.  So Simeon went with him.1:4 And Judah went up; and Yahweh delivered the Canaanites and the Perizzites into their hand: and they smote of them in Bezek ten thousand men.1:5 And they found Adoni-bezek in Bezek; and they fought against him, and they smote the Canaanites and the Perizzites.1:6 But Adoni-bezek fled; and they pursued after him, and caught him, and cut off his thumbs and his great toes.1:7 And Adoni-bezek said, Seventy kings, having their thumbs and their big toes cut off, gathered their food under my table: as I have done, so God has requited me.  And they brought him to Jerusalem, and he died there.1:8 And the children of Judah fought against Jerusalem, and took it, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and set the city on fire.1:9 And afterward the children of Judah went down to fight against the Canaanites that dwelt in the hill-country, and in the South, and in the lowland.1:10 And Judah went against the Canaanites that dwelt in Hebron (now the name of Hebron beforetime was Kiriath-arba); and they smote Sheshai, and Ahiman, and Talmai.1:11 And from there he went against the inhabitants of Debir.  (Now the name of Debir beforetime was Kiriath-sepher.)1:12 And Caleb said, He that attacks Kiriath-sepher, and captures it, to him will I give Achsah my daughter as wife.1:13 And Othniel the son of Kenaz, Caleb's younger brother, captured it: and he gave him Achsah his daughter as wife.1:14 And it came to pass, when she came to him, that she moved him to ask of her father a field: and she alighted from off her donkey; and Caleb said to her, What would you?1:15 And she said to him, Give me a blessing; for that you have set me in the land of the South, give me also springs of water.  And Caleb gave her the upper springs and the nether springs.1:16 And the children of the Kenite, Moses' brother-in-law, went up out of the city of palm-trees with the children of Judah into the wilderness of Judah, which is in the south of Arad; and they went and dwelt with the people.1:17 And Judah went with Simeon his brother, and they smote the Canaanites that inhabited Zephath, and utterly destroyed it.  And the name of the city was called Hormah.1:18 Also Judah took Gaza with the border thereof, and Ashkelon with the border thereof, and Ekron with the border thereof.1:19 And Yahweh was with Judah; and drove out the inhabitants of the hill-country; for he could not drive out the inhabitants of the valley, because they had chariots of iron.1:20 And they gave Hebron to Caleb, as Moses had spoken: and he drove out there the three sons of Anak.1:21 And the children of Benjamin did not drive out the Jebusites that inhabited Jerusalem; but the Jebusites dwell with the children of Benjamin in Jerusalem to this day.1:22 And the house of Joseph, they also went up against Beth-el; and Yahweh was with them.1:23 And the house of Joseph sent to spy out Beth-el.  (Now the name of the city beforetime was Luz.)1:24 And the watchers saw a man come forth out of the city, and they said to him, Show us, we pray you, the entrance into the city, and we will deal kindly with you.1:25 And he showed them the entrance into the city; and they smote the city with the edge of the sword; but they let the man go and all his family.1:26 And the man went into the land of the Hittites, and built a city, and called the name thereof Luz, which is the name thereof to this day.1:27 And Manasseh did not drive out the inhabitants of Beth-shean and its towns, nor of Taanach and its towns, nor the inhabitants of Dor and its towns, nor the inhabitants of Ibleam and its towns, nor the inhabitants of Megiddo and its towns; but the Canaanites would dwell in that land.1:28 And it came to pass, when Israel was become strong, that they put the Canaanites to taskwork, and did not utterly drive them out.1:29 And Ephraim drove not out the Canaanites that dwelt in Gezer; but the Canaanites dwelt in Gezer among them.1:30 Zebulun drove not out the inhabitants of Kitron, nor the inhabitants of Nahalol; but the Canaanites dwelt among them, and became subject to taskwork.1:31 Asher drove not out the inhabitants of Acco, nor the inhabitants of Sidon, nor of Ahlab, nor of Achzib, nor of Helbah, nor of Aphik, nor of Rehob;1:32 but the Asherites dwelt among the Canaanites, the inhabitants of the land; for they did not drive them out.1:33 Naphtali drove not out the inhabitants of Beth-shemesh, nor the inhabitants of Beth-anath; but he dwelt among the Canaanites, the inhabitants of the land: nevertheless the inhabitants of Beth-shemesh and of Beth-anath became subject to taskwork.1:34 And the Amorites forced the children of Dan into the hill-country; for they would not allow them to come down to the valley;1:35 but the Amorites would dwell in mount Heres, in Aijalon, and in Shaalbim: yet the hand of the house of Joseph prevailed, so that they became subject to taskwork.1:36 And the border of the Amorites was from the ascent of Akrabbim, from the rock, and upward.Chapter 22:1 And the angel of Yahweh came up from Gilgal to Bochim.  And he said, I made you to go up out of Egypt, and have brought you to the land which I swore to your fathers; and I said, I will never break my covenant with you:2:2 and ye shall make no covenant with the inhabitants of this land; ye shall break down their altars.  But ye have not hearkened to my voice: why have ye done this?2:3 Wherefore I also said, I will not drive them out from before you; but they shall be as thorns in your sides, and their gods shall be a snare to you.2:4 And it came to pass, when the angel of Yahweh spoke these words to all the children of Israel, that the people lifted up their voice, and wept.2:5 And they called the name of that place Bochim: and they sacrificed there to Yahweh.2:6 Now when Joshua had sent the people away, the children of Israel went every man to his inheritance to possess the land.2:7 And the people served Yahweh all the days of Joshua, and all the days of the elders that outlived Joshua, who had seen all the great work of Yahweh that he had wrought for Israel.2:8 And Joshua the son of Nun, the servant of Yahweh, died, being a hundred and ten years old.2:9 And they buried him in the border of his inheritance in Timnath-heres, in the hill-country of Ephraim, on the north of the mountain of Gaash.2:10 And also all that generation were gathered to their fathers: and there arose another generation after them, that knew not Yahweh, nor yet the work which he had wrought for Israel.2:11 And the children of Israel did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and served the Baalim;2:12 and they forsook Yahweh, the God of their fathers, who brought them out of the land of Egypt, and followed other gods, of the gods of the peoples that were round about them, and bowed themselves down to them: and they provoked Yahweh to anger.2:13 And they forsook Yahweh, and served Baal and the Ashtaroth.2:14 And the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Israel, and he delivered them into the hands of spoilers that despoiled them; and he sold them into the hands of their enemies round about, so that they could not any longer stand before their enemies.2:15 Wherever they went out, the hand of Yahweh was against them for evil, as Yahweh had spoken, and as Yahweh had sworn to them: and they were sore distressed.2:16 And Yahweh raised up judges, who saved them out of the hand of those that despoiled them.2:17 And yet they hearkened not to their judges; for they played the harlot after other gods, and bowed themselves down to them: they turned aside quickly out of the way in which their fathers walked- obeying the commandments of Yahweh; but they did not so.2:18 And when Yahweh raised them up judges, then Yahweh was with the judge, and saved them out of the hand of their enemies all the days of the judge: for it repented Yahweh because of their groaning by reason of them that oppressed them and vexed them.2:19 But it came to pass, when the judge was dead, that they turned back, and dealt more corruptly than their fathers, in following other gods to serve them, and to bow down to them; they ceased not from their doings, nor from their stubborn way.2:20 And the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Israel; and he said, Because this nation have transgressed my covenant which I commanded their fathers, and have not hearkened to my voice;2:21 I also will not from now on drive out any from before them of the nations that Joshua left when he died;2:22 that by them I may prove Israel, whether they will keep the way of Yahweh to walk therein, as their fathers did keep it, or not.2:23 So Yahweh left those nations, without driving them out hastily; neither delivered he them into the hand of Joshua.Chapter 33:1 Now these are the nations which Yahweh left, to prove Israel by them, even as many of Israel as had not known all the wars of Canaan;3:2 only that the generations of the children of Israel might know, to teach them war, at the least such as beforetime knew nothing thereof:3:3 namely, the five lords of the Philistines, and all the Canaanites, and the Sidonians, and the Hivites that dwelt in mount Lebanon, from mount Baal-hermon to the entrance of Hamath.3:4 And they were left, to prove Israel by them, to know whether they would hearken to the commandments of Yahweh, which he commanded their fathers by Moses.3:5 And the children of Israel dwelt among the Canaanites, the Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites:3:6 and they took their daughters to be their wives, and gave their own daughters to their sons and served their gods.3:7 And the children of Israel did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and forgat Yahweh their God, and served the Baalim and the Asheroth.3:8 Therefore the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Israel, and he sold them into the hand of Cushan-rishathaim king of Mesopotamia: and the children of Israel served Cushan-rishathaim eight years.3:9 And when the children of Israel cried to Yahweh, Yahweh raised up a saviour to the children of Israel, who saved them, even Othniel the son of Kenaz, Caleb's younger brother.3:10 And the Spirit of Yahweh came upon him, and he judged Israel; and he went out to war, and Yahweh delivered Cushan-rishathaim king of Mesopotamia into his hand: and his hand prevailed against Cushan-rishathaim.3:11 And the land had rest forty years.  And Othniel the son of Kenaz died.3:12 And the children of Israel again did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh: and Yahweh strengthened Eglon the king of Moab against Israel, because they had done that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh.3:13 And he gathered to him the children of Ammon and Amalek; and he went and smote Israel, and they possessed the city of palm-trees.3:14 And the children of Israel served Eglon the king of Moab eighteen years.3:15 But when the children of Israel cried to Yahweh, Yahweh raised them up a saviour, Ehud the son of Gera, the Benjamite, a man left-handed.  And the children of Israel sent tribute by him to Eglon the king of Moab.3:16 And Ehud made him a sword which had two edges, a cubit in length; and he girded it under his raiment upon his right thigh.3:17 And he offered the tribute to Eglon king of Moab: now Eglon was a very fat man.3:18 And when he had made an end of offering the tribute, he sent away the people that bore the tribute.3:19 But he himself turned back from the quarries that were by Gilgal, and said, I have a secret errand to you, O king.  And he said, Keep silence.  And all that stood by him went out from him.3:20 And Ehud came to him; and he was sitting by himself alone in the cool upper room.  And Ehud said, I have a message from God to you.  And he arose out of his seat.3:21 And Ehud put forth his left hand, and took the sword from his right thigh, and thrust it into his body:3:22 and the haft also went in after the blade; and the fat closed upon the blade, for he drew not the sword out of his body; and it came out behind.3:23 Then Ehud went forth into the porch, and shut the doors of the upper room upon him, and locked them.3:24 Now when he was gone out, his servants came; and they saw, and, behold, the doors of the upper room were locked; and they said, Surely he is covering his feet in the upper chamber.3:25 And they tarried till they were ashamed; and, behold, he opened not the doors of the upper room: therefore they took the key, and opened them, and, behold, their lord was fallen down dead on the earth.3:26 And Ehud escaped while they tarried, and passed beyond the quarries, and escaped to Seirah.3:27 And it came to pass, when he was come, that he blew a trumpet in the hill-country of Ephraim; and the children of Israel went down with him from the hill-country, and he before them.3:28 And he said to them, Follow after me; for Yahweh has delivered your enemies the Moabites into your hand.  And they went down after him, and took the fords of the Jordan against the Moabites, and allowed not a man to pass over.3:29 And they smote of Moab at that time about ten thousand men, every lusty man, and every man of valor; and there escaped not a man.3:30 So Moab was subdued that day under the hand of Israel.  And the land had rest 80 years.3:31 And after him was Shamgar the son of Anath, who smote of the Philistines six hundred men with an ox-goad: and he also saved Israel.Chapter 44:1 And the children of Israel again did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, when Ehud was dead.4:2 And Yahweh sold them into the hand of Jabin king of Canaan, that reigned in Hazor; the captain of whose host was Sisera, who dwelt in Harosheth of the Gentiles.4:3 And the children of Israel cried to Yahweh: for he had nine hundred chariots of iron; and twenty years he mightily oppressed the children of Israel.4:4 Now Deborah, a prophetess, the wife of Lappidoes, she judged Israel at that time.4:5 And she dwelt under the palm-tree of Deborah between Ramah and Beth-el in the hill-country of Ephraim: and the children of Israel came up to her for judgment.4:6 And she sent and called Barak the son of Abinoam out of Kedesh-naphtali, and said to him, Has not Yahweh, the God of Israel, commanded, saying, Go and draw to mount Tabor, and take with you ten thousand men of the children of Naphtali and of the children of Zebulun?4:7 And I will draw to you, to the river Kishon, Sisera, the captain of Jabin's army, with his chariots and his multitude; and I will deliver him into your hand.4:8 And Barak said to her, If you will go with me, then I will go; but if you will not go with me, I will not go.4:9 And she said, I will surely go with you: notwithstanding, the journey that you take shall not be for your honor; for Yahweh will sell Sisera into the hand of a woman.  And Deborah arose, and went with Barak to Kedesh.4:10 And Barak called Zebulun and Naphtali together to Kedesh; and there went up ten thousand men at his feet: and Deborah went up with him.4:11 Now Heber the Kenite had separated himself from the Kenites, even from the children of Hobab the brother-in-law of Moses, and had pitched his tent as far as the oak in Zaanannim, which is by Kedesh.4:12 And they told Sisera that Barak the son of Abinoam was gone up to mount Tabor.4:13 And Sisera gathered together all his chariots, even nine hundred chariots of iron, and all the people that were with him, from Harosheth of the Gentiles, to the river Kishon.4:14 And Deborah said to Barak, Up; for this is the day in which Yahweh has delivered Sisera into your hand; is not Yahweh gone out before you?  So Barak went down from mount Tabor, and ten thousand men after him.4:15 And Yahweh discomfited Sisera, and all his chariots, and all his host, with the edge of the sword before Barak; and Sisera alighted from his chariot, and fled away on his feet.4:16 But Barak pursued after the chariots, and after the host, to Harosheth of the Gentiles: and all the host of Sisera fell by the edge of the sword; there was not a man left.4:17 Sisera however fled away on his feet to the tent of Jael the wife of Heber the Kenite; for there was peace between Jabin the king of Hazor and the house of Heber the Kenite.4:18 And Jael went out to meet Sisera, and said to him, Turn in, my lord, turn in to me; fear not.  And he turned in to her into the tent, and she covered him with a rug.4:19 And he said to her, Give me, I pray you, a little water to drink; for I am thirsty.  And she opened a bottle of milk, and gave him drink, and covered him.4:20 And he said to her, Stand in the door of the tent, and it shall be, when any man does come and inquire of you, and say, Is there any man here?  that you shall say, No.4:21 Then Jael Heber's wife took a tent-pin, and took a hammer in her hand, and went softly to him, and smote the pin into his temples, and it pierced through into the ground; for he was in a deep sleep; so he swooned and died.4:22 And, behold, as Barak pursued Sisera, Jael came out to meet him, and said to him, Come, and I will show you the man whom you seek.  And he came to her; and, behold, Sisera lay dead, and the tent-pin was in his temples.4:23 So God subdued on that day Jabin the king of Canaan before the children of Israel.4:24 And the hand of the children of Israel prevailed more and more against Jabin the king of Canaan, until they had destroyed Jabin king of Canaan.Chapter 55:1 Then sang Deborah and Barak the son of Abinoam on that day, saying,5:2 For that the leaders took the lead in Israel, For that the people offered themselves willingly, Bless ye Yahweh.5:3 Hear, O ye kings; give ear, O ye princes; I, even I, will sing to Yahweh; I will sing praise to Yahweh, the God of Israel.5:4 Yahweh, when you went forth out of Seir, When you marched out of the field of Edom, The earth trembled, the heavens also dropped, Yes, the clouds dropped water.5:5 The mountains quaked at the presence of Yahweh, Even yon Sinai at the presence of Yahweh, the God of Israel.5:6 In the days of Shamgar the son of Anath, In the days of Jael, the highways were unoccupied, and the travellers walked through byways.5:7 The rulers ceased in Israel, they ceased, Until that I Deborah arose, That I arose a mother in Israel.5:8 They chose new gods; Then was war in the gates: Was there a shield or spear seen Among forty thousand in Israel?5:9 My heart is toward the governors of Israel, That offered themselves willingly among the people: Bless ye Yahweh.5:10 Tell of it, ye that ride on white asses, You that sit on rich carpets, and ye that walk by the way.5:11 Far from the noise of archers, in the places of drawing water, There shall they rehearse the righteous acts of Yahweh, even the righteous acts of his rule in Israel.  Then the people of Yahweh went down to the gates.5:12 Awake, awake, Deborah; Awake, awake, utter a song: Arise, Barak, and lead away your captives, you son of Abinoam.5:13 Then came down a remnant of the nobles and the people; Yahweh came down for me against the mighty.5:14 Out of Ephraim came down they whose root is in Amalek; After you, Benjamin, among your peoples; Out of Machir came down governors, and out of Zebulun they that handle the marshal's staff.5:15 And the princes of Issachar were with Deborah; As was Issachar, so was Barak; Into the valley they rushed forth at his feet.  By the watercourses of Reuben There were great resolves of heart.5:16 Why sat you among the sheepfolds, To hear the pipings for the flocks?  At the watercourses of Reuben There were great searchings of heart.5:17 Gilead abode beyond the Jordan: And Dan, why did he remain in ships?  Asher sat still at the haven of the sea, and abode by his creeks.5:18 Zebulun was a people that jeoparded their lives to the death, and Naphtali, upon the high places of the field.5:19 The kings came and fought; Then fought the kings of Canaan.  In Taanach by the waters of Megiddo: They took no gain of money.5:20 From heaven fought the stars, From their courses they fought against Sisera.5:21 The river Kishon swept them away, That ancient river, the river Kishon.  O my soul, march on with strength.5:22 Then did the horsehoofs stamp By reason of the prancings, the prancings of their strong ones.5:23 Curse ye Meroz, said the angel of Yahweh.  Curse ye bitterly the inhabitants thereof, Because they came not to the help of Yahweh, To the help of Yahweh against the mighty.5:24 Blessed above women shall Jael be, The wife of Heber the Kenite; Blessed shall she be above women in the tent.5:25 He asked water, and she gave him milk; She brought him butter in a lordly dish.5:26 She put her hand to the tent-pin, and her right hand to the workmen's hammer; And with the hammer she smote Sisera, she smote through his head; Yes, she pierced and struck through his temples.5:27 At her feet he bowed, he fell, he lay; At her feet he bowed, he fell; Where he bowed, there he fell down dead.5:28 Through the window she looked forth, and cried, The mother of Sisera cried through the lattice, Why is his chariot so long in coming?  Why tarry the wheels of his chariots?5:29 Her wise ladies answered her, Indeed, she returned answer to herself,5:30 Have they not found, have they not divided the spoil?  A damsel, two damsels to every man; To Sisera a spoil of dyed garments, a spoil of dyed garments embroidered, Of dyed garments embroidered on both sides, on the necks of the spoil?5:31 So let all your enemies perish, O Yahweh: But let them that love him be as the sun when he goes forth in his might.  And the land had rest forty years.Chapter 66:1 And the children of Israel did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh: and Yahweh delivered them into the hand of Midian seven years.6:2 And the hand of Midian prevailed against Israel; and because of Midian the children of Israel made them the dens which are in the mountains, and the caves, and the strongholds.6:3 And so it was, when Israel had sown, that the Midianites came up, and the Amalekites, and the children of the east; they came up against them;6:4 and they encamped against them, and destroyed the increase of the earth, till you come to Gaza, and left no sustenance in Israel, neither sheep, nor ox, nor donkey.6:5 For they came up with their cattle and their tents; they came in as locusts for multitude; both they and their camels were without number: and they came into the land to destroy it.6:6 And Israel was brought very low because of Midian; and the children of Israel cried to Yahweh.6:7 And it came to pass, when the children of Israel cried to Yahweh because of Midian,6:8 that Yahweh sent a prophet to the children of Israel: and he said to them, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, I brought you up from Egypt, and brought you forth out of the house of bondage;6:9 and I delivered you out of the hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of all that oppressed you, and drove them out from before you, and gave you their land;6:10 and I said to you, I am Yahweh your God; ye shall not fear the gods of the Amorites, in whose land ye dwell.  But ye have not hearkened to my voice.6:11 And the angel of Yahweh came, and sat under the oak which was in Ophrah, that pertained to Joash the Abiezrite: and his son Gideon was beating out wheat in the winepress, to hide it from the Midianites.6:12 And the angel of Yahweh appeared to him, and said to him, Yahweh is with you, you mighty man of valor.6:13 And Gideon said to him, Oh, my lord, if Yahweh is with us, why then is all this befallen us?  and where are all his wondrous works which our fathers told us of, saying, Did not Yahweh bring us up from Egypt?  but now Yahweh has cast us off, and delivered us into the hand of Midian.6:14 And Yahweh looked upon him, and said, Go in this your might, and save Israel from the hand of Midian: have not I sent you?6:15 And he said to him, Oh, Lord, with which shall I save Israel?  behold, my family is the poorest in Manasseh, and I am the least in my father's house.6:16 And Yahweh said to him, Surely I will be with you, and you shall strike the Midianites as one man.6:17 And he said to him, If now I have found favor in your sight, then show me a sign that it is you that is talking with me.6:18 Depart not from here, I pray you, until I come to you, and bring forth my present, and lay it before you.  And he said, I will tarry until you come again.6:19 And Gideon went in, and made ready a kid, and unleavened cakes of an ephah of meal: the flesh he put in a basket, and he put the broth in a pot, and brought it out to him under the oak, and presented it.6:20 And the angel of God said to him, Take the flesh and the unleavened cakes, and lay them upon this rock, and pour out the broth.  And he did so.6:21 Then the angel of Yahweh put forth the end of the staff that was in his hand, and touched the flesh and the unleavened cakes; and there went up fire out of the rock, and consumed the flesh and the unleavened cakes; and the angel of Yahweh departed out of his sight.6:22 And Gideon saw that he was the angel of Yahweh; and Gideon said, alas, O Lord Yahweh! forasmuch as I have seen the angel of Yahweh face to face.6:23 And Yahweh said to him, Peace be to you; fear not: you shall not die.6:24 Then Gideon built an altar there to Yahweh, and called it Yahweh-shalom: to this day it is yet in Ophrah of the Abiezrites.6:25 And it came to pass the same night, that Yahweh said to him, Take your father's bullock, even the second bullock seven years old, and throw down the altar of Baal that your father has, and cut down the Asherah that is by it;6:26 and build an altar to Yahweh your God upon the top of this stronghold, in the orderly manner, and take the second bullock, and offer a burnt offering with the wood of the Asherah which you shall cut down.6:27 Then Gideon took ten men of his servants, and did as Yahweh had spoken to him: and it came to pass, because he feared his father's household and the men of the city, so that he could not do it by day, that he did it by night.6:28 And when the men of the city arose early in the morning, behold, the altar of Baal was broken down, and the Asherah was cut down that was by it, and the second bullock was offered upon the altar that was built.6:29 And they said one to another, Who has done this thing?  And when they inquired and asked, they said, Gideon the son of Joash has done this thing.6:30 Then the men of the city said to Joash, Bring out your son, that he may die, because he has broken down the altar of Baal, and because he has cut down the Asherah that was by it.6:31 And Joash said to all that stood against him, Will ye contend for Baal?  Or will ye save him?  he that will contend for him, let him be put to death whilst it is yet morning: if he be a god, let him contend for himself, because one has broken down his altar.6:32 Therefore on that day he called him Jerubbaal, saying, Let Baal contend against him, because he has broken down his altar.6:33 Then all the Midianites and the Amalekites and the children of the east assembled themselves together; and they passed over, and encamped in the valley of Jezreel.6:34 But the Spirit of Yahweh came upon Gideon; and he blew a trumpet; and Abiezer was gathered together after him.6:35 And he sent messengers throughout all Manasseh; and they also were gathered together after him: and he sent messengers to Asher, and to Zebulun, and to Naphtali; and they came up to meet them.6:36 And Gideon said to God, If you will save Israel by my hand, as you have spoken,6:37 behold, I will put a fleece of wool on the threshing-floor; if there be dew on the fleece only, and it be dry upon all the ground, then shall I know that you will save Israel by my hand, as you have spoken.6:38 And it was so; for he rose up early on the morrow, and pressed the fleece together, and wrung the dew out of the fleece, a bowlful of water.6:39 And Gideon said to God, Let not your anger be kindled against me, and I will speak but this once: let me make trial, I pray you, but this once with the fleece; let it now be dry only upon the fleece, and upon all the ground let there be dew.6:40 And God did so that night: for it was dry upon the fleece only, and there was dew on all the ground.Chapter 77:1 Then Jerubbaal, who is Gideon, and all the people that were with him, rose up early, and encamped beside the spring of Harod: and the camp of Midian was on the north side of them, by the hill of Moreh, in the valley.7:2 And Yahweh said to Gideon, The people that are with you are too many for me to give the Midianites into their hand, lest Israel vaunt themselves against me, saying, My own hand has saved me.7:3 Now therefore proclaim in the ears of the people, saying, Whosoever is fearful and trembling, let him return and depart from mount Gilead.  And there returned of the people twenty and two thousand; and there remained ten thousand.7:4 And Yahweh said to Gideon, The people are yet too many; bring them down to the water, and I will try them for you there: and it shall be, that of whom I say to you, This shall go with you, the same shall go with you; and of whomsoever I say to you, This shall not go with you, the same shall not go.7:5 So he brought down the people to the water: and Yahweh said to Gideon, Every one that laps of the water with his tongue, as a dog laps, him shall you set by himself; likewise every one that bows down upon his knees to drink.7:6 And the number of them that lapped, putting their hand to their mouth, was three hundred men: but all the rest of the people bowed down upon their knees to drink water.7:7 And Yahweh said to Gideon, By the three hundred men that lapped will I save you, and deliver the Midianites into your hand; and let all the people go every man to his place.7:8 So the people took victuals in their hand, and their trumpets; and he sent all the men of Israel every man to his tent, but retained the three hundred men: and the camp of Midian was beneath him in the valley.7:9 And it came to pass the same night, that Yahweh said to him, arise, go down into the camp; for I have delivered it into your hand.7:10 But if you fear to go down, go you with Purah your servant down to the camp:7:11 and you shall hear what they say; and afterward shall your hands be strengthened to go down into the camp.  Then went he down with Purah his servant to the outermost part of the armed men that were in the camp.7:12 And the Midianites and the Amalekites and all the children of the east lay along in the valley like locusts for multitude; and their camels were without number, as the sand which is upon the sea-shore for multitude.7:13 And when Gideon was come, behold, there was a man telling a dream to his fellow; and he said, Behold, I dreamed a dream; and, lo, a cake of barley bread tumbled into the camp of Midian, and came to the tent, and smote it so that it fell, and turned it upside down, so that the tent lay flat.7:14 And his fellow answered and said, This is nothing else save the sword of Gideon the son of Joash, a man of Israel: into his hand God has delivered Midian, and all the host.7:15 And it was so, when Gideon heard the telling of the dream, and the interpretation thereof, that he worshipped; and he returned into the camp of Israel, and said, arise; for Yahweh has delivered into your hand the host of Midian.7:16 And he divided the three hundred men into three companies, and he put into the hands of all of them trumpets, and empty pitchers, with torches within the pitchers.7:17 And he said to them, Look on me, and do likewise: and, behold, when I come to the outermost part of the camp, it shall be that, as I do, so shall ye do.7:18 When I blow the trumpet, I and all that are with me, then blow ye the trumpets also on every side of all the camp, and say, For Yahweh and for Gideon.7:19 So Gideon, and the hundred men that were with him, came to the outermost part of the camp in the beginning of the middle watch, when they had but newly set the watch: and they blew the trumpets, and broke in pieces the pitchers that were in their hands.7:20 And the three companies blew the trumpets, and broke the pitchers, and held the torches in their left hands, and the trumpets in their right hands with which to blow; and they cried, The sword of Yahweh and of Gideon.7:21 And they stood every man in his place round about the camp; and all the host ran; and they shouted, and put them to flight.7:22 And they blew the three hundred trumpets, and Yahweh set every man's sword against his fellow, and against all the host; and the host fled as far as Beth-shittah toward Zererah, as far as the border of Abel-meholah, by Tabbath.7:23 And the men of Israel were gathered together out of Naphtali, and out of Asher, and out of all Manasseh, and pursued after Midian.7:24 And Gideon sent messengers throughout all the hill-country of Ephraim, saying, Come down against Midian, and take before them the waters, as far as Beth-barah, even the Jordan.  So all the men of Ephraim were gathered together, and took the waters as far as Beth-barah, even the Jordan.7:25 And they took the two princes of Midian, Oreb and Zeeb; and they slew Oreb at the rock of Oreb, and Zeeb they slew at the winepress of Zeeb, and pursued Midian: and they brought the heads of Oreb and Zeeb to Gideon beyond the Jordan.Chapter 88:1 And the men of Ephraim said to him, Why have you served us in this manner, such that you did not call us when you went to fight with Midian?  And they chided him sharply.8:2 And he said to them, What have I now done in comparison with you?  Is not the gleaning of the grapes of Ephraim better than the vintage of Abiezer?8:3 God has delivered into your hand the princes of Midian, Oreb and Zeeb: and what was I able to do in comparison with you?  Then their anger toward him was abated, when he had said that.8:4 And Gideon came to the Jordan, and passed over, he, and the three hundred men that were with him, faint, yet pursuing.8:5 And he said to the men of Succoth, Give, I pray you, loaves of bread to the people that follow me; for they are faint, and I am pursuing after Zebah and Zalmunna, the kings of Midian.8:6 And the princes of Succoth said, are the hands of Zebah and Zalmunna now in your hand, that we should give bread to your army?8:7 And Gideon said, Therefore when Yahweh has delivered Zebah and Zalmunna into my hand, then I will tear your flesh with the thorns of the wilderness and with briers.8:8 And he went up there to Penuel, and spoke to them in like manner; and the men of Penuel answered him as the men of Succoth had answered.8:9 And he spoke also to the men of Penuel, saying, When I come again in peace, I will break down this tower.8:10 Now Zebah and Zalmunna were in Karkor, and their hosts with them, about fifteen thousand men, all that were left of all the host of the children of the east; for there fell a hundred and twenty thousand men that drew sword.8:11 And Gideon went up by the way of them that dwelt in tents on the east of Nobah and Jogbehah, and smote the host; for the host was secure.8:12 And Zebah and Zalmunna fled; and he pursued after them; and he took the two kings of Midian, Zebah and Zalmunna, and discomfited all the host.8:13 And Gideon the son of Joash returned from the battle from the ascent of Heres.8:14 And he caught a young man of the men of Succoth, and inquired of him: and he described for him the princes of Succoth, and the elders thereof, seventy and seven men.8:15 And he came to the men of Succoth, and said, Behold Zebah and Zalmunna, concerning whom ye did taunt me, saying, are the hands of Zebah and Zalmunna now in your hand, that we should give bread to your men that are weary?8:16 And he took the elders of the city, and thorns of the wilderness and briers, and with them he taught the men of Succoth.8:17 And he broke down the tower of Penuel, and slew the men of the city.8:18 Then said he to Zebah and Zalmunna, What manner of men were they whom ye slew at Tabor?  And they answered, as you are, so were they; each one resembled the children of a king.8:19 And he said, They were my brethren, the sons of my mother: as Yahweh lives, if ye had saved them alive, I would not slay you.8:20 And he said to Jether his first-born, Up, and slay them.  But the youth drew not his sword; for he feared, because he was yet a youth.8:21 Then Zebah and Zalmunna said, Rise you, and fall upon us; for as the man is, so is his strength.  And Gideon arose, and slew Zebah and Zalmunna, and took the crescents that were on their camels' necks.8:22 Then the men of Israel said to Gideon, Rule you over us, both you, and your son, and your son's son also; for you have saved us out of the hand of Midian.8:23 And Gideon said to them, I will not rule over you, neither shall my son rule over you: Yahweh shall rule over you.8:24 And Gideon said to them, I would make a request of you, that ye would give me every man the ear-rings of his spoil.  (For they had golden ear-rings, because they were Ishmaelites.)8:25 And they answered, We will willingly give them.  And they spread a garment, and did cast therein every man the ear-rings of his spoil.8:26 And the weight of the golden ear-rings that he requested was a thousand and seven hundred shekels of gold, besides the crescents, and the pendants, and the purple raiment that was on the kings of Midian, and besides the chains that were about their camels' necks.8:27 And Gideon made an ephod thereof, and put it in his city, even in Ophrah: and all Israel played the harlot after it there; and it became a snare to Gideon, and to his house.8:28 So Midian was subdued before the children of Israel, and they lifted up their heads no more.  And the land had rest forty years in the days of Gideon.8:29 And Jerubbaal the son of Joash went and dwelt in his own house.8:30 And Gideon had from his body begotten 70 sons; for he had many wives.8:31 And his concubine that was in Shechem, she also bore him a son, and he called his name Abimelech.8:32 And Gideon the son of Joash died in a good old age, and was buried in the sepulchre of Joash his father, in Ophrah of the Abiezrites.8:33 And it came to pass, as soon as Gideon was dead, that the children of Israel turned again, and played the harlot after the Baalim, and made Baal-berith their god.8:34 And the children of Israel remembered not Yahweh their God, who had delivered them out of the hand of all their enemies on every side;8:35 neither showed they kindness to the house of Jerubbaal, who is Gideon, according to all the goodness which he had shown to Israel.Chapter 99:1 And Abimelech the son of Jerubbaal went to Shechem to his mother's brethren, and spoke with them, and with all the family of the house of his mother's father, saying,9:2 Speak, I pray you, in the ears of all the men of Shechem, Whether is better for you, that all the sons of Jerubbaal, who are 70 persons, rule over you, or that one rule over you?  remember also that I am your bone and your flesh.9:3 And his mother's brethren spoke of him in the ears of all the men of Shechem all these words: and their hearts inclined to follow Abimelech; for they said, He is our brother.9:4 And they gave him 70 pieces of silver out of the house of Baal-berith, with which Abimelech hired vain and light fellows, who followed him.9:5 And he went to his father's house at Ophrah, and slew his brethren the sons of Jerubbaal, being 70 persons, upon one stone: but Jotham the youngest son of Jerubbaal was left; for he hid himself.9:6 And all the men of Shechem assembled themselves together, and all the house of Millo, and went and made Abimelech king, by the oak of the pillar that was in Shechem.9:7 And when they told it to Jotham, he went and stood on the top of mount Gerizim, and lifted up his voice, and cried, and said to them, Hearken to me, ye men of Shechem, that God may hearken to you.9:8 The trees went forth on a time to anoint a king over them; and they said to the olive-tree, Reign you over us.9:9 But the olive-tree said to them, Should I leave my fatness, with which by me they honor God and man, and go to wave to and fro over the trees?9:10 And the trees said to the fig-tree, Come you, and reign over us.9:11 But the fig-tree said to them, Should I leave my sweetness, and my good fruit, and go to wave to and fro over the trees?9:12 And the trees said to the vine, Come you, and reign over us.9:13 And the vine said to them, Should I leave my new wine, which cheers God and man, and go to wave to and fro over the trees?9:14 Then said all the trees to the bramble, Come you, and reign over us.9:15 And the bramble said to the trees, If in truth ye anoint me king over you, then come and take refuge in my shade; and if not, let fire come out of the bramble, and devour the cedars of Lebanon.9:16 Now therefore, if ye have dealt truly and uprightly, in that ye have made Abimelech king, and if ye have dealt well with Jerubbaal and his house, and have done to him according to the deserving of his hands9:17 (for my father fought for you, and adventured his life, and delivered you out of the hand of Midian:9:18 and ye are risen up against my father's house this day, and have slain his sons, 70 persons, upon one stone, and have made Abimelech, the son of his maid-servant, king over the men of Shechem, because he is your brother);9:19 if ye then have dealt truly and uprightly with Jerubbaal and with his house this day, then rejoice ye in Abimelech, and let him also rejoice in you:9:20 but if not, let fire come out from Abimelech, and devour the men of Shechem, and the house of Millo; and let fire come out from the men of Shechem, and from the house of Millo, and devour Abimelech.9:21 And Jotham ran away, and fled, and went to Beer, and dwelt there, for fear of Abimelech his brother.9:22 And Abimelech was prince over Israel three years.9:23 And God sent an evil spirit between Abimelech and the men of Shechem; and the men of Shechem dealt treacherously with Abimelech:9:24 that the violence done to the 70 sons of Jerubbaal might come, and that their blood might be laid upon Abimelech their brother, who slew them, and upon the men of Shechem, who strengthened his hands to slay his brethren.9:25 And the men of Shechem set liers-in-wait for him on the tops of the mountains, and they robbed all that came along that way by them: and it was told Abimelech.9:26 And Gaal the son of Ebed came with his brethren, and went over to Shechem; and the men of Shechem put their trust in him.9:27 And they went out into the field, and gathered their vineyards, and trod the grapes, and held festival, and went into the house of their god, and did eat and drink, and cursed Abimelech.9:28 And Gaal the son of Ebed said, Who is Abimelech, and who is Shechem, that we should serve him?  is not he the son of Jerubbaal?  and Zebul his officer?  serve ye the men of Hamor the father of Shechem: but why should we serve him?9:29 And would that this people were under my hand! then would I remove Abimelech.  And he said to Abimelech, Increase your army, and come out.9:30 And when Zebul the ruler of the city heard the words of Gaal the son of Ebed, his anger was kindled.9:31 And he sent messengers to Abimelech craftily, saying, Behold, Gaal the son of Ebed and his brethren are come to Shechem; and, behold, they constrain the city to take part against you.9:32 Now therefore, up by night, you and the people that are with you, and lie in wait in the field:9:33 and it shall be, that in the morning, as soon as the sun is up, you shall rise early, and rush upon the city; and, behold, when he and the people that are with him come out against you, then may you do to them as you shall find occasion.9:34 And Abimelech rose up, and all the people that were with him, by night, and they laid wait against Shechem in four companies.9:35 And Gaal the son of Ebed went out, and stood in the entrance of the gate of the city: and Abimelech rose up, and the people that were with him, from the ambushment.9:36 And when Gaal saw the people, he said to Zebul, Behold, there come people down from the tops of the mountains.  And Zebul said to him, You see the shadow of the mountains as if they were men.9:37 And Gaal spoke again and said, See, there come people down by the middle of the land, and one company comes by the way of the oak of Meonenim.9:38 Then said Zebul to him, Where is now your mouth, that you said, Who is Abimelech, that we should serve him?  is not this the people that you have despised?  go out now, I pray, and fight with them.9:39 And Gaal went out before the men of Shechem, and fought with Abimelech.9:40 And Abimelech chased him, and he fled before him, and there fell many wounded, even to the entrance of the gate.9:41 And Abimelech dwelt at Arumah: and Zebul drove out Gaal and his brethren, that they should not dwell in Shechem.9:42 And it came to pass on the morrow, that the people went out into the field; and they told Abimelech.9:43 And he took the people, and divided them into three companies, and laid wait in the field; and he looked, and, behold, the people came forth out of the city; And he rose up against them, and smote them.9:44 And Abimelech, and the companies that were with him, rushed forward, and stood in the entrance of the gate of the city: and the two companies rushed upon all that were in the field, and smote them.9:45 And Abimelech fought against the city all that day; and he took the city, and slew the people that were therein: and he beat down the city, and sowed it with salt.9:46 And when all the men of the tower of Shechem heard thereof, they entered into the stronghold of the house of Elberith.9:47 And it was told Abimelech that all the men of the tower of Shechem were gathered together.9:48 And Abimelech gat him up to mount Zalmon, he and all the people that were with him; and Abimelech took an axe in his hand, and cut down a bough from the trees, and took it up, and laid it on his shoulder: and he said to the people that were with him, What ye have seen me do, make haste, and do as I have done.9:49 And all the people likewise cut down every man his bough, and followed Abimelech, and put them to the stronghold, and set the stronghold on fire upon them; so that all the men of the tower of Shechem died also, about a thousand men and women.9:50 Then went Abimelech to Thebez, and encamped against Thebez, and took it.9:51 But there was a strong tower within the city, and there fled all the men and women, and all they of the city, and shut themselves in, and gat them up to the roof of the tower.9:52 And Abimelech came to the tower, and fought against it, and drew near to the door of the tower to burn it with fire.9:53 And a certain woman cast an upper millstone upon Abimelech's head, and broke his skull.9:54 Then he called hastily to the young man his armorbearer, and said to him, Draw your sword, and kill me, that men say not of me, a woman slew him.  And his young man thrust him through, and he died.9:55 And when the men of Israel saw that Abimelech was dead, they departed every man to his place.9:56 Thus God requited the wickedness of Abimelech, which he did to his father, in slaying his seventy brethren;9:57 and all the wickedness of the men of Shechem did God requite upon their heads: and upon them came the curse of Jotham the son of Jerubbaal.Chapter 1010:1 And after Abimelech there arose to save Israel Tola the son of Puah, the son of Dodo, a man of Issachar; and he dwelt in Shamir in the hill-country of Ephraim.10:2 And he judged Israel twenty and three years, and died, and was buried in Shamir.10:3 And after him arose Jair, the Gileadite; and he judged Israel twenty and two years.10:4 And he had thirty sons that rode on thirty donkey colts, and they had thirty cities, which are called Havvoth-jair to this day, which are in the land of Gilead.10:5 And Jair died, and was buried in Kamon.10:6 And the children of Israel again did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and served the Baalim, and the Ashtaroth, and the gods of Syria, and the gods of Sidon, and the gods of Moab, and the gods of the children of Ammon, and the gods of the Philistines; and they forsook Yahweh, and served him not.10:7 And the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Israel, and he sold them into the hand of the Philistines, and into the hand of the children of Ammon.10:8 And they vexed and oppressed the children of Israel that year: eighteen years they oppressed all the children of Israel that were beyond the Jordan in the land of the Amorites, which is in Gilead.10:9 And the children of Ammon passed over the Jordan to fight also against Judah, and against Benjamin, and against the house of Ephraim; so that Israel was sore distressed.10:10 And the children of Israel cried to Yahweh, saying, We have sinned against you, even because we have forsaken our God, and have served the Baalim.10:11 And Yahweh said to the children of Israel, Did I not save you from the Egyptians, and from the Amorites, from the children of Ammon, and from the Philistines?10:12 The Sidonians also, and the Amalekites, and the Maonites, did oppress you; and ye cried to me, and I saved you out of their hand.10:13 Yet ye have forsaken me, and served other gods: therefore I will save you no more.10:14 Go and cry to the gods which ye have chosen; let them save you in the time of your distress.10:15 And the children of Israel said to Yahweh, We have sinned: do you to us whatsoever seems good to you; only deliver us, we pray you, this day.10:16 And they put away the foreign gods from among them, and served Yahweh; and his soul was grieved for the misery of Israel.10:17 Then the children of Ammon were gathered together, and encamped in Gilead.  And the children of Israel assembled themselves together, and encamped in Mizpah.10:18 And the people, the princes of Gilead, said one to another, What man is he that will begin to fight against the children of Ammon?  he shall be head over all the inhabitants of Gilead.Chapter 1111:1 Now Jephthah the Gileadite was a mighty man of valor, and he was the son of a harlot: and Gilead begat Jephthah.11:2 And Gilead's wife bore him sons; and when his wife's sons grew up, they drove out Jephthah, and said to him, You shall not inherit in our father's house; for you are the son of another woman.11:3 Then Jephthah fled from his brethren, and dwelt in the land of Tob: and there were gathered vain fellows to Jephthah, and they went out with him.11:4 And it came to pass after a while, that the children of Ammon made war against Israel.11:5 And it was so, that, when the children of Ammon made war against Israel, the elders of Gilead went to fetch Jephthah out of the land of Tob;11:6 and they said to Jephthah, Come and be our chief, that we may fight with the children of Ammon.11:7 And Jephthah said to the elders of Gilead, Did not ye hate me, and drive me out of my father's house?  and why are ye come to me now when ye are in distress?11:8 And the elders of Gilead said to Jephthah, Therefore are we turned again to you now, that you may go with us, and fight with the children of Ammon; and you shall be our head over all the inhabitants of Gilead.11:9 And Jephthah said to the elders of Gilead, If ye bring me home again to fight with the children of Ammon, and Yahweh deliver them before me, shall I be your head?11:10 And the elders of Gilead said to Jephthah, Yahweh shall be witness between us; surely according to your word so will we do.11:11 Then Jephthah went with the elders of Gilead, and the people made him head and chief over them: and Jephthah spoke all his words before Yahweh in Mizpah.11:12 And Jephthah sent messengers to the king of the children of Ammon, saying, What have you to do with me, that you are come to me to fight against my land?11:13 And the king of the children of Ammon answered to the messengers of Jephthah, Because Israel took away my land, when he came up out of Egypt, from the Arnon even to the Jabbok, and to the Jordan: now therefore restore those lands again peaceably.11:14 And Jephthah sent messengers again to the king of the children of Ammon;11:15 and he said to him, Thus says Jephthah: Israel took not away the land of Moab, nor the land of the children of Ammon,11:16 but when they came up from Egypt, and Israel went through the wilderness to the Red Sea, and came to Kadesh;11:17 then Israel sent messengers to the king of Edom, saying, Let me, I pray you, pass through your land; but the king of Edom hearkened not.  And in like manner he sent to the king of Moab; but he would not: and Israel abode in Kadesh.11:18 Then they went through the wilderness, and went around the land of Edom, and the land of Moab, and came by the east side of the land of Moab, and they encamped on the other side of the Arnon; but they came not within the border of Moab, for the Arnon was the border of Moab.11:19 And Israel sent messengers to Sihon king of the Amorites, the king of Heshbon; and Israel said to him, Let us pass, we pray you, through your land to my place.11:20 But Sihon trusted not Israel to pass through his border; but Sihon gathered all his people together, and encamped in Jahaz, and fought against Israel.11:21 And Yahweh, the God of Israel, delivered Sihon and all his people into the hand of Israel, and they smote them: so Israel possessed all the land of the Amorites, the inhabitants of that country.11:22 And they possessed all the border of the Amorites, from the Arnon even to the Jabbok, and from the wilderness even to the Jordan.11:23 So now Yahweh, the God of Israel, has dispossessed the Amorites from before his people Israel, and should you possess them?11:24 Will not you possess that which Chemosh your god gives you to possess?  So whomsoever Yahweh our God has dispossessed from before us, them will we possess.11:25 And now are you anything better than Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab?  did he ever strive against Israel, or did he ever fight against them?11:26 While Israel dwelt in Heshbon and its towns, and in Aroer and its towns, and in all the cities that are along by the side of the Arnon, three hundred years; why did ye not recover them within that time?11:27 I therefore have not sinned against you, but you do me wrong to war against me: Yahweh, the Judge, be judge this day between the children of Israel and the children of Ammon.11:28 But the king of the children of Ammon hearkened not to the words of Jephthah which he sent him.11:29 Then the Spirit of Yahweh came upon Jephthah, and he passed over Gilead and Manasseh, and passed over Mizpeh of Gilead, and from Mizpeh of Gilead he passed over to the children of Ammon.11:30 And Jephthah vowed a vow to Yahweh, and said, If you will indeed deliver the children of Ammon into my hand,11:31 then it shall be, that whatsoever comes forth from the doors of my house to meet me, when I return in peace from the children of Ammon, it shall be Yahweh's, and I will offer it up for a burnt offering.11:32 So Jephthah passed over to the children of Ammon to fight against them; and Yahweh delivered them into his hand.11:33 And he smote them from Aroer until you come to Minnith, even twenty cities, and to Abelcheramim, with a very great slaughter.  So the children of Ammon were subdued before the children of Israel.11:34 And Jephthah came to Mizpah to his house; and, behold, his daughter came out to meet him with timbrels and with dances: and she was his only child; besides her he had neither son nor daughter.11:35 And it came to pass, when he saw her, that he rent his clothes, and said, alas, my daughter! you have brought me very low, and you are one of them that trouble me; for I have opened my mouth to Yahweh, and I cannot go back.11:36 And she said to him, My father, you have opened your mouth to Yahweh; do to me according to that which has proceeded out of your mouth, forasmuch as Yahweh has taken vengeance for you on your enemies, even on the children of Ammon.11:37 And she said to her father, Let this thing be done for me: let me alone two months, that I may depart and go down upon the mountains, and bewail my virginity, I and my companions.11:38 And he said, Go.  And he sent her away for two months: and she departed, she and her companions, and bewailed her virginity upon the mountains.11:39 And it came to pass at the end of two months, that she returned to her father, who did with her according to his vow which he had vowed: and she knew not man.  And it was a custom in Israel,11:40 that the daughters of Israel went yearly to celebrate the daughter of Jephthah the Gileadite four days in a year.Chapter 1212:1 And the men of Ephraim were gathered together, and passed northward; and they said to Jephthah, Why did you pass over to fight against the children of Ammon, and not call us to go with you?  we will burn your house upon you with fire.12:2 And Jephthah said to them, I and my people were at great strife with the children of Ammon; and when I called you, ye saved me not out of their hand.12:3 And when I saw that ye saved me not, I put my life in my hand, and passed over against the children of Ammon, and Yahweh delivered them into my hand: why then are ye come up to me this day, to fight against me?12:4 Then Jephthah gathered together all the men of Gilead, and fought with Ephraim; and the men of Gilead smote Ephraim, because they said, You are fugitives of Ephraim, ye Gileadites, in the midst of Ephraim, and in the midst of Manasseh.12:5 And the Gileadites took the fords of the Jordan against the Ephraimites.  And it was so, that, when any of the fugitives of Ephraim said, Let me go over, the men of Gilead said to him, are you an Ephraimite?  If he said, Nay;12:6 then said they to him, Say now Shibboleth; and he said Sibboleth; for he could not frame to pronounce it right: then they laid hold on him, and slew him at the fords of the Jordan.  And there fell at that time of Ephraim forty and two thousand.12:7 And Jephthah judged Israel six years.  Then died Jephthah the Gileadite, and was buried in one of the cities of Gilead.12:8 And after him Ibzan of Beth-lehem judged Israel.12:9 And he had thirty sons; and thirty daughters he sent abroad, and thirty daughters he brought in from abroad for his sons.  And he judged Israel seven years.12:10 And Ibzan died, and was buried at Beth-lehem.12:11 And after him Elon the Zebulunite judged Israel; and he judged Israel ten years.12:12 And Elon the Zebulunite died, and was buried in Aijalon in the land of Zebulun.12:13 And after him Abdon the son of Hillel the Pirathonite judged Israel.12:14 And he had forty sons and thirty sons' sons, that rode on 70 donkey colts: and he judged Israel eight years.12:15 And Abdon the son of Hillel the Pirathonite died, and was buried in Pirathon in the land of Ephraim, in the hill-country of the Amalekites.Chapter 1313:1 And the children of Israel again did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh; and Yahweh delivered them into the hand of the Philistines forty years.13:2 And there was a certain man of Zorah, of the family of the Danites, whose name was Manoah; and his wife was barren, and bore not.13:3 And the angel of Yahweh appeared to the woman, and said to her, Behold now, you are barren, and bear not; but you shall conceive, and bear a son.13:4 Now therefore beware, I pray you, and drink no wine nor strong drink, and eat not any unclean thing:13:5 for, lo, you shall conceive, and bear a son; and no razor shall come upon his head; for the child shall be a Nazirite to God from the womb: and he shall begin to save Israel out of the hand of the Philistines.13:6 Then the woman came and told her husband, saying, a man of God came to me, and his countenance was like the countenance of the angel of God, very terrible; and I asked him not from where he was, neither told he me his name:13:7 but he said to me, Behold, you shall conceive, and bear a son; and now drink no wine nor strong drink, and eat not any unclean thing; for the child shall be a Nazirite to God from the womb to the day of his death.13:8 Then Manoah entreated Yahweh, and said, Oh, Lord, I pray you, let the man of God whom you did send come again to us, and teach us what we shall do to the child that shall be born.13:9 And God hearkened to the voice of Manoah; and the angel of God came again to the woman as she sat in the field: but Manoah her husband was not with her.13:10 And the woman made haste, and ran, and told her husband, and said to him, Behold, the man has appeared to me, that came to me the other day.13:11 And Manoah arose, and went after his wife, and came to the man, and said to him, are you the man that spoke to the woman?  And he said, I am.13:12 And Manoah said, Now let your words come to pass: what shall be the ordering of the child, and how shall we do to him?13:13 And the angel of Yahweh said to Manoah, Of all that I said to the woman let her beware.13:14 She may not eat of anything that comes of the vine, neither let her drink wine or strong drink, nor eat any unclean thing; all that I commanded her let her observe.13:15 And Manoah said to the angel of Yahweh, I pray you, let us detain you, that we may make ready a kid for you.13:16 And the angel of Yahweh said to Manoah, Though you detain me, I will not eat of your bread; and if you will make ready a burnt offering, you must offer it to Yahweh.  For Manoah knew not that he was the angel of Yahweh.13:17 And Manoah said to the angel of Yahweh, What is your name, that, when your words come to pass, we may do you honor?13:18 And the angel of Yahweh said to him, Why do you ask after my name, seeing it is wonderful?13:19 So Manoah took the kid with the meal offering, and offered it upon the rock to Yahweh: and the angel did wondrously, and Manoah and his wife looked on.13:20 For it came to pass, when the flame went up toward heaven from off the altar, that the angel of Yahweh ascended in the flame of the altar: and Manoah and his wife looked on; and they fell on their faces to the ground.13:21 But the angel of Yahweh did no more appear to Manoah or to his wife.  Then Manoah knew that he was the angel of Yahweh.13:22 And Manoah said to his wife, We shall surely die, because we have seen God.13:23 But his wife said to him, If Yahweh were pleased to kill us, he would not have received a burnt offering and a meal offering at our hand, neither would he have shown us all these things, nor would at this time have told such things as these.13:24 And the woman bore a son, and called his name Samson: and the child grew, and Yahweh blessed him.13:25 And the Spirit of Yahweh began to move him in Mahaneh-dan, between Zorah and Eshtaol.Chapter 1414:1 And Samson went down to Timnah, and saw a woman in Timnah of the daughters of the Philistines.14:2 And he came up, and told his father and his mother, and said, I have seen a woman in Timnah of the daughters of the Philistines: now therefore get her for me to wife.14:3 Then his father and his mother said to him, Is there never a woman among the daughters of your brethren, or among all my people, that you go to take a wife of the uncircumcised Philistines?  And Samson said to his father, Get her for me; for she pleases me well.14:4 But his father and his mother knew not that it was of Yahweh; for he sought an occasion against the Philistines.  Now at that time the Philistines had rule over Israel.14:5 Then went Samson down, and his father and his mother, to Timnah, and came to the vineyards of Timnah: and, behold, a young lion roared against him.14:6 And the Spirit of Yahweh came mightily upon him, and he rent him as he would have rent a kid; and he had nothing in his hand: but he told not his father or his mother what he had done.14:7 And he went down, and talked with the woman, and she pleased Samson well.14:8 And after a while he returned to take her; and he turned aside to see the carcass of the lion: and, behold, there was a swarm of bees in the body of the lion, and honey.14:9 And he took it into his hands, and went on, eating as he went; and he came to his father and mother, and gave to them, and they did eat: but he told them not that he had taken the honey out of the body of the lion.14:10 And his father went down to the woman: and Samson made there a feast; for so used the young men to do.14:11 And it came to pass, when they saw him, that they brought thirty companions to be with him.14:12 And Samson said to them, Let me now put forth a riddle to you: if ye can declare it to me within the seven days of the feast, and find it out, then I will give you thirty linen garments and thirty changes of raiment;14:13 but if ye cannot declare it to me, then shall ye give me thirty linen garments and thirty changes of raiment.  And they said to him, Put forth your riddle, that we may hear it.14:14 And he said to them, Out of the eater came forth food, and out of the strong came forth sweetness.  And they could not in three days declare the riddle.14:15 And it came to pass on the seventh day, that they said to Samson's wife, Entice your husband, that he may declare to us the riddle, lest we burn you and your father's house with fire: have ye called us to impoverish us?  is it not so?14:16 And Samson's wife wept before him, and said, You just hate me.  You don't love me.  You have put forth a riddle to the children of my people, and not told it to me.  And he said to her, Behold, I have not told it my father nor my mother, and shall I tell you?14:17 And she wept before him the seven days, while their feast lasted: and it came to pass on the seventh day, that he told her, because she pressed him sore; and she told the riddle to the children of her people.14:18 And the men of the city said to him on the seventh day before the sun went down, What is sweeter than honey?  and what is stronger than a lion?  And he said to them, If ye had not plowed with my heifer, You had not found out my riddle.14:19 And the Spirit of Yahweh came mightily upon him, and he went down to Ashkelon, and killed thirty of their men, and took their spoil, and gave the changes of clothes to those that had declared the riddle.  And his anger was kindled, and he went up to his father's house.14:20 But Samson's wife was given to his companion, the man he had used as his wedding friend.Chapter 1515:1 But it came to pass after a while, in the time of wheat harvest, that Samson visited his wife bringing a kid goat; and he said, I will go in to my wife into the bedroom.  But her father would not allow him to go in.15:2 And her father said, I really thought that you had utterly hated her; so I gave her to your companion.  Is not her younger sister fairer than she?  Take her, I pray you, instead of her.15:3 And Samson said to them, This time shall I be blameless in regard of the Philistines, when I do them a mischief.15:4 And Samson went and caught three hundred foxes, and took firebrands, and tied them tail to tail.  He put a firebrand in the midst between every two tails.15:5 And when he had set the brands on fire, he let them go into the standing grain of the Philistines, and burnt up both the shocks and the standing grain, and also the oliveyards.15:6 Then the Philistines said, Who has done this?  And they said, Samson, the son-in-law of that Timnite, because he has taken his wife and given her to his companion.  So the Philistines came up, and burnt her and her father with fire.15:7 And Samson said to them, If ye do after this manner, surely I will be avenged of you, and after that I will cease.15:8 And he smote them hip and thigh with a great slaughter: and he went down and dwelt in the cleft of the rock of Etam.15:9 Then the Philistines went up, and encamped in Judah, and spread themselves in Lehi.15:10 And the men of Judah said, Why are ye come up against us?  And they said, To bind Samson are we come up, to do to him as he has done to us.15:11 Then three thousand men of Judah went down to the cleft of the rock of Etam, and said to Samson, Know you not that the Philistines are rulers over us?  what then is this that you have done to us?  And he said to them, as they did to me, so have I done to them.15:12 And they said to him, We are come down to bind you, that we may deliver you into the hand of the Philistines.  And Samson said to them, Swear to me, that ye will not fall upon me yourselves.15:13 And they spoke to him, saying, No; but we will bind you fast, and deliver you into their hand: but surely we will not kill you.  And they bound him with two new ropes, and brought him up from the rock.15:14 When he came to Lehi, the Philistines shouted as they met him: and the Spirit of Yahweh came mightily upon him, and the ropes that were upon his arms became as flax that was burnt with fire, and his bands dropped from off his hands.15:15 And he found a fresh jawbone of a donkey, and put forth his hand, and took it, and smote a thousand men with it.15:16 And Samson said, With the jawbone of a donkey, heaps upon heaps, With the jawbone of a donkey have I smitten a thousand men.15:17 And it came to pass, when he had made an end of speaking, that he cast away the jawbone out of his hand; and that place was called Ramath-lehi.15:18 And he was sore athirst, and called on Yahweh, and said, You have given this great deliverance by the hand of your servant; and now shall I die for thirst, and fall into the hand of the uncircumcised.15:19 But God clave the hollow place that is in Lehi, and there came water thereout; and when he had drunk, his spirit came again, and he revived: therefore the name thereof was called En-hakkore, which is in Lehi, to this day.15:20 And he judged Israel in the days of the Philistines twenty years.Chapter 1616:1 And Samson went to Gaza, and saw there a harlot, and went in to her.16:2 And it was told the Gazites, saying, Samson is come here.  And they surrounded him, and laid wait for him all night in the gate of the city, and were quiet all the night, saying, Let us wait till morning light, then we will kill him.16:3 And Samson lay till midnight, and arose at midnight, and laid hold of the doors of the gate of the city, and the two posts, and plucked them up, bar and all, and put them on his shoulders, and carried them up to the top of the mountain that is before Hebron.16:4 And it came to pass afterward, that he loved a woman in the valley of Sorek, whose name was Delilah.16:5 And the lords of the Philistines came up to her, and said to her, Entice him, and find out wherein his great strength lies, and by what means we may prevail against him, that we may bind him to afflict him: and we will give you every one of us eleven hundred pieces of silver.16:6 And Delilah said to Samson, Tell me, I pray you, where does your great strength come from, and with what might you be bound that would afflict you.16:7 And Samson said to her, If they bind me with seven green bowstrings that were never dried, then shall I become weak, and be as another man.16:8 Then the lords of the Philistines brought up to her seven green bowstrings which had not been dried, and she bound him with them.16:9 Now she had liers-in-wait abiding in the inner chamber.  And she said to him, The Philistines are upon you, Samson.  And he broke the bowstrings, like a string of flax is broken when it touches the fire.  So the source of his strength was not discovered.16:10 And Delilah said to Samson, Behold, you have mocked me, and told me lies: now tell me, I pray you, with what can you be bound.16:11 And he said to her, If they only bind me with new ropes with which no work has been done, then shall I become weak, and be as another man.16:12 So Delilah took new ropes, and bound him with it, and said to him, The Philistines are upon you, Samson.  And the liers-in-wait were abiding in the inner chamber.  And he broke them off his arms like a thread.16:13 And Delilah said to Samson, Up till now you have mocked me, and told me lies: tell me with what you can be bound.  And he said to her, If you weave the seven locks of my head with the web.16:14 And she fastened it with the pin, and said to him, The Philistines are upon you, Samson.  And he awoke out of his sleep, and plucked away the pin of the beam, and the web.16:15 And she said to him, How can you say, I love you, when your heart is not with me?  you have mocked me these three times, and have not told me the source of your great strength.16:16 And it came to pass, when she pressed him daily with her words, and urged him, that his soul was vexed to death.16:17 And he told her all his heart, and said to her, There has not come a razor upon my head; for I have been a Nazirite to God from my mother's womb: if I be shaven, then my strength will go from me, and I shall become weak, and be like any other man.16:18 And when Delilah saw that he had told her all his heart, she sent and called for the lords of the Philistines, saying, Come up this once, for he has told me all his heart.  Then the lords of the Philistines came up to her, and brought the money in their hand.16:19 And she made him sleep upon her knees; and she called for a man, and shaved off the seven locks of his head; and she began to afflict him, and his strength went from him.16:20 And she said, The Philistines are upon you, Samson.  And he awoke out of his sleep, and said, I will go out as at other times, and shake myself free.  But he knew not that Yahweh was departed from him.16:21 And the Philistines laid hold on him, and put out his eyes; and they brought him down to Gaza, and bound him with fetters of brass; and he did grind in the prison-house.16:22 But now the hair of his head began to grow again after he was shaven.16:23 And the lords of the Philistines gathered them together to offer a great sacrifice to Dagon their god, and to rejoice; for they said, Our god has delivered Samson our enemy into our hand.16:24 And when the people saw him, they praised their god; for they said, Our god has delivered into our hand our enemy, and the destroyer of our country, who has slain many of us.16:25 And it came to pass, when their hearts were merry, that they said, Call for Samson, that he may make us sport.  And they called for Samson out of the prison-house; and he made sport before them.  And they set him between the pillars:16:26 and Samson said to the lad that held him by the hand, allow me to feel the pillars upon which the house rests, so that I may lean upon them.16:27 Now the house was full of men and women; and all the lords of the Philistines were there; and there were upon the roof about three thousand men and women, that beheld while Samson made sport.16:28 And Samson called to Yahweh, and said, O Lord Yahweh, remember me, I pray you, and strengthen me, I pray you, only this once, O God, that I may be at once avenged of the Philistines for my two eyes.16:29 And Samson took hold of the two middle pillars upon which the house rested, and leaned upon them, the one with his right hand, and the other with his left.16:30 And Samson said, Let me die with the Philistines.  And he bowed himself with all his might; and the house fell upon the lords, and upon all the people that were therein.  So the dead that he slew at his death were more than they that he slew in his life.16:31 Then his brethren and all the house of his father came down, and took him, and brought him up, and buried him between Zorah and Eshtaol in the burying-place of Manoah his father.  And he judged Israel twenty years.Chapter 1717:1 And there was a man of the hill-country of Ephraim, whose name was Micah.17:2 And he said to his mother, The eleven hundred pieces of silver that were taken from you, about which you did utter a curse, and did also speak it in my ears, behold, the silver is with me; I took it.  And his mother said, Blessed be my son of Yahweh.17:3 And he restored the eleven hundred pieces of silver to his mother; and his mother said, I verily dedicate the silver to Yahweh from my hand for my son, to make a graven image and a molten image: now therefore I will restore it to you.17:4 And when he restored the money to his mother, his mother took two hundred pieces of silver, and gave them to the founder, who made thereof a graven image and a molten image: and it was in the house of Micah.17:5 And the man Micah had a house of gods, and he made an ephod, and teraphim, and ordained one of his sons, who became his priest.17:6 In those days there was no king in Israel: every man did that which was right in his own eyes.17:7 And there was a young man out of Beth-lehem-judah, of the family of Judah, who was a Levite; and he sojourned there.17:8 And the man departed out of the city, out of Beth-lehem-judah, to sojourn where he could find a place, and he came to the hill-country of Ephraim to the house of Micah, as he journeyed.17:9 And Micah said to him, From where are you coming?  And he said to him, I am a Levite of Beth-lehem-judah, and I go to sojourn where I may find a place.17:10 And Micah said to him, Dwell with me, and be to me a father and a priest, and I will give you ten pieces of silver by the year, and a suit of apparel, and your victuals.  So the Levite went in.17:11 And the Levite was content to dwell with the man; and the young man was to him as one of his sons.17:12 And Micah consecrated the Levite, and the young man became his priest, and was in the house of Micah.17:13 Then said Micah, Now know I that Yahweh will do me good, seeing I have a Levite to my priest.Chapter 1818:1 In those days there was no king in Israel: and in those days the tribe of the Danites sought them an inheritance to dwell in; for to that day their inheritance had not fallen to them among the tribes of Israel.18:2 And the children of Dan sent of their family five men from their whole number, men of valor, from Zorah, and from Eshtaol, to spy out the land, and to search it; and they said to them, Go, search the land.  And they came to the hill-country of Ephraim, to the house of Micah, and lodged there.18:3 When they were by the house of Micah, they knew the voice of the young man the Levite; and they turned aside there, and said to him, Who brought you here?  and what do you in this place?  and what have you here?18:4 And he said to them, Thus and thus has Micah dealt with me, and he has hired me, and I am become his priest.18:5 And they said to him, ask counsel, we pray you, of God, that we may know whether our way which we go shall be prosperous.18:6 And the priest said to them, Go in peace: before Yahweh is your way in which ye go.18:7 Then the five men departed, and came to Laish, and saw the people that were therein, how they dwelt in security, after the manner of the Sidonians, quiet and secure; for there was none in the land, possessing authority, that might put them to shame in anything, and they were far from the Sidonians, and had no dealings with any man.18:8 And they came to their brethren to Zorah and Eshtaol: and their brethren said to them, What say ye?18:9 And they said, arise, and let us go up against them; for we have seen the land, and, behold, it is very good: and are ye still?  be not slothful to go and to enter in to possess the land.18:10 When ye go, ye shall come to a people secure, and the land is large; for God has given it into your hand, a place where there is no want of anything that is in the earth.18:11 And there set forth from there of the family of the Danites, out of Zorah and out of Eshtaol, six hundred men girt with weapons of war.18:12 And they went up, and encamped in Kiriath-jearim, in Judah: therefore they called that place Mahaneh-dan, to this day; behold, it is behind Kiriath-jearim.18:13 And they passed there to the hill-country of Ephraim, and came to the house of Micah.18:14 Then answered the five men that went to spy out the country of Laish, and said to their brethren, Do ye know that there is in these houses an ephod, and teraphim, and a graven image, and a molten image?  now therefore consider what ye have to do.18:15 And they turned aside there, and came to the house of the young man the Levite, even to the house of Micah, and asked him of his welfare.18:16 And the six hundred men girt with their weapons of war, who were of the children of Dan, stood by the entrance of the gate.18:17 And the five men that went to spy out the land went up, and came in there, and took the graven image, and the ephod, and the teraphim, and the molten image: and the priest stood by the entrance of the gate with the six hundred men girt with weapons of war.18:18 And when these went into Micah's house, and fetched the graven image, the ephod, and the teraphim, and the molten image, the priest said to them, What do ye?18:19 And they said to him, Hold your peace, lay your hand upon your mouth, and go with us, and be to us a father and a priest: is it better for you to be priest to the house of one man, or to be priest to a tribe and a family in Israel?18:20 And the priest's heart was glad, and he took the ephod, and the teraphim, and the graven image, and went in the midst of the people.18:21 So they turned and departed, and put the little ones and the cattle and the goods before them.18:22 When they were a good way from the house of Micah, the men that were in the houses near to Micah's house were gathered together, and overtook the children of Dan.18:23 And they cried to the children of Dan.  And they turned their faces, and said to Micah, What ails you, that you come with such a company?18:24 And he said, ye have taken away my gods which I made, and the priest, and are gone away, and what have I more?  and how then say ye to me, What ails you?18:25 And the children of Dan said to him, Let not your voice be heard among us, lest angry fellows fall upon you, and you lose your life, with the lives of your household.18:26 And the children of Dan went their way: and when Micah saw that they were too strong for him, he turned and went back to his house.18:27 And they took that which Micah had made, and the priest whom he had, and came to Laish, to a people quiet and secure, and smote them with the edge of the sword; and they burnt the city with fire.18:28 And there was no deliverer, because it was far from Sidon, and they had no dealings with any man; and it was in the valley that lies by Beth-rehob.  And they built the city, and dwelt therein.18:29 And they called the name of the city Dan, after the name of Dan their father, who was born to Israel: though the name of the city was Laish at the first.18:30 And the children of Dan set up for themselves the graven image: and Jonathan, the son of Gershom, the son of Moses, he and his sons were priests to the tribe of the Danites until the day of the captivity of the land.18:31 So they set them up Micah's graven image which he made, all the time that the house of God was in Shiloh.Chapter 1919:1 And it came to pass in those days, when there was no king in Israel, that there was a certain Levite sojourning on the farther side of the hill-country of Ephraim, who took to him a concubine out of Beth-lehem-judah.19:2 And his concubine played the harlot against him, and went away from him to her father's house to Beth-lehem-judah, and was there the space of four months.19:3 And her husband arose, and went after her, to speak kindly to her, to bring her again, having his servant with him, and a couple of asses: and she brought him into her father's house; and when the father of the damsel saw him, he rejoiced to meet him.19:4 And his father-in-law, the damsel's father, retained him; and he abode with him three days: so they did eat and drink, and lodged there.19:5 And it came to pass on the fourth day, that they arose early in the morning, and he rose up to depart: and the damsel's father said to his son-in-law, Strengthen your heart with a morsel of bread, and afterward ye shall go your way.19:6 So they sat down, and did eat and drink, both of them together: and the damsel's father said to the man, Be pleased, I pray you, to tarry all night, and let your heart be merry.19:7 And the man rose up to depart; but his father-in-law urged him, and he lodged there again.19:8 And he arose early in the morning on the fifth day to depart; and the damsel's father said, Strengthen your heart, I pray you, and tarry ye until the day declines; and they did eat, both of them.19:9 And when the man rose up to depart, he, and his concubine, and his servant, his father-in-law, the damsel's father, said to him, Behold, now the day draws toward evening, I pray you tarry all night: behold, the day grows to an end, lodge here, that your heart may be merry; and tomorrow get early on your way, that you may go home.19:10 But the man would not tarry that night, but he rose up and departed, and came over against Jebus (the same is Jerusalem): and there were with him a couple of asses saddled; his concubine also was with him.19:11 When they were by Jebus, the day was far spent; and the servant said to his master, Come, I pray you, and let us turn aside into this city of the Jebusites, and lodge in it.19:12 And his master said to him, We will not turn aside into the city of a foreigner, that is not of the children of Israel; but we will pass over to Gibeah.19:13 And he said to his servant, Come and let us draw near to one of these places; and we will lodge in Gibeah, or in Ramah.19:14 So they passed on and went their way; and the sun went down upon them near to Gibeah, which belongs to Benjamin.19:15 And they turned aside there, to go in to lodge in Gibeah: and he went in, and sat him down in the street of the city; for there was no man that took them into his house to lodge.19:16 And, behold, there came an old man from his work out of the field at even: now the man was of the hill-country of Ephraim, and he sojourned in Gibeah; but the men of the place were Benjamites.19:17 And he lifted up his eyes, and saw the wayfaring man in the street of the city; and the old man said, Where are you going?  and from where do you come?19:18 And he said to him, We are passing from Beth-lehem-judah to the farther side of the hill-country of Ephraim; from there am I, and I went to Beth-lehem-judah: and I am now going to the house of Yahweh; and there is no man that takes me into his house.19:19 Yet there is both straw and provender for our asses; and there is bread and wine also for me, and for your handmaid, and for the young man that is with your servants: there is no want of anything.19:20 And the old man said, Peace be to you; howsoever let all your wants lie upon me; only lodge not in the street.19:21 So he brought him into his house, and gave the asses fodder; and they washed their feet, and did eat and drink.19:22 As they were making their hearts merry, behold, the men of the city, certain base fellows, beset the house round about, beating at the door; and they spoke to the master of the house, the old man, saying, Bring forth the man that came into your house, that we may know him.19:23 And the man, the master of the house, went out to them, and said to them, Nay, my brethren, I pray you, do not so wickedly; seeing that this man is come into my house, do not this folly.19:24 Behold, here is my daughter a virgin, and his concubine; them I will bring out now, and humble ye them, and do with them what seems good to you: but to this man do not any such folly.19:25 But the men would not hearken to him: so the man laid hold on his concubine, and brought her forth to them; and they knew her, and abused her all the night until the morning: and when the day began to spring, they let her go.19:26 Then came the woman in the dawning of the day, and fell down at the door of the man's house where her lord was, till it was light.19:27 And her lord rose up in the morning, and opened the doors of the house, and went out to go his way; and, behold, the woman his concubine was fallen down at the door of the house, with her hands upon the threshold.19:28 And he said to her, Up, and let us be going; but none answered: then he took her up upon the donkey; and the man rose up, and gat him to his place.19:29 And when he was come into his house, he took a knife, and laid hold on his concubine, and divided her, limb by limb, into twelve pieces, and sent her throughout all the borders of Israel.19:30 And it was so, that all that saw it said, There was no such deed done nor seen from the day that the children of Israel came up out of the land of Egypt to this day: consider it, take counsel, and speak.Chapter 2020:1 Then all the children of Israel went out, and the congregation was assembled as one man, from Dan even to Beer-sheba, with the land of Gilead, to Yahweh at Mizpah.20:2 And the chiefs of all the people, even of all the tribes of Israel, presented themselves in the assembly of the people of God, four hundred thousand footmen that drew sword.20:3 (Now the children of Benjamin heard that the children of Israel were gone up to Mizpah.) And the children of Israel said, Tell us, how was this wickedness brought to pass?20:4 And the Levite, the husband of the woman that was murdered, answered and said, I came into Gibeah that belongs to Benjamin, I and my concubine, to lodge.20:5 And the men of Gibeah rose against me, and beset the house round about me by night; me they thought to have slain, and my concubine they forced, and she is dead.20:6 And I took my concubine, and cut her in pieces, and sent her throughout all the country of the inheritance of Israel; for they have committed lewdness and folly in Israel.20:7 Behold, ye children of Israel, all of you, give here your advice and counsel.20:8 And all the people arose as one man, saying, We will not any of us go to his tent, neither will we any of us turn to his house.20:9 But now this is the thing which we will do to Gibeah: we will go up against it by lot;20:10 and we will take ten men of a hundred throughout all the tribes of Israel, and a hundred of a thousand, and a thousand out of ten thousand, to fetch victuals for the people, that they may do, when they come to Gibeah of Benjamin, according to all the folly that they have wrought in Israel.20:11 So all the men of Israel were gathered against the city, knit together as one man.20:12 And the tribes of Israel sent men through all the tribe of Benjamin, saying, What wickedness is this that is come to pass among you?20:13 Now therefore deliver up the men, the base fellows, that are in Gibeah, that we may put them to death, and put away evil from Israel.  But Benjamin would not hearken to the voice of their brethren the children of Israel.20:14 And the children of Benjamin gathered themselves together out of the cities to Gibeah, to go out to battle against the children of Israel.20:15 And the children of Benjamin were numbered on that day out of the cities twenty and six thousand men that drew sword, besides the inhabitants of Gibeah, who were numbered seven hundred chosen men.20:16 Among all this people there were seven hundred chosen men lefthanded; every one could sling stones at a hair-breadth, and not miss.20:17 And the men of Israel, besides Benjamin, were numbered four hundred thousand men that drew sword: all these were men of war.20:18 And the children of Israel arose, and went up to Beth-el, and asked counsel of God; and they said, Who shall go up for us first to battle against the children of Benjamin?  And Yahweh said, Judah shall go up first.20:19 And the children of Israel rose up in the morning, and encamped against Gibeah.20:20 And the men of Israel went out to battle against Benjamin; and the men of Israel set the battle in array against them at Gibeah.20:21 And the children of Benjamin came forth out of Gibeah, and destroyed down to the ground of the Israelites on that day twenty and two thousand men.20:22 And the people, the men of Israel, encouraged themselves, and set the battle again in array in the place where they set themselves in array the first day.20:23 And the children of Israel went up and wept before Yahweh until even; and they asked of Yahweh, saying, Shall I again draw near to battle against the children of Benjamin my brother?  And Yahweh said, Go up against him.20:24 And the children of Israel came near against the children of Benjamin the second day.20:25 And Benjamin went forth against them out of Gibeah the second day, and destroyed down to the ground of the children of Israel again eighteen thousand men; all these drew the sword.20:26 Then all the children of Israel, and all the people, went up, and came to Beth-el, and wept, and sat there before Yahweh, and fasted that day until even; and they offered burnt offerings and peace offerings before Yahweh.20:27 And the children of Israel asked of Yahweh (for the ark of the covenant of God was there in those days,20:28 and Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron, stood before it in those days), saying, Shall I yet again go out to battle against the children of Benjamin my brother, or shall I cease?  And Yahweh said, Go up; for tomorrow I will deliver him into your hand.20:29 And Israel set liers-in-wait against Gibeah round about.20:30 And the children of Israel went up against the children of Benjamin on the third day, and set themselves in array against Gibeah, as at other times.20:31 And the children of Benjamin went out against the people, and were drawn away from the city; and they began to strike and kill of the people, as at other times, in the highways, of which one goes up to Beth-el, and the other to Gibeah, in the field, about thirty men of Israel.20:32 And the children of Benjamin said, They are smitten down before us, as at the first.  But the children of Israel said, Let us flee, and draw them away from the city to the highways.20:33 And all the men of Israel rose up out of their place, and set themselves in array at Baal-tamar: and the liers-in-wait of Israel broke forth out of their place, even out of Maareh-geba.20:34 And there came over against Gibeah ten thousand chosen men out of all Israel, and the battle was sore; but they knew not that evil was close upon them.20:35 And Yahweh smote Benjamin before Israel; and the children of Israel destroyed of Benjamin that day twenty and five thousand and a hundred men: all these drew the sword.20:36 So the children of Benjamin saw that they were smitten; for the men of Israel gave place to Benjamin, because they trusted to the liers-in-wait whom they had set against Gibeah.20:37 And the liers-in-wait hasted, and rushed upon Gibeah; and the liers-in-wait drew themselves along, and smote all the city with the edge of the sword.20:38 Now the appointed sign between the men of Israel and the liers-in-wait was, that they should make a great cloud of smoke rise up out of the city.20:39 And the men of Israel turned in the battle, and Benjamin began to strike and kill of the men of Israel about thirty persons; for they said, Surely they are smitten down before us, as in the first battle.20:40 But when the cloud began to arise up out of the city in a pillar of smoke, the Benjamites looked behind them; and, behold, the whole of the city went up in smoke to heaven.20:41 And the men of Israel turned, and the men of Benjamin were dismayed; for they saw that evil was come upon them.20:42 Therefore they turned their backs before the men of Israel to the way of the wilderness; but the battle followed hard after them; and they that came out of the cities destroyed them in the midst thereof.20:43 They inclosed the Benjamites round about, and chased them, and trod them down at their resting-place, as far as over against Gibeah toward the sunrising.20:44 And there fell of Benjamin eighteen thousand men; all these weremen of valor.20:45 And they turned and fled toward the wilderness to the rock of Rimmon: and they gleaned of them in the highways five thousand men, and followed hard after them to Gidom, and smote of them two thousand men.20:46 So that all who fell that day of Benjamin were twenty and five thousand men that drew the sword; all these weremen of valor.20:47 But six hundred men turned and fled toward the wilderness to the rock of Rimmon, and abode in the rock of Rimmon four months.20:48 And the men of Israel turned again upon the children of Benjamin, and smote them with the edge of the sword, both the entire city, and the cattle, and all that they found: moreover all the cities which they found they set on fire.Chapter 2121:1 Now the men of Israel had sworn in Mizpah, saying, There shall not any of us give his daughter to Benjamin to wife.21:2 And the people came to Beth-el, and sat there till even before God, and lifted up their voices, and wept sore.21:3 And they said, O Yahweh, the God of Israel, why is this come to pass in Israel, that there should be today one tribe lacking in Israel?21:4 And it came to pass on the morrow, that the people rose early, and built there an altar, and offered burnt offerings and peace offerings.21:5 And the children of Israel said, Who is there among all the tribes of Israel that came not up in the assembly to Yahweh?  For they had made a great oath concerning him that came not up to Yahweh to Mizpah, saying, He shall surely be put to death.21:6 And the children of Israel repented them for Benjamin their brother, and said, There is one tribe cut off from Israel this day.21:7 How shall we do for wives for them that remain, seeing we have sworn by Yahweh that we will not give them of our daughters to wives?21:8 And they said, What one is there of the tribes of Israel that came not up to Yahweh to Mizpah?  And, behold, there came none to the camp from Jabesh-gilead to the assembly.21:9 For when the people were numbered, behold, there were none of the inhabitants of Jabesh-gilead there.21:10 And the congregation sent there twelve thousand men of the most valiant, and commanded them, saying, Go and strike the inhabitants of Jabesh-gilead with the edge of the sword, along with the women and the little ones.21:11 And this is the thing that ye shall do: ye shall utterly destroy every male, and every woman that has lain by man.21:12 And they found among the inhabitants of Jabesh-gilead four hundred young virgins, that had not known man by lying with him; and they brought them to the camp to Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan.21:13 And the whole congregation sent and spoke to the children of Benjamin that were in the rock of Rimmon, and proclaimed peace to them.21:14 And Benjamin returned at that time; and they gave them the women whom they had saved alive of the women of Jabesh-gilead: and yet so they sufficed them not.21:15 And the people repented them for Benjamin, because that Yahweh had made a breach in the tribes of Israel.21:16 Then the elders of the congregation said, How shall we do for wives for them that remain, seeing the women are destroyed out of Benjamin?21:17 And they said, There must be an inheritance for them that are escaped of Benjamin, that a tribe be not blotted out from Israel.21:18 Yet we may not give them wives of our daughters, for the children of Israel had sworn, saying, Cursed be he that gives a wife to Benjamin.21:19 And they said, Behold, there is a feast of Yahweh from year to year in Shiloh, which is on the north of Beth-el, on the east side of the highway that goes up from Beth-el to Shechem, and on the south of Lebonah.21:20 And they commanded the children of Benjamin, saying, Go and lie in wait in the vineyards,21:21 and see, and, behold, if the daughters of Shiloh come out to dance in the dances, then come ye out of the vineyards, and catch you every man his wife of the daughters of Shiloh, and go to the land of Benjamin.21:22 And it shall be, when their fathers or their brethren come to complain to us, that we will say to them, Grant them graciously to us, because we took not for each man of them his wife in battle, neither did ye give them to them, else would ye now be guilty.21:23 And the children of Benjamin did so, and took them wives, according to their number, of them that danced, whom they carried off: and they went and returned to their inheritance, and built the cities, and dwelt in them.21:24 And the children of Israel departed there at that time, every man to his tribe and to his family, and they went out from there every man to his inheritance.21:25 In those days there was no king in Israel: every man did that which was right in his own eyes.End of JudgesRuth1:1 And it came to pass in the days when the judges judged, that there was a famine in the land.  And a certain man of Bethlehem-judah went to sojourn in the country of Moab, he, and his wife, and his two sons.1:2 And the name of the man was Elimelech, and the name of his wife Naomi, and the name of his two sons Mahlon and Chilion, Ephrathites of Bethlehem-judah.  And they came into the country of Moab, and continued there.1:3 And Elimelech, Naomi's husband, died; and she was left, and her two sons.1:4 And they took them wives of the women of Moab; the name of the one was Orpah, and the name of the other Ruth: and they dwelt there about ten years.1:5 And Mahlon and Chilion died both of them; and the woman was left of her two children and of her husband.1:6 Then she arose with her daughters-in-law, that she might return from the country of Moab: for she had heard in the country of Moab how that Yahweh had visited his people in giving them bread.1:7 And she went forth out of the place where she was, and her two daughters-in-law with her; and they went on the way to return to the land of Judah.1:8 And Naomi said to her two daughters-in-law, Go, return each of you to her mother's house: Yahweh deal kindly with you, as ye have dealt with the dead, and with me.1:9 Yahweh grant you that ye may find rest, each of you in the house of her husband.  Then she kissed them, and they lifted up their voice, and wept.1:10 And they said to her, Nay, but we will return with you to your people.1:11 And Naomi said, Turn back, my daughters: why will ye go with me?  have I yet sons in my womb, that they may be your husbands?1:12 Turn back, my daughters, go your way; for I am too old to have a husband.  If I should say, I have hope, if I should even have a husband to-night, and should also bear sons;1:13 would ye therefore tarry till they were grown?  would ye therefore stay from having husbands?  nay, my daughters, for it grieves me much for your sakes, for the hand of Yahweh is gone forth against me.1:14 And they lifted up their voice, and wept again: and Orpah kissed her mother-in-law, but Ruth clave to her.1:15 And she said, Behold, your sister-in-law is gone back to her people, and to her god: return you after your sister-in-law.1:16 And Ruth said, Entreat me not to leave you, and to return from following after you, for whither you go, I will go; and where you lodgest, I will lodge; your people shall be my people, and your God my God;1:17 where you die, I will die, and there will I be buried: Yahweh do so to me, and more also, if anything except death parts you and me.1:18 And when she saw that she was stedfastly minded to go with her, she left off speaking to her.1:19 So they two went until they came to Bethlehem.  And it came to pass, when they were come to Bethlehem, that all the city was moved about them, and the women said, Is this Naomi?1:20 And she said to them, Call me not Naomi, call me Mara; for the Almighty has dealt very bitterly with me.1:21 I went out full, and Yahweh has brought me home again empty; why call ye me Naomi, seeing Yahweh has testified against me, and the Almighty has afflicted me?1:22 So Naomi returned, and Ruth the Moabitess, her daughter-in-law, with her, who returned out of the country of Moab: and they came to Bethlehem in the beginning of barley harvest.2:1 And Naomi had a kinsman of her husband's, a mighty man of wealth, of the family of Elimelech, and his name was Boaz.2:2 And Ruth the Moabitess said to Naomi, Let me now go to the field, and glean among the ears of grain after him in whose sight I shall find favor.  And she said to her, Go, my daughter.2:3 And she went, and came and gleaned in the field after the reapers: and her hap was to light on the portion of the field belonging to Boaz, who was of the family of Elimelech.2:4 And, behold, Boaz came from Bethlehem, and said to the reapers, Yahweh be with you.  And they answered him, Yahweh bless you.2:5 Then said Boaz to his servant that was set over the reapers, Whose damsel is this?2:6 And the servant that was set over the reapers answered and said, It is the Moabitish damsel that came back with Naomi out of the country of Moab:2:7 And she said, Let me glean, I pray you, and gather after the reapers among the sheaves.  So she came, and has continued even from the morning until now, save that she tarried a little in the house.2:8 Then said Boaz to Ruth, Hear you not, my daughter?  Go not to glean in another field, neither pass from out of here, but abide here fast by my maidens.2:9 Let your eyes be on the field that they do reap, and go you after them: have I not charged the young men that they shall not touch you?  and when you are athirst, go to the vessels, and drink of that which the young men have drawn.2:10 Then she fell on her face, and bowed herself to the ground, and said to him, Why have I found favor in your sight, that you should take knowledge of me, seeing I am a foreigner?2:11 And Boaz answered and said to her, It has fully been shown me, all that you have done to your mother-in-law since the death of your husband; and how you have left your father and your mother, and the land of your nativity, and are come to a people that you knew not heretofore.2:12 Yahweh recompense your work, and a full reward be given you of Yahweh, the God of Israel, under whose wings you are come to take refuge.2:13 Then she said, Let me find favor in your sight, my lord, for that you have comforted me, and for that you have spoken kindly to your handmaid, though I be not as one of your handmaidens.2:14 And at meal-time Boaz said to her, Come here, and eat of the bread, and dip your morsel in the vinegar.  And she sat beside the reapers, and they reached her parched grain, and she did eat, and was sufficed, and left thereof.2:15 And when she was risen up to glean, Boaz commanded his young men, saying, Let her glean even among the sheaves, and reproach her not.2:16 And also pull out some for her from the bundles, and leave it, and let her glean, and rebuke her not.2:17 So she gleaned in the field until even; and she beat out that which she had gleaned, and it was about an ephah of barley.2:18 And she took it up, and went into the city; and her mother-in-law saw what she had gleaned: and she brought forth and gave to her that which she had left after she was sufficed.2:19 And her mother-in-law said to her, Where have you gleaned today?  and where have you wrought?  blessed be he that did take knowledge of you.  And she showed her mother-in-law with whom she had wrought, and said, The man's name with whom I wrought today is Boaz.2:20 And Naomi said to her daughter-in-law, Blessed be he of Yahweh, who has not left off his kindness to the living and to the dead.  And Naomi said to her, The man is near of kin to us, one of our near kinsmen.2:21 And Ruth the Moabitess said, Yes, he said to me, You shall keep fast by my young men, until they have ended all my harvest.2:22 And Naomi said to Ruth her daughter-in-law, It is good, my daughter, that you go out with his maidens, and that they meet you not in any other field.2:23 So she kept fast by the maidens of Boaz, to glean to the end of barley harvest and of wheat harvest; and she dwelt with her mother-in-law.3:1 And Naomi her mother-in-law said to her, My daughter, shall I not seek rest for you, that it may be well with you?3:2 And now is not Boaz our kinsman, with whose maidens you were?  Behold, he winnows barley to-night in the threshing-floor.3:3 Wash yourself therefore, and anoint you, and put your raiment upon you, and go down to the threshing-floor, but make not yourself known to the man, until he shall have done eating and drinking.3:4 And it shall be, when he lies down, that you shall mark the place where he shall lie, and you shall go in, and uncover his feet, and lay you down; and he will tell you what you shall do.3:5 And she said to her, all that you say I will do.3:6 And she went down to the threshing-floor, and did according to all that her mother-in-law told her.3:7 And when Boaz had eaten and drunk, and his heart was merry, he went to lie down at the end of the heap of grain: and she came softly, and uncovered his feet, and laid her down.3:8 And it came to pass at midnight, that the man was afraid, and turned himself; and, behold, a woman lay at his feet.3:9 And he said, Who are you?  And she answered, I am Ruth your handmaid: spread therefore your skirt over your handmaid; for you are a near kinsman.3:10 And he said, Blessed be you of Yahweh, my daughter: you have shown more kindness in the latter end than at the beginning, inasmuch as you followed not young men, whether poor or rich.3:11 And now, my daughter, fear not; I will do to you all that you say; for all the city of my people does know that you are a worthy woman.3:12 And now it is true that I am a near kinsman; yet there is a kinsman nearer than I.3:13 Tarry this night, and it shall be in the morning, that if he will perform to you the part of a kinsman, well; let him do the kinsman's part: but if he will not do the part of a kinsman to you, then will I do the part of a kinsman to you, as Yahweh lives: lie down until the morning.3:14 And she lay at his feet until the morning.  And she rose up before one could discern another.  For he said, Let it not be known that the woman came to the threshing-floor.3:15 And he said, Bring the mantle that is upon you, and hold it; and she held it; and he measured six measures of barley, and laid it on her: and he went into the city.3:16 And when she came to her mother-in-law, she said, Who are you, my daughter?  And she told her all that the man had done to her.3:17 And she said, These six measures of barley gave he me; for he said, Go not empty to your mother-in-law.3:18 Then said she, Sit still, my daughter, until you know how the matter will fall; for the man will not rest, until he have finished the thing this day.4:1 Now Boaz went up to the gate, and sat him down there: and, behold, the near kinsman of whom Boaz spoke came by; to whom he said, Ho, such a one! turn aside, sit down here.  And he turned aside, and sat down.4:2 And he took ten men of the elders of the city, and said, Sit ye down here.  And they sat down.4:3 And he said to the near kinsman, Naomi, that is come again out of the country of Moab, sells the parcel of land, which was our brother Elimelech's:4:4 And I thought to disclose it to you, saying, Buy it before them that sit here, and before the elders of my people.  If you will redeem it, redeem it: but if you will not redeem it, then tell me, that I may know; for there is none to redeem it besides you; and I am after you.  And he said, I will redeem it.4:5 Then said Boaz, What day you buy the field of the hand of Naomi, you must buy it also of Ruth the Moabitess, the wife of the dead, to raise up the name of the dead upon his inheritance.4:6 And the near kinsman said, I cannot redeem it for myself, lest I mar my own inheritance: take you my right of redemption on you; for I cannot redeem it.4:7 Now this was the custom in former time in Israel concerning redeeming and concerning exchanging, to confirm all things: a man drew off his shoe, and gave it to his neighbor; and this was the manner of attestation in Israel.4:8 So the near kinsman said to Boaz, Buy it for yourself.  And he drew off his shoe.4:9 And Boaz said to the elders, and to all the people, You are witnesses this day, that I have bought all that was Elimelech's, and all that was Chilion's and Mahlon's, of the hand of Naomi.4:10 Moreover Ruth the Moabitess, the wife of Mahlon, have I purchased to be my wife, to raise up the name of the dead upon his inheritance, that the name of the dead be not cut off from among his brethren, and from the gate of his place: ye are witnesses this day.4:11 And all the people that were in the gate, and the elders, said, We are witnesses.  Yahweh make the woman that is come into your house like Rachel and like Leah, which two did build the house of Israel: and do you worthily in Ephrathah, and be famous in Bethlehem:4:12 and let your house be like the house of Perez, whom Tamar bore to Judah, of the seed which Yahweh shall give you of this young woman.4:13 So Boaz took Ruth, and she became his wife; and he went in to her, and Yahweh gave her conception, and she bore a son.4:14 And the women said to Naomi, Blessed be Yahweh, who has not left you this day without a near kinsman; and let his name be famous in Israel.4:15 And he shall be to you a restorer of life, and a nourisher of your old age, for your daughter-in-law, who loves you, who is better to you than seven sons, has borne him.4:16 And Naomi took the child, and laid it in her bosom, and became nurse to it.4:17 And the women her neighbors gave it a name, saying, There is a son born to Naomi; and they called his name Obed: he is the father of Jesse, the father of David.4:18 Now these are the generations of Perez: Perez begat Hezron,4:19 and Hezron begat Ram, and Ram begat Amminadab,4:20 and Amminadab begat Nahshon, and Nahshon begat Salmon,4:21 and Salmon begat Boaz, and Boaz begat Obed,4:22 and Obed begat Jesse, and Jesse begat David.End of Ruth1 Samuel1:1 Now there was a certain man of Ramathaim-zophim, of the hill-country of Ephraim, and his name was Elkanah, the son of Jeroham, the son of Elihu, the son of Tohu, the son of Zuph, an Ephraimite:1:2 and he had two wives; the name of the one was Hannah, and the name of the other Peninnah: and Peninnah had children, but Hannah had no children.1:3 And this man went up out of his city from year to year to worship and to sacrifice to Yahweh of hosts in Shiloh.  And the two sons of Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, priests to Yahweh, were there.1:4 And when the day came that Elkanah sacrificed, he gave to Peninnah his wife, and to all her sons and her daughters, portions:1:5 but to Hannah he gave a double portion; for he loved Hannah, but Yahweh had shut up her womb.1:6 And her rival provoked her sore, to make her fret, because Yahweh had shut up her womb.1:7 And as he did so year by year, when she went up to the house of Yahweh, so she provoked her; therefore she wept, and did not eat.1:8 And Elkanah her husband said to her, Hannah, why are you weeping?  and why are you not eating?  and why is your heart grieved?  am not I better to you than ten sons?1:9 So Hannah rose up after they had eaten in Shiloh, and after they had drank.  (Now Eli the priest was sitting upon his seat by the doorpost of the temple of Yahweh.)1:10 And she was in bitterness of soul, and prayed to Yahweh, and wept sore.1:11 And she vowed a vow, and said, O Yahweh of hosts, if you will indeed look on the affliction of your handmaid, and remember me, and not forget your handmaid, but will give to your handmaid a man-child, then I will give him to Yahweh all the days of his life, and there shall no razor come upon his head.1:12 And it came to pass, as she continued praying before Yahweh, that Eli toke note of her mouth.1:13 Now Hannah, she spoke in her heart; only her lips moved, but her voice was not heard: therefore Eli thought she had been drunk.1:14 And Eli said to her, How long will you be drunken?  put away your wine from you.1:15 And Hannah answered and said, No, my lord, I am a woman of a sorrowful spirit: I have drunk neither wine nor strong drink, but I poured out my soul before Yahweh.1:16 Count not your handmaid for a wicked woman; for out of the abundance of my complaint and my provocation have I spoken hitherto.1:17 Then Eli answered and said, Go in peace; and the God of Israel grant your petition that you have asked of him.1:18 And she said, Let your handmaid find favor in your sight.  So the woman went her way, and did eat; and her countenance was no longer sad.1:19 And they rose up in the morning early, and worshipped before Yahweh, and returned, and came to their house to Ramah: and Elkanah knew Hannah his wife; and Yahweh remembered her.1:20 And it came to pass, when the time was come about, that Hannah conceived, and bore a son; and she called his name Samuel, saying, Because I have asked him of Yahweh.1:21 And the man Elkanah, and his entire house, went up to offer to Yahweh the yearly sacrifice, and his vow.1:22 But Hannah went not up; for she said to her husband, Not until the child be weaned; and then I will bring him, that he may appear before Yahweh, and there abide for ever.1:23 And Elkanah her husband said to her, Do what seems you good; tarry until you have weaned him; only Yahweh establish his word.  So the woman tarried and gave her son suck, until she weaned him.1:24 And when she had weaned him, she took him up with her, with three bullocks, and one ephah of meal, and a bottle of wine, and brought him to the house of Yahweh in Shiloh: and the child was young.1:25 And they slew the bullock, and brought the child to Eli.1:26 And she said, Oh, my lord, as your soul lives, my lord, I am the woman that stood by you here, praying to Yahweh.1:27 For this child I prayed; and Yahweh has given me my petition which I asked of him:1:28 therefore also I have granted him to Yahweh; as long as he lives he is granted to Yahweh.  And he worshipped Yahweh there.2:1 And Hannah prayed, and said: My heart exults in Yahweh; My horn is exalted in Yahweh; My mouth is enlarged over my enemies; Because I rejoice in your salvation.2:2 There is none holy as Yahweh; For there is none besides you, Neither is there any rock like our God.2:3 Talk no more so exceedingly proudly; Let not arrogance come out of your mouth; For Yahweh is a God of knowledge, and by him actions are weighed.2:4 The bows of the mighty men are broken; And they that stumbled are girded with strength.2:5 They that were full have hired out themselves for bread; And they that were hungry have ceased to hunger.  Even the barren has borne seven; And she that has many children languishes.2:6 Yahweh kills, and makes alive: He brings down to Sheol, and brings up.2:7 Yahweh makes poor, and makes rich: He brings low, he also lifts up.2:8 He raises up the poor out of the dust, He lifts up the needy from the dunghill, To make them sit with princes, and inherit the throne of glory: For the pillars of the earth are Yahweh's, and he has set the world upon them.2:9 He will keep the feet of his holy ones; But the wicked shall be put to silence in darkness; For by strength shall no man prevail.2:10 They that strive with Yahweh shall be broken to pieces; Against them will he thunder in heaven: Yahweh will judge the ends of the earth; And he will give strength to his king, and exalt the horn of his anointed.2:11 And Elkanah went to Ramah to his house.  And the child did minister to Yahweh before Eli the priest.2:12 Now the sons of Eli were base men; they knew not Yahweh.2:13 And the custom of the priests with the people was, that, when any man offered sacrifice, the priest's servant came, while the flesh was boiling, with a flesh-hook of three teeth in his hand;2:14 and he struck it into the pan, or kettle, or caldron, or pot; all that the flesh-hook brought up the priest took with it.  So they did in Shiloh to all the Israelites that came there.2:15 Moreover, before they burnt the fat, the priest's servant came, and said to the man that sacrificed, Give flesh to roast for the priest; for he will not have boiled flesh of you, but raw.2:16 And if the man said to him, They will surely burn the fat first, and then take as much as your soul desires; then he would say, Nay, but you shall give it me now: and if not, I will take it by force.2:17 And the sin of the young men was very great before Yahweh; for the men despised the offering of Yahweh.2:18 But Samuel ministered before Yahweh, being a child, girded with a linen ephod.2:19 Moreover his mother made him a little robe, and brought it to him from year to year, when she came up with her husband to offer the yearly sacrifice.2:20 And Eli blessed Elkanah and his wife, and said, Yahweh give you seed of this woman for the petition which was asked of Yahweh.  And they went to their own home.2:21 And Yahweh visited Hannah, and she conceived, and bore three sons and two daughters.  And the child Samuel grew before Yahweh.2:22 Now Eli was very old; and he heard all that his sons did to all Israel, and how that they lay with the women that did service at the door of the tent of meeting.2:23 And he said to them, Why do ye such things?  For I hear of your evil dealings from this entire people.2:24 Nay, my sons; for it is not a good report that I hear: ye make Yahweh's people to transgress.2:25 If one man sins against another, God shall judge him; but if a man sins against Yahweh, who shall entreat for him?  Notwithstanding, they heeded not the voice of their father, because Yahweh was minded to kill them.2:26 And the child Samuel grew on, and increased in favor both with Yahweh, and also with men.2:27 And there came a man of God to Eli, and said to him, Thus says Yahweh, Did I reveal myself to the house of your father, when they were in Egypt in bondage to Pharaoh's house?2:28 and did I choose him out of all the tribes of Israel to be my priest, to go up to my altar, to burn incense, to wear an ephod before me?  and did I give to the house of your father all the offerings of the children of Israel made by fire?2:29 Why are you disgracing my offering, which I have commanded to be in my habitation, and honor your sons above me, to make yourselves fat with the chiefest of all the offerings of Israel my people?2:30 Therefore Yahweh, the God of Israel, says, I said indeed that your house, and the house of your father, should walk before me for ever: but now Yahweh says, Be it far from me; for them that honor me I will honor, and they that despise me shall be lightly esteemed.2:31 Behold, the days are coming, that I will cut off your arm, and the arm of your father's house, that there shall not be an old man in your house.2:32 And you shall behold the affliction of my habitation, in all the wealth which God shall give Israel; and there shall not be an old man in your house for ever.2:33 And the man of yours, whom I shall not cut off from my altar, shall be to consume your eyes, and to grieve your heart; and all the increase of your house shall die in the flower of their age.2:34 And this shall be the sign to you, that shall come upon your two sons, on Hophni and Phinehas: in one day they shall die both of them.2:35 And I will raise me up a faithful priest, that shall do according to that which is in my heart and in my mind: and I will build him a sure house; and he shall walk before my anointed for ever.2:36 And it shall come to pass, that every one that is left in your house shall come and bow down to him for a piece of silver and a loaf of bread, and shall say, Put me, I pray you, into one of the priests' offices, that I may eat a morsel of bread.3:1 And the child Samuel ministered to Yahweh before Eli.  And the word of Yahweh was precious in those days; there was no frequent vision.3:2 And it came to pass at that time, when Eli was laid down in his place (now his eyes had begun to grow dim, so that he could not see),3:3 and the lamp of God was not yet gone out, and Samuel was laid down to sleep, in the temple of Yahweh, where the ark of God was;3:4 that Yahweh called Samuel; and he said, Here am I.3:5 And he ran to Eli, and said, Here am I; for you called me.  And he said, I called not; lie down again.  And he went and lay down.3:6 And Yahweh called yet again, Samuel.  And Samuel arose and went to Eli, and said, Here am I; for you called me.  And he answered, I called not, my son; lie down again.3:7 Now Samuel did not yet know Yahweh, neither was the word of Yahweh yet revealed to him.3:8 And Yahweh called Samuel again the third time.  And he arose and went to Eli, and said, Here am I; for you called me.  And Eli perceived that Yahweh had called the child.3:9 Therefore Eli said to Samuel, Go, lie down: and it shall be, if he call you, that you shall say, Speak, Yahweh; for your servant hears.  So Samuel went and lay down in his place.3:10 And Yahweh came, and stood, and called as at other times, Samuel, Samuel.  Then Samuel said, Speak; for your servant hears.3:11 And Yahweh said to Samuel, Behold, I will do a thing in Israel, at which both the ears of every one that hears it shall tingle.3:12 In that day I will perform against Eli all that I have spoken concerning his house, from the beginning even to the end.3:13 For I have told him that I will judge his house for ever, for the iniquity which he knew, because his sons did bring a curse upon themselves, and he restrained them not.3:14 And therefore I have sworn to the house of Eli, that the iniquity of Eli's house shall not be expiated with sacrifice nor offering for ever.3:15 And Samuel lay until the morning, and opened the doors of the house of Yahweh.  And Samuel feared to show Eli the vision.3:16 Then Eli called Samuel, and said, Samuel, my son.  And he said, Here am I.3:17 And he said, What is the thing that Yahweh has spoken to you?  I pray you, hide it not from me: God do so to you, and more also, if you hide anything from me of all the things that he spoke to you.3:18 And Samuel told him every whit, and hid nothing from him.  And he said, It is Yahweh: let him do what seems to him good.3:19 And Samuel grew, and Yahweh was with him, and did let none of his words fall to the ground.3:20 And all Israel from Dan even to Beer-sheba knew that Samuel was established to be a prophet of Yahweh.3:21 And Yahweh appeared again in Shiloh; for Yahweh revealed himself to Samuel in Shiloh by the word of Yahweh.4:1 And the word of Samuel came to all Israel.  Now Israel went out against the Philistines to battle, and encamped beside Eben-ezer: and the Philistines encamped in Aphek.4:2 And the Philistines put themselves in array against Israel: and when they joined battle, Israel was smitten before the Philistines; and they slew of the army in the field about four thousand men.4:3 And when the people were come into the camp, the elders of Israel said, Why has Yahweh smitten us today before the Philistines?  Let us fetch the ark of the covenant of Yahweh out of Shiloh to us, that it may come among us, and save us out of the hand of our enemies.4:4 So the people sent to Shiloh; and they brought from there the ark of the covenant of Yahweh of hosts, who sits above the cherubim: and the two sons of Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, were there with the ark of the covenant of God.4:5 And when the ark of the covenant of Yahweh came into the camp, all Israel shouted with a great shout, so that the earth rang again.4:6 And when the Philistines heard the noise of the shout, they said, What means the noise of this great shout in the camp of the Hebrews?  And they understood that the ark of Yahweh was come into the camp.4:7 And the Philistines were afraid, for they said, God is come into the camp.  And they said, Woe to us! for there has not been such a thing heretofore.4:8 Woe to us! who shall deliver us out of the hand of these mighty gods?  these are the gods that smote the Egyptians with all manner of plagues in the wilderness.4:9 Be strong, and quit yourselves like men, O ye Philistines, that ye be not servants to the Hebrews, as they have been to you: quit yourselves like men, and fight.4:10 And the Philistines fought, and Israel was smitten, and they fled every man to his tent: and there was a very great slaughter; for there fell of Israel thirty thousand footmen.4:11 And the ark of God was taken; and the two sons of Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, were slain.4:12 And there ran a man of Benjamin out of the army, and came to Shiloh the same day, with his clothes rent, and with earth upon his head.4:13 And when he came, lo, Eli was sitting upon his seat by the wayside watching; for his heart trembled for the ark of God.  And when the man came into the city, and told it, all the city cried out.4:14 And when Eli heard the noise of the crying, he said, What means the noise of this tumult?  And the man hasted, and came and told Eli.4:15 Now Eli was ninety and eight years old; and his eyes were set, so that he could not see.4:16 And the man said to Eli, I am he that came out of the army, and I fled today out of the army.  And he said, How went the matter, my son?4:17 And he that brought the tidings answered and said, Israel is fled before the Philistines, and there has been also a great slaughter among the people, and your two sons also, Hophni and Phinehas, are dead, and the ark of God is taken.4:18 And it came to pass, when he made mention of the ark of God, that Eli fell from off his seat backward by the side of the gate; and his neck broke, and he died: for he was an old man, and heavy.  And he had judged Israel forty years.4:19 And his daughter-in-law, Phinehas' wife, was with child, near to be delivered: and when she heard the news that the ark of God was taken, and that her father-in-law and her husband were dead, she bowed herself and brought forth; for her pains came upon her.4:20 And about the time of her death the women that stood by her said to her, Fear not; for you have brought forth a son.  But she answered not, neither did she regard it.4:21 And she named the child Ichabod, saying, The glory is departed from Israel; because the ark of God was taken, and because of her father-in-law and her husband.4:22 And she said, The glory is departed from Israel; for the ark of God is taken.5:1 Now the Philistines had taken the ark of God, and they brought it from Eben-ezer to Ashdod.5:2 And the Philistines took the ark of God, and brought it into the house of Dagon, and set it by Dagon.5:3 And when they of Ashdod arose early on the morrow, behold, Dagon was fallen upon his face to the ground before the ark of Yahweh.  And they took Dagon, and set him in his place again.5:4 And when they arose early on the morrow morning, behold, Dagon was fallen upon his face to the ground before the ark of Yahweh; and the head of Dagon and both the palms of his hands lay cut off upon the threshold; only the stump of Dagon was left to him.5:5 Therefore neither the priests of Dagon, nor any that come into Dagon's house, tread on the threshold of Dagon in Ashdod, to this day.5:6 But the hand of Yahweh was heavy upon those of Ashdod, and he destroyed them, and smote them with tumors, even Ashdod and the borders thereof.5:7 And when the men of Ashdod saw that it was so, they said, The ark of the God of Israel shall not abide with us; for his hand is sore upon us, and upon Dagon our god.5:8 They sent therefore and gathered all the lords of the Philistines to them, and said, What shall we do with the ark of the God of Israel?  And they answered, Let the ark of the God of Israel be carried about to Gath.  And they carried the ark of the God of Israel there.5:9 And it was so, that, after they had carried it about, the hand of Yahweh was against the city with a very great discomfiture: and he smote the men of the city, both small and great; and tumors broke out upon them.5:10 So they sent the ark of God to Ekron.  And it came to pass, as the ark of God came to Ekron, that the Ekronites cried out, saying, They have brought about the ark of the God of Israel to us, to slay us and our people.5:11 They sent therefore and gathered together all the lords of the Philistines, and they said, Send away the ark of the God of Israel, and let it go again to its own place, that is slay us not, and our people.  For there was a deadly discomfiture throughout all the city; the hand of God was very heavy there.5:12 And the men that died not were smitten with the tumors; and the cry of the city went up to heaven.6:1 And the ark of Yahweh was in the country of the Philistines seven months.6:2 And the Philistines called for the priests and the diviners, saying, What shall we do with the ark of Yahweh?  show us with which we shall sent it to its place.6:3 And they said, If ye send away the ark of the God of Israel, send it not empty; but by all means return him a trespass offering: then ye shall be healed, and it shall be known to you why his hand is not removed from you.6:4 Then said they, What shall be the trespass offering which we shall return to him?  And they said, Five golden tumors, and five golden mice, according to the number of the lords of the Philistines; for one plague was on you all, and on your lords.6:5 Wherefore ye shall make images of your tumors, and images of your mice that mar the land; and ye shall give glory to the God of Israel: peradventure he will lighten his hand from off you, and from off your gods, and from off your land.6:6 Why then do ye harden your hearts, as the Egyptians and Pharaoh hardened their hearts?  When he had wrought wonderfully among them, did they not let the people go, and they departed?6:7 Now therefore take and prepare you a new cart, and two milch kine, on which there has come no yoke; and tie the kine to the cart, and bring their calves home from them;6:8 and take the ark of Yahweh, and lay it upon the cart; and put the jewels of gold, which ye return him for a trespass offering, in a coffer by the side thereof; and send it away, that it may go.6:9 And see; if it goes up by the way of its own border to Beth-shemesh, then he has done us this great evil: but if not, then we shall know that it is not his hand that smote us; it was a chance that happened to us.6:10 And the men did so, and took two milch kine, and tied them to the cart, and shut up their calves at home;6:11 and they put the ark of Yahweh upon the cart, and the coffer with the mice of gold and the images of their tumors.6:12 And the kine took the straight way by the way to Beth-shemesh; they went along the highway, lowing as they went, and turned not aside to the right hand or to the left; and the lords of the Philistines went after them to the border of Beth-shemesh.6:13 And they of Beth-shemesh were reaping their wheat harvest in the valley; and they lifted up their eyes, and saw the ark, and rejoiced to see it.6:14 And the cart came into the field of Joshua the Beth-shemite, and stood there, where there was a great stone: and they clave the wood of the cart, and offered up the kine for a burnt offering to Yahweh.6:15 And the Levites took down the ark of Yahweh, and the coffer that was with it, in which the jewels of gold were, and put them on the great stone: and the men of Beth-shemesh offered burnt offerings and sacrificed sacrifices the same day to Yahweh.6:16 And when the five lords of the Philistines had seen it, they returned to Ekron the same day.6:17 And these are the golden tumors which the Philistines returned for a trespass offering to Yahweh: for Ashdod one, for Gaza one, for Ashkelon one, for Gath one, for Ekron one;6:18 and the golden mice, according to the number of all the cities of the Philistines belonging to the five lords, both of fortified cities and of country villages, even to the great stone, whereon they set down the ark of Yahweh, which stone remains to this day in the field of Joshua the Beth-shemite.6:19 And he smote of the men of Beth-shemesh, because they had looked into the ark of Yahweh, he smote of the people seventy men, and fifty thousand men; and the people mourned, because Yahweh had smitten the people with a great slaughter.6:20 And the men of Beth-shemesh said, Who is able to stand before Yahweh, this holy God?  and to whom shall he go up from us?6:21 And they sent messengers to the inhabitants of Kiriath-jearim, saying, The Philistines have brought back the ark of Yahweh; come ye down, and fetch it up to you.7:1 And the men of Kiriath-jearim came, and fetched up the ark of Yahweh, and brought it into the house of Abinadab in the hill, and sanctified Eleazar his son to keep the ark of Yahweh.7:2 And it came to pass, from the day that the ark abode in Kiriath-jearim, that the time was long; for it was twenty years: and all the house of Israel lamented after Yahweh.7:3 And Samuel spoke to all the house of Israel, saying, If ye do return to Yahweh with all your heart, then put away the foreign gods and the Ashtaroth from among you, and direct your hearts to Yahweh, and serve him only; and he will deliver you out of the hand of the Philistines.7:4 Then the children of Israel did put away the Baalim and the Ashtaroth, and served Yahweh only.7:5 And Samuel said, Gather all Israel to Mizpah, and I will pray for you to Yahweh.7:6 And they gathered together to Mizpah, and drew water, and poured it out before Yahweh, and fasted on that day, and said there, We have sinned against Yahweh.  And Samuel judged the children of Israel in Mizpah.7:7 And when the Philistines heard that the children of Israel were gathered together to Mizpah, the lords of the Philistines went up against Israel.  And when the children of Israel heard it, they were afraid of the Philistines.7:8 And the children of Israel said to Samuel, Cease not to cry to Yahweh our God for us, that he will save us out of the hand of the Philistines.7:9 And Samuel took a sucking lamb, and offered it for a whole burnt offering to Yahweh: and Samuel cried to Yahweh for Israel; and Yahweh answered him.7:10 And as Samuel was offering up the burnt offering, the Philistines drew near to battle against Israel; but Yahweh thundered with a great thunder on that day upon the Philistines, and discomfited them; and they were smitten down before Israel.7:11 And the men of Israel went out of Mizpah, and pursued the Philistines, and smote them, until they came under Beth-car.7:12 Then Samuel took a stone, and set it between Mizpah and Shen, and called the name of it Eben-ezer, saying, Hitherto has Yahweh helped us.7:13 So the Philistines were subdued, and they came no more within the border of Israel: and the hand of Yahweh was against the Philistines all the days of Samuel.7:14 And the cities which the Philistines had taken from Israel were restored to Israel, from Ekron even to Gath; and the border thereof did Israel deliver out of the hand of the Philistines.  And there was peace between Israel and the Amorites.7:15 And Samuel judged Israel all the days of his life.7:16 And he went from year to year in circuit to Beth-el and Gilgal, and Mizpah; and he judged Israel in all those places.7:17 And his return was to Ramah, for there was his house; and there he judged Israel: and he built there an altar to Yahweh.8:1 And it came to pass, when Samuel was old, that he made his sons judges over Israel.8:2 Now the name of his first-born was Joel; and the name of his second, abijah: they were judges in Beer-sheba.8:3 And his sons walked not in his ways, but turned aside after lucre, and took bribes, and perverted justice.8:4 Then all the elders of Israel gathered themselves together, and came to Samuel to Ramah;8:5 and they said to him, Behold, you are old, and your sons walk not in your ways: now make us a king to judge us like all the nations.8:6 But the thing displeased Samuel, when they said, Give us a king to judge us.  And Samuel prayed to Yahweh.8:7 And Yahweh said to Samuel, Hearken to the voice of the people in all that they say to you; for they have not rejected you, but they have rejected me, that I should not be king over them.8:8 According to all the works which they have done since the day that I brought them up out of Egypt even to this day, in that they have forsaken me, and served other gods, so do they also to you.8:9 Now therefore hearken to their voice, nevertheless you shall protest solemnly to them, and shall show them the manner of the king that shall reign over them.8:10 And Samuel told all the words of Yahweh to the people that asked of him a king.8:11 And he said, This will be the manner of the king that shall reign over you: he will take your sons, and appoint them to him, for his chariots, and to be his horsemen; and they shall run before his chariots;8:12 and he will appoint them to him for captains of thousands, and captains of fifties; and he will set some to plow his ground, and to reap his harvest, and to make his instruments of war, and the instruments of his chariots.8:13 And he will take your daughters to be perfumers, and to be cooks, and to be bakers.8:14 And he will take your fields, and your vineyards, and your oliveyards, even the best of them, and give them to his servants.8:15 And he will take the tenth of your seed, and of your vineyards, and give to his officers, and to his servants.8:16 And he will take your men-servants, and your maid-servants, and your goodliest young men, and your asses, and put them to his work.8:17 He will take the tenth of your flocks: and ye shall be his servants.8:18 And ye shall cry out in that day because of your king whom ye shall have chosen you; and Yahweh will not answer you in that day.8:19 But the people refused to hearken to the voice of Samuel; and they said, Nay: but we will have a king over us,8:20 that we also may be like all the nations, and that our king may judge us, and go out before us, and fight our battles.8:21 And Samuel heard all the words of the people, and he rehearsed them in the ears of Yahweh.8:22 And Yahweh said to Samuel, Hearken to their voice, and make them a king.  And Samuel said to the men of Israel, Go ye every man to his city.9:1 Now there was a man of Benjamin, whose name was Kish, the son of Abiel, the son of Zeror, the son of Becorath, the son of Aphiah, the son of a Benjamite, a mighty man of valor.9:2 And he had a son, whose name was Saul, a young man and a goodly: and there was not among the children of Israel a goodlier person than he: from his shoulders and upward he was higher than any of the people.9:3 And the asses of Kish, Saul's father, were lost.  And Kish said to Saul his son, Take now one of the servants with you, and arise, go seek the asses.9:4 And he passed through the hill-country of Ephraim, and passed through the land of Shalishah, but they found them not: then they passed through the land of Shaalim, and there they were not: and he passed through the land of the Benjamites, but they found them not.9:5 When they were come to the land of Zuph, Saul said to his servant that was with him, Come, and let us return, lest my father leave off caring for the asses, and be anxious for us.9:6 And he said to him, Behold now, there is in this city a man of God, and he is a man that is held in honor; all that he says comes surely to pass: now let us go there; peradventure he can tell us concerning our journey whereon we go.9:7 Then said Saul to his servant, But, behold, if we go, what shall we bring the man?  for the bread is spent in our vessels, and there is not a present to bring to the man of God: what have we?9:8 And the servant answered Saul again, and said, Behold, I have in my hand the fourth part of a shekel of silver: that will I give to the man of God, to tell us our way.9:9 (Beforetime in Israel, when a man went to inquire of God, thus he said, Come, and let us go to the seer; for he that is now called a Prophet was beforetime called a Seer.)9:10 Then said Saul to his servant, Well said; come, let us go.  So they went to the city where the man of God was.9:11 As they went up the ascent to the city, they found young maidens going out to draw water, and said to them, Is the seer here?9:12 And they answered them, and said, He is; behold, he is before you: make haste now, for he is come today into the city; for the people have a sacrifice today in the high place:9:13 as soon as ye are come into the city, ye shall straightway find him, before he goes up to the high place to eat; for the people will not eat until he come, because he does bless the sacrifice; and afterwards they eat that are bidden.  Now therefore go up; for at this time ye shall find him.9:14 And they went up to the city; and as they came within the city, behold, Samuel came out toward them, to go up to the high place.9:15 Now Yahweh had revealed to Samuel a day before Saul came, saying,9:16 Tomorrow about this time I will send you a man out of the land of Benjamin, and you shall anoint him to be prince over my people Israel; and he shall save my people out of the hand of the Philistines: for I have looked upon my people, because their cry is come to me.9:17 And when Samuel saw Saul, Yahweh said to him, Behold, the man of whom I spoke to you! this same shall have authority over my people.9:18 Then Saul drew near to Samuel in the gate, and said, Tell me, I pray you, where the seer's house is.9:19 And Samuel answered Saul, and said, I am the seer; go up before me to the high place, for ye shall eat with me today: and in the morning I will let you go, and will tell you all that is in your heart.9:20 And as for your asses that were lost three days ago, set not they mind on them; for they are found.  And for whom is all that is desirable in Israel?  Is it not for you, and for all your father's house?9:21 And Saul answered and said, am not I a Benjamite, of the smallest of the tribes of Israel?  and my family the least of all the families of the tribe of Benjamin?  why then speak to me after this manner?9:22 And Samuel took Saul and his servant, and brought them into the guest-chamber, and made them sit in the chiefest place among them that were bidden, who were about thirty persons.9:23 And Samuel said to the cook, Bring the portion which I gave you, of which I said to you, Set it by you.9:24 And the cook took up the thigh, and that which was upon it, and set it before Saul.  And Samuel said, Behold, that which has been reserved! set it before you and eat; because to the appointed time has it been kept for you, for I said, I have invited the people.  So Saul did eat with Samuel that day.9:25 And when they were come down from the high place into the city, he communed with Saul upon the housetop.9:26 And they arose early: and it came to pass about the spring of the day, that Samuel called to Saul on the housetop, saying, Up, that I may send you away.  And Saul arose, and they went out both of them, he and Samuel, abroad.9:27 As they were going down at the end of the city, Samuel said to Saul, Bid the servant pass on before us (and he passed on), but stand you still first, that I may cause you to hear the word of God.10:1 Then Samuel took the vial of oil, and poured it upon his head, and kissed him, and said, Is it not that Yahweh has anointed you to be prince over his inheritance?10:2 When you are departed from me today, then you shall find two men by Rachel's sepulchre, in the border of Benjamin at Zelzah; and they will say to you, The asses which you went to seek are found; and, lo, your father has left off caring for the asses, and is anxious for you, saying, What shall I do for my son?10:3 Then shall you go on forward from there, and you shall come to the oak of Tabor; and there shall meet you there three men going up to God to Beth-el, one carrying three kids, and another carrying three loaves of bread, and another carrying a bottle of wine:10:4 and they will salute you, and give you two loaves of bread, which you shall receive of their hand.10:5 After that you shall come to the hill of God, where is the garrison of the Philistines: and it shall come to pass, when you are come there to the city, that you shall meet a band of prophets coming down from the high place with a psaltery, and a timbrel, and a pipe, and a harp, before them; and they will be prophesying:10:6 and the Spirit of Yahweh will come mightily upon you, and you shall prophesy with them, and shall be turned into another man.10:7 And let it be, when these signs are come to you, that you do as occasion shall serve you; for God is with you.10:8 And you shall go down before me to Gilgal; and, behold, I will come down to you, to offer burnt offerings, and to sacrifice sacrifices of peace offerings: seven days shall you tarry, till I come to you, and show you what you shall do.10:9 And it was so, that, when he had turned his back to go from Samuel, God gave him another heart: and all those signs came to pass that day.10:10 And when they came there to the hill, behold, a band of prophets met him; and the Spirit of God came mightily upon him, and he prophesied among them.10:11 And it came to pass, when all that knew him beforetime saw that, behold, he prophesied with the prophets, then the people said one to another, What is this that is come to the son of Kish?  Is Saul also among the prophets?10:12 And one of the same place answered and said, and who is their father?  Therefore it became a proverb, Is Saul also among the prophets?10:13 And when he had made an end of prophesying, he came to the high place.10:14 And Saul's uncle said to him and to his servant, Whither went ye?  And he said, To seek the asses; and when we saw that they were not found, we came to Samuel.10:15 And Saul's uncle said, Tell me, I pray you, what Samuel said to you.10:16 And Saul said to his uncle, He told us plainly that the asses were found.  But concerning the matter of the kingdom, whereof Samuel spoke, he told him not.10:17 And Samuel called the people together to Yahweh to Mizpah;10:18 and he said to the children of Israel, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, I brought up Israel out of Egypt, and I delivered you out of the hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of all the kingdoms that oppressed you:10:19 but ye have this day rejected your God, who himself saves you out of all your calamities and your distresses; and ye have said to him, No, but set a king over us.  Now therefore present yourselves before Yahweh by your tribes, and by your thousands.10:20 So Samuel brought all the tribes of Israel near, and the tribe of Benjamin was taken.10:21 And he brought the tribe of Benjamin near by their families; and the family of the Matrites was taken; and Saul the son of Kish was taken: but when they sought him, he could not be found.10:22 Therefore they asked of Yahweh further, Is there yet a man to come here?  And Yahweh answered, Behold, he has hid himself among the baggage.10:23 And they ran and fetched him there; and when he stood among the people, he was higher than any of the people from his shoulders and upward.10:24 And Samuel said to all the people, See ye him whom Yahweh has chosen, that there is none like him along all the people?  And all the people shouted, and said, Long live the king.10:25 Then Samuel told the people the manner of the kingdom, and wrote it in a book, and laid it up before Yahweh.  And Samuel sent all the people away, every man to his house.10:26 And Saul also went to his house to Gibeah; and there went with him the host, whose hearts God had touched.10:27 But certain worthless fellows said, How shall this man save us?  And they despised him, and brought him no present.  But he held his peace.11:1 Then Nahash the Ammonite came up, and encamped against Jabesh-gilead: and all the men of Jabesh said to Nahash, Make a covenant with us, and we will serve you.11:2 And Nahash the Ammonite said to them, On this condition will I make it with you, that all your right eyes be put out; and I will lay it for a reproach upon all Israel.11:3 And the elders of Jabesh said to him, Give us seven days' respite, that we may send messengers to all the borders of Israel; and then, if there be none to save us, we will come out to you.11:4 Then came the messengers to Gibeah of Saul, and spoke these words in the ears of the people: and all the people lifted up their voice, and wept.11:5 And, behold, Saul came following the oxen out of the field; and Saul said, What ails the people that they weep?  And they told him the words of the men of Jabesh.11:6 And the Spirit of God came mightily upon Saul when he heard those words, and his anger was kindled greatly.11:7 And he took a yoke of oxen, and cut them in pieces, and sent them throughout all the borders of Israel by the hand of messengers, saying, Whosoever comes not forth after Saul and after Samuel, so shall it be done to his oxen.  And the dread of Yahweh fell on the people, and they came out as one man.11:8 And he numbered them in Bezek; and the children of Israel were three hundred thousand, and the men of Judah thirty thousand.11:9 And they said to the messengers that came, Thus shall ye say to the men of Jabesh-gilead, Tomorrow, by the time the sun is hot, ye shall have deliverance.  And the messengers came and told the men of Jabesh; and they were glad.11:10 Therefore the men of Jabesh said, Tomorrow we will come out to you, and ye shall do with us all that seems good to you.11:11 And it was so on the morrow, that Saul put the people in three companies; and they came into the midst of the camp in the morning watch, and smote the Ammonites until the heat of the day: and it came to pass, that they that remained were scattered, so that not two of them were left together.11:12 And the people said to Samuel, Who is he that said, Shall Saul reign over us?  bring the men, that we may put them to death.11:13 And Saul said, There shall not a man be put to death this day; for today Yahweh has wrought deliverance in Israel.11:14 Then said Samuel to the people, Come, and let us go to Gilgal, and renew the kingdom there.11:15 And all the people went to Gilgal; and there they made Saul king before Yahweh in Gilgal; and there they offered sacrifices of peace offerings before Yahweh; and there Saul and all the men of Israel rejoiced greatly.12:1 And Samuel said to all Israel, Behold, I have hearkened to your voice in all that ye said to me, and have made a king over you.12:2 And now, behold, the king walks before you; and I am old and grayheaded; and, behold, my sons are with you: and I have walked before you from my youth to this day.12:3 Here I am: witness against me before Yahweh, and before his anointed: whose ox have I taken?  or whose donkey have I taken?  or whom have I defrauded?  whom have I oppressed?  or of whose hand have I taken a ransom to blind my eyes by it?  and I will restore it you.12:4 And they said, You have not defrauded us, nor oppressed us, neither have you taken anything of any man's hand.12:5 And he said to them, Yahweh is witness against you, and his anointed is witness this day, that ye have not found anything in my hand.  And they said, He is witness.12:6 And Samuel said to the people, It is Yahweh that appointed Moses and Aaron, and that brought your fathers up out of the land of Egypt.12:7 Now therefore stand still, that I may plead with you before Yahweh concerning all the righteous acts of Yahweh, which he did to you and to your fathers.12:8 When Jacob was come into Egypt, and your fathers cried to Yahweh, then Yahweh sent Moses and Aaron, who brought forth your fathers out of Egypt, and made them to dwell in this place.12:9 But they forgat Yahweh their God; and he sold them into the hand of Sisera, captain of the host of Hazor, and into the hand of the Philistines, and into the hand of the king of Moab; and they fought against them.12:10 And they cried to Yahweh, and said, We have sinned, because we have forsaken Yahweh, and have served the Baalim and the Ashtaroth: but now deliver us out of the hand of our enemies, and we will serve you.12:11 And Yahweh sent Jerubbaal, and Bedan, and Jephthah, and Samuel, and delivered you out of the hand of your enemies on every side; and ye dwelt in safety.12:12 And when ye saw that Nahash the king of the children of Ammon came against you, ye said to me, Nay, but a king shall reign over us; when Yahweh your God was your king.12:13 Now therefore behold the king whom ye have chosen, and whom ye have asked for: and, behold, Yahweh has set a king over you.12:14 If ye will fear Yahweh, and serve him, and hearken to his voice, and not rebel against the commandment of Yahweh, and both ye and also the king that reigns over you be followers of Yahweh your God, good:12:15 but if ye will not hearken to the voice of Yahweh, but rebel against the commandment of Yahweh, then will the hand of Yahweh be against you, as it was against your fathers.12:16 Now therefore stand still and see this great thing, which Yahweh will do before your eyes.12:17 Is it not wheat harvest today?  I will call to Yahweh, that he may send thunder and rain; and ye shall know and see that your wickedness is great, which ye have done in the sight of Yahweh, in asking you a king.12:18 So Samuel called to Yahweh; and Yahweh sent thunder and rain that day: and all the people greatly feared Yahweh and Samuel.12:19 And all the people said to Samuel, Pray for your servants to Yahweh your God, that we die not; for we have added to all our sins this evil, to ask us a king.12:20 And Samuel said to the people, Fear not; ye have indeed done all this evil; yet turn not aside from following Yahweh, but serve Yahweh with all your heart:12:21 and turn ye not aside; for then would ye go after vain things which cannot profit nor deliver, for they are vain.12:22 For Yahweh will not forsake his people for his great name's sake, because it has pleased Yahweh to make you a people to himself.12:23 Moreover as for me, far be it from me that I should sin against Yahweh in ceasing to pray for you: but I will instruct you in the good and the right way.12:24 Only fear Yahweh, and serve him in truth with all your heart; for consider how great things he has done for you.12:25 But if ye shall still do wickedly, ye shall be consumed, both ye and your king.13:1 Saul was forty years old when he began to reign; and when he had reigned twenty-two years  over Israel,13:2 Saul chose him three thousand men of Israel, of whom two thousand were with Saul in Michmash and in the mount of Beth-el, and a thousand were with Jonathan in Gibeah of Benjamin: and the rest of the people he sent every man to his tent.13:3 And Jonathan defeated the garrison of the Philistines that was in Geba: and the Philistines heard of it.  And Saul blew the trumpet throughout all the land, saying, Let the Hebrews hear.13:4 And all Israel heard say that Saul had defeated the garrison of the Philistines, and also that Israel was held to be an abomination with the Philistines.  And the people were gathered together after Saul to Gilgal.13:5 And the Philistines assembled themselves together to fight with Israel, thirty thousand chariots, and six thousand horsemen, and people as the sand which is on the sea-shore in multitude: and they came up, and encamped in Michmash, eastward of Beth-aven.13:6 When the men of Israel saw that they were in a strait (for the people were distressed), then the people did hide themselves in caves, and in thickets, and in rocks, and in coverts, and in pits.13:7 Now some of the Hebrews had gone over the Jordan to the land of Gad and Gilead; but as for Saul, he was yet in Gilgal, and all the people followed him trembling.13:8 And he tarried seven days, according to the set time that Samuel had appointed: but Samuel came not to Gilgal; and the people were scattered from him.13:9 And Saul said, Bring here the burnt offering to me, and the peace offerings.  And he offered the burnt offering.13:10 And it came to pass that, as soon as he had made an end of offering the burnt offering, behold, Samuel came; and Saul went out to meet him, that he might salute him.13:11 And Samuel said, What have you done?  And Saul said, Because I saw that the people were scattered from me, and that you came not within the days appointed, and that the Philistines assembled themselves together at Michmash;13:12 therefore said I, Now will the Philistines come down upon me to Gilgal, and I have not entreated the favor of Yahweh: I forced myself therefore, and offered the burnt offering.13:13 And Samuel said to Saul, You have done foolishly; you have not kept the commandment of Yahweh your God, which he commanded you: for now would Yahweh have established your kingdom upon Israel for ever.13:14 But now your kingdom shall not continue: Yahweh has sought him a man after his own heart, and Yahweh has appointed him to be prince over his people, because you have not kept that which Yahweh commanded you.13:15 And Samuel arose, and got himself up from Gilgal to Gibeah of Benjamin.  And Saul numbered the people that were present with him, about six hundred men.13:16 And Saul, and Jonathan his son, and the people that were present with them, abode in Geba of Benjamin: but the Philistines encamped in Michmash.13:17 And the spoilers came out of the camp of the Philistines in three companies: one company turned to the way that leads to Ophrah, to the land of Shual;13:18 and another company turned the way to Beth-horon; and another company turned the way of the border that looks down upon the valley of Zeboim toward the wilderness.13:19 Now there was no blacksmith found throughout all the land of Israel; for the Philistines said, Lest the Hebrews make themselves swords or spears:13:20 but all the Israelites went down to the Philistines, to sharpen every man his plowshare, and his mattock, and his axe, and his sickle;13:21 and the charge was a pim for the plowshares and for the mattocks, and a half pim for the axes, and to set the goads.13:22 So it came to pass in the day of battle, that there was neither sword nor spear found in the hand of any of the people that were with Saul and Jonathan: only with Saul and with Jonathan his son was there found.13:23 And the garrison of the Philistines went out to the pass of Michmash.14:1 Now it fell upon a day, that Jonathan the son of Saul said to the young man that bore his armor, Come, and let us go over to the Philistines' garrison, that is on yonder side.  But he told not his father.14:2 And Saul abode in the uttermost part of Gibeah under the pomegranate-tree which is in Migron: and the people that were with him were about six hundred men;14:3 and Ahijah, the son of Ahitub, Ichabod's brother, the son of Phinehas, the son of Eli, the priest of Yahweh in Shiloh, wearing an ephod.  And the people knew not that Jonathan was gone.14:4 And between the passes, by which Jonathan sought to go over to the Philistines' garrison, there was a rocky crag on the one side, and a rocky crag on the other side: and the name of the one was Bozez, and the name of the other Seneh.14:5 The one crag rose up on the north in front of Michmash, and the other on the south in front of Geba.14:6 And Jonathan said to the young man that bore his armor, Come, and let us go over to the garrison of these uncircumcised: it may be that Yahweh will work for us; for there is no restraint to Yahweh to save by many or by few.14:7 And his armorbearer said to him, Do all that is in your heart: turn you, behold, I am with you according to your heart.14:8 Then said Jonathan, Behold, we will pass over to the men, and we will disclose ourselves to them.14:9 If they say thus to us, Tarry until we come to you; then we will stand still in our place, and will not go up to them.14:10 But if they say thus, Come up to us; then we will go up; for Yahweh has delivered them into our hand: and this shall be the sign to us.14:11 And both of them disclosed themselves to the garrison of the Philistines: and the Philistines said, Behold, the Hebrews come forth out of the holes where they had hid themselves.14:12 And the men of the garrison answered Jonathan and his armorbearer, and said, Come up to us, and we will show you a thing.  And Jonathan said to his armorbearer, Come up after me; for Yahweh has delivered them into the hand of Israel.14:13 And Jonathan climbed up upon his hands and upon his feet, and his armorbearer after him: and they fell before Jonathan; and his armorbearer slew them after him.14:14 And that first slaughter, which Jonathan and his armorbearer made, was about twenty men, within as it were half a furrow's length in an acre of land.14:15 And there was a trembling in the camp sent by God, in the field, and among all the people; the garrison. And the spoilers, they also trembled; and the earth quaked: such that there was an exceedingly great trembling.14:16 And the watchmen of Saul in Gibeah of Benjamin looked; and, behold, the multitude melted away, and they went here and there.14:17 Then said Saul to the people that were with him, Number now, and see who is gone from us.  And when they had numbered, behold, Jonathan and his armorbearer were not there.14:18 And Saul said to Ahijah, Bring here the ark of God.  For the ark of God was there at that time with the children of Israel.14:19 And it came to pass, while Saul talked to the priest, that the tumult that was in the camp of the Philistines went on and increased: and Saul said to the priest, Withdraw your hand.14:20 And Saul and all the people that were with him were gathered together, and came to the battle: and, behold, every man's sword was against his fellow, and there was a very great discomfiture.14:21 Now the Hebrews that were with the Philistines as beforetime, and that went up with them into the camp, from the country round about, even they also turned to be with the Israelites that were with Saul and Jonathan.14:22 Likewise all the men of Israel that had hid themselves in the hill-country of Ephraim, when they heard that the Philistines fled, even they also followed hard after them in the battle.14:23 So Yahweh saved Israel that day: and the battle passed over by Beth-aven.14:24 And the men of Israel were distressed that day; for Saul had adjured the people, saying, Cursed be the man that eats any food until it be evening, and I be avenged on my enemies.  So none of the people tasted food.14:25 And all the people came into the forest; and there was honey upon the ground.14:26 And when the people were come to the forest, behold, the honey dropped: but no man put his hand to his mouth; for the people feared the oath.14:27 But Jonathan heard not when his father charged the people with the oath: therefore he put forth the end of the rod that was in his hand, and dipped it in the honeycomb, and put his hand to his mouth; and his eyes were enlightened.14:28 Then answered one of the people, and said, Your father strictly charged the people with an oath, saying, Cursed be the man that eats food this day.  And the people were faint.14:29 Then said Jonathan, My father has troubled the land: see, I pray you, how my eyes have been enlightened, because I tasted a little of this honey.14:30 How much more, if haply the people had eaten freely today of the spoil of their enemies which they found?  for now has there been no great slaughter among the Philistines.14:31 And they smote of the Philistines that day from Michmash to Aijalon.  And the people were very faint;14:32 and the people flew upon the spoil, and took sheep, and oxen, and calves, and slew them on the ground; and the people did eat them with the blood.14:33 Then they told Saul, saying, Behold, the people sin against Yahweh, in that they eat with the blood.  And he said, ye have dealt treacherously: roll a great stone to me this day.14:34 And Saul said, Disperse yourselves among the people, and say to them, Bring me here every man his ox, and every man his sheep, and slay them here, and eat; and sin not against Yahweh in eating with the blood.  And all the people brought every man his ox with him that night, and slew them there.14:35 And Saul built an altar to Yahweh: the same was the first altar that he built to Yahweh.14:36 And Saul said, Let us go down after the Philistines by night, and take spoil among them until the morning light, and let us not leave a man of them.  And they said, Do whatsoever seems good to you.  Then said the priest, Let us draw near here to God.14:37 And Saul asked counsel of God, Shall I go down after the Philistines?  will you deliver them into the hand of Israel?  But he answered him not that day.14:38 And Saul said, Draw near here, all ye chiefs of the people; and know and see where it is this sin has been this day.14:39 For, as Yahweh lives, who saves Israel, though it be in Jonathan my son, he shall surely die.  But there was not a man among all the people that answered him.14:40 Then said he to all Israel, Be ye on one side, and I and Jonathan my son will be on the other side.  And the people said to Saul, Do what seems good to you.14:41 Therefore Saul said to Yahweh, the God of Israel, Show the right.  And Jonathan and Saul were taken by lot; but the people escaped.14:42 And Saul said, Cast lots between me and Jonathan my son.  And Jonathan was taken.14:43 Then Saul said to Jonathan, Tell me what you have done.  And Jonathan told him, and said, I did certainly taste a little honey with the end of the rod that was in my hand; and, lo, I must die.14:44 And Saul said, God do so and more also; for you shall surely die, Jonathan.14:45 And the people said to Saul, Shall Jonathan die, who has wrought this great salvation in Israel?  Far from it: as Yahweh lives, there shall not one hair of his head fall to the ground; for he has wrought with God this day.  So the people rescued Jonathan, that he died not.14:46 Then Saul went up from following the Philistines; and the Philistines went to their own place.14:47 Now when Saul had taken the kingdom over Israel, he fought against all his enemies on every side, against Moab, and against the children of Ammon, and against Edom, and against the kings of Zobah, and against the Philistines: and wherever he turned himself, he put them to the worse.14:48 And he did valiantly, and smote the Amalekites, and delivered Israel out of the hands of them that despoiled them.14:49 Now the sons of Saul were Jonathan, and Ishvi, and Malchishua; and the names of his two daughters were these: the name of the first-born Merab, and the name of the younger Michal:14:50 and the name of Saul's wife was Ahinoam the daughter of Ahimaaz.  And the name of the captain of his host was Abner the son of Ner, Saul's uncle.14:51 And Kish was the father of Saul; and Ner the father of Abner was the son of Abiel.14:52 And there was sore war against the Philistines all the days of Saul: and when Saul saw any mighty man, or any valiant man, he took him to him.15:1 And Samuel said to Saul, Yahweh sent me to anoint you to be king over his people, over Israel: now therefore hearken you to the voice of the words of Yahweh.15:2 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, I have marked that which Amalek did to Israel, how he set himself against him in the way, when he came up out of Egypt.15:3 Now go and attack Amalek, and utterly destroy all that they have, and spare them not; but slay both man and woman, infant and suckling, ox and sheep, camel and donkey.15:4 And Saul summoned the people, and numbered them in Telaim, two hundred thousand footmen, and ten thousand men of Judah.15:5 And Saul came to the city of Amalek, and laid wait in the valley.15:6 And Saul said to the Kenites, Go, depart, go down from among the Amalekites, lest I destroy you with them; for ye showed kindness to all the children of Israel, when they came up out of Egypt.  So the Kenites departed from among the Amalekites.15:7 And Saul smote the Amalekites, from Havilah as you go to Shur, that is before Egypt.15:8 And he took Agag the king of the Amalekites alive, and utterly destroyed all the people with the edge of the sword.15:9 But Saul and the people spared Agag, and the best of the sheep, and of the oxen, and of the fatlings, and the lambs, and all that was good, and would not utterly destroy them: but everything that was vile and refuse, that they destroyed utterly.15:10 Then came the word of Yahweh to Samuel, saying,15:11 It repents me that I have set up Saul to be king; for he is turned back from following me, and has not performed my commandments.  And Samuel was angry; and he cried to Yahweh all night.15:12 And Samuel rose early to meet Saul in the morning; and it was told Samuel, saying, Saul came to Carmel, and, behold, he set him up a monument, and turned, and passed on, and went down to Gilgal.15:13 And Samuel came to Saul; and Saul said to him, Blessed be you of Yahweh: I have performed the commandment of Yahweh.15:14 And Samuel said, What means then this bleating of the sheep in my ears, and the lowing of the oxen which I hear?15:15 And Saul said, They have brought them from the Amalekites: for the people spared the best of the sheep and of the oxen, to sacrifice to Yahweh your God; and the rest we have utterly destroyed.15:16 Then Samuel said to Saul, Stay, and I will tell you what Yahweh has said to me this night.  And he said to him, Say on.15:17 And Samuel said, Though you were little in your own sight, were you not made the head of the tribes of Israel?  And Yahweh anointed you king over Israel;15:18 and Yahweh sent you on a journey, and said, Go, and utterly destroy the sinners the Amalekites, and fight against them until they be consumed.15:19 Why then did you not obey the voice of Yahweh, but did fly upon the spoil, and did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh?15:20 And Saul said to Samuel, Yes, I have obeyed the voice of Yahweh, and have gone the way which Yahweh sent me, and have brought Agag the king of Amalek, and have utterly destroyed the Amalekites.15:21 But the people took of the spoil, sheep and oxen, the chief of the devoted things, to sacrifice to Yahweh your God in Gilgal.15:22 And Samuel said, Has Yahweh as great delight in burnt offerings and sacrifices, as in obeying the voice of Yahweh?  Behold, to obey is better than sacrifice, and to hearken than the fat of rams.15:23 For rebellion is as the sin of witchcraft, and stubbornness is as idolatry and teraphim.  Because you have rejected the word of Yahweh, he has also rejected you from being king.15:24 And Saul said to Samuel, I have sinned; for I have transgressed the commandment of Yahweh, and your words, because I feared the people, and obeyed their voice.15:25 Now therefore, I pray you, pardon my sin, and turn again with me, that I may worship Yahweh.15:26 And Samuel said to Saul, I will not return with you; for you have rejected the word of Yahweh, and Yahweh has rejected you from being king over Israel.15:27 And as Samuel turned about to go away, Saul laid hold upon the skirt of his robe, and it rent.15:28 And Samuel said to him, Yahweh has rent the kingdom of Israel from you this day, and has given it to a neighbor of yours, that is better than you.15:29 And also the Strength of Israel will not lie nor repent; for he is not a man, that he should repent.15:30 Then he said, I have sinned: yet honor me now, I pray you, before the elders of my people, and before Israel, and turn again with me, that I may worship Yahweh your God.15:31 So Samuel turned again after Saul; and Saul worshipped Yahweh.15:32 Then said Samuel, Bring ye here to me Agag the king of the Amalekites.  And Agag came to him cheerfully.  And Agag said, Surely the bitterness of death is past.15:33 And Samuel said, as your sword has made women childless, so shall your mother be childless among women.  And Samuel hewed Agag in pieces before Yahweh in Gilgal.15:34 Then Samuel went to Ramah; and Saul went up to his house to Gibeah of Saul.15:35 And Samuel came no more to see Saul until the day of his death; for Samuel mourned for Saul: and Yahweh repented that he had made Saul king over Israel.16:1 And Yahweh said to Samuel, How long will you mourn for Saul, seeing I have rejected him from being king over Israel?  fill your horn with oil, and go: I will send you to Jesse the Beth-lehemite; for I have provided me a king among his sons.16:2 And Samuel said, How can I go?  if Saul hear it, he will kill me.  And Yahweh said, Take a heifer with you, and say, I am come to sacrifice to Yahweh.16:3 And call Jesse to the sacrifice, and I will show you what you shall do: and you shall anoint to me him whom I name to you.16:4 And Samuel did that which Yahweh spoke, and came to Beth-lehem.  And the elders of the city came to meet him trembling, and said, Come you peaceably?16:5 And he said, Peaceably; I am come to sacrifice to Yahweh: sanctify yourselves, and come with me to the sacrifice.  And he sanctified Jesse and his sons, and called them to the sacrifice.16:6 And it came to pass, when they were come, that he looked on Eliab, and said, Surely Yahweh's anointed is before him.16:7 But Yahweh said to Samuel, Look not on his countenance, or on the height of his stature; because I have rejected him: for Yahweh sees not as man sees.  For man looks on the outward appearance, but Yahweh looks on the heart.16:8 Then Jesse called Abinadab, and made him pass before Samuel.  And he said, Neither has Yahweh chosen this.16:9 Then Jesse made Shammah pass by.  And he said, Neither has Yahweh chosen this one.16:10 And Jesse made seven of his sons pass before Samuel.  And Samuel said to Jesse, Yahweh has not chosen these.16:11 And Samuel said to Jesse, are all your children here?  And he said, There remains yet the youngest, and, behold, he is keeping the sheep.  And Samuel said to Jesse, Send and fetch him; for we will not sit down until he comes here.16:12 And he sent, and brought him in.  Now he was ruddy, and withal of a beautiful countenance, and goodly to look upon.  And Yahweh said, arise, anoint him; for this is he.16:13 Then Samuel took the horn of oil, and anointed him in the midst of his brethren: and the Spirit of Yahweh came mightily upon David from that day forward.  So Samuel rose up, and went to Ramah.16:14 Now the Spirit of Yahweh departed from Saul, and an evil spirit from Yahweh troubled him.16:15 And Saul's servants said to him, Behold now, an evil spirit from God troubles you.16:16 Let our lord now command your servants, that are before you, to seek out a man who is a skilful player on the harp: and it shall come to pass, when the evil spirit from God is upon you, that he shall play with his hand, and you shall be well.16:17 And Saul said to his servants, Provide me now a man that can play well, and bring him to me.16:18 Then one of the young men answered, and said, Behold, I have seen a son of Jesse the Beth-lehemite, that is skilful in playing, and a mighty man of valor, and a man of war, and prudent in speech, and a comely person; and Yahweh is with him.16:19 Wherefore Saul sent messengers to Jesse, and said, Send me David your son, who is with the sheep.16:20 And Jesse took a donkey loaded with bread, and a bottle of wine, and a kid, and sent them by David his son to Saul.16:21 And David came to Saul, and stood before him: and he loved him greatly; and he became his armorbearer.16:22 And Saul sent to Jesse, saying, Let David, I pray you, stand before me; for he has found favor in my sight.16:23 And it came to pass, when the evil spirit from God was upon Saul, that David took the harp, and played with his hand: so Saul was refreshed, and was well, and the evil spirit departed from him.17:1 Now the Philistines gathered together their armies to battle; and they were gathered together at Socoh, which belongs to Judah, and encamped between Socoh and Azekah, in Ephes-dammim.17:2 And Saul and the men of Israel were gathered together, and encamped in the valley of Elah, and set the battle in array against the Philistines.17:3 And the Philistines stood on the mountain on the one side, and Israel stood on the mountain on the other side: and there was a valley between them.17:4 And there went out a champion out of the camp of the Philistines, named Goliath, of Gath, whose height was six cubits and a span.17:5 And he had a helmet of brass upon his head, and he was clad with a coat of mail; and the weight of the coat was five thousand shekels of brass.17:6 And he had greaves of brass upon his legs, and a javelin of brass between his shoulders.17:7 And the staff of his spear was like a weaver's beam; and his spear's head weighed six hundred shekels of iron: and his shield-bearer went before him.17:8 And he stood and cried to the armies of Israel, and said to them, Why are ye come out to set your battle in array?  am not I a Philistine, and ye servants to Saul?  Choose yourselves a man, and let him come down to me.17:9 If he is able to fight with me, and kill me, then we will be your servants; but if I prevail against him, and kill him, then shall ye be our servants, and serve us.17:10 And the Philistine said, I defy the armies of Israel this day; give me a man, so we may fight together.17:11 And when Saul and all Israel heard those words of the Philistine, they were dismayed, and greatly afraid.17:12 Now David was the son of that Ephrathite of Beth-lehem-judah, whose name was Jesse; and he had eight sons: and the man was an old man in the days of Saul, stricken in years among men.17:13 And the three eldest sons of Jesse had gone after Saul to the battle: and the names of his three sons that went to the battle were Eliab the first-born, and next to him Abinadab, and the third Shammah.17:14 And David was the youngest; and the three eldest followed Saul.17:15 Now David went back and forth from Saul to feed his father's sheep at Bethlehem.17:16 And the Philistine drew near morning and evening, and presented himself forty days.17:17 And Jesse said to David his son, Take now for your brethren an ephah of this parched grain, and these ten loaves, and carry them quickly to the camp to your brethren;17:18 and bring these ten cheeses to the captain of their thousand, and look how your brethren fare, and take their pledge.17:19 Now Saul, and they, and all the men of Israel, were in the valley of Elah, fighting with the Philistines.17:0 And David rose up early in the morning, and left the sheep with a keeper, and took, and went, as Jesse had commanded him; and he came to the place of the wagons, as the host which was going forth to the fight shouted for the battle.17:21 And Israel and the Philistines put the battle in array, army against army.17:22 And David left his baggage in the hand of the keeper of the baggage, and ran to the army, and came and saluted his brethren.17:23 And as he talked with them, behold, there came up the champion, the Philistine of Gath, Goliath by name, out of the ranks of the Philistines, and spoke according to the same words: and David heard them.17:24 And all the men of Israel, when they saw the man, fled from him, and were sore afraid.17:25 And the men of Israel said, Have ye seen this man that is come up?  surely to defy Israel is he come up: and it shall be, that the man who kills him, the king will enrich him with great riches, and will give him his daughter, and make his father's house free in Israel.17:26 And David spoke to the men that stood by him, saying, What shall be done to the man that kills this Philistine, and takes away the reproach from Israel?  for who is this uncircumcised Philistine, that he should defy the armies of the living God?17:27 And the people answered him after this manner, saying, So shall it be done to the man that kills him.17:28 And Eliab his eldest brother heard when he spoke to the men; and Eliab's anger was kindled against David, and he said, Why are you come down?  and with whom have you left those few sheep in the wilderness?  I know your pride, and the naughtiness of your heart; for you are come down that you might see the battle.17:29 And David said, What have I now done?  Is there not a cause?17:30 And he turned away from him toward another, and spoke after the same manner: and the people answered him again after the former manner.17:31 And when the words were heard which David spoke, they rehearsed them before Saul; and he sent for him.17:32 And David said to Saul, Let no man's heart fail because of him; your servant will go and fight with this Philistine.17:33 And Saul said to David, You are not able to go against this Philistine to fight with him; for you are but a youth, and he a man of war from his youth.17:34 And David said to Saul, Your servant was keeping his father's sheep; and when there came a lion, or a bear, and took a lamb out of the flock,17:35 I went out after him, and smote him, and delivered it out of his mouth; and when he arose against me, I caught him by his beard, and smote him, and slew him.17:36 Your servant smote both the lion and the bear: and this uncircumcised Philistine shall be as one of them, seeing he has defied the armies of the living God.17:37 And David said, Yahweh that delivered me out of the paw of the lion, and out of the paw of the bear, he will deliver me out of the hand of this Philistine.  And Saul said to David, Go, and Yahweh shall be with you.17:38 And Saul clad David with his apparel, and he put a helmet of brass upon his head, and he clad him with a coat of mail.17:39 And David girded his sword upon his apparel, and he assayed to go; for he had not proved it.  And David said to Saul, I cannot go with these; for I have not proved them.  And David put them off him.17:40 And he took his staff in his hand, and chose him five smooth stones out of the brook, and put them in the shepherd's bag which he had, even in his wallet; and his sling was in his hand: and he drew near to the Philistine.17:41 And the Philistine came on and drew near to David; and the man that carried the shield went before him.17:42 And when the Philistine looked around, and saw David, he disdained him; for he was but a youth, and ruddy, and fairly handsome in appearance.17:43 And the Philistine said to David, am I a dog, that you come to me with sticks?  And the Philistine cursed David by his gods.17:44 And the Philistine said to David, Come near me, and I will give your flesh to the birds of the heavens, and to the beasts of the field.17:45 Then said David to the Philistine, You come to me with a sword, and with a spear, and with a javelin: but I come to you in the name of Yahweh of hosts, the God of the armies of Israel, whom you have defied.17:46 This day will Yahweh deliver you into my hand; and I will strike you down, and take your head off of you; and I will give the dead bodies of the army of the Philistines this day to the birds of the heavens, and to the wild beasts of the earth; that all the earth may know that there is a God in Israel,17:47 and that all this assembly may know that Yahweh saves not with sword and spear: for the battle is Yahweh's, and he will give you into our hand.17:48 And it came to pass, when the Philistine arose, and came and drew near to meet David, that David ran quickly toward the army, to meet the Philistine.17:49 And David put his hand in his bag, and took there a stone, and slung it, and struck the Philistine in his forehead; and the stone sank into his forehead, and he fell on his face to the earth.17:50 Thus David prevailed over the Philistine with a sling and with a stone, and struck down the Philistine, and killed him, though there was no sword in the hand of David.17:51 Then David ran, and stood over the Philistine, and took his sword and drew it out of its sheath, and killed him, and cut off his head with it.  And when the Philistines saw that their champion was dead, they fled.17:52 And the men of Israel and of Judah arose, and shouted, and pursued the Philistines, until you come to Gai, and to the gates of Ekron.  And the wounded of the Philistines fell down by the way to Shaaraim, even to Gath, and to Ekron.17:53 And the children of Israel returned from chasing after the Philistines, and they plundered their camp.17:54 And David took the head of the Philistine, and brought it to Jerusalem; but he put his armor in his tent.17:55 And when Saul saw David go forth against the Philistine, he said to Abner, the captain of the host, abner, whose son is this youth?  And Abner said, as your soul lives, O king, I cannot tell.17:56 And the king said, Inquire you whose son the stripling is.17:57 And as David returned from the slaughter of the Philistine, abner took him, and brought him before Saul with the head of the Philistine in his hand.17:58 And Saul said to him, Whose son are you, you young man?  And David answered, I am the son of your servant Jesse the Beth-lehemite.18:1 And it came to pass, when he had made an end of speaking to Saul, that the soul of Jonathan was knit with the soul of David, and Jonathan loved him as his own soul.18:2 And Saul took him that day, and would let him go no more home to his father's house.18:3 Then Jonathan and David made a covenant, because he loved him as his own soul.18:4 And Jonathan stripped himself of the robe that was upon him, and gave it to David, and his apparel, even to his sword, and to his bow, and to his girdle.18:5 And David went out wherever Saul sent him, and behaved himself wisely: and Saul set him over the men of war, and it was good in the sight of all the people, and also in the sight of Saul's servants.18:6 And it came to pass as they came, when David returned from the slaughter of the Philistine, that the women came out of all the cities of Israel, singing and dancing, to meet king Saul, with timbrels, with joy, and with instruments of music.18:7 And the women sang one to another as they played, and said, Saul has slain his thousands, and David his ten thousands.18:8 And Saul was very angry, and this saying displeased him; and he said, They have ascribed to David ten thousands, and to me they have ascribed but thousands: and what can he have more but the kingdom?18:9 And Saul eyed David from that day and forward.18:10 And it came to pass on the morrow, that an evil spirit from God came mightily upon Saul, and he prophesied in the midst of the house: and David played with his hand, as he did day by day.  And Saul had his spear in his hand;18:11 and Saul cast the spear; for he said, I will smite David even to the wall.  And David avoided out of his presence twice.18:12 And Saul was afraid of David, because Yahweh was with him, and was departed from Saul.18:13 Therefore Saul removed him from him, and made him his captain over a thousand; and he went out and came in before the people.18:14 And David behaved himself wisely in all his ways; and Yahweh was with him.18:15 And when Saul saw that he behaved himself very wisely, he stood in awe of him.18:16 But all Israel and Judah loved David; for he went out and came in before them.18:17 And Saul said to David, Behold, my elder daughter Merab, her will I give you to wife: only be you valiant for me, and fight Yahweh's battles.  For Saul said, Let not my hand be upon him, but let the hand of the Philistines be upon him.18:18 And David said to Saul, Who am I, and what is my life, or my father's family in Israel, that I should be son-in-law to the king?18:19 But it came to pass at the time when Merab, Saul's daughter, should have been given to David, that she was given to Adriel the Meholathite to wife.18:20 And Michal, Saul's daughter, loved David: and they told Saul, and the thing pleased him.18:21 And Saul said, I will give him her, that she may be a snare to him, and that the hand of the Philistines may be against him.  Wherefore Saul said to David, You shall this day be my son-in-law a second time.18:22 And Saul commanded his servants, saying, Commune with David secretly, and say, Behold, the king has delight in you, and all his servants love you: now therefore be the king's son-in-law.18:23 And Saul's servants spoke those words in the ears of David.  And David said, Seems it to you a light thing to be the king's son-in-law, seeing that I am a poor man, and lightly esteemed?18:24 And the servants of Saul told him, saying, On this manner spoke David.18:25 And Saul said, Thus shall ye say to David, The king desires not any dowry, but a hundred foreskins of the Philistines, to be avenged of the king's enemies.  Now Saul thought to make David fall by the hand of the Philistines.18:26 And when his servants told David these words, it pleased David well to be the king's son-in-law.  And the days were not expired;18:27 and David arose and went, he and his men, and slew of the Philistines two hundred men; and David brought their foreskins, and they gave them in full number to the king, that he might be the king's son-in-law.  And Saul gave him Michal his daughter to wife.18:28 And Saul saw and knew that Yahweh was with David; and Michal, Saul's daughter, loved him.18:29 And Saul was yet the more afraid of David; and Saul was David's enemy continually.18:30 Then the princes of the Philistines went forth: and it came to pass, as often as they went forth, that David behaved himself more wisely than all the servants of Saul; so that his name was much set by.19:1 And Saul spoke to Jonathan his son, and to all his servants, that they should slay David.  But Jonathan, Saul's son, delighted much in David.19:2 And Jonathan told David, saying, Saul my father seeks to slay you: now therefore, I pray you, take heed to yourself in the morning, and abide in a secret place, and hide yourself:19:3 and I will go out and stand beside my father in the field where you are, and I will commune with my father of you; and if I see anything, I will tell you.19:4 And Jonathan spoke good of David to Saul his father, and said to him, Let not the king sin against his servant, against David; because he has not sinned against you, and because his works have been to you-ward very good:19:5 for he put his life in his hand, and smote the Philistine, and Yahweh wrought a great victory for all Israel: you saw it, and did rejoice; why then will you sin against innocent blood, to slay David without a cause?19:6 And Saul hearkened to the voice of Jonathan: and Saul swore, as Yahweh lives, he shall not be put to death.19:7 And Jonathan called David, and Jonathan showed him all those things.  And Jonathan brought David to Saul, and he was in his presence, as beforetime.19:8 And there was war again: and David went out, and fought with the Philistines, and slew them with a great slaughter; and they fled before him.19:9 And an evil spirit from Yahweh was upon Saul, as he sat in his house with his spear in his hand; and David was playing with his hand.19:10 And Saul sought to smite David even to the wall with the spear; but he slipped away out of Saul's presence, and he smote the spear into the wall: and David fled, and escaped that night.19:11 And Saul sent messengers to David's house, to watch him, and to slay him in the morning: and Michal, David's wife, told him, saying, If you save not your life to-night, tomorrow you will be slain.19:12 So Michal let David down through the window: and he went, and fled, and escaped.19:13 And Michal took the teraphim, and laid it in the bed, and put a pillow of goats' hair at the head thereof, and covered it with the clothes.19:14 And when Saul sent messengers to take David, she said, He is sick.19:15 And Saul sent the messengers to see David, saying, Bring him up to me in the bed, that I may slay him.19:16 And when the messengers came in, behold, the teraphim was in the bed, with the pillow of goats' hair at the head thereof.19:17 And Saul said to Michal, Why have you deceived me thus, and let my enemy go, so that he is escaped?  And Michal answered Saul, He said to me, Let me go; why should I kill you?19:18 Now David fled, and escaped, and came to Samuel to Ramah, and told him all that Saul had done to him.  And he and Samuel went and dwelt in Naioth.19:19 And it was told Saul, saying, Behold, David is at Naioth in Ramah.19:20 And Saul sent messengers to take David: and when they saw the company of the prophets prophesying, and Samuel standing as head over them, the Spirit of God came upon the messengers of Saul, and they also prophesied.19:21 And when it was told Saul, he sent other messengers, and they also prophesied.  And Saul sent messengers again the third time, and they also prophesied.19:22 Then went he also to Ramah, and came to the great well that is in Secu: and he asked and said, Where are Samuel and David?  And one said, Behold, they are at Naioth in Ramah.19:23 And he went there to Naioth in Ramah: and the Spirit of God came upon him also, and he went on, and prophesied, until he came to Naioth in Ramah.19:24 And he also stripped off his clothes, and he also prophesied before Samuel, and lay down naked all that day and all that night.  Wherefore they say, Is Saul also among the prophets?20:1 And David fled from Naioth in Ramah, and came and said before Jonathan, What have I done?  what is my iniquity?  and what is my sin before your father, that he seeks my life?20:2 And he said to him, Far from it; you shall not die: behold, my father does nothing either great or small, but that he discloses it to me; and why should my father hide this thing from me?  it is not so.20:3 And David swore moreover, and said, Your father knows well that I have found favor in your eyes; and he says, Let not Jonathan know this, lest he be grieved: but truly as Yahweh lives, and as your soul lives, there is but a step between me and death.20:4 Then said Jonathan to David, Whatsoever your soul desires, I will even do it for you.20:5 And David said to Jonathan, Behold, tomorrow is the new moon, and I should not fail to sit with the king at meat: but let me go, that I may hide myself in the field to the third day at even.20:6 If your father miss me at all, then say, David earnestly asked leave of me that he might run to Beth-lehem his city; for it is the yearly sacrifice there for all the family.20:7 If he say thus, It is well; your servant shall have peace: but if he be angry, then know that evil is determined by him.20:8 Therefore deal kindly with your servant; for you have brought your servant into a covenant of Yahweh with you: but if there be in me iniquity, slay me yourself; for why should you bring me to your father?20:9 And Jonathan said, Far be it from you; for if I should at all know that evil were determined by my father to come upon you, then would not I tell it to you?20:10 Then said David to Jonathan, Who shall tell me if perchance your father answer you roughly?20:11 And Jonathan said to David, Come, and let us go out into the field.  And they went out both of them into the field.20:12 And Jonathan said to David, Yahweh, the God of Israel, be witness: when I have sounded my father about this time tomorrow, or the third day, behold, if there be good toward David, shall I not then send to you, and disclose it to you?20:13 Yahweh do so to Jonathan, and more also, should it please my father to do you evil, if I disclose it not to you, and send you away, that you may go in peace: and Yahweh be with you, as he has been with my father.20:14 And you shall not only while yet I live show me the lovingkindness of Yahweh, that I die not;20:15 but also you shall not cut off your kindness from my house for ever; no, not when Yahweh has cut off the enemies of David every one from the face of the earth.20:16 So Jonathan made a covenant with the house of David, saying, and Yahweh will require it at the hand of David's enemies.20:17 And Jonathan caused David to swear again, for the love that he had to him; for he loved him as he loved his own soul.20:18 Then Jonathan said to him, Tomorrow is the new moon: and you will be missed, because your seat will be empty.20:19 And when you have stayed three days, you shall go down quickly, and come to the place where you did hide yourself when the business was in hand, and shall remain by the stone Ezel.20:20 And I will shoot three arrows on the side thereof, as though I shot at a mark.20:21 And, behold, I will send the lad, saying, Go, find the arrows.  If I say to the lad, Behold, the arrows are on this side of you; take them, and come; for there is peace to you and no hurt, as Yahweh lives.20:22 But if I say thus to the boy, Behold, the arrows are beyond you; go your way; for Yahweh has sent you away.20:23 And as touching the matter which you and I have spoken of, behold, Yahweh is between you and me for ever.20:24 So David hid himself in the field: and when the new moon was come, the king sat him down to eat food.20:25 And the king sat upon his seat, as at other times, even upon the seat by the wall; and Jonathan stood up, and Abner sat by Saul's side: but David's place was empty.20:26 Nevertheless Saul spoke not anything that day: for he thought, Something has befallen him, he is not clean; surely he is not clean.20:27 And it came to pass on the morrow after the new moon, which was the second day, that David's place was empty: and Saul said to Jonathan his son, Why does the son of Jesse not come to the meal, either yesterday or today?20:28 And Jonathan answered Saul, David earnestly asked leave of me to go to Beth-lehem:20:29 and he said, Let me go, I pray you; for our family has a sacrifice in the city; and my brother, he has commanded me to be there: and now, if I have found favor in your eyes, let me get away, I pray you, and see my brethren.  This is why he is not come to the king's table.20:30 Then Saul's anger was kindled against Jonathan, and he said to him, You son of a perverse rebellious woman, do I not know that you have chosen the son of Jesse to your own shame, and to the shame of your mother's nakedness?20:31 Because you see, as long as the son of Jesse lives upon the earth, you shall not be established, nor your kingdom.  Therefore send now and fetch him to me, for he shall surely die.20:32 And Jonathan answered Saul his father, and said to him, Why should he be put to death?  what has he done?20:33 And Saul cast his spear at him to strike him; whereby Jonathan knew that it was determined by his father to put David to death.20:34 So Jonathan arose from the table in fierce anger, and did eat no food the second day of the month; for he was grieved for David, because his father had done him shame.20:35 And it came to pass in the morning, that Jonathan went out into the field at the time appointed with David, and a little lad with him.20:36 And he said to his lad, Run, find now the arrows which I shoot.  And as the lad ran, he shot an arrow beyond him.20:37 And when the lad was come to the place of the arrow which Jonathan had shot, Jonathan cried after the lad, and said, Is not the arrow beyond you?20:38 And Jonathan cried after the lad, Make speed, haste, stay not.  And Jonathan's lad gathered up the arrows, and came to his master.20:39 But the lad knew not anything: only Jonathan and David knew the matter.20:40 And Jonathan gave his weapons to his lad, and said to him, Go, carry them to the city.20:41 And as soon as the lad was gone, David arose out of a place toward the South, and fell on his face to the ground, and bowed himself three times: and they kissed one another, and wept one with another, until David exceeded.20:42 And Jonathan said to David, Go in peace, forasmuch as we have sworn both of us in the name of Yahweh, saying, Yahweh shall be between me and you, and between my seed and your seed, for ever.  And he arose and departed: and Jonathan went into the city.21:1 Then came David to Nob to Ahimelech the priest: and Ahimelech came to meet David trembling, and said to him, Why are you alone, and no man with you?21:2 And David said to Ahimelech the priest, The king has commanded me a business, and has said to me, Let no man know anything of the business whereabout I send you, and what I have commanded you: and I have appointed the young men to such and such a place.21:3 Now therefore what is under your hand?  give me five loaves of bread in my hand, or whatsoever there is present.21:4 And the priest answered David, and said, There is no common bread under my hand, but there is holy bread; if only the young men have kept themselves from women.21:5 And David answered the priest, and said to him, Of a truth women have been kept from us about these three days; when I came out, the vessels of the young men were holy, though it was but a common journey; how much more then today shall their vessels be holy?21:6 So the priest gave him holy bread; for there was no bread there but the showbread, that was taken from before Yahweh, to put hot bread in the day when it was taken away.21:7 Now a certain man of the servants of Saul was there that day, detained before Yahweh; and his name was Doeg the Edomite, the chiefest of the herdsmen that belonged to Saul.21:8 And David said to Ahimelech, and is there not here under your hand spear or sword?  for I have neither brought my sword nor my weapons with me, because the king's business required haste.21:9 And the priest said, The sword of Goliath the Philistine, whom you slew in the valley of Elah, behold, it is here wrapped in a cloth behind the ephod: if you will take that, take it; for there is no other but that here.  And David said, There is none like that; give it to me.21:10 And David arose, and fled that day for fear of Saul, and went to Achish the king of Gath.21:11 And the servants of Achish said to him, Is not this David the king of the land?  did they not sing one to another of him in dances, saying, Saul has slain his thousands, and David his ten thousands?21:12 And David laid up these words in his heart, and was sore afraid of Achish the king of Gath.21:13 And while in their hands he changed his behavior before them, and pretended to be insane, and scribbled on the doors of the gate, and let his saliva fall down onto his beard.21:14 Then said Achish to his servants, Lo, ye see the man is mad; why then have ye brought him to me?21:15 Do I lack madmen, that ye have brought this fellow to play the madman in my presence?  shall this fellow come into my house?22:1 David therefore departed there, and escaped to the cave of Adullam: and when his brethren and all his father's house heard it, they went down there to him.22:2 And every one that was in distress, and every one that was in debt, and every one that was discontented, gathered themselves to him; and he became captain over them: and there were with him about four hundred men.22:3 And David went there to Mizpeh of Moab: and he said to the king of Moab, Let my father and my mother, I pray you, come forth, and be with you, till I know what God will do for me.22:4 And he brought them before the king of Moab: and they dwelt with him all the while that David was in the stronghold.22:5 And the prophet Gad said to David, abide not in the stronghold; depart, and go into the land of Judah.  Then David departed, and came into the forest of Hereth.22:6 And Saul heard that David was discovered, and the men that were with him: now Saul was sitting in Gibeah, under the tamarisk-tree in Ramah, with his spear in his hand, and all his servants were standing about him.22:7 And Saul said to his servants that stood about him, Hear now, ye Benjamites; will the son of Jesse give every one of you fields and vineyards, will he make you all captains of thousands and captains of hundreds,22:8 that all of you have conspired against me, and there is none that discloses to me when my son makes a league with the son of Jesse, and there is none of you that is sorry for me, or discloses to me that my son has stirred up my servant against me, to lie in wait, as at this day?22:9 Then answered Doeg the Edomite, who stood by the servants of Saul, and said, I saw the son of Jesse coming to Nob, to Ahimelech the son of Ahitub.22:10 And he inquired of Yahweh for him, and gave him victuals, and gave him the sword of Goliath the Philistine.22:11 Then the king sent to call Ahimelech the priest, the son of Ahitub, and all his father's house, the priests that were in Nob: and they came all of them to the king.22:12 And Saul said, Hear now, you son of Ahitub.  And he answered, Here I am, my lord.22:13 And Saul said to him, Why have ye conspired against me, you and the son of Jesse, in that you have given him bread, and a sword, and have inquired of God for him, that he should rise against me, to lie in wait, as at this day?22:14 Then Ahimelech answered the king, and said, and who among all your servants is so faithful as David, who is the king's son-in-law, and is taken into your council, and is honorable in your house?22:15 Have I today begun to inquire of God for him?  be it far from me: let not the king impute anything to his servant, nor to all the house of my father; for your servant knows nothing of all this, less or more.22:16 And the king said, You shall surely die, ahimelech, you, and all your father's house.22:17 And the king said to the guard that stood about him, Turn, and slay the priests of Yahweh; because their hand also is with David, and because they knew that he fled, and did not disclose it to me.  But the servants of the king would not put forth their hand to fall upon the priests of Yahweh.22:18 And the king said to Doeg, Turn you, and fall upon the priests.  And Doeg the Edomite turned, and he fell upon the priests, and he slew on that day 85 persons that did wear a linen ephod.22:19 And Nob, the city of the priests, smote he with the edge of the sword, both men and women, children and sucklings, and oxen and asses and sheep, with the edge of the sword.22:20 And one of the sons of Ahimelech, the son of Ahitub, named Abiathar, escaped, and fled after David.22:21 And Abiathar told David that Saul had slain Yahweh's priests.22:22 And David said to Abiathar, I knew on that day, when Doeg the Edomite was there, that he would surely tell Saul: I have occasioned the death of all the persons of your father's house.22:23 Abide you with me, fear not; for he that seeks my life seeks your life: for with me you shall be in safeguard.23:1 And they told David, saying, Behold, the Philistines are fighting against Keilah, and are robbing the threshing-floors.23:2 Therefore David inquired of Yahweh, saying, Shall I go and smite these Philistines?  And Yahweh said to David, Go, and smite the Philistines, and save Keilah.23:3 And David's men said to him, Behold, we are afraid here in Judah: how much more then if we go to Keilah against the armies of the Philistines?23:4 Then David inquired of Yahweh yet again.  And Yahweh answered him, and said, arise, go down to Keilah; for I will deliver the Philistines into your hand.23:5 And David and his men went to Keilah, and fought with the Philistines, and brought away their cattle, and slew them with a great slaughter.  So David save the inhabitants of Keilah.23:6 And it came to pass, when Abiathar the son of Ahimelech fled to David to Keilah, that he came down with an ephod in his hand.23:7 And it was told Saul that David was come to Keilah.  And Saul said, God has delivered him into my hand; for he is shut in, by entering into a town that has gates and bars.23:8 And Saul summoned all the people to war, to go down to Keilah, to besiege David and his men.23:9 And David knew that Saul was devising mischief against him; and he said to Abiathar the priest, Bring here the ephod.23:10 Then said David, O Yahweh, the God of Israel, your servant has surely heard that Saul seeks to come to Keilah, to destroy the city for my sake.23:11 Will the men of Keilah deliver me up into his hand?  will Saul come down, as your servant has heard?  O Yahweh, the God of Israel, I beseech you, tell your servant.  And Yahweh said, He will come down.23:12 Then said David, Will the men of Keilah deliver up to me and my men into the hand of Saul?  And Yahweh said, They will deliver you up.23:13 Then David and his men, who were about six hundred, arose and departed out of Keilah, and went wherever they could go.  And it was told Saul that David was escaped from Keilah; and he forbare to go forth.23:14 And David abode in the wilderness in the strongholds, and remained in the hill-country in the wilderness of Ziph.  And Saul sought him every day, but God delivered him not into his hand.23:15 And David saw that Saul was come out to seek his life: and David was in the wilderness of Ziph in the wood.23:16 And Jonathan, Saul's son, arose, and went to David into the wood, and strengthened his hand in God.23:17 And he said to him, Fear not; for the hand of Saul my father shall not find you; and you shall be king over Israel, and I shall be next to you; and that also Saul my father knows.23:18 And they two made a covenant before Yahweh: and David abode in the wood, and Jonathan went to his house.23:19 Then came up the Ziphites to Saul to Gibeah, saying, Does not David hide himself with us in the strongholds in the wood, in the hill of Hachilah, which is on the south of the desert?23:20 Now therefore, O king, come down, according to all the desire of your soul to come down; and our part shall be to deliver him up into the king's hand.23:21 And Saul said, Blessed be ye of Yahweh; for ye have had compassion on me.23:22 Go, I pray you, make yet more sure, and know and see his place where his haunt is, and who has seen him there; for it is told me that he deals very subtly.23:23 See therefore, and take knowledge of all the lurking-places where he hides himself, and come ye again to me of a certainty, and I will go with you: and it shall come to pass, if he be in the land, that I will search him out among all the thousands of Judah.23:24 And they arose, and went to Ziph before Saul: but David and his men were in the wilderness of Maon, in the Arabah on the south of the desert.23:25 And Saul and his men went to seek him.  And they told David: therefore he came down to the rock, and abode in the wilderness of Maon.  And when Saul heard that, he pursued after David in the wilderness of Maon.23:26 And Saul went on this side of the mountain, and David and his men on that side of the mountain: and David made haste to get away for fear of Saul; for Saul and his men surrounded David and his men round about to take them.23:27 But there came a messenger to Saul, saying, Make haste, and come; for the Philistines have made a raid upon the land.23:28 So Saul returned from pursuing after David, and went against the Philistines: therefore they called that place Sela-hammahlekoth.23:29 And David went up from there, and dwelt in the strongholds of En-gedi.24:1 And it came to pass, when Saul was returned from following the Philistines, that it was told him, saying, Behold, David is in the wilderness of En-gedi.24:2 Then Saul took three thousand chosen men out of all Israel, and went to seek David and his men upon the rocks of the wild goats.24:3 And he came to the pastures by the way, where was a cave; and Saul went in to relieve himself.  Now David and his men were abiding in the innermost parts of the cave.24:4 And the men of David said to him, Behold, the day of which Yahweh said to you, Behold, I will deliver your enemy into your hand, and you shall do to him as it shall seem good to you.  Then David arose, and cut off the skirt of Saul's robe stealthily.24:5 And it came to pass afterward, that David's heart smote him, because he had cut off Saul's skirt.24:6 And he said to his men, Yahweh forbid that I should do this thing to my lord, Yahweh's anointed, to put forth my hand against him, seeing he is Yahweh's anointed.24:7 So David checked his men with these words, and did not allow them to rise against Saul.  And Saul rose up out of the cave, and went on his way.24:8 David also arose afterward, and went out of the cave, and cried after Saul, saying, My lord the king.  And when Saul looked behind him, David bowed with his face to the earth, and did obeisance.24:9 And David said to Saul, Why do you take heed to men's words, when they say, Behold, David seeks your hurt?24:10 Behold, this day your eyes have seen how that Yahweh had delivered you today into my hand in the cave: and some told me to kill you; but my eye spared you; and I said, I will not put forth my hand against my lord; for he is Yahweh's anointed.24:11 Moreover, my father, see, indeed, see the skirt of your robe in my hand; for in that I cut off the skirt of your robe, and did not kill you, know you and see that there is neither evil nor transgression in my hand, and I have not sinned against you, though you hunt after my life to take it.24:12 Yahweh judge between me and you, and Yahweh avenge me of you; but my hand shall not be upon you.24:13 As the proverb of the ancients says, Out of the wicked comes forth wickedness; but my hand shall not be upon you.24:14 After whom is the king of Israel come out?  after whom do you pursue?  after a dead dog, after a flea.24:15 Yahweh therefore be judge, and give sentence between me and you, and see, and plead my cause, and deliver me out of your hand.24:16 And it came to pass, when David had made an end of speaking these words to Saul, that Saul said, Is this your voice, my son David?  And Saul lifted up his voice, and wept.24:17 And he said to David, You are more righteous than I; for you have rendered to me good, whereas I have rendered to you evil.24:18 And you have declared this day how that you have dealt well with me, forasmuch as when Yahweh had delivered me up into your hand, you killed me not.24:19 For if a man finds his enemy, will he let him go well away?  therefore may Yahweh reward you good for that which you have done to me this day.24:20 And now, behold, I know that you shall surely be king, and that the kingdom of Israel shall be established in your hand.24:21 Swear now therefore to me by Yahweh, that you will not cut off my seed after me, and that you will not destroy my name out of my father's house.24:22 And David swore to Saul.  And Saul went home; but David and his men gat them up to the stronghold.25:1 And Samuel died; and all Israel gathered themselves together, and lamented him, and buried him in his house at Ramah.  And David arose, and went down to the wilderness of Paran.25:2 And there was a man in Maon, whose possessions were in Carmel; and the man was very great, and he had three thousand sheep, and a thousand goats: and he was shearing his sheep in Carmel.25:3 Now the name of the man was Nabal; and the name of his wife Abigail; and the woman was of good understanding, and of a beautiful countenance: but the man was churlish and evil in his doings; and he was of the house of Caleb.25:4 And David heard in the wilderness that Nabal was shearing his sheep.25:5 And David sent ten young men, and David said to the young men, Get you up to Carmel, and go to Nabal, and greet him in my name:25:6 and thus shall ye say to him that lives in prosperity, Peace be to you, and peace be to your house, and peace be to all that you have.25:7 And now I have heard that you have shearers: your shepherds have now been with us, and we did them no hurt, neither was there anything missing to them, all the while they were in Carmel.25:8 Ask your young men, and they will tell you: therefore let the young men find favor in your eyes; for we come in a good day: give, I pray you, whatsoever comes to your hand, to your servants, and to your son David.25:9 And when David's young men came, they spoke to Nabal according to all those words in the name of David, and ceased.25:10 And Nabal answered David's servants, and said, Who is David?  and who is the son of Jesse?  there are many servants now-a-days that break away every man from his master.25:11 Shall I then take my bread, and my water, and my flesh that I have killed for my shearers, and give it to men of whom I know not from where they are?25:12 So David's young men turned on their way, and went back, and came and told him according to all these words.25:13 And David said to his men, Gird ye on every man his sword.  And they girded on every man his sword; and David also girded on his sword: and there went up after David about four hundred men; and two hundred abode by the baggage.25:14 But one of the young men told Abigail, Nabal's wife, saying, Behold, David sent messengers out of the wilderness to salute our master; and he railed at them.25:15 But the men were very good to us, and we were not hurt, neither missed we anything, as long as we went with them, when we were in the fields:25:16 they were a wall to us both by night and by day, all the while we were with them keeping the sheep.25:17 Now therefore know and consider what you will do; for evil is determined against our master, and against all his house: for he is such a worthless fellow, that one cannot speak to him.25:18 Then Abigail made haste, and took two hundred loaves, and two bottles of wine, and five sheep ready dressed, and five measures of parched grain, and a hundred clusters of raisins, and two hundred cakes of figs, and laid them on asses.25:19 And she said to her young men, Go on before me; behold, I come after you.  But she told not her husband Nabal.25:20 And it was so, as she rode on her donkey, and came down by the covert of the mountain, that, behold, David and his men came down toward her; and she met them.25:21 Now David had said, Surely in vain have I kept all that this fellow has in the wilderness, so that nothing was missed of all that pertained to him: and he has returned me evil for good.25:22 God do so to the enemies of David, and more also, if I leave of all that pertain to him by the morning light so much as one male person. 25:23 And when Abigail saw David, she hasted, and alighted from her donkey, and fell before David on her face, and bowed herself to the ground.25:24 And she fell at his feet, and said, Upon me, my lord, upon me be the iniquity; and let your handmaid, I pray you, speak in your ears, and hear you the words of your handmaid.25:25 Let not my lord, I pray you, regard this worthless fellow, even Nabal; for as his name is, so is he; Nabal is his name, and folly is with him: but I your handmaid saw not the young men of my lord, whom you did send.25:26 Now therefore, my lord, as Yahweh lives, and as your soul lives, seeing Yahweh has withhheld you from bloodguiltiness, and from avenging yourself with your own hand, now therefore let your enemies, and them that seek evil to my lord, be as Nabal.25:27 And now this present which your servant has brought to my lord, let it be given to the young men that follow my lord.25:28 Forgive, I pray you, the trespass of your handmaid: for Yahweh will certainly make my lord a sure house, because my lord fights the battles of Yahweh; and evil shall not be found in you all your days.25:29 And though men be risen up to pursue you, and to seek your soul, yet the soul of my lord shall be bound in the bundle of life with Yahweh your God; and the souls of your enemies, them shall he sling out, as from the hollow of a sling.25:30 And it shall come to pass, when Yahweh shall have done to my lord according to all the good that he has spoken concerning you, and shall have appointed you prince over Israel,25:31 that this shall be no grief to you, nor offence of heart to my lord, either that you have shed blood without cause, or that my lord has avenged himself.  And when Yahweh shall have dealt well with my lord, then remember your handmaid.25:32 And David said to Abigail, Blessed be Yahweh, the God of Israel, who sent you this day to meet me:25:33 and blessed be your discretion, and blessed be you, that have kept me this day from bloodguiltiness, and from avenging myself with my own hand.25:34 For in very deed, as Yahweh, the God of Israel, lives, who has withholden me from hurting you, except you had hasted and come to meet me, surely there had not been left to Nabal by the morning light so much as one man-child.25:35 So David received of her hand that which she had brought him: and he said to her, Go up in peace to your house; see, I have hearkened to your voice, and have accepted your person.25:36 And Abigail came to Nabal; and, behold, he held a feast in his house, like the feast of a king; and Nabal's heart was merry within him, for he was very drunken: therefore she told him nothing, less or more, until the morning light.25:37 And it came to pass in the morning, when the wine was gone out of Nabal, that his wife told him these things, and his heart died within him, and he became as a stone.25:38 And it came to pass about ten days after, that Yahweh smote Nabal, so that he died.25:39 And when David heard that Nabal was dead, he said, Blessed be Yahweh, that has pleaded the cause of my reproach from the hand of Nabal, and has kept back his servant from evil: and the evil-doing of Nabal has Yahweh returned upon his own head.  And David sent and spoke concerning Abigail, to take her to him to wife.25:40 And when the servants of David were come to Abigail to Carmel, they spoke to her, saying, David has sent us to you, to take you to him to wife.25:41 And she arose, and bowed herself with her face to the earth, and said, Behold, your handmaid is a servant to wash the feet of the servants of my lord.25:42 And Abigail hasted, and arose, and rode upon a donkey, with five damsels of hers that followed her; and she went after the messengers of David, and became his wife.25:43 David also took Ahinoam of Jezreel; and they became both of them his wives.25:44 Now Saul had given Michal his daughter, David's wife, to Palti the son of Laish, who was of Gallim.26:1 And the Ziphites came to Saul to Gibeah, saying, Does not David hide himself in the hill of Hachilah, which is before the desert?26:2 Then Saul arose, and went down to the wilderness of Ziph, having three thousand chosen men of Israel with him, to seek David in the wilderness of Ziph.26:3 And Saul encamped in the hill of Hachilah, which is before the desert, by the way.  But David abode in the wilderness, and he saw that Saul came after him into the wilderness.26:4 David therefore sent out spies, and understood that Saul was come of a certainty.26:5 And David arose, and came to the place where Saul had encamped; and David beheld the place where Saul lay, and Abner the son of Ner, the captain of his host: and Saul lay within the place of the wagons, and the people were encamped round about him.26:6 Then answered David and said to Ahimelech the Hittite, and to Abishai the son of Zeruiah, brother to Joab, saying, Who will go down with me to Saul to the camp?  And Abishai said, I will go down with you.26:7 So David and Abishai came to the people by night: and, behold, Saul lay sleeping within the place of the wagons, with his spear stuck in the ground at his head; and Abner and the people lay round about him.26:8 Then said Abishai to David, God has delivered up your enemy into your hand this day: now therefore let me smite him, I pray you, with the spear to the earth at one stroke, and I will not smite him the second time.26:9 And David said to Abishai, Destroy him not; for who can put forth his hand against Yahweh's anointed, and be guiltless?26:10 And David said, as Yahweh lives, Yahweh will smite him; or his day shall come to die; or he shall go down into battle and perish.26:11 Yahweh forbid that I should put forth my hand against Yahweh's anointed: but now take, I pray you, the spear that is at his head, and the cruse of water, and let us go.26:12 So David took the spear and the cruse of water from Saul's head; and they gat them away: and no man saw it, nor knew it, neither did any awake; for they were all asleep, because a deep sleep from Yahweh was fallen upon them.26:13 Then David went over to the other side, and stood on the top of the mountain afar off; a great space being between them;26:14 and David cried to the people, and to Abner the son of Ner, saying, answer you not, abner?  Then Abner answered and said, Who are you that cry to the king?26:15 And David said to Abner, are not you a valiant man?  and who is like to you in Israel?  why then have you not kept watch over your lord the king?  for there came one of the people in to destroy the king your lord.26:16 This thing is not good that you have done.  As Yahweh lives, ye are worthy to die, because ye have not kept watch over your lord, Yahweh's anointed.  And now see where the king's spear is, and the cruse of water that was at his head.26:17 And Saul knew David's voice, and said, Is this your voice, my son David?  And David said, It is my voice, my lord, O king.26:18 And he said, Why does my lord pursue after his servant?  for what have I done?  or what evil is in my hand?26:19 Now therefore, I pray you, let my lord the king hear the words of his servant.  If it be Yahweh that has stirred you up against me, let him accept an offering: but if it be the children of men, cursed be they before Yahweh: for they have driven me out this day that I should not cleave to the inheritance of Yahweh, saying, Go, serve other gods.26:20 Now therefore, let not my blood fall to the earth away from the presence of Yahweh: for the king of Israel is come out to seek a flea, as when one does hunt a partridge in the mountains.26:21 Then said Saul, I have sinned: return, my son David; for I will no more do you harm, because my life was precious in your eyes this day: behold, I have played the fool, and have erred exceedingly.26:22 And David answered and said, Behold the spear, O king! let then one of the young men come over and fetch it.26:23 And Yahweh will render to every man his righteousness and his faithfulness; forasmuch as Yahweh delivered you into my hand today, and I would not put forth my hand against Yahweh's anointed.26:24 And, behold, as your life was much set by this day in my eyes, so let my life be much set by in the eyes of Yahweh, and let him deliver me out of all tribulation.26:25 Then Saul said to David, Blessed be you, my son David: you shall both do mightily, and shall surely prevail.  So David went his way, and Saul returned to his place.27:1 And David said in his heart, I shall now perish one day by the hand of Saul: there is nothing better for me than that I should escape into the land of the Philistines; and Saul will despair of me, to seek me any more in all the borders of Israel: so shall I escape out of his hand.27:2 And David arose, and passed over, he and the six hundred men that were with him, to Achish the son of Maoch, king of Gath.27:3 And David dwelt with Achish at Gath, he and his men, every man with his household, even David with his two wives, ahinoam the Jezreelitess, and Abigail the Carmelitess, Nabal's wife.27:4 And it was told Saul that David was fled to Gath: and he sought no more again for him.27:5 And David said to Achish, If now I have found favor in your eyes, let them give me a place in one of the cities in the country, that I may dwell there: for why should your servant dwell in the royal city with you?27:6 Then Achish gave him Ziklag that day: therefore Ziklag belongs to the kings of Judah to this day.27:7 And the number of the days that David dwelt in the country of the Philistines was a full year and four months.27:8 And David and his men went up, and made a raid upon the Geshurites, and the Girzites, and the Amalekites; for those nations were the inhabitants of the land, who were of old, as you go to Shur, even to the land of Egypt.27:9 And David smote the land, and saved neither man nor woman alive, and took away the sheep, and the oxen, and the asses, and the camels, and the apparel; and he returned, and came to Achish.27:10 And Achish said, against whom have ye made a raid today?  And David said, against the South of Judah, and against the South of the Jerahmeelites, and against the South of the Kenites.27:11 And David saved neither man nor woman alive, to bring them to Gath, saying, Lest they should tell of us, saying, So did David, and so has been his manner all the while he has dwelt in the country of the Philistines.27:12 And Achish believed David, saying, He has made his people Israel utterly to abhor him; therefore he shall be my servant for ever.28:1 And it came to pass in those days, that the Philistines gathered their hosts together for warfare, to fight with Israel.  And Achish said to David, Know you assuredly, that you shall go out with me in the host, you and your men.28:2 And David said to Achish, Therefore you shall know what your servant will do.  And Achish said to David, Therefore will I make you keeper of my head for ever.28:3 Now Samuel was dead, and all Israel had lamented him, and buried him in Ramah, even in his own city.  And Saul had put away those that had familiar spirits, and the wizards, out of the land.28:4 And the Philistines gathered themselves together, and came and encamped in Shunem: and Saul gathered all Israel together, and they encamped in Gilboa.28:5 And when Saul saw the host of the Philistines, he was afraid, and his heart trembled greatly.28:6 And when Saul inquired of Yahweh, Yahweh answered him not, neither by dreams, nor by Urim, nor by prophets.28:7 Then said Saul to his servants, Seek me a woman that has a familiar spirit, that I may go to her, and inquire of her.  And his servants said to him, Behold, there is a woman that has a familiar spirit at En-dor.28:8 And Saul disguised himself, and put on other raiment, and went, he and two men with him, and they came to the woman by night: and he said, Divine to me, I pray you, by the familiar spirit, and bring me up whomsoever I shall name to you.28:9 And the woman said to him, Behold, you know what Saul has done, how he has cut off those that have familiar spirits, and the wizards, out of the land: why then lay you a snare for my life, to cause me to die?28:10 And Saul swore to her by Yahweh, saying, as Yahweh lives, there shall no punishment happen to you for this thing.28:11 Then said the woman, Whom shall I bring up to you?  And he said, Bring me up Samuel.28:12 And when the woman saw Samuel, she cried with a loud voice; and the woman spoke to Saul, saying, Why have you deceived me?  for you are Saul.28:13 And the king said to her, Be not afraid: for what see you?  And the woman said to Saul, I see a god coming up out of the earth.28:14 And he said to her, What form is he of?  And she said, an old man comes up; and he is covered with a robe.  And Saul perceived that it was Samuel, and he bowed with his face to the ground, and did obeisance.28:15 And Samuel said to Saul, Why have you disquieted me, to bring me up?  And Saul answered, I am sore distressed; for the Philistines make war against me, and God is departed from me, and answers me no more, neither by prophets, nor by dreams: therefore I have called you, that you may make known to me what I shall do.28:16 And Samuel said, Why then do you ask of me, seeing Yahweh is departed from you, and is become your adversary?28:17 And Yahweh has done to you, as he spoke by me: and Yahweh has torn the kingdom out of your hand, and given it to your neighbor, even to David.28:18 Because you obeyed not the voice of Yahweh, and did not execute his fierce wrath upon Amalek, therefore has Yahweh done this thing to you this day.28:19 Moreover Yahweh will deliver Israel along with you into the hand of the Philistines; and tomorrow shall you and your sons be with me: Yahweh will deliver the host of Israel also into the hand of the Philistines.28:20 Then Saul fell straightway his full length upon the earth, and was sore afraid, because of the words of Samuel: and there was no strength in him; for he had eaten no bread all the day, nor all the night.28:21 And the woman came to Saul, and saw that he was sore troubled, and said to him, Behold, your handmaid has hearkened to your voice, and I have put my life in my hand, and have hearkened to your words which you spoke to me.28:22 Now therefore, I pray you, hearken you also to the voice of your handmaid, and let me set a morsel of bread before you; and eat, that you may have strength, when you go on your way.28:23 But he refused, and said, I will not eat.  But his servants, together with the woman, constrained him; and he hearkened to their voice.  So he arose from the earth, and sat upon the bed.28:24 And the woman had a fatted calf in the house; and she hasted, and killed it; and she took flour, and kneaded it, and did bake unleavened bread thereof:28:25 and she brought it before Saul, and before his servants; and they did eat.  Then they rose up, and went away that night.29:1 Now the Philistines gathered together all their hosts to Aphek: and the Israelites encamped by the fountain which is in Jezreel.29:2 And the lords of the Philistines passed on by hundreds, and by thousands; and David and his men passed on in the rearward with Achish.29:3 Then said the princes of the Philistines, What are these Hebrews doing here?  And Achish said to the princes of the Philistines, Is not this David, the servant of Saul the king of Israel, who has been with me these days, or rather these years, and I have found no fault in him since he fell away to me to this day?29:4 But he princes of the Philistines were angry with him; and the princes of the Philistines said to him, Make the man return, that he may go back to his place where you have appointed him, and let him not go down with us to battle, lest in the battle he become an adversary to us: for with which should this fellow reconcile himself to his lord?  should it not be with the heads of these men?29:5 Is not this David, of whom they sang one to another in dances, saying, Saul has slain his thousands,  And David his ten thousands?29:6 Then Achish called David, and said to him, as Yahweh lives, you have been upright, and your going out and your coming in with me in the host is good in my sight; for I have not found evil in you since the day of your coming to me to this day: nevertheless the lords favor you not.29:7 Wherefore now return, and go in peace, that you displease not the lords of the Philistines.29:8 And David said to Achish, But what have I done?  and what have you found in your servant so long as I have been before you to this day, that I may not go and fight against the enemies of my lord the king?29:9 And Achish answered and said to David, I know that you are good in my sight, as an angel of God: notwithstanding the princes of the Philistines have said, He shall not go up with us to the battle.29:10 Wherefore now rise up early in the morning with the servants of your lord that are come with you; and as soon as ye are up early in the morning, and have light, depart.29:11 So David rose up early, he and his men, to depart in the morning, to return into the land of the Philistines.  And the Philistines went up to Jezreel.30:1 And it came to pass, when David and his men were come to Ziklag on the third day, that the Amalekites had made a raid upon the South, and upon Ziklag, and had smitten Ziklag, and burned it with fire,30:2 and had taken captive the women and all that were therein, both small and great: they slew not any, but carried them off, and went their way.30:3 And when David and his men came to the city, behold, it was burned with fire; and their wives, and their sons, and their daughters, were taken captive.30:4 Then David and the people that were with him lifted up their voice and wept, until they had no more power to weep.30:5 And David's two wives were taken captive, ahinoam the Jezreelitess, and Abigail the wife of Nabal the Carmelite.30:6 And David was greatly distressed; for the people spoke of stoning him, because the soul of all the people was grieved, every man for his sons and for his daughters: but David strengthened himself in Yahweh his God.30:7 And David said to Abiathar the priest, the son of Ahimelech, I pray you, bring me here the ephod.  And Abiathar brought there the ephod to David.30:8 And David inquired of Yahweh, saying, If I pursue after this troop, shall I overtake them?  And he answered him, Pursue; for you shall surely overtake them, and shall without fail recover all.30:9 So David went, he and the six hundred men that were with him, and came to the brook Besor, where those that were left behind stayed.30:10 But David pursued, he and four hundred men; for two hundred stayed behind, who were so faint that they could not go over the brook Besor.30:11 And they found an Egyptian in the field, and brought him to David, and gave him bread, and he did eat; and they gave him water to drink.30:12 And they gave him a piece of a cake of figs, and two clusters of raisins: and when he had eaten, his spirit came again to him; for he had eaten no bread, nor drunk any water, three days and three nights.30:13 And David said to him, To whom do you belong?  and from where are you?  And he said, I am a young man of Egypt, servant to an Amalekite; and my master left me, because three days ago I fell sick.30:14 We made a raid upon the South of the Cherethites, and upon that which belongs to Judah, and upon the South of Caleb; and we burned Ziklag with fire.30:15 And David said to him, Will you bring me down to this troop?  And he said, Swear to me by God, that you will neither kill me, nor deliver me up into the hands of my master, and I will bring you down to this troop.30:16 And when he had brought him down, behold, they were spread abroad over all the ground, eating and drinking, and dancing, because of all the great spoil that they had taken out of the land of the Philistines, and out of the land of Judah.30:17 And David smote them from the twilight even to the evening of the next day: and there escaped not a man of them, save four hundred young men, who rode upon camels and fled.30:18 And David recovered all that the Amalekites had taken; and David rescued his two wives.30:19 And there was nothing lacking to them, neither small nor great, neither sons nor daughters, neither spoil, nor anything that they had taken to them: David brought back all.30:20 And David took all the flocks and the herds, which they drove before those other cattle, and said, This is David's spoil.30:21 And David came to the two hundred men, who were so faint that they could not follow David, whom also they had made to abide at the brook Besor; and they went forth to meet David, and to meet the people that were with him: and when David came near to the people, he saluted them.30:22 Then answered all the wicked men and base fellows, of those that went with David, and said, Because they went not with us, we will not give them anything of the spoil that we have recovered, save to every man his wife and his children, that he may lead them away, and depart.30:23 Then said David, You shall not do so, my brethren, with that which Yahweh has given to us, who has preserved us, and delivered the troop that came against us into our hand.30:24 And who will hearken to you in this matter?  for as his share is that goes down to the battle, so shall his share be that tarries by the baggage: they shall share alike.30:25 And it was so from that day forward, that he made it a statute and an ordinance for Israel to this day.30:26 And when David came to Ziklag, he sent of the spoil to the elders of Judah, even to his friends, saying, Behold, a present for you of the spoil of the enemies of Yahweh:30:27 To them that were in Beth-el, and to them that were in Ramoth of the South, and to them that were in Jattir,30:28 and to them that were in Aroer, and to them that were in Siphmoth, and to them that were in Eshtemoa,30:29 and to them that were in Racal, and to them that were in the cities of the Jerahmeelites, and to them that were in the cities of the Kenites,30:30 and to them that were in Hormah, and to them that were in Bor-ashan, and to them that were in Athach,30:31 and to them that were in Hebron, and to all the places where David himself and his men were wont to haunt.31:1 Now the Philistines fought against Israel: and the men of Israel fled from before the Philistines, and fell down slain in mount Gilboa.31:2 And the Philistines followed hard upon Saul and upon his sons; and the Philistines slew Jonathan, and Abinadab, and Malchishua, the sons of Saul.31:3 And the battle went sore against Saul, and the archers overtook him; and he was greatly distressed by reason of the archers.31:4 Then said Saul to his armorbearer, Draw your sword, and thrust me through with it, lest these uncircumcised come and thrust me through, and abuse me.  But his armorbearer would not; for he was sore afraid.  Therefore Saul took his sword, and fell upon it.31:5 And when his armorbearer saw that Saul was dead, he likewise fell upon his sword, and died with him.31:6 So Saul died, and his three sons, and his armorbearer, and all his men, that same day together.31:7 And when the men of Israel that were on the other side of the valley, and they that were beyond the Jordan, saw that the men of Israel fled, and that Saul and his sons were dead, they forsook the cities, and fled; and the Philistines came and dwelt in them.31:8 And it came to pass on the morrow, when the Philistines came to strip the slain, that they found Saul and his three sons fallen in mount Gilboa.31:9 And they cut off his head, and stripped off his armor, and sent into the land of the Philistines round about, to carry the tidings to the house of their idols, and to the people.31:10 And they put his armor in the house of the Ashtaroth; and they fastened his body to the wall of Beth-shan.31:11 And when the inhabitants of Jabesh-gilead heard concerning him that which the Philistines had done to Saul,31:12 all the valiant men arose, and went all night, and took the body of Saul and the bodies of his sons from the wall of Beth-shan; and they came to Jabesh, and burnt them there.31:13 And they took their bones, and buried them under the tamarisk-tree in Jabesh, and fasted seven days.End of 1 Samuel2 Samuel1:1 And it came to pass after the death of Saul, when David had returned from the slaughter of the Amalekites, and David had abode two days in Ziklag;1:2 it came to pass that on the third day, behold, a man came out of the camp from Saul, with his clothes rent, and earth upon his head.  And so it was, that when he came to David, he fell to the ground, and did obeisance.1:3 And David said to him, Where did you come from?  And he said to him, Out of the camp of Israel I have escaped.1:4 And David said to him, How went the matter?  I pray you, tell me.  And he answered, The people have fled from the battle, and many of the people also are fallen and dead; and Saul and Jonathan his son are dead also.1:5 And David said to the young man who told him, How do you know that Saul and Jonathan his son are dead?1:6 And the young man who told him said, As I happened by chance upon mount Gilboa, behold, Saul was leaning on his spear; and, lo, the chariots and the horsemen were following hard after him.1:7 And when he looked behind him, he saw me, and called to me.  And I answered, Here am I.1:8 And he said to me, Who are you?  And I answered him, I am an Amalekite.1:9 And he said to me, Stand, I beg you, beside me, and kill me; for anguish has seized me, because my life is still whole inside me.1:10 So I stood beside him, and killed him, because I was sure that he could not live after how he was fallen: and I took the crown that was on his head, and the bracelet that was on his arm, and I have brought them here to my lord.1:11 Then David took hold on his clothes, and tore them; and all the men that were with him the same:1:12 and they mourned, and wept, and fasted until evening, mourned for Saul, and for Jonathan his son, and for the people of Yahweh, and for the house of Israel; because they were fallen by the sword.1:13 And David said to the young man that told him, From where are you?  And he answered, I am the son of a sojourner, an Amalekite.1:14 And David said to him, How were you not afraid to put forth your hand to destroy Yahweh's anointed?1:15 And David called one of the young men, and said, Go near, and fall upon him.  And he struck him, so that he died.1:16 And David said to him, Your blood is on your head; for your own mouth has testified against you, saying, I have killed Yahweh's anointed.1:17 And David lamented with this lamentation, "The Bow," over Saul and over Jonathan his son, 1:18 and he said The Bow should be taught to the children of Judah: behold, it is written in the book of Jashar:1:19 Your glory, O Israel, is slain upon your high places! How are the mighty fallen!1:20 Tell it not in Gath, Publish it not in the streets of Ashkelon; Lest the daughters of the Philistines rejoice, Lest the daughters of the uncircumcised triumph.1:21 You mountains of Gilboa, Let there be no dew nor rain upon you, neither fields of offerings: For there the shield of the mighty was vilely cast away, The shield of Saul, not anointed with oil.1:22 From the blood of the slain, from the fat of the mighty, The bow of Jonathan turned not back, and the sword of Saul returned not empty.1:23 Saul and Jonathan were lovely and pleasant in their lives, and in their death they were not divided: They were swifter than eagles, They were stronger than lions.1:24 You daughters of Israel, weep over Saul, Who clothed you in scarlet delicately, Who put ornaments of gold on your apparel.1:25 How are the mighty fallen in the midst of the battle! Jonathan is slain on your high places.1:26 I am distressed for you, my brother Jonathan: Very pleasant have you been to me: Your love to me was wonderful, Surpassing the love of women.1:27 How are the mighty fallen, and the weapons of war perished!2:1 And it came to pass after this, that David inquired of Yahweh, saying, Shall I go up into any of the cities of Judah?  And Yahweh said to him, Go up.  And David said, Where shall I go up?  And he said, To Hebron.2:2 So David went up there, and his two wives also, Ahinoam the Jezreelitess, and Abigail the wife of Nabal the Carmelite.2:3 And his men who were with him David brought up, every man with his household: and they dwelt in the cities of Hebron.2:4 And the men of Judah came, and there they anointed David king over the house of Judah.  And they told David, saying, The men of Jabesh-gilead were the ones that buried Saul.2:5 And David sent messengers to the men of Jabesh-gilead, and said to them, Blessed be ye of Yahweh, that ye have shown this kindness to your lord, even to Saul, and have buried him.2:6 And now may Yahweh show lovingkindness and truth to you: and I also will repay you this kindness, because ye have done this thing.2:7 Now therefore let your hands be strong, and be ye valiant; for Saul your lord is dead, and also the house of Judah have anointed me king over them.2:8 Now Abner the son of Ner, captain of Saul's host, had taken Ish-bosheth the son of Saul, and brought him over to Mahanaim;2:9 and he made him king over Gilead, and over the Ashurites, and over Jezreel, and over Ephraim, and over Benjamin, and over all Israel.2:10 Ish-bosheth, Saul's son, was forty years old when he began to reign over Israel, and he reigned two years.  But the house of Judah followed David.2:11 And the time that David was king in Hebron over the house of Judah was seven years and six months.2:12 And Abner the son of Ner, and the servants of Ish-bosheth the son of Saul, went out from Mahanaim to Gibeon.2:13 And Joab the son of Zeruiah, and the servants of David, went out, and met them by the pool of Gibeon; and they sat down, the one on the one side of the pool, and the other on the other side of the pool.2:14 And Abner said to Joab, Let the young men, I pray you, arise and play before us.  And Joab said, Let them arise.2:15 Then they arose and went over by number: twelve for Benjamin, and for Ish-bosheth the son of Saul, and twelve of the servants of David.2:16 And they caught every one his fellow by the head, and thrust his sword in his fellow's side; so they fell down together: therefore that place was called Helkath-hazzurim, which is in Gibeon.2:17 And the battle was very sore that day: and Abner was beaten, and the men of Israel, before the servants of David.2:18 And the three sons of Zeruiah were there, Joab, and Abishai, and Asahel: and Asahel was as light of foot as a wild roe.2:19 And Asahel pursued after Abner; and in going he turned not to the right hand nor to the left from following Abner.2:20 Then Abner looked behind him, and said, Is it you, asahel?  And he answered, It is I.2:21 And Abner said to him, Turn you aside to your right hand or to your left, and lay you hold on one of the young men, and take you his armor.  But Asahel would not turn aside from following him.2:22 And Abner said again to Asahel, Turn you aside from following me: why should I smite you to the ground?  how then should I hold up my face to Joab your brother?2:23 But he refused to turn aside: therefore Abner with the hinder end of the spear smote him in the body, so that the spear came out behind him; and he fell down there, and died in the same place: and it came to pass, that as many as came to the place where Asahel fell down and died stood still.2:24 But Joab and Abishai pursued after Abner: and the sun went down when they were come to the hill of Ammah, that lies before Giah by the way of the wilderness of Gibeon.2:25 And the children of Benjamin gathered themselves together after Abner, and became one band, and stood on the top of a hill.2:26 Then Abner called to Joab, and said, Shall the sword devour for ever?  know you not that it will be bitterness in the latter end?  how long shall it be then, before you bid the people return from following their brethren?2:27 And Joab said, as God lives, if you had not spoken, surely then in the morning the people had gone away, nor followed every one his brother.2:28 So Joab blew the trumpet; and all the people stood still, and pursued after Israel no more, neither fought they any more.2:29 And Abner and his men went all that night through the Arabah; and they passed over the Jordan, and went through all Bithron, and came to Mahanaim.2:30 And Joab returned from following Abner: and when he had gathered all the people together, there lacked of David's servants nineteen men and Asahel.2:31 But the servants of David had smitten of Benjamin, and of Abner's men, so that 360 men died.2:32 And they took up Asahel, and buried him in the sepulchre of his father, which was in Beth-lehem.  And Joab and his men went all night, and the day broke upon them at Hebron.3:1 Now there was long war between the house of Saul and the house of David: and David grew stronger and stronger, but the house of Saul grew weaker and weaker.3:2 And to David were sons born in Hebron: and his first-born was Amnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess;3:3 and his second, Chileab, of Abigail the wife of Nabal the Carmelite; and the third, absalom the son of Maacah the daughter of Talmai king of Geshur;3:4 and the fourth, adonijah the son of Haggith; and the fifth, Shephatiah the son of Abital;3:5 and the sixth, Ithream, of Eglah, David's wife.  These were born to David in Hebron.3:6 And it came to pass, while there was war between the house of Saul and the house of David, that Abner made himself strong in the house of Saul.3:7 Now Saul had a concubine, whose name was Rizpah, the daughter of Aiah: and Ish-bosheth said to Abner, Why have you gone in to my father's concubine?3:8 Then was Abner very angry for the words of Ish-bosheth, and said, am I a dog's head that belongs to Judah?  This day do I show kindness to the house of Saul your father, to his brethren, and to his friends, and have not delivered you into the hand of David; and yet you charge me this day with a fault concerning this woman.3:9 God do so to Abner, and more also, if, as Yahweh has sworn to David, I do not even so to him;3:10 to transfer the kingdom from the house of Saul, and to set up the throne of David over Israel and over Judah, from Dan even to Beer-sheba.3:11 And he could not answer Abner another word, because he feared him.3:12 And Abner sent messengers to David on his behalf, saying, Whose is the land?  saying also, Make your league with me, and, behold, my hand shall be with you, to bring about all Israel to you.3:13 And he said, Well; I will make a league with you; but one thing I require of you: that is, you shall not see my face, except you first bring Michal, Saul's daughter, when you come to see my face.3:14 And David sent messengers to Ish-bosheth, Saul's son, saying, Deliver me my wife Michal, whom I betrothed to me for a hundred foreskins of the Philistines.3:15 And Ish-bosheth sent, and took her from her husband, even from Paltiel the son of Laish.3:16 And her husband went with her, weeping as he went, and followed her to Bahurim.  Then said Abner to him, Go, return: and he returned.3:17 And Abner had communication with the elders of Israel, saying, In times past ye sought for David to be king over you:3:18 now then do it; for Yahweh has spoken of David, saying, By the hand of my servant David I will save my people Israel out of the hand of the Philistines, and out of the hand of all their enemies.3:19 And Abner also spoke in the ears of Benjamin: and Abner went also to speak in the ears of David in Hebron all that seemed good to Israel, and to the whole house of Benjamin.3:20 So Abner came to David to Hebron, and twenty men with him.  And David made Abner and the men that were with him a feast.3:21 And Abner said to David, I will arise and go, and will gather all Israel to my lord the king, that they may make a covenant with you, and that you may reign over all that your soul desires.  And David sent Abner away; and he went in peace.3:22 And, behold, the servants of David and Joab came from a foray, and brought in a great spoil with them: but Abner was not with David in Hebron; for he had sent him away, and he was gone in peace.3:23 When Joab and all the host that was with him were come, they told Joab, saying, abner the son of Ner came to the king, and he has sent him away, and he is gone in peace.3:24 Then Joab came to the king, and said, What have you done?  behold, abner came to you; why is it that you have sent him away, and he is quite gone?3:25 You know Abner the son of Ner, that he came to deceive you, and to know your going out and your coming in, and to know all that you do.3:26 And when Joab was come out from David, he sent messengers after Abner, and they brought him back from the well of Sirah: but David knew it not.3:27 And when Abner was returned to Hebron, Joab took him aside into the midst of the gate to speak with him quietly, and smote him there in the body, so that he died, for the blood of Asahel his brother.3:28 And afterward, when David heard it, he said, I and my kingdom are guiltless before Yahweh for ever of the blood of Abner the son of Ner:3:29 let it fall upon the head of Joab, and upon all his father's house; and let there not fail from the house of Joab one that has an issue, or that is a leper, or that leans on a staff, or that falls by the sword, or that lacks bread.3:30 So Joab and Abishai his brother slew Abner, because he had killed their brother Asahel at Gibeon in the battle.3:31 And David said to Joab, and to all the people that were with him, Rend your clothes, and gird you with sackcloth, and mourn before Abner.  And king David followed the bier.3:32 And they buried Abner in Hebron: and the king lifted up his voice, and wept at the grave of Abner; and all the people wept.3:33 And the king lamented for Abner, and said, Should Abner die as a fool dies?3:34 Your hands were not bound, nor your feet put into fetters: As a man falls before the children of iniquity, so did you fall.  And all the people wept again over him.3:35 And all the people came to cause David to eat bread while it was yet day; but David swore, saying, God do so to me, and more also, if I taste bread, or anything else, till the sun be down.3:36 And all the people took notice of it, and it pleased them; as whatsoever the king did pleased all the people.3:37 So all the people and all Israel understood that day that it was not of the king to slay Abner the son of Ner.3:38 And the king said to his servants, Know ye not that there is a prince and a great man fallen this day in Israel?3:39 And I am this day weak, though anointed king; and these men the sons of Zeruiah are too hard for me: Yahweh reward the evil-doer according to his wickedness.4:1 And when Ish-bosheth, Saul's son, heard that Abner was dead in Hebron, his hands became feeble, and all the Israelites were troubled.4:2 And Ish-bosheth, Saul's son, had two men that were captains of bands: the name of the one was Baanah, and the name of the other Rechab, the sons of Rimmon the Beerothite, of the children of Benjamin (for Beeroth also is reckoned to Benjamin:4:3 and the Beerothites fled to Gittaim, and have been sojourners there until this day).4:4 Now Jonathan, Saul's son, had a son that was lame of his feet.  He was five years old when the tidings came of Saul and Jonathan out of Jezreel; and his nurse took him up, and fled: and it came to pass, as she made haste to flee, that he fell, and became lame.  And his name was Mephibosheth.4:5 And the sons of Rimmon the Beerothite, Rechab and Baanah, went, and came about the heat of the day to the house of Ish-bosheth, as he took his rest at noon.4:6 And they came there into the midst of the house, as though they would have fetched wheat; and they smote him in the body: and Rechab and Baanah his brother escaped.4:7 Now when they came into the house, as he lay on his bed in his bedchamber, they smote him, and slew him, and beheaded him, and took his head, and went by the way of the Arabah all night.4:8 And they brought the head of Ish-bosheth to David to Hebron, and said to the king, Behold, the head of Ish-bosheth, the son of Saul, your enemy, who sought your life; and Yahweh has avenged my lord the king this day of Saul, and of his seed.4:9 And David answered Rechab and Baanah his brother, the sons of Rimmon the Beerothite, and said to them, as Yahweh lives, who has redeemed my soul out of all adversity,4:10 when one told me, saying, Behold, Saul is dead, thinking to have brought good tidings, I took hold of him, and slew him in Ziklag, which was the reward I gave him for his tidings.4:11 How much more, when wicked men have slain a righteous person in his own house upon his bed, shall I not now require his blood of your hand, and take you away from the earth?4:12 And David commanded his young men, and they slew them, and cut off their hands and their feet, and hanged them up beside the pool in Hebron.  But they took the head of Ish-bosheth, and buried it in the grave of Abner in Hebron.5:1 Then came all the tribes of Israel to David to Hebron, and spoke, saying, Behold, we are your bone and your flesh.5:2 In times past, when Saul was king over us, it was you that led out and brought in Israel: and Yahweh said to you, You shall be shepherd of my people Israel, and you shall be prince over Israel.5:3 So all the elders of Israel came to the king to Hebron; and king David made a covenant with them in Hebron before Yahweh: and they anointed David king over Israel.5:4 David was thirty years old when he began to reign, and he reigned forty years.5:5 In Hebron he reigned over Judah seven years and six months; and in Jerusalem he reigned thirty and three years over all Israel and Judah.5:6 And the king and his men went to Jerusalem against the Jebusites, the inhabitants of the land, who spoke to David, saying, Except you take away the blind and the lame, you shall not come in here; thinking, David cannot come in here.5:7 Nevertheless David took the stronghold of Zion; the same is the city of David.5:8 And David said on that day, Whosoever strikes the Jebusites, let him get up to the watercourse, and strike the lame and the blind, that are hated of David's soul.  Wherefore they say, There are the blind and the lame; he cannot come into the house.5:9 And David dwelt in the stronghold, and called it the city of David.  And David built round about from Millo and inward.5:10 And David became greater and greater; for Yahweh, the God of hosts, was with him.5:11 And Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and cedar-trees, and carpenters, and masons; and they built David a house.5:12 And David perceived that Yahweh had established him king over Israel, and that he had exalted his kingdom for his people Israel's sake.5:13 And David took him more concubines and wives out of Jerusalem, after he was come from Hebron; and there were yet sons and daughters born to David.5:14 And these are the names of those that were born to him in Jerusalem: Shammua, and Shobab, and Nathan, and Solomon,5:15 and Ibhar, and Elishua, and Nepheg, and Japhia,5:16 and Elishama, and Eliada, and Eliphelet.5:17 And when the Philistines heard that they had anointed David king over Israel, all the Philistines went up to seek David; and David heard of it, and went down to the stronghold.5:18 Now the Philistines had come and spread themselves in the valley of Rephaim.5:19 And David inquired of Yahweh, saying, Shall I go up against the Philistines?  will you deliver them into my hand?  And Yahweh said to David, Go up; for I will certainly deliver the Philistines into your hand.5:20 And David came to Baal-perazim, and David smote them there; and he said, Yahweh has broken my enemies before me, like the breach of waters.  Therefore he called the name of that place Baal-perazim.5:21 And they left their images there; and David and his men took them away.5:22 And the Philistines came up yet again, and spread themselves in the valley of Rephaim.5:23 And when David inquired of Yahweh, he said, You shall not go up: make a circuit behind them, and come upon them over against the mulberry-trees.5:24 And it shall be, when you hear the sound of marching in the tops of the mulberry-trees, that then you shall bestir yourself; for then is Yahweh gone out before you to smite the host of the Philistines.5:25 And David did so, as Yahweh commanded him, and smote the Philistines from Geba until you come to Gezer.6:1 And David again gathered together all the chosen men of Israel, thirty thousand.6:2 And David arose, and went with all the people that were with him, from Baale-judah, to bring up from there the ark of God, which is called by the Name, even the name of Yahweh of hosts that sits above the cherubim.6:3 And they set the ark of God upon a new cart, and brought it out of the house of Abinadab that was in the hill: and Uzzah and Ahio, the sons of Abinadab, drove the new cart.6:4 And they brought it out of the house of Abinadab, which was in the hill, with the ark of God: and Ahio went before the ark.6:5 And David and all the house of Israel played before Yahweh with all manner of instruments made of fir-wood, and with harps, and with psalteries, and with timbrels, and with castanets, and with cymbals.6:6 And when they came to the threshing-floor of Nacon, Uzzah put forth his hand to the ark of God, and took hold of it; for the oxen stumbled.6:7 And the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Uzzah; and God smote him there for his error; and there he died by the ark of God.6:8 And David was displeased, because Yahweh had broken forth upon Uzzah; and he called that place Perez-uzzah, to this day.6:9 And David was afraid of Yahweh that day; and he said, How shall the ark of Yahweh come to me?6:10 So David would not remove the ark of Yahweh to him into the city of David; but David carried it aside into the house of Obed-edom the Gittite.6:11 And the ark of Yahweh remained in the house of Obed-edom the Gittite three months: and Yahweh blessed Obed-edom, and all his house.6:12 And it was told king David, saying, Yahweh has blessed the house of Obed-edom, and all that pertains to him, because of the ark of God.  And David went and brought up the ark of God from the house of Obed-edom into the city of David with joy.6:13 And it was so, that, when they that bore the ark of Yahweh had gone six paces, he sacrificed an ox and a fatling.6:14 And David danced before Yahweh with all his might; and David was girded with a linen ephod.6:15 So David and all the house of Israel brought up the ark of Yahweh with shouting, and with the sound of the trumpet.6:16 And it was so, as the ark of Yahweh came into the city of David, that Michal the daughter of Saul looked out at the window, and saw king David leaping and dancing before Yahweh; and she despised him in her heart.6:17 And they brought in the ark of Yahweh, and set it in its place, in the midst of the tent that David had pitched for it; and David offered burnt offerings and peace offerings before Yahweh.6:18 And when David had made an end of offering the burnt offering and the peace offerings, he blessed the people in the name of Yahweh of hosts.6:19 And he dealt among all the people, even among the whole multitude of Israel, both to men and women, to every one a cake of bread, and a portion of flesh, and a cake of raisins.  So all the people departed every one to his house.6:20 Then David returned to bless his household.  And Michal the daughter of Saul came out to meet David, and said, How glorious was the king of Israel today, who uncovered himself today in the eyes of the handmaids of his servants, as one of the vain fellows shamelessly uncovers himself!6:21 And David said to Michal, It was before Yahweh, who chose me above your father, and above all his house, to appoint me prince over the people of Yahweh, over Israel: therefore will I play before Yahweh.6:22 And I will be yet more vile than this, and will be base in my own sight: but of the handmaids of whom you have spoken, of them shall I be had in honor.6:23 And Michal the daughter of Saul had no child to the day of her death.7:1 And it came to pass, when the king dwelt in his house, and Yahweh had given him rest from all his enemies round about,7:2 that the king said to Nathan the prophet, See now, I dwell in a house of cedar, but the ark of God dwells within curtains.7:3 And Nathan said to the king, Go, do all that is in your heart; for Yahweh is with you.7:4 And it came to pass the same night, that the word of Yahweh came to Nathan, saying,7:5 Go and tell my servant David, Thus says Yahweh, Shall you build me a house for me to dwell in?7:6 for I have not dwelt in a house since the day that I brought up the children of Israel out of Egypt, even to this day, but have walked in a tent and in a tabernacle.7:7 In all places in which I have walked with all the children of Israel, spoke I a word with any of the tribes of Israel, whom I commanded to be shepherd of my people Israel, saying, Why have ye not built me a house of cedar?7:8 Now therefore thus shall you say to my servant David, Thus says Yahweh of hosts, I took you from the pasture, from following the sheep, that you should be prince over my people, over Israel;7:9 and I have been with you wherever you went, and have cut off all your enemies from before you; and I will make you a great name, like to the name of the great ones that are in the earth.7:10 And I will appoint a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, that they may dwell in their own place, and be moved no more; neither shall the children of wickedness afflict them any more, as at the first,7:11 and as from the day that I commanded judges to be over my people Israel; and I will cause you to rest from all your enemies.  Moreover Yahweh tells you that Yahweh will make you a house.7:12 When your days are fulfilled, and you shall sleep with your fathers, I will set up your seed after you, that shall proceed out of your bowels, and I will establish his kingdom.7:13 He shall build a house for my name, and I will establish the throne of his kingdom for ever.7:14 I will be his father, and he shall be my son: if he commit iniquity, I will chasten him with the rod of men, and with the stripes of the children of men;7:15 but my lovingkindness shall not depart from him, as I took it from Saul, whom I put away before you.7:16 And your house and your kingdom shall be made sure for ever before you: your throne shall be established for ever.7:17 According to all these words, and according to all this vision, so did Nathan speak to David.7:18 Then David the king went in, and sat before Yahweh; and he said, Who am I, O Lord Yahweh, and what is my house, that you have brought me thus far?7:19 And this was yet a small thing in your eyes, O Lord Yahweh; but you have spoken also of your servant's house for a great while to come; and this too after the manner of men, O Lord Yahweh!7:20 And what can David say more to you?  for you know your servant, O Lord Yahweh.7:21 For your word's sake, and according to your own heart, have you wrought all this greatness, to make your servant know it.7:22 Wherefore you are great, O Yahweh God: for there is none like you, neither is there any God besides you, according to all that we have heard with our ears.7:23 And what one nation in the earth is like your people, even like Israel, whom God went to redeem to himself for a people, and to make him a name, and to do great things for you, and terrible things for your land, before your people, whom you redeem to you out of Egypt, from the nations and their gods?7:24 And you did establish to yourself your people Israel to be a people to you for ever; and you, Yahweh, became their God.7:25 And now, O Yahweh God, the word that you have spoken concerning your servant, and concerning his house, confirm you it for ever, and do as you have spoken.7:26 And let your name be magnified for ever, saying, Yahweh of hosts is God over Israel; and the house of your servant David shall be established before you.7:27 For you, O Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, have revealed to your servant, saying, I will build you a house: therefore has your servant found in his heart to pray this prayer to you.7:28 And now, O Lord Yahweh, you are God, and your words are truth, and you have promised this good thing to your servant:7:29 now therefore let it please you to bless the house of your servant, that it may continue for ever before you; for you, O Lord Yahweh, have spoken it: and with your blessing let the house of your servant be blessed for ever.8:1 And after this it came to pass, that David smote the Philistines, and subdued them: and David took the bridle of the mother city out of the hand of the Philistines.8:2 And he smote Moab, and measured them with the line, making them to lie down on the ground; and he measured two lines to put to death, and one full line to keep alive.  And the Moabites became servants to David, and brought tribute.8:3 David smote also Hadadezer the son of Rehob, king of Zobah, as he went to recover his dominion at the River.8:4 And David took from him a thousand and seven hundred horsemen, and twenty thousand footmen: and David hocked all the chariot horses, but reserved of them for a hundred chariots.8:5 And when the Syrians of Damascus came to succor Hadadezer king of Zobah, David smote of the Syrians two and twenty thousand men.8:6 Then David put garrisons in Syria of Damascus; and the Syrians became servants to David, and brought tribute.  And Yahweh gave victory to David wherever he went.8:7 And David took the shields of gold that were on the servants of Hadadezer, and brought them to Jerusalem.8:8 And from Betah and from Berothai, cities of Hadadezer, king David took exceedingly much brass.8:9 And when Toi king of Hamath heard that David had smitten all the host of Hadadezer,8:10 then Toi sent Joram his son to king David, to salute him, and to bless him, because he had fought against Hadadezer and smitten him: for Hadadezer had wars with Toi.  And Joram brought with him vessels of silver, and vessels of gold, and vessels of brass:8:11 These also did king David dedicate to Yahweh, with the silver and gold that he dedicated of all the nations which he subdued;8:12 of Syria, and of Moab, and of the children of Ammon, and of the Philistines, and of Amalek, and of the spoil of Hadadezer, son of Rehob, king of Zobah.8:13 And David gat him a name when he returned from smiting the Syrians in the Valley of Salt, even eighteen thousand men.8:14 And he put garrisons in Edom; throughout all Edom put he garrisons, and all the Edomites became servants to David.  And Yahweh gave victory to David wherever he went.8:15 And David reigned over all Israel; and David executed justice and righteousness to all his people.8:16 And Joab the son of Zeruiah was over the host; and Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud was recorder;8:17 and Zadok the son of Ahitub, and Ahimelech the son of Abiathar, were priests; and Seraiah was scribe;8:18 and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over the Cherethites and the Pelethites; and David's sons were chief ministers.9:1 And David said, Is there yet any that is left of the house of Saul, that I may show him kindness for Jonathan's sake?9:2 And there was of the house of Saul a servant whose name was Ziba, and they called him to David; and the king said to him, are you Ziba?  And he said, Your servant is he.9:3 And the king said, Is there not yet any of the house of Saul, that I may show the kindness of God to him?  And Ziba said to the king, Jonathan has yet a son, who is lame of his feet.9:4 And the king said to him, Where is he?  And Ziba said to the king, Behold, he is in the house of Machir the son of Ammiel, in Lo-debar.9:5 Then king David sent, and fetched him out of the house of Machir the son of Ammiel, from Lo-debar.9:6 And Mephibosheth, the son of Jonathan, the son of Saul, came to David, and fell on his face, and did obeisance.  And David said, Mephibosheth.  And he answered, Behold, your servant!9:7 And David said to him, Fear not; for I will surely show you kindness for Jonathan your father's sake, and will restore you all the land of Saul your father; and you shall eat bread at my table continually.9:8 And he did obeisance, and said, What is your servant, that you should look upon such a dead dog as I am?9:9 Then the king called to Ziba, Saul's servant, and said to him, all that pertained to Saul and to all his house have I given to your master's son.9:10 And you shall till the land for him, you, and your sons, and your servants; and you shall bring in the fruits, that your master's son may have bread to eat: but Mephibosheth your master's son shall eat bread alway at my table.  Now Ziba had fifteen sons and twenty servants.9:11 Then said Ziba to the king, according to all that my lord the king commands his servant, so shall your servant do.  As for Mephibosheth, said the king, he shall eat at my table, as one of the king's sons.9:12 And Mephibosheth had a young son, whose name was Mica.  And all that dwelt in the house of Ziba were servants to mephibosheth.9:13 So Mephibosheth dwelt in Jerusalem; for he did eat continually at the king's table.  And he was lame in both his feet.10:1 And it came to pass after this, that the king of the children of Ammon died, and Hanun his son reigned in his stead.10:2 And David said, I will show kindness to Hanun the son of Nahash, as his father showed kindness to me.  So David sent by his servants to comfort him concerning his father.  And David's servants came into the land of the children of Ammon.10:3 But the princes of the children of Ammon said to Hanun their lord, Think you that David does honor your father, in that he has sent comforters to you?  has not David sent his servants to you to search the city, and to spy it out, and to overthrow it?10:4 So Hanun took David's servants, and shaved off the one half of their beards, and cut off their garments in the middle, even to their buttocks, and sent them away.10:5 When they told it to David, he sent to meet them; for the men were greatly ashamed.  And the king said, Tarry at Jericho until your beards be grown, and then return.10:6 And when the children of Ammon saw that they were become odious to David, the children of Ammon sent and hired the Syrians of Beth-rehob, and the Syrians of Zobah, twenty thousand footmen, and the king of Maacah with a thousand men, and the men of Tob twelve thousand men.10:7 And when David heard of it, he sent Joab, and all the host of the mighty men.10:8 And the children of Ammon came out, and put the battle in array at the entrance of the gate: and the Syrians of Zobah and of Rehob, and the men of Tob and Maacah, were by themselves in the field.10:9 Now when Joab saw that the battle was set against him before and behind, he chose of all the choice men of Israel, and put them in array against the Syrians:10:10 And the rest of the people he committed into the hand of Abishai his brother; and he put them in array against the children of Ammon.10:11 And he said, If the Syrians be too strong for me, then you shall help me; but if the children of Ammon be too strong for you, then I will come and help you.10:12 Be of good courage, and let us play the man for our people, and for the cities of our God: and Yahweh do that which seems him good.10:13 So Joab and the people that were with him drew near to the battle against the Syrians: and they fled before him.10:14 And when the children of Ammon saw that the Syrians were fled, they likewise fled before Abishai, and entered into the city.  Then Joab returned from the children of Ammon, and came to Jerusalem.10:15 And when the Syrians saw that they were put to the worse before Israel, they gathered themselves together.10:16 And Hadarezer sent, and brought out the Syrians that were beyond the River: and they came to Helam, with Shobach the captain of the host of Hadarezer at their head.10:17 And it was told David; and he gathered all Israel together, and passed over the Jordan, and came to Helam.  And the Syrians set themselves in array against David, and fought with him.10:18 And the Syrians fled before Israel; and David slew of the Syrians the men of seven hundred chariots, and forty thousand horsemen, and smote Shobach the captain of their host, so that he died there.10:19 And when all the kings that were servants to Hadarezer saw that they were put to the worse before Israel, they made peace with Israel, and served them.  So the Syrians feared to help the children of Ammon any more.11:1 And it came to pass, at the return of the year, at the time when kings go out to battle, that David sent Joab, and his servants with him, and all Israel; and they destroyed the children of Ammon, and besieged Rabbah.  But David tarried at Jerusalem.11:2 And it came to pass at eventide, that David arose from off his bed, and walked upon the roof of the king's house: and from the roof he saw a woman bathing; and the woman was very beautiful to look upon.11:3 And David sent and inquired after the woman.  And one said, Is this not Bathsheba, the daughter of Eliam, the wife of Uriah the Hittite?11:4 And David sent messengers, and took her; and she came in to him, and he lay with her (for she was purified from her uncleanness); and she returned to her house.11:5 And the woman conceived; and she sent and told David, and said, I am with child.11:6 And David sent to Joab, saying, Send me Uriah the Hittite.  And Joab sent Uriah to David.11:7 And when Uriah was come to him, David asked of him how Joab did, and how the people fared, and how the war prospered.11:8 And David said to Uriah, Go down to your house, and wash your feet.  And Uriah departed out of the king's house, and there followed him a mess of food from the king.11:9 But Uriah slept at the door of the king's house with all the servants of his lord, and went not down to his house.11:10 And when they had told David, saying, Uriah went not down to his house, David said to Uriah, are you not come from a journey?  why did you not go down to your house?11:11 And Uriah said to David, The ark, and Israel, and Judah, abide in booths; and my lord Joab, and the servants of my lord, are encamped in the open field; shall I then go into my house, to eat and to drink, and to lie with my wife?  as you live, and as your soul lives, I will not do this thing.11:12 And David said to Uriah, Tarry here today also, and tomorrow I will let you depart.  So Uriah abode in Jerusalem that day, and the morrow.11:13 And when David had called him, he did eat and drink before him; and he made him drunk: and at even he went out to lie on his bed with the servants of his lord, but went not down to his house.11:14 And it came to pass in the morning, that David wrote a letter to Joab, and sent it by the hand of Uriah.11:15 And he wrote in the letter, saying, Set ye Uriah in the forefront of the hottest battle, and retire ye from him, that he may be smitten, and die.11:16 And it came to pass, when Joab kept watch upon the city, that he assigned Uriah to the place where he knew that valiant men were.11:17 And the men of the city went out, and fought with Joab: and there fell some of the people, even of the servants of David; and Uriah the Hittite died also.11:18 Then Joab sent and told David all the things concerning the war;11:19 and he charged the messenger, saying, When you have made an end of telling all the things concerning the war to the king,11:20 it shall be that, if the king's wrath arise, and he say to you, Why went ye so near to the city to fight?  knew ye not that they would shoot from the wall?11:21 who smote Abimelech the son of Jerubbesheth?  did not a woman cast an upper millstone upon him from the wall, so that he died at Thebez?  why went ye so near the wall?  then shall you say, Your servant Uriah the Hittite is dead also.11:22 So the messenger went, and came and showed David all that Joab had sent him for.11:23 And the messenger said to David, The men prevailed against us, and came out to us into the field, and we were upon them even to the entrance of the gate.11:24 And the shooters shot at your servants from off the wall; and some of the king's servants are dead, and your servant Uriah the Hittite is dead also.11:25 Then David said to the messenger, Thus shall you say to Joab, Let not this thing displease you, for the sword devours one as well as another; make your battle more strong against the city, and overthrow it: and encourage you him.11:26 And when the wife of Uriah heard that Uriah her husband was dead, she made lamentation for her husband.11:27 And when the mourning was past, David sent and took her home to his house, and she became his wife, and bore him a son.  But the thing that David had done displeased Yahweh.12:1 And Yahweh sent Nathan to David.  And he came to him, and said to him, There were two men in one city; the one rich, and the other poor.12:2 The rich man had exceedingly many flocks and herds;12:3 but the poor man had nothing, save one little ewe lamb, which he had bought and nourished up: and it grew up together with him, and with his children; it did eat of his own morsel, and drank of his own cup, and lay in his bosom, and was to him as a daughter.12:4 And there came a traveller to the rich man, and he spared to take of his own flock and of his own herd, to dress for the wayfaring man that was come to him, but took the poor man's lamb, and dressed it for the man that was come to him.12:5 And David's anger was greatly kindled against the man; and he said to Nathan, as Yahweh lives, the man that has done this is worthy to die:12:6 and he shall restore the lamb fourfold, because he did this thing, and because he had no pity.12:7 And Nathan said to David, You are the man.  Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, I anointed you king over Israel, and I delivered you out of the hand of Saul;12:8 and I gave you your master's house, and your master's wives into your bosom, and gave you the house of Israel and of Judah; and if that had been too little, I would have added to you such and such things.12:9 Why have you despised the word of Yahweh, to do that which is evil in his sight?  you have smitten Uriah the Hittite with the sword, and have taken his wife to be your wife, and have slain him with the sword of the children of Ammon.12:10 Now therefore the sword shall never depart from your house, because you have despised me, and have taken the wife of Uriah the Hittite to be your wife.12:11 Thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will raise up evil against you out of your own house; and I will take your wives before your eyes, and give them to your neighbor, and he shall lie with your wives in the sight of this sun.12:12 For you did it secretly: but I will do this thing before all Israel, and before the sun.12:13 And David said to Nathan, I have sinned against Yahweh.  And Nathan said to David, Yahweh also has put away your sin; you shall not die.12:14 However, because by this deed you have given great occasion to the enemies of Yahweh to blaspheme, the child also that is born to you shall surely die.12:15 And Nathan departed to his house.  And Yahweh struck the child that Uriah's wife bore to David, and it was very sick.12:16 David therefore besought God for the child; and David fasted, and went in, and lay all night upon the earth.12:17 And the elders of his house arose, and stood beside him, to raise him up from the earth: but he would not, neither did he eat bread with them.12:18 And it came to pass on the seventh day, that the child died.  And the servants of David feared to tell him that the child was dead; for they said, Behold, while the child was yet alive, we spoke to him, and he hearkened not to our voice: how will he then vex himself, if we tell him that the child is dead!12:19 But when David saw that his servants were whispering together, David perceived that the child was dead; and David said to his servants, Is the child dead?  And they said, He is dead.12:20 Then David arose from the earth, and washed, and anointed himself, and changed his apparel; and he came into the house of Yahweh, and worshipped: then he came to his own house; and when he required, they set bread before him, and he did eat.12:21 Then said his servants to him, What thing is this that you have done?  you did fast and weep for the child, while it was alive; but when the child was dead, you did rise and eat bread.12:22 And he said, While the child was yet alive, I fasted and wept: for I said, Who knows whether Yahweh will not be gracious to me, that the child may live?12:23 But now he is dead, why should I fast?  can I bring him back again?  I shall go to him, but he will not return to me.12:24 And David comforted Bathsheba his wife, and went in to her, and lay with her: and she bore a son, and he called his name Solomon.  And Yahweh loved him;12:25 and he sent by the hand of Nathan the prophet; and he called his name Jedidiah, for Yahweh's sake.12:26 Now Joab fought against Rabbah of the children of Ammon, and took the royal city.12:27 And Joab sent messengers to David, and said, I have fought against Rabbah; yes, I have taken the city of waters.12:28 Now therefore gather the rest of the people together, and encamp against the city, and take it; lest I take the city, and it be called after my name.12:29 And David gathered all the people together, and went to Rabbah, and fought against it, and took it.12:30 And he took the crown of their king from off his head; and the weight of it was a talent of gold, and in it were precious stones; and it was set on David's head.  And he brought forth the spoil of the city, exceedingly much.12:31 And he brought out the people that were in it, and put them under saws, and under harrows of iron, and under axes of iron, and made them pass through the brick kiln: and this is what he did to all the cities of the children of Ammon.  And David and all the people returned to Jerusalem.13:1 And it came to pass after this, that Absalom the son of David had a fair sister, whose name was Tamar; and Amnon the son of David loved her.13:2 And Amnon was so vexed that he fell sick because of his sister Tamar; for she was a virgin; and it seemed hard to Amnon to do anything to her.13:3 But Amnon had a friend, whose name was Jonadab, the son of Shimeah, David's brother; and Jonadab was a very subtle man.13:4 And he said to him, Why, O son of the king, are you thus lean from day to day?  will you not tell me?  And Amnon said to him, I love Tamar, my brother Absalom's sister.13:5 And Jonadab said to him, Lay you down on your bed, and feign yourself sick: and when your father comes to see you, say to him, Let my sister Tamar come, I pray you, and give me bread to eat, and dress the food in my sight, that I may see it, and eat it from her hand.13:6 So Amnon lay down, and feigned himself sick: and when the king was come to see him, amnon said to the king, Let her sister Tamar come, I pray you, and make me a couple of cakes in my sight, that I may eat from her hand.13:7 Then David sent home to Tamar, saying, Go now to your brother Amnon's house, and dress him food.13:8 So Tamar went to her brother Amnon's house; and he was laid down.  And she took dough, and kneaded it, and made cakes in his sight, and did bake the cakes.13:9 And she took the pan, and poured them out before him; but he refused to eat.  And Amnon said, Have out all men from me.  And they went out every man from him.13:10 And Amnon said to Tamar, Bring the food into the chamber, that I may eat from your hand.  And Tamar took the cakes which she had made, and brought them into the chamber to Amnon her brother.13:11 And when she had brought them near to him to eat, he took hold of her, and said to her, Come, lie with me, my sister.13:12 And she answered him, Nay, my brother, do not force me; for no such thing ought to be done in Israel: do not you this folly.13:13 And I, where shall I carry my shame?  and as for you, you will be as one of the fools in Israel.  Now therefore, I pray you, speak to the king; for he will not withhold me from you.13:14 But he would not hearken to her voice; but being stronger than she, he forced her, and lay with her.13:15 Then Amnon hated her with exceedingly great hatred; for the hatred with which he hated her was greater than the love with which he had loved her.  And Amnon said to her, arise, be gone.13:16 And she said to him, Not so, because this great wrong in putting me forth is worse than the other that you did to me.  But he would not hearken to her.13:17 Then he called his servant that ministered to him, and said, Put now this woman out from me, and bolt the door after her.13:18 And she had a garment of divers colors upon her; for with such robes were the king's daughters that were virgins apparelled.  Then his servant brought her out, and bolted the door after her.13:19 And Tamar put ashes on her head, and rent her garment of divers colors that was on her; and she laid her hand on her head, and went her way, crying aloud as she went.13:20 And Absalom her brother said to her, Has Amnon your brother been with you?  but now hold your peace, my sister: he is your brother; take not this thing to heart.  So Tamar remained desolate in her brother Absalom's house.13:21 But when king David heard of all these things, he was very angry.13:22 And Absalom spoke to Amnon neither good nor bad; for Absalom hated Amnon, because he had forced his sister Tamar.13:23 And it came to pass after two full years, that Absalom had sheep-shearers in Baal-hazor, which is beside Ephraim: and Absalom invited all the king's sons.13:24 And Absalom came to the king, and said, Behold now, your servant has sheep-shearers; let the king, I pray you, and his servants go with your servant.13:25 And the king said to Absalom, Nay, my son, let us not all go, lest we be burdensome to you.  And he pressed him: however, he would not go, but blessed him.13:26 Then said Absalom, If not, I pray you, let my brother Amnon go with us.  And the king said to him, Why should he go with you?13:27 But Absalom pressed him, and he let Amnon and all the king's sons go with him.13:28 And Absalom commanded his servants, saying, Mark ye now, when Amnon's heart is merry with wine; and when I say to you, Smite Amnon, then kill him; fear not; have not I commanded you?  be courageous, and be valiant.13:29 And the servants of Absalom did to Amnon as Absalom had commanded.  Then all the king's sons arose, and every man gat him up upon his mule, and fled.13:30 And it came to pass, while they were in the way, that the tidings came to David, saying, absalom has slain all the king's sons, and there is not one of them left.13:31 Then the king arose, and rent his garments, and lay on the earth; and all his servants stood by with their clothes rent.13:32 And Jonadab, the son of Shimeah, David's brother, answered and said, Let not my lord suppose that they have killed all the young men the king's sons; for Amnon only is dead; for by the appointment of Absalom this has been determined from the day that he forced his sister Tamar.13:33 Now therefore let not my lord the king take the thing to his heart, to think that all the king's sons are dead; for Amnon only is dead.13:34 But Absalom fled.  And the young man that kept the watch lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came much people by the way of the hill-side behind him.13:35 And Jonadab said to the king, Behold, the king's sons are come: as your servant said, so it is.13:36 And it came to pass, as soon as he had made an end of speaking, that, behold, the king's sons came, and lifted up their voice, and wept: and the king also and all his servants wept very sore.13:37 But Absalom fled, and went to Talmai the son of Ammihur, king of Geshur.  And David mourned for his son every day.13:38 So Absalom fled, and went to Geshur, and was there three years.13:39 And the soul of king David longed to go forth to Absalom: for he was comforted concerning Amnon, seeing he was dead.14:1 Now Joab the son of Zeruiah perceived that the king's heart was toward Absalom.14:2 And Joab sent to Tekoa, and fetched there a wise woman, and said to her, I pray you, feign yourself to be a mourner, and put on mourning apparel, I pray you, and anoint not yourself with oil, but be as a woman that has a long time mourned for the dead:14:3 and go in to the king, and speak on this manner to him.  So Joab put the words in her mouth.14:4 And when the woman of Tekoa spoke to the king, she fell on her face to the ground, and did obeisance, and said, Help, O king.14:5 And the king said to her, What ails you?  And she answered, Of a truth I am a widow, and my husband is dead.14:6 And your handmaid had two sons, and they two strove together in the field, and there was none to part them, but the one smote the other, and killed him.14:7 And, behold, the whole family is risen against your handmaid, and they say, Deliver him that smote his brother, that we may kill him for the life of his brother whom he slew, and so destroy the heir also.  Thus will they quench my coal which is left, and will leave to my husband neither name nor remainder upon the face of the earth.14:8 And the king said to the woman, Go to your house, and I will give charge concerning you.14:9 And the woman of Tekoa said to the king, My lord, O king, the iniquity be on me, and on my father's house; and the king and his throne be guiltless.14:10 And the king said, Whosoever says anything to you, bring him to me, and he shall not touch you any more.14:11 Then said she, I pray you, let the king remember Yahweh your God, that the avenger of blood destroy not any more, lest they destroy my son.  And he said, as Yahweh lives, there shall not one hair of your son fall to the earth.14:12 Then the woman said, Let your handmaid, I pray you, speak a word to my lord the king.  And he said, Say on.14:13 And the woman said, Why then have you devised such a thing against the people of God?  for in speaking this word the king is as one that is guilty, in that the king does not fetch home again his banished one.14:14 We must indeed die, and are as water split on the ground, which cannot be gathered up again; neither does God take away life, but devises means, that he that is banished be not an outcast from him.14:15 Now therefore seeing that I am come to speak this word to my lord the king, it is because the people have made me afraid: and your handmaid said, I will now speak to the king; it may be that the king will perform the request of his servant.14:16 For the king will hear, to deliver his servant out of the hand of the man that would destroy me and my son together out of the inheritance of God.14:17 Then your handmaid said, Let, I pray you, the word of my lord the king be comfortable; for as an angel of God, so is my lord the king to discern good and bad: and Yahweh your God be with you.14:18 Then the king answered and said to the woman, Hide not from me, I pray you, anything that I shall ask you.  And the woman said, Let my lord the king now speak.14:19 And the king said, Is the hand of Joab with you in all this?  And the woman answered and said, as your soul lives, my lord the king, none can turn to the right hand or to the left from anything that my lord the king has spoken; for your servant Joab, he commanded me, and he put all these words in the mouth of your handmaid;14:20 to change the face of the matter has your servant Joab done this thing: and my lord is wise, according to the wisdom of an angel of God, to know all things that are in the earth.14:21 And the king said to Joab, Behold now, I have done this thing: go therefore, bring the young man Absalom back.14:22 And Joab fell to the ground on his face, and did obeisance, and blessed the king: and Joab said, Today your servant knows that I have found favor in your sight, my lord, O king, in that the king has performed the request of his servant.14:23 So Joab arose and went to Geshur, and brought Absalom to Jerusalem.14:24 And the king said, Let him turn to his own house, but let him not see my face.  So Absalom turned to his own house, and saw not the king's face.14:25 Now in all Israel there was none to be so much praised as Absalom for his beauty: from the sole of his foot even to the crown of his head there was no blemish in him.14:26 And when he cut the hair of his head (now it was at every year's end that he cut it; because it was heavy on him, therefore he cut it); he weighed the hair of his head at two hundred shekels, after the king's weight.14:27 And to Absalom there were born three sons, and one daughter, whose name was Tamar: she was a woman of a fair countenance.14:28 And Absalom dwelt two full years in Jerusalem; and he saw not the king's face.14:29 Then Absalom sent for Joab, to send him to the king; but he would not come to him: and he sent again a second time, but he would not come.14:30 Therefore he said to his servants, See, Joab's field is near mine, and he has barley there; go and set it on fire.  And Absalom's servants set the field on fire.14:31 Then Joab arose, and came to Absalom to his house, and said to him, Why have your servants set my field on fire?14:32 And Absalom answered Joab, Behold, I sent to you, saying, Come here, that I may send you to the king, to say, Why am I come from Geshur?  it were better for me to be there still.  Now therefore let me see the king's face; and if there be iniquity in me, let him kill me.14:33 So Joab came to the king, and told him; and when he had called for Absalom, he came to the king, and bowed himself on his face to the ground before the king: and the king kissed Absalom.15:1 And it came to pass after this, that Absalom prepared him a chariot and horses, and fifty men to run before him.15:2 And Absalom rose up early, and stood beside the way of the gate: and it was so, that, when any man had a suit which should come to the king for judgment, then Absalom called to him, and said, Of what city are you?  And he said, Your servant is of one of the tribes of Israel.15:3 And Absalom said to him, See, your matters are good and right; but there is no man deputed of the king to hear you.15:4 Absalom said moreover, Oh that I were made judge in the land, that every man who has any suit or cause might come to me, and I would do him justice!15:5 And it was so, that, when any man came near to do him obeisance, he put forth his hand, and took hold of him, and kissed him.15:6 And on this manner did Absalom to all Israel that came to the king for judgment: so Absalom stole the hearts of the men of Israel.15:7 And it came to pass at the end of forty years, that Absalom said to the king, I pray you, let me go and pay my vow, which I have vowed to Yahweh, in Hebron.15:8 For your servant vowed a vow while I abode at Geshur in Syria, saying, If Yahweh shall indeed bring me again to Jerusalem, then I will serve Yahweh.15:9 And the king said to him, Go in peace.  So he arose, and went to Hebron.15:10 But Absalom sent spies throughout all the tribes of Israel, saying, as soon as ye hear the sound of the trumpet, then ye shall say, absalom is king in Hebron.15:11 And with Absalom went two hundred men out of Jerusalem, that were invited, and went in their simplicity; and they knew not anything.15:12 And Absalom sent for Ahithophel the Gilonite, David's counsellor, from his city, even from Giloh, while he was offering the sacrifices.  And the conspiracy was strong; for the people increased continually with Absalom.15:13 And there came a messenger to David, saying, The hearts of the men of Israel are after Absalom.15:14 And David said to all his servants that were with him at Jerusalem, arise, and let us flee; for else none of us shall escape from Absalom: make speed to depart, lest he overtake us quickly, and bring down evil upon us, and smite the city with the edge of the sword.15:15 And the king's servants said to the king, Behold, your servants are ready to do whatsoever my lord the king shall choose.15:16 And the king went forth, and all his household after him.  And the king left ten women, that were concubines, to keep the house.15:17 And the king went forth, and all the people after him; and they tarried in Beth-merhak.15:18 And all his servants passed on beside him; and all the Cherethites, and all the Pelethites, and all the Gittites, six hundred men that came after him from Gath, passed on before the king.15:19 Then said the king to Ittai the Gittite, Why go you also with us?  return, and abide with the king: for you are a foreigner, and also an exile; return to your own place.15:20 Whereas you came but yesterday, should I this day make you go up and down with us, seeing I go whither I may?  return you, and take back your brethren; mercy and truth be with you.15:21 And Ittai answered the king, and said, as Yahweh lives, and as my lord the king lives, surely in what place my lord the king shall be, whether for death or for life, even there also will your servant be.15:22 And David said to Ittai, Go and pass over.  And Ittai the Gittite passed over, and all his men, and all the little ones that were with him.15:23 And all the country wept with a loud voice, and all the people passed over: the king also himself passed over the brook Kidron, and all the people passed over, toward the way of the wilderness.15:24 And, lo, Zadok also came, and all the Levites with him, bearing the ark of the covenant of God; and they set down the ark of God; and Abiathar went up, until all the people had done passing out of the city.15:25 And the king said to Zadok, Carry back the ark of God into the city: if I shall find favor in the eyes of Yahweh, he will bring me again, and show me both it, and his habitation:15:26 but if he say thus, I have no delight in you; behold, here am I, let him do to me as seems good to him.15:27 The king said also to Zadok the priest, are you not a seer?  return into the city in peace, and your two sons with you, ahimaaz your son, and Jonathan the son of Abiathar.15:28 See, I will tarry at the fords of the wilderness, until there come word from you to certify me.15:29 Zadok therefore and Abiathar carried the ark of God again to Jerusalem: and they abode there.15:30 And David went up by the ascent of the mount of Olives, and wept as he went up; and he had his head covered, and went barefoot: and all the people that were with him covered each one his head, and they went up, weeping as they went up.15:31 And one told David, saying, ahithophel is among the conspirators with Absalom.  And David said, O Yahweh, I pray you, turn the counsel of Ahithophel into foolishness.15:32 And it came to pass, that, when David was come to the top of the ascent, where God was worshipped, behold, Hushai the Archite came to meet him with his coat rent, and earth upon his head.15:33 And David said to him, If you pass on with me, then you will be a burden to me:15:34 but if you return to the city, and say to Absalom, I will be your servant, O king; as I have been your father's servant in time past, so will I now be your servant; then will you defeat for me the counsel of Ahithophel.15:35 And have you not there with you Zadok and Abiathar the priests?  therefore it shall be, that what thing soever you shall hear out of the king's house, you shall tell it to Zadok and Abiathar the priests.15:36 Behold, they have there with them their two sons, ahimaaz, Zadok's son, and Jonathan, abiathar's son; and by them ye shall send to me everything that ye shall hear.15:37 So Hushai, David's friend, came into the city; and Absalom came into Jerusalem.16:1 And when David was a little past the top of the ascent, behold, Ziba the servant of Mephibosheth met him, with a couple of asses saddled, and upon them two hundred loaves of bread, and a hundred clusters of raisins, and a hundred of summer fruits, and a bottle of wine.16:2 And the king said to Ziba, What mean you by these?  And Ziba said, The asses are for the king's household to ride on; and the bread and summer fruit for the young men to eat; and the wine, that such as are faint in the wilderness may drink.16:3 And the king said, and where is your master's son?  And Ziba said to the king, Behold, he abides at Jerusalem; for he said, Today will the house of Israel restore me the kingdom of my father.16:4 Then said the king to Ziba, Behold, yours is all that belongs to Mephibosheth.  And Ziba said, I do obeisance; let me find favor in your sight, my lord, O king.16:5 And when king David came to Bahurim, behold, there came out there a man of the family of the house of Saul, whose name was Shimei, the son of Gera; he came out, and cursed still as he came.16:6 And he cast stones at David, and at all the servants of king David: and all the people and all the mighty men were on his right hand and on his left.16:7 And thus said Shimei when he cursed, Begone, begone, you man of blood, and base fellow:16:8 Yahweh has returned upon you all the blood of the house of Saul, in whose stead you have reigned; and Yahweh has delivered the kingdom into the hand of Absalom your son; and, behold, you are taken in your own mischief, because you are a man of blood.16:9 Then said Abishai the son of Zeruiah to the king, Why should this dead dog curse my lord the king?  let me go over, I pray you, and take off his head.16:10 And the king said, What have I to do with you, ye sons of Zeruiah?  Because he curseth, and because Yahweh has said to him, Curse David; who then shall say, Why have you done so?16:11 And David said to Abishai, and to all his servants, Behold, my son, who came forth from my bowels, seeks my life: how much more may this Benjamite now do it?  let him alone, and let him curse; for Yahweh has bidden him.16:12 It may be that Yahweh will look on the wrong done to me, and that Yahweh will requite me good for his cursing of me this day.16:13 So David and his men went by the way; and Shimei went along on the hill-side over against him, and cursed as he went, and threw stones at him, and cast dust.16:14 And the king, and all the people that were with him, came weary; and he refreshed himself there.16:15 And Absalom, and all the people, the men of Israel, came to Jerusalem, and Ahithophel with him.16:16 And it came to pass, when Hushai the Archite, David's friend, was come to Absalom, that Hushai said to Absalom, Long live the king, Long live the king.16:17 And Absalom said to Hushai, Is this your kindness to your friend?  why did you not go with your friend?16:18 And Hushai said to Absalom, Nay; but whom Yahweh, and this people, and all the men of Israel have chosen, his will I be, and with him will I abide.16:19 And again, whom should I serve?  should I not serve in the presence of his son?  as I have served in your father's presence, so will I be in your presence.16:20 Then said Absalom to Ahithophel, Give your counsel what we shall do.16:21 And Ahithophel said to Absalom, Go in to your father's concubines, that he has left to keep the house; and all Israel will hear that you are abhorred of your father: then will the hands of all that are with you be strong.16:22 So they spread Absalom a tent upon the top of the house; and Absalom went in to his father's concubines in the sight of all Israel.16:23 And the counsel of Ahithophel, which he gave in those days, was as if a man inquired at the oracle of God: so was all the counsel of Ahithophel both with David and with Absalom.17:1 Moreover Ahithophel said to Absalom, Let me now choose out twelve thousand men, and I will arise and pursue after David this night:17:2 and I will come upon him while he is weary and weak-handed, and will make him afraid; and all the people that are with him shall flee; and I will smite the king only;17:3 and I will bring back all the people to you: the man whom you seek is as if all returned: so all the people shall be in peace.17:4 And the saying pleased Absalom well, and all the elders of Israel.17:5 Then said Absalom, Call now Hushai the Archite also, and let us hear likewise what he says.17:6 And when Hushai was come to Absalom, absalom spoke to him, saying, ahithophel has spoken after this manner: shall we do after his saying?  if not, speak.17:7 And Hushai said to Absalom, The counsel that Ahithophel has given this time is not good.17:8 Hushai said moreover, You know your father and his men, that they are mighty men, and they are chafed in their minds, as a bear robbed of her whelps in the field; and your father is a man of war, and will not lodge with the people.17:9 Behold, he is hid now in some pit, or in some other place: and it will come to pass, when some of them are fallen at the first, that whosoever hears it will say, There is a slaughter among the people that follow Absalom.17:10 And even he that is valiant, whose heart is as the heart of a lion, will utterly melt; for all Israel knows that your father is a mighty man, and they that are with him are valiant men.17:11 But I counsel that all Israel be gathered together to you, from Dan even to Beer-sheba, as the sand that is by the sea for multitude; and that you go to battle in your own person.17:12 So shall we come upon him in some place where he shall be found, and we will light upon him as the dew falls on the ground; and of him and of all the men that are with him we will not leave so much as one.17:13 Moreover, if he be gotten into a city, then shall all Israel bring ropes to that city, and we will draw it into the river, until there be not one small stone found there.17:14 And Absalom and all the men of Israel said, The counsel of Hushai the Archite is better than the counsel of Ahithophel.  For Yahweh had ordained to defeat the good counsel of Ahithophel, to the intent that Yahweh might bring evil upon Absalom.17:15 Then said Hushai to Zadok and to Abiathar the priests, Thus and thus did Ahithophel counsel Absalom and the elders of Israel; and thus and thus have I counselled.17:16 Now therefore send quickly, and tell David, saying, Lodge not this night at the fords of the wilderness, but by all means pass over; lest the king be swallowed up, and all the people that are with him.17:17 Now Jonathan and Ahimaaz were staying by En-rogel; and a maid-servant used to go and tell them; and they went and told king David: for they might not be seen to come into the city.17:18 But a lad saw them, and told Absalom: and they went both of them away quickly, and came to the house of a man in Bahurim, who had a well in his court; and they went down there.17:19 And the woman took and spread the covering over the well's mouth, and strewed bruised grain upon it; and nothing was known.17:20 And Absalom's servants came to the woman to the house; and they said, Where are Ahimaaz and Jonathan?  And the woman said to them, They are gone over the brook of water.  And when they had sought and could not find them, they returned to Jerusalem.17:21 And it came to pass, after they were departed, that they came up out of the well, and went and told king David; and they said to David, arise ye, and pass quickly over the water; for thus has Ahithophel counselled against you.17:22 Then David arose, and all the people that were with him, and they passed over the Jordan: by the morning light there lacked not one of them that was not gone over the Jordan.17:23 And when Ahithophel saw that his counsel was not followed, he saddled his donkey, and arose, and gat him home, to his city, and set his house in order, and hanged himself; and he died, and was buried in the sepulchre of his father.17:24 Then David came to Mahanaim.  And Absalom passed over the Jordan, he and all the men of Israel with him.17:25 And Absalom set Amasa over the host instead of Joab.  Now Amasa was the son of a man, whose name was Ithra the Israelite, that went in to Abigal the daughter of Nahash, sister to Zeruiah, Joab's mother.17:26 And Israel and Absalom encamped in the land of Gilead.17:27 And it came to pass, when David was come to Mahanaim, that Shobi the son of Nahash of Rabbah of the children of Ammon, and Machir the son of Ammiel of Lodebar, and Barzillai the Gileadite of Rogelim,17:28 brought beds, and basins, and earthen vessels, and wheat, and barley, and meal, and parched grain, and beans, and lentils, and parched pulse,17:29 and honey, and butter, and sheep, and cheese of the herd, for David, and for the people that were with him, to eat: for they said, The people are hungry, and weary, and thirsty, in the wilderness.18:1 And David numbered the people that were with him, and set captains of thousands and captains of hundreds over them.18:2 And David sent forth the people, a third part under the hand of Joab, and a third part under the hand of Abishai the son of Zeruiah, Joab's brother, and a third part under the hand of Ittai the Gittite.  And the king said to the people, I will surely go forth with you myself also.18:3 But the people said, You shall not go forth: for if we flee away, they will not care for us; neither if half of us die, will they care for us: but you are worth ten thousand of us; therefore now it is better that you be ready to help us out of the city.18:4 And the king said to them, What seems to you best I will do.  And the king stood by the gate-side, and all the people went out by hundreds and by thousands.18:5 And the king commanded Joab and Abishai and Ittai, saying, Deal gently for my sake with the young man, that is, with Absalom.  And all the people heard when the king gave all the captains the command about Absalom.18:6 So the people went out into the field against Israel: and the battle was in the forest of Ephraim.18:7 And the people of Israel were smitten there before the servants of David, and there was a great slaughter there that day of twenty thousand men.18:8 For the battle was there spread over the face of all the country; and the forest devoured more people that day than the sword devoured.18:9 And Absalom chanced to meet the servants of David.  And Absalom was riding upon his mule, and the mule went under the thick boughs of a great oak, and his head caught hold of the oak, and he was taken up between heaven and earth; and the mule that was under him went on.18:10 And a man saw it, and told Joab, and said, Behold, I saw Absalom hanging in an oak.18:11 And Joab said to the man that told him, And, behold, you saw it, and why did you not smite him there to the ground?  and I would have given you ten pieces of silver, and a girdle.18:12 And the man said to Joab, Though I should receive a thousand pieces of silver in my hand, yet would I not put forth my hand against the king's son; for in our hearing the king charged you and Abishai and Ittai, saying, Beware that none touch the young man Absalom.18:13 Otherwise if I had dealt falsely against his life (and there is no matter hid from the king), then you yourself would have set yourself against me.18:14 Then said Joab, I may not tarry like this with you.  And he took three darts in his hand, and thrust them through the heart of Absalom, while he was yet alive in the midst of the oak.18:15 And ten young men that bore Joab's armor surrounded and attacked Absalom, and slew him.18:16 And Joab blew the trumpet, and the people returned from pursuing after Israel; for Joab held back the people.18:17 And they took Absalom, and cast him into the great pit in the forest, and raised over him a very great heap of stones: and all Israel fled every one to his tent.18:18 Now Absalom in his lifetime had taken and reared up for himself the pillar, which is in the king's dale; for he said, I have no son to keep my name in remembrance: and he called the pillar after his own name; and it is called Absalom's monument, to this day.18:19 Then said Ahimaaz the son of Zadok, Let me now run, and bear the king tidings, how that Yahweh has avenged him of his enemies.18:20 And Joab said to him, You shall not be the bearer of tidings this day, but you shall bear tidings another day; but this day you shall bear no tidings, because the king's son is dead.18:21 Then said Joab to the Cushite, Go, tell the king what you have seen.  And the Cushite bowed himself to Joab, and ran.18:22 Then said Ahimaaz the son of Zadok yet again to Joab, But come what may, let me, I pray you, also run after the Cushite.  And Joab said, Why will you run, my son, seeing that you will have no reward for the tidings?18:23 But come what may, said he, I will run.  And he said to him, Run.  Then Ahimaaz ran by the way of the Plain, and outran the Cushite.18:24 Now David was sitting between the two gates: and the watchman went up to the roof of the gate to the wall, and lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, a man running alone.18:25 And the watchman cried, and told the king.  And the king said, If he be alone, there is tidings in his mouth.  And he came apace, and drew near.18:26 And the watchman saw another man running; and the watchman called to the porter, and said, Behold, another man running alone.  And the king said, He also brings tidings.18:27 And the watchman said, I think the running of the foremost is like the running of Ahimaaz the son of Zadok.  And the king said, He is a good man, and comes with good tidings.18:28 And Ahimaaz called, and said to the king, all is well.  And he bowed himself before the king with his face to the earth, and said, Blessed be Yahweh your God, who has delivered up the men that lifted up their hand against my lord the king.18:29 And the king said, Is it well with the young man Absalom?  And Ahimaaz answered, When Joab sent the king's servant, even me your servant, I saw a great tumult, but I knew not what it was.18:30 And the king said, Turn aside, and stand here.  And he turned aside, and stood still.18:31 And, behold, the Cushite came; and the Cushite said, Tidings for my lord the king; for Yahweh has avenged you this day of all them that rose up against you.18:32 And the king said to the Cushite, Is it well with the young man Absalom?  And the Cushite answered, The enemies of my lord the king, and all that rise up against you to do you hurt, be as that young man is.18:33 And the king was much moved, and went up to the chamber over the gate, and wept: and as he went, thus he said, O my son Absalom, my son, my son Absalom! would I had died for you, O Absalom, my son, my son!19:1 And it was told Joab, Behold, the king weeps and mourns for Absalom.19:2 And the victory that day was turned into mourning to all the people; for the people heard say that day, The king grieves for his son.19:3 And the people gat them by stealth that day into the city, as people that are ashamed steal away when they flee in battle.19:4 And the king covered his face, and the king cried with a loud voice, O my son Absalom, O Absalom, my son, my son!19:5 And Joab came into the house to the king, and said, You have shamed this day the faces of all your servants, who this day have saved your life, and the lives of your sons and of your daughters, and the lives of your wives, and the lives of your concubines;19:6 in that you love them that hate you, and hate them that love you.  For you have declared this day, that princes and servants are nought to you: for this day I perceive, that if Absalom had lived, and all we had died this day, then it had pleased you well.19:7 Now therefore arise, go forth, and speak comfortably to your servants; for I swear by Yahweh, if you go not forth, there will not tarry a man with you this night: and that will be worse to you than all the evil that has befallen you from your youth until now.19:8 Then the king arose, and sat in the gate.  And they told to all the people, saying, Behold, the king is sitting in the gate: and all the people came before the king.  Now Israel had fled every man to his tent.19:9 And all the people were at strife throughout all the tribes of Israel, saying, The king delivered us out of the hand of our enemies, and he saved us out of the hand of the Philistines; and now he is fled out of the land from Absalom.19:10 And Absalom, whom we anointed over us, is dead in battle.  Now therefore why speak ye not a word of bringing the king back?19:11 And king David sent to Zadok and to Abiathar the priests, saying, Speak to the elders of Judah, saying, Why are ye the last to bring the king back to his house?  seeing the speech of all Israel is come to the king, to bring him to his house.19:12 You are my brethren, ye are my bone and my flesh: why then are ye the last to bring back the king?19:13 And say ye to Amasa, are you not my bone and my flesh?  God do so to me, and more also, if you be not captain of the host before me continually in the room of Joab.19:14 And he bowed the heart of all the men of Judah, even as the heart of one man; so that they sent to the king, saying, Return, and all your servants.19:15 So the king returned, and came to the Jordan.  And Judah came to Gilgal, to go to meet the king, to bring the king over the Jordan.19:16 And Shimei the son of Gera, the Benjamite, who was of Bahurim, hasted and came down with the men of Judah to meet king David.19:17 And there were a thousand men of Benjamin with him, and Ziba the servant of the house of Saul, and his fifteen sons and his twenty servants with him; and they went through the Jordan in the presence of the king.19:18 And there went over a ferry-boat to bring over the king's household, and to do what he thought good.  And Shimei the son of Gera fell down before the king, when he was come over the Jordan.19:19 And he said to the king, Let not my lord impute iniquity to me, nor remember that which your servant did perversely the day that my lord the king went out of Jerusalem, that the king should take it to his heart.19:20 For your servant does know that I have sinned: therefore, behold, I am come this day the first of all the house of Joseph to go down to meet my lord the king.19:21 But Abishai the son of Zeruiah answered and said, Shall not Shimei be put to death for this, because he cursed Yahweh's anointed?19:22 And David said, What have I to do with you, ye sons of Zeruiah, that ye should this day be adversaries to me?  shall there any man be put to death this day in Israel?  for do not I know that I am this day king over Israel?19:23 And the king said to Shimei, You shall not die.  And the king swore to him.19:24 And Mephibosheth the son of Saul came down to meet the king; and he had neither dressed his feet, nor trimmed his beard, nor washed his clothes, from the day the king departed until the day he came home in peace.19:25 And it came to pass, when he was come to Jerusalem to meet the king, that the king said to him, Why did you not go with me, Mephibosheth?19:26 And he answered, My lord, O king, my servant deceived me: for your servant said, I will saddle me a donkey, that I may ride upon it, and go with the king; because your servant is lame.19:27 And he has slandered your servant to my lord the king; but my lord the king is as an angel of God: do therefore what is good in your eyes.19:28 For all my father's house were but dead men before my lord the king; yet did you set your servant among them that did eat at your own table.  What right therefore have I yet that I should cry any more to the king?19:29 And the king said to him, Why speak any more of your matters?  I say, You and Ziba divide the land.19:30 And Mephibosheth said to the king, Let him in fact take it all, seeing as how my lord the king is come in peace to his own house.19:31 And Barzillai the Gileadite came down from Rogelim; and he went over the Jordan with the king, to conduct him over the Jordan.19:32 Now Barzillai was a very aged man, even 80 years old: and he had provided the king with sustenance while he lay at Mahanaim; for he was a very great man.19:33 And the king said to Barzillai, Come you over with me, and I will sustain you with me in Jerusalem.19:34 And Barzillai said to the king, How many are the days of the years of my life, that I should go up with the king to Jerusalem?19:35 I am this day 80 years old: can I discern between good and bad?  can your servant taste what I eat or what I drink?  can I hear any more the voice of singing men and singing women?  why then should your servant be yet a burden to my lord the king?19:36 Your servant would but just go over the Jordan with the king: and why should the king recompense it me with such a reward?19:37 Let your servant, I pray you, turn back again, that I may die in my own city, by the grave of my father and my mother.  But behold, your servant Chimham; let him go over with my lord the king; and do to him what shall seem good to you.19:38 And the king answered, Chimham shall go over with me, and I will do to him that which shall seem good to you: and whatsoever you shall require of me, that will I do for you.19:39 And all the people went over the Jordan, and the king went over: and the king kissed Barzillai, and blessed him; and he returned to his own place.19:40 So the king went over to Gilgal, and Chimham went over with him: and all the people of Judah brought the king over, and also half the people of Israel.19:41 And, behold, all the men of Israel came to the king, and said to the king, Why have our brethren the men of Judah stolen you away, and brought the king, and his household, over the Jordan, and all David's men with him?19:42 And all the men of Judah answered the men of Israel, Because the king is near of kin to us: why then are ye angry for this matter?  have we eaten at all at the king's cost?  or has he given us any gift?19:43 And the men of Israel answered the men of Judah, and said, We have ten parts in the king, and we have also more right in David than ye: why then did ye despise us, that our advice should not be first had in bringing back our king?  And the words of the men of Judah were fiercer than the words of the men of Israel.20:1 And there happened to be there a base fellow, whose name was Sheba, the son of Bichri, a Benjamite: and he blew the trumpet, and said, We have no portion in David, neither have we inheritance in the son of Jesse: every man to his tents, O Israel.20:2 So all the men of Israel went up from following David, and followed Sheba the son of Bichri; but the men of Judah clave to their king, from the Jordan even to Jerusalem.20:3 And David came to his house at Jerusalem; and the king took the ten women his concubines, whom he had left to keep the house, and put them in ward, and provided them with sustenance, but went not in to them.  So they were shut up to the day of their death, living in widowhood.20:4 Then said the king to Amasa, Call me the men of Judah together within three days, and be you here present.20:5 So Amasa went to call the men of Judah together; but he tarried longer than the set time which he had appointed him.20:6 And David said to Abishai, Now will Sheba the son of Bichri do us more harm than did Absalom: take you your lord's servants, and pursue after him, lest he get him fortified cities, and escape out of our sight.20:7 And there went out after him Joab's men, and the Cherethites and the Pelethites, and all the mighty men; and they went out of Jerusalem, to pursue after Sheba the son of Bichri.20:8 When they were at the great stone which is in Gibeon, amasa came to meet them.  And Joab was girded with his apparel of war that he had put on, and upon it was a girdle with a sword fastened upon his loins in the sheath thereof; and as he went forth it fell out.20:9 And Joab said to Amasa, Is it well with you, my brother?  And Joab took Amasa by the beard with his right hand to kiss him.20:10 But Amasa took no heed to the sword that was in Joab's hand: so he struck him with it in the body, and shed out his bowels to the ground, without striking a second blow; and he died.  And Joab and Abishai his brother pursued after Sheba the son of Bichri.20:11 And there stood by him one of Joab's young men, and said, He that favors Joab, and he that is for David, let him follow Joab.20:12 And Amasa lay wallowing in his blood in the midst of the highway.  And when the man saw that all the people stood still, he carried Amasa out of the highway into the field, and cast a garment over him, when he saw that every one that came by him stood still.20:13 When he was removed out of the highway, all the people went on after Joab, to pursue after Sheba the son of Bichri.20:14 And he went through all the tribes of Israel to Abel, and to Beth-maacah, and all the Berites: and they were gathered together, and went also after him.20:15 And they came and besieged him in Abel of Beth-maacah, and they cast up a mound against the city, and it stood against the rampart; and all the people that were with Joab battered the wall, to throw it down.20:16 Then cried a wise woman out of the city, Hear, hear; say, I pray you, to Joab, Come near here, that I may speak with you.20:17 And he came near to her; and the woman said, are you Joab?  And he answered, I am.  Then she said to him, Hear the words of your handmaid.  And he answered, I do hear.20:18 Then she spoke, saying, They were wont to speak in old time, saying, They shall surely ask counsel at Abel: and so they ended the matter.20:19 I am of them that are peaceable and faithful in Israel: you seek to destroy a city and a mother in Israel: why will you swallow up the inheritance of Yahweh?20:20 And Joab answered and said, Far be it, far be it from me, that I should swallow up or destroy.20:21 The matter is not so: but a man of the hill-country of Ephraim, Sheba the son of Bichri by name, has lifted up his hand against the king, even against David; deliver him only, and I will depart from the city.  And the woman said to Joab, Behold, his head shall be thrown to you over the wall.20:22 Then the woman went to all the people in her wisdom.  And they cut off the head of Sheba the son of Bichri, and threw it out to Joab.  And he blew the trumpet, and they were dispersed from the city, every man to his tent.  And Joab returned to Jerusalem to the king.20:23 Now Joab was over all the host of Israel; and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over the Cherethites and over the Pelethites;20:24 and Adoram was over the men subject to taskwork; and Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud was the recorder;20:25 and Sheva was scribe; and Zadok and Abiathar were priests;20:26 and also Ira the Jairite was chief minister to David.21:1 And there was a famine in the days of David three years, year after year; and David sought the face of Yahweh.  And Yahweh said, It is for Saul, and for his bloody house, because he put to death the Gibeonites.21:2 And the king called the Gibeonites, and said to them (now the Gibeonites were not of the children of Israel, but of the remnant of the Amorites; and the children of Israel had sworn to them: and Saul sought to slay them in his zeal for the children of Israel and Judah);21:3 and David said to the Gibeonites, What shall I do for you?  and with which shall I make atonement, that ye may bless the inheritance of Yahweh?21:4 And the Gibeonites said to him, It is no matter of silver or gold between us and Saul, or his house; neither is it for us to put any man to death in Israel.  And he said, What ye shall say, that will I do for you.21:5 And they said to the king, The man that consumed us, and that devised against us, that we should be destroyed from remaining in any of the borders of Israel,21:6 let seven men of his sons be delivered to us, and we will hang them up to Yahweh in Gibeah of Saul, the chosen of Yahweh.  And the king said, I will give them.21:7 But the king spared Mephibosheth, the son of Jonathan the son of Saul, because of Yahweh's oath that was between them, between David and Jonathan the son of Saul.21:8 But the king took the two sons of Rizpah the daughter of Aiah, whom she bore to Saul, armoni and Mephibosheth; and the five sons of Michal the daughter of Saul, whom she bore to Adriel the son of Barzillai the Meholathite:21:9 And he delivered them into the hands of the Gibeonites, and they hanged them in the mountain before Yahweh, and they fell all seven together.  And they were put to death in the days of harvest, in the first days, at the beginning of barley harvest.21:10 And Rizpah the daughter of Aiah took sackcloth, and spread it for her upon the rock, from the beginning of harvest until water was poured upon them from heaven; and she allowed neither the birds of the heavens to rest on them by day, nor the beasts of the field by night.21:11 And it was told David what Rizpah the daughter of Aiah, the concubine of Saul, had done.21:12 And David went and took the bones of Saul and the bones of Jonathan his son from the men of Jabesh-gilead, who had stolen them from the street of Beth-shan, where the Philistines had hanged them, in the day that the Philistines slew Saul in Gilboa;21:13 and he brought up from there the bones of Saul and the bones of Jonathan his son: and they gathered the bones of them that were hanged.21:14 And they buried the bones of Saul and Jonathan his son in the country of Benjamin in Zela, in the sepulchre of Kish his father: and they performed all that the king commanded.  And after that God was entreated for the land.21:15 And the Philistines had war again with Israel; and David went down, and his servants with him, and fought against the Philistines.  And David became faint;21:16 and Ishbibenob, who was of the sons of the giant, the weight of whose spear was three hundred shekels of brass in weight, he being girded with a new sword, thought to have slain David.21:17 But Abishai the son of Zeruiah succored him, and smote the Philistine, and killed him.  Then the men of David swore to him, saying, You shall go no more out with us to battle, that you quench not the lamp of Israel.21:18 And it came to pass after this, that there was again war with the Philistines at Gob: then Sibbecai the Hushathite slew Saph, who was of the sons of the giant.21:19 And there was again war with the Philistines at Gob; and Elhanan the son of Jaareoregim the Beth-lehemite slew Goliath the Gittite, the staff of whose spear was like a weaver's beam.21:20 And there was again war at Gath, where was a man of great stature, that had on every hand six fingers, and on every foot six toes, four and twenty in number; and he also was born to the giant.21:21 And when he defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimei, David's brother, slew him.21:22 These four were born to the giant in Gath; and they fell by the hand of David, and by the hand of his servants.22:1 And David spoke to Yahweh the words of this song in the day that Yahweh delivered him out of the hand of all his enemies, and out of the hand of Saul:22:2 and he said, Yahweh is my rock, and my fortress, and my deliverer, even mine;22:3 God, my rock, in him will I take refuge; My shield, and the horn of my salvation, my high tower, and my refuge; My saviour, you save me from violence.22:4 I will call upon Yahweh, who is worthy to be praised: So shall I be saved from my enemies.22:5 For the waves of death surrounded me; The floods of ungodliness made me afraid:22:6 The cords of Sheol were round about me; The snares of death came upon me.22:7 In my distress I called upon Yahweh; Yes, I called to my God: And he heard my voice out of his temple, and my cry came into his ears.22:8 Then the earth shook and trembled, The foundations of heaven quaked And were shaken, because he was angry.22:9 There went up a smoke out of his nostrils, and fire out of his mouth devoured: Coals were kindled by it.22:10 He bowed the heavens also, and came down; And thick darkness was under his feet.22:11 And he rode upon a cherub, and did fly; And he was seen upon the wings of the wind.22:12 And he made darkness pavilions round about him, Gathering of waters, thick clouds of the skies.22:13 At the brightness before him Coals of fire were kindled.22:14 Yahweh thundered from heaven, and the Most High uttered his voice.22:15 And he sent out arrows, and scattered them; Lightning, and discomfited them.22:16 Then the channels of the sea appeared, The foundations of the world were laid bare, By the rebuke of Yahweh, at the blast of the breath of his nostrils.22:17 He sent from on high, he took me; He drew me out of many waters;22:18 He delivered me from my strong enemy, From them that hated me; for they were too mighty for me.22:19 They came upon me in the day of my calamity; But Yahweh was my stay.22:20 He brought me forth also into a large place; He delivered me, because he delighted in me.22:21 Yahweh rewarded me according to my righteousness; According to the cleanness of my hands has he recompensed me.22:22 For I have kept the ways of Yahweh, and have not wickedly departed from my God.22:23 For all his ordinances were before me; And as for his statutes, I did not depart from them.22:24 I was also perfect toward him; And I kept myself from my iniquity.22:25 Therefore has Yahweh recompensed me according to my righteousness, according to my cleanness in his eyesight.22:26 With the merciful you will show yourself merciful; With the perfect man you will show yourself perfect;22:27 With the pure you will show yourself pure; And with the perverse you will show yourself froward.22:28 And the afflicted people you will save; But your eyes are upon the haughty, that you may bring them down.22:29 For you are my lamp, O Yahweh; And Yahweh will lighten my darkness.22:30 For by you I run upon a troop; By my God do I leap over a wall.22:31 As for God, his way is perfect: The word of Yahweh is tried; He is a shield to all them that take refuge in him.22:32 For who is God, save Yahweh?  And who is a rock, save our God?22:33 God is my strong fortress; And he guides the perfect in his way.22:34 He makes his feet like hinds' feet, and sets me upon my high places.22:35 He teaches my hands to war, So that my arms do bend a bow of brass.22:36 You have also given me the shield of your salvation; And your gentleness has made me great.22:37 You have enlarged my steps under me; And my feet have not slipped.22:38 I have pursued my enemies, and destroyed them; Neither did I turn again till they were consumed.22:39 And I have consumed them, and smitten them through, so that they cannot arise: Yes, they are fallen under my feet.22:40 For you have girded me with strength to the battle; You have subdued under me those that rose up against me.22:41 You have also made my enemies turn their backs to me, That I might cut off them that hate me.22:42 They looked, but there was none to save; Even to Yahweh, but he answered them not.22:43 Then did I beat them small as the dust of the earth, I did crush them as the mire of the streets, and did spread them abroad.22:44 You also have delivered me from the strivings of my people; You have kept me to be the head of the nations: A people whom I have not known shall serve me.22:45 The foreigners shall submit themselves to me: As soon as they hear of me, they shall obey me.22:46 The foreigners shall fade away, and shall come trembling out of their close places.22:47 Yahweh lives; And blessed be my rock; And exalted be God, the rock of my salvation,22:48 Even the God that executes vengeance for me, and that brings down peoples under me,22:49 And that brings me forth from my enemies: Yes, you lift me up above them that rise up against me; You deliver me from the violent man.22:50 Therefore I will give thanks to you, O Yahweh, among the nations, and will sing praises to your name.22:51 Great deliverance gives he to his king, and shows lovingkindness to his anointed, To David and to his seed, for evermore.23:1 Now these are the last words of David.  David the son of Jesse says, and the man who was raised on high says, The anointed of the God of Jacob, and the sweet psalmist of Israel:23:2 The Spirit of Yahweh spoke by me, and his word was upon my tongue.23:3 The God of Israel said, The Rock of Israel spoke to me: One that rules over men righteously, That rules in the fear of God,23:4 He shall be as the light of the morning, when the sun rises, a morning without clouds, When the tender grass springs out of the earth, Through clear shining after rain.23:5 Verily my house is not so with God; Yet he has made with me an everlasting covenant, Ordered in all things, and sure: For it is all my salvation, and all my desire, although he makes it not to grow.23:6 But the ungodly shall be all of them as thorns to be thrust away, Because they cannot be taken with the hand 23:7 But the man that touches them Must be armed with iron and the staff of a spear: And they shall be utterly burned with fire in their place23:8 These are the names of the mighty men whom David had: Josheb-basshebeth a Tahchemonite, chief of the captains; the same was Adino the Eznite, against eight hundred slain at one time.23:9 And after him was Eleazar the son of Dodai the son of an Ahohite, one of the three mighty men with David, when they defied the Philistines that were there gathered together to battle, and the men of Israel were gone away.23:10 He arose, and smote the Philistines until his hand was weary, and his hand clave to the sword; and Yahweh wrought a great victory that day; and the people returned after him only to take spoil.23:11 And after him was Shammah the son of Agee a Hararite.  And the Philistines were gathered together into a troop, where was a plot of ground full of lentils; and the people fled from the Philistines.23:12 But he stood in the midst of the plot, and defended it, and slew the Philistines; and Yahweh wrought a great victory.23:13 And three of the thirty chief men went down, and came to David in the harvest time to the cave of Adullam; and the troop of the Philistines was encamped in the valley of Rephaim.23:14 And David was then in the stronghold; and the garrison of the Philistines was then in Beth-lehem.23:15 And David longed, and said, Oh that one would give me water to drink of the well of Beth-lehem, which is by the gate!23:16 And the three mighty men broke through the host of the Philistines, and drew water out of the well of Beth-lehem, that was by the gate, and took it, and brought it to David: but he would not drink thereof, but poured it out to Yahweh.23:17 And he said, Be it far from me, O Yahweh, that I should do this: shall I drink the blood of the men that went in jeopardy of their lives?  therefore he would not drink it.  These things did the three mighty men.23:18 And Abishai, the brother of Joab, the son of Zeruiah, was chief of the three.  And he lifted up his spear against three hundred and slew them, and had a name among the three.23:19 Was he not most honorable of the thirty?  therefore he was made their captain: nevertheless he attained not to the first three.23:20 And Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, the son of a valiant man of Kabzeel, who had done mighty deeds, he slew the two sons of Ariel of Moab: he went down also and slew a lion in the midst of a pit in time of snow.23:21 And he slew an Egyptian, a goodly man: and the Egyptian had a spear in his hand; but he went down to him with a staff, and plucked the spear out of the Egyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear.23:22 These things did Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and had a name among the three mighty men.23:23 He was more honorable than the thirty, but he attained not to the first three.  And David set him over his guard.23:24 Asahel the brother of Joab was one of the thirty; Elhanan the son of Dodo of Beth-lehem,23:25 Shammah the Harodite, Elika the Harodite,23:26 Helez the Paltite, Ira the son of Ikkesh the Tekoite,23:27 Abiezer the Anathothite, Mebunnai the Hushathite,23:28 Zalmon the Ahohite, Maharai the Netophathite,23:29 Heleb the son of Baanah the Netophathite, Ittai the son of Ribai of Gibeah of the children of Benjamin,23:30 Benaiah a Pirathonite, Hiddai of the brooks of Gaash.23:31 Abialbon the Arbathite, azmaveth the Barhumite,23:32 Eliahba the Shaalbonite, the sons of Jashen, Jonathan,23:33 Shammah the Hararite, ahiam the son of Sharar the Ararite,23:34 Eliphelet the son of Ahasbai, the son of the Maacathite, Eliam the son of Ahithophel the Gilonite,23:35 Hezro the Carmelite, Paarai the Arbite,23:36 Igal the son of Nathan of Zobah, Bani the Gadite,23:37 Zelek the Ammonite, Naharai the Beerothite, armorbearers to Joab the son of Zeruiah,23:38 Ira the Ithrite, Gareb the Ithrite,23:39 Uriah the Hittite: thirty and seven in all.24:1 And again the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Israel, and he moved David against them, saying, Go, number Israel and Judah.24:2 And the king said to Joab the captain of the host, who was with him, Go now to and fro through all the tribes of Israel, from Dan even to Beer-sheba, and number ye the people, that I may know the sum of the people.24:3 And Joab said to the king, Now Yahweh your God add to the people, how many soever they may be, a hundredfold; and may the eyes of my lord the king see it: but why does my lord the king delight in this thing?24:4 Notwithstanding, the king's word prevailed against Joab, and against the captains of the host.  And Joab and the captains of the host went out from the presence of the king, to number the people of Israel.24:5 And they passed over the Jordan, and encamped in Aroer, on the right side of the city that is in the middle of the valley of Gad, and to Jazer:24:6 then they came to Gilead, and to the land of Tahtim-hodshi; and they came to Dan-jaan, and round about to Sidon,24:7 and came to the stronghold of Tyre, and to all the cities of the Hivites, and of the Canaanites; and they went out to the south of Judah, at Beer-sheba.24:8 So when they had gone to and from through all the land, they came to Jerusalem at the end of nine months and twenty days.24:9 And Joab gave up the sum of the numbering of the people to the king: and there were in Israel eight hundred thousand valiant men that drew the sword; and the men of Judah were five hundred thousand men.24:10 And David's heart smote him after that he had numbered the people.  And David said to Yahweh, I have sinned greatly in that which I have done: but now, O Yahweh, put away, I beseech you, the iniquity of your servant; for I have done very foolishly.24:11 And when David rose up in the morning, the word of Yahweh came to the prophet Gad, David's seer, saying,24:12 Go and speak to David, Thus says Yahweh, I offer you three things: choose you one of them, that I may do it to you.24:13 So Gad came to David, and told him, and said to him, Shall seven years of famine come to you in your land?  or will you flee three months before your foes while they pursue you?  or shall there be three days' pestilence in your land?  now advise you, and consider what answer I shall return to him that sent me.24:14 And David said to Gad, I am in a great strait: let us fall now into the hand of Yahweh; for his mercies are great; and let me not fall into the hand of man.24:15 So Yahweh sent a pestilence upon Israel from the morning even to the time appointed; and there died of the people from Dan even to Beer-sheba seventy thousand men.24:16 And when the angel stretched out his hand toward Jerusalem to destroy it, Yahweh repented him of the evil, and said to the angel that destroyed the people, It is enough; now stay your hand.  And the angel of Yahweh was by the threshing-floor of Araunah the Jebusite.24:17 And David spoke to Yahweh when he saw the angel that smote the people, and said, Lo, I have sinned, and I have done perversely; but these sheep, what have they done?  let your hand, I pray you, be against me, and against my father's house.24:18 And Gad came that day to David, and said to him, Go up, rear an altar to Yahweh in the threshing-floor of Araunah the Jebusite.24:19 And David went up according to the saying of Gad, as Yahweh commanded.24:20 And Araunah looked forth, and saw the king and his servants coming on toward him: and Araunah went out, and bowed himself before the king with his face to the ground.24:21 And Araunah said, Why is my lord the king come to his servant?  And David said, To buy the threshing-floor of you, to build an altar to Yahweh, that the plague may be stayed from the people.24:22 And Araunah said to David, Let my lord the king take and offer up what seems good to him: behold, the oxen for the burnt offering, and the threshing instruments and the yokes of the oxen for the wood:24:23 all this, O king, does Araunah give to the king.  And Araunah said to the king, Yahweh your God accept you.24:24 And the king said to Araunah, Nay; but I will verily buy it of you at a price.  Neither will I offer burnt offerings to Yahweh my God which cost me nothing.  So David bought the threshing-floor and the oxen for fifty shekels of silver.24:25 And David built there an altar to Yahweh, and offered burnt offerings and peace offerings.  So Yahweh was entreated for the land, and the plague was stayed from Israel.End of 2 Samuel1 Kings1:1 Now king David was old and stricken in years; and they covered him with clothes, but he gat no heat.1:2 Wherefore his servants said to him, Let there be sought for my lord the king a young virgin: and let her stand before the king, and cherish him; and let her lie in your bosom, that my lord the king may get heat.1:3 So they sought for a fair damsel throughout all the borders of Israel, and found Abishag the Shunammite, and brought her to the king.1:4 And the damsel was very fair; and she cherished the king, and ministered to him; but the king knew her not.1:5 Then Adonijah the son of Haggith exalted himself, saying, I will be king: and he prepared him chariots and horsemen, and fifty men to run before him.1:6 And his father had not displeased him at any time in saying, Why have you done so?  and he was also a very goodly man; and he was born after Absalom.1:7 And he conferred with Joab the son of Zeruiah, and with Abiathar the priest: and they following Adonijah helped him.1:8 But Zadok the priest, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and Nathan the prophet, and Shimei, and Rei, and the mighty men that belonged to David, were not with Adonijah.1:9 And Adonijah slew sheep and oxen and fatlings by the stone of Zoheleth, which is beside En-rogel; and he called all his brethren, the king's sons, and all the men of Judah, the king's servants:1:10 but Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah, and the mighty men, and Solomon his brother, he called not.1:11 Then Nathan spoke to Bathsheba the mother of Solomon, saying, Have you not heard that Adonijah the son of Haggith does reign, and David our lord knows it not?1:12 Now therefore come, let me, I pray you, give you counsel, that you may save your own life, and the life of your son Solomon.1:13 Go in at once to king David, and say to him, Did not you, my lord, O king, swear to your handmaid, saying, assuredly Solomon your son shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne?  why then does Adonijah reign?1:14 Behold, while you yet talk there with the king, I also will come in after you, and confirm your words.1:15 And Bathsheba went in to the king into the chamber: and the king was very old; and Abishag the Shunammite was ministering to the king.1:16 And Bathsheba bowed, and did obeisance to the king.  And the king said, What would you?1:17 And she said to him, My lord, you swore by Yahweh your God to your handmaid, saying, assuredly Solomon your son shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne.1:18 And now, behold, adonijah reigns; and you, my lord the king, know it not:1:19 and he has slain oxen and fatlings and sheep in abundance, and has called all the sons of the king, and Abiathar the priest, and Joab the captain of the host; but Solomon your servant has he not called.1:20 And you, my lord the king, the eyes of all Israel are upon you, that you should tell them who shall sit on the throne of my lord the king after him.1:21 Otherwise it will come to pass, when my lord the king shall sleep with his fathers, that I and my son Solomon shall be counted offenders.1:22 And, lo, while she yet talked with the king, Nathan the prophet came in.1:23 And they told the king, saying, Behold, Nathan the prophet.  And when he was come in before the king, he bowed himself before the king with his face to the ground.1:24 And Nathan said, My lord, O king, have you said, adonijah shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne?1:25 For he is gone down this day, and has slain oxen and fatlings and sheep in abundance, and has called all the king's sons, and the captains of the host, and Abiathar the priest; and, behold, they are eating and drinking before him, and say, Long live king Adonijah.1:26 But me, even me your servant, and Zadok the priest, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and your servant Solomon, has he not called.1:27 Is this thing done by my lord the king, and you have not shown to your servants who should sit on the throne of my lord the king after him?1:28 Then king David answered and said, Call to me Bathsheba.  And she came into the king's presence, and stood before the king.1:29 And the king swore, and said, as Yahweh lives, who has redeemed my soul out of all adversity,1:30 verily as I swore to you by Yahweh, the God of Israel, saying, assuredly Solomon your son shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne in my stead; verily so will I do this day.1:31 Then Bathsheba bowed with her face to the earth, and did obeisance to the king, and said, Let my lord king David live for ever.1:32 And king David said, Call to me Zadok the priest, and Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada.  And they came before the king.1:33 And the king said to them, Take with you the servants of your lord, and cause Solomon my son to ride upon my own mule, and bring him down to Gihon:1:34 and let Zadok the priest and Nathan the prophet anoint him there king over Israel; and blow ye the trumpet, and say, Long live king Solomon.1:35 Then ye shall come up after him, and he shall come and sit upon my throne; for he shall be king in my stead; and I have appointed him to be prince over Israel and over Judah.1:36 And Benaiah the son of Jehoiada answered the king, and said, amen: Yahweh, the God of my lord the king, say so too.1:37 As Yahweh has been with my lord the king, even so be he with Solomon, and make his throne greater than the throne of my lord king David.1:38 So Zadok the priest, and Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and the Cherethites and the Pelethites, went down, and caused Solomon to ride upon king David's mule, and brought him to Gihon.1:39 And Zadok the priest took the horn of oil out of the Tent, and anointed Solomon.  And they blew the trumpet; and all the people said, Long live king Solomon.1:40 And all the people came up after him, and the people piped with pipes, and rejoiced with great joy, so that the earth rent with the sound of them.1:41 And Adonijah and all the guests that were with him heard it as they had made an end of eating.  And when Joab heard the sound of the trumpet, he said, Why is this noise of the city being in an uproar?1:42 While he yet spoke, behold, Jonathan the son of Abiathar the priest came: and Adonijah said, Come in; for you are a worthy man, and bring good tidings.1:43 And Jonathan answered and said to Adonijah, Verily our lord king David has made Solomon king:1:44 and the king has sent with him Zadok the priest, and Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and the Cherethites and the Pelethites; and they have caused him to ride upon the king's mule;1:45 and Zadok the priest and Nathan the prophet have anointed him king in Gihon; and they are come up from there rejoicing, so that the city rang again.  This is the noise that ye have heard.1:46 And also Solomon sits on the throne of the kingdom.1:47 And moreover the king's servants came to bless our lord king David, saying, Your God make the name of Solomon better than your name, and make his throne greater than your throne: and the king bowed himself upon the bed.1:48 And also thus said the king, Blessed be Yahweh, the God of Israel, who has given one to sit on my throne this day, my eyes even seeing it.1:49 And all the guests of Adonijah were afraid, and rose up, and went every man his way.1:50 And Adonijah feared because of Solomon; and he arose, and went, and caught hold on the horns of the altar.1:51 And it was told Solomon, saying, Behold, adonijah fears king Solomon; for, lo, he has laid hold on the horns of the altar, saying, Let king Solomon swear to me first that he will not slay his servant with the sword.1:52 And Solomon said, If he shall show himself a worthy man, there shall not a hair of him fall to the earth; but if wickedness be found in him, he shall die.1:53 So king Solomon sent, and they brought him down from the altar.  And he came and did obeisance to king Solomon; and Solomon said to him, Go to your house.2:1 Now the days of David drew near that he should die; and he charged Solomon his son, saying,2:2 I am going the way of all the earth: be you strong therefore, and show yourself a man;2:3 and keep the charge of Yahweh your God, to walk in his ways, to keep his statutes, and his commandments, and his ordinances, and his testimonies, according to that which is written in the law of Moses, that you may prosper in all that you do, and wherever you turn yourself.2:4 That Yahweh may establish his word which he spoke concerning me, saying, If your children take heed to their way, to walk before me in truth with all their heart and with all their soul, there shall not fail you (said he) a man on the throne of Israel.2:5 Moreover you know also what Joab the son of Zeruiah did to me, even what he did to the two captains of the hosts of Israel, to Abner the son of Ner, and to Amasa the son of Jether, whom he slew, and shed the blood of war in peace, and put the blood of war upon his girdle that was about his loins, and in his shoes that were on his feet.2:6 Do therefore according to your wisdom, and let not his gray head go down to Sheol in peace.2:7 But show kindness to the sons of Barzillai the Gileadite, and let them be of those that eat at your table; for so they came to me when I fled from Absalom your brother.2:8 And, behold, there is with you Shimei the son of Gera, the Benjamite, of Bahurim, who cursed me with a grievous curse in the day when I went to Mahanaim; but he came down to meet me at the Jordan, and I swore to him by Yahweh, saying, I will not put you to death with the sword.2:9 Now therefore hold him not guiltless, for you are a wise man; and you will know what you ought to do to him, and you shall bring his gray head down to Sheol with blood.2:10 And David slept with his fathers, and was buried in the city of David.2:11 And the days that David reigned over Israel were forty years; seven years reigned he in Hebron, and thirty and three years reigned he in Jerusalem.2:12 And Solomon sat upon the throne of David his father; and his kingdom was established greatly.2:13 Then Adonijah the son of Haggith came to Bathsheba the mother of Solomon.  And she said, Come you peaceably?  And he said, Peaceably.2:14 He said moreover, I have somewhat to say to you.  And she said, Say on.2:15 And he said, You know that the kingdom was mine, and that all Israel set their faces on me, that I should reign: however, the kingdom is turned about, and is become my brother's; for it was his from Yahweh.2:16 And now I ask one petition of you; deny me not.  And she said to him, Say on.2:17 And he said, Speak, I pray you, to Solomon the king (for he will not say you nay), that he give me Abishag the Shunammite to wife.2:18 And Bathsheba said, Well; I will speak for you to the king.2:19 Bathsheba therefore went to king Solomon, to speak to him for Adonijah.  And the king rose up to meet her, and bowed himself to her, and sat down on his throne, and caused a throne to be set for the king's mother; and she sat on his right hand.2:20 Then she said, I ask one small petition of you; deny me not.  And the king said to her, ask on, my mother; for I will not deny you.2:21 And she said, Let Abishag the Shunammite be given to Adonijah your brother to wife.2:22 And king Solomon answered and said to his mother, and why do you ask Abishag the Shunammite for Adonijah?  ask for him the kingdom also; for he is my elder brother; even for him, and for Abiathar the priest, and for Joab the son of Zeruiah.2:23 Then king Solomon swore by Yahweh, saying, God do so to me, and more also, if Adonijah has not spoken this word against his own life.2:24 Now therefore as Yahweh lives, who has established me, and set me on the throne of David my father, and who has made me a house, as he promised, surely Adonijah shall be put to death this day.2:25 And king Solomon sent by Benaiah the son of Jehoiada; and he fell upon him, so that he died.2:26 And to Abiathar the priest said the king, Get you to Anathoth, to your own fields; for you are worthy of death: but I will not at this time put you to death, because you bore the ark of the Lord Yahweh before David my father, and because you were afflicted in all in which my father was afflicted.2:27 So Solomon thrust out Abiathar from being priest to Yahweh, that he might fulfil the word of Yahweh, which he spoke concerning the house of Eli in Shiloh.2:28 And the tidings came to Joab; for Joab had turned after Adonijah, though he turned not after Absalom.  And Joab fled to the Tent of Yahweh, and caught hold on the horns of the altar.2:29 And it was told king Solomon, Joab is fled to the Tent of Yahweh, and, behold, he is by the altar.  Then Solomon sent Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, saying, Go, fall upon him.2:30 And Benaiah came to the Tent of Yahweh, and said to him, Thus says the king, Come forth.  And he said, Nay; but I will die here.  And Benaiah brought the king word again, saying, Thus said Joab, and thus he answered me.2:31 And the king said to him, Do as he has said, and fall upon him, and bury him; that you may take away the blood, which Joab shed without cause, from me and from my father's house.2:32 And Yahweh will return his blood upon his own head, because with my father David knowing it not, he fell upon two men more righteous and better than he, and slew them with the sword: Abner the son of Ner, captain of the host of Israel, and Amasa the son of Jether, captain of the host of Judah.2:33 So shall their blood return upon the head of Joab, and upon the head of his seed for ever: but to David, and to his seed, and to his house, and to his throne, shall there be peace for ever from Yahweh.2:34 Then Benaiah the son of Jehoiada went up, and fell upon him, and slew him; and he was buried in his own house in the wilderness.2:35 And the king put Benaiah the son of Jehoiada in his room over the host; and Zadok the priest did the king put in the room of Abiathar.2:36 And the king sent and called for Shimei, and said to him, Build you a house in Jerusalem, and dwell there, and go not forth there any whither.2:37 For on the day you go out, and pass over the brook Kidron, know for certain that you shall surely die: your blood shall be upon your own head.2:38 And Shimei said to the king, The saying is good: as my lord the king has said, so will your servant do.  And Shimei dwelt in Jerusalem many days.2:39 And it came to pass at the end of three years, that two of the servants of Shimei ran away to Achish, son of Maacah, king of Gath.  And they told Shimei, saying, Behold, your servants are in Gath.2:40 And Shimei arose, and saddled his donkey, and went to Gath to Achish, to seek his servants; and Shimei went, and brought his servants from Gath.2:41 And it was told Solomon that Shimei had gone from Jerusalem to Gath, and was come again.2:42 And the king sent and called for Shimei, and said to him, Did I not adjure you by Yahweh, and protest to you, saying, Know for certain, that on the day you go out, and walk abroad any whither, you shall surely die?  and you said to me, The saying that I have heard is good.2:43 Why then have you not kept the oath of Yahweh, and the commandment that I have charged you with?2:44 The king said moreover to Shimei, You know all the wickedness which your heart is privy to, that you did to David my father: therefore Yahweh shall return your wickedness upon your own head.2:45 But king Solomon shall be blessed, and the throne of David shall be established before Yahweh for ever.2:46 So the king commanded Benaiah the son of Jehoiada; and he went out, and fell upon him, so that he died.  And the kingdom was established in the hand of Solomon.3:1 And Solomon made affinity with Pharaoh king of Egypt, and took Pharaoh's daughter, and brought her into the city of David, until he had made an end of building his own house, and the house of Yahweh, and the wall of Jerusalem round about.3:2 Only the people sacrificed in the high places, because there was no house built for the name of Yahweh until those days.3:3 And Solomon loved Yahweh, walking in the statutes of David his father: only he sacrificed and burnt incense in the high places.3:4 And the king went to Gibeon to sacrifice there; for that was the great high place: a thousand burnt offerings did Solomon offer upon that altar.3:5 In Gibeon Yahweh appeared to Solomon in a dream by night; and God said, ask what I shall give you.3:6 And Solomon said, You have shown to your servant David my father great lovingkindness, according as he walked before you in truth, and in righteousness, and in uprightness of heart with you; and you have kept for him this great lovingkindness, that you have given him a son to sit on his throne, as it is this day.3:7 And now, O Yahweh my God, you have made your servant king instead of David my father: and I am but a little child; I know not how to go out or come in.3:8 And your servant is in the midst of your people which you have chosen, a great people, that cannot be numbered nor counted for multitude.3:9 Give your servant therefore an understanding heart to judge your people, that I may discern between good and evil; for who is able to judge this your great people?3:10 And the speech pleased the Lord, that Solomon had asked this thing.3:11 And God said to him, Because you have asked this thing, and have not asked for yourself long life, neither have asked riches for yourself, nor have asked the life of your enemies, but have asked for yourself understanding to discern justice;3:12 behold, I have done according to your word: lo, I have given you a wise and an understanding heart; so that there has been none like you before you, neither after you shall any arise like to you.3:13 And I have also given you that which you have not asked, both riches and honor, so that there shall not be any among the kings like to you, all your days.3:14 And if you will walk in my ways, to keep my statutes and my commandments, as your father David did walk, then I will lengthen your days.3:15 And Solomon awoke; and, behold, it was a dream: and he came to Jerusalem, and stood before the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, and offered up burnt offerings, and offered peace offerings, and made a feast to all his servants.3:16 Then there came two women that were harlots, to the king, and stood before him.3:17 And the one woman said, Oh, my lord, I and this woman dwell in one house; and I was delivered of a child with her in the house.3:18 And it came to pass the third day after I was delivered, that this woman was delivered also; and we were together; there was no stranger with us in the house, save we two in the house.3:19 And this woman's child died in the night, because she lay upon it.3:20 And she arose at midnight, and took my son from beside me, while your handmaid slept, and laid it in her bosom, and laid her dead child in my bosom.3:21 And when I rose in the morning to give my child suck, behold, it was dead; but when I had looked at it in the morning, behold, it was not my son, whom I did bear.3:22 And the other woman said, Nay; but the living is my son, and the dead is your son.  And this said, No; but the dead is your son, and the living is my son.  Thus they spoke before the king.3:23 Then said the king, The one says, This is my son that lives, and your son is the dead: and the other says, Nay; but your son is the dead, and my son is the living.3:24 And the king said, Fetch me a sword.  And they brought a sword before the king.3:25 And the king said, Divide the living child in two, and give half to the one, and half to the other.3:26 Then spoke the woman whose the living child was to the king, for her heart yearned over her son, and she said, Oh, my lord, give her the living child, and in no wise slay it.  But the other said, It shall be neither mine nor yours; divide it.3:27 Then the king answered and said, Give her the living child, and in no wise slay it: she is the mother thereof.3:28 And all Israel heard of the judgment which the king had judged; and they feared the king: for they saw that the wisdom of God was in him, to do justice.4:1 And king Solomon was king over all Israel.4:2 And these were the princes whom he had: Azariah the son of Zadok, the priest;4:3 Elihoreph and Ahijah, the sons of Shisha, scribes; Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud, the recorder;4:4 and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over the host; and Zadok and Abiathar were priests;4:5 and Azariah the son of Nathan was over the officers; and Zabud the son of Nathan was chief minister, and the king's friend;4:6 and Ahishar was over the household; and Adoniram the son of Abda was over the men subject to taskwork.4:7 And Solomon had twelve officers over all Israel, who provided victuals for the king and his household: each man had to make provision for a month in the year.4:8 And these are their names: Ben-hur, in the hill-country of Ephraim;4:9 Ben-deker, in Makaz, and in Shaalbim, and Beth-shemesh, and Elon-beth-hanan;4:10 Ben-hesed, in Arubboth (to him belonged Socoh, and all the land of Hepher);4:11 Ben-abinadab, in all the height of Dor (he had Taphath the daughter of Solomon to wife);4:12 Baana the son of Ahilud, in Taanach and Megiddo, and all Beth-shean which is beside Zarethan, beneath Jezreel, from Beth-shean to Abel-meholah, as far as beyond Jokmeam;4:13 Ben-geber, in Ramoth-gilead (to him belonged the towns of Jair the son of Manasseh, which are in Gilead; even to him belonged the region of Argob, which is in Bashan, 60 great cities with walls and brazen bars);4:14 Ahinadab the son of Iddo, in Mahanaim;4:15 Ahimaaz, in Naphtali (he also took Basemath the daughter of Solomon to wife);4:16 Baana the son of Hushai, in Asher and Bealoth;4:17 Jehoshaphat the son of Paruah, in Issachar;4:18 Shimei the son of Ela, in Benjamin;4:19 Geber the son of Uri, in the land of Gilead, the country of Sihon king of the Amorites and of Og king of Bashan; and he was the only officer that was in the land.4:20 Judah and Israel were many as the sand which is by the sea in multitude, eating and drinking and making merry.4:21 And Solomon ruled over all the kingdoms from the River to the land of the Philistines, and to the border of Egypt: they brought tribute, and served Solomon all the days of his life.4:22 And Solomon's provision for one day was thirty measures of fine flour, and sixty measures of meal,4:23 ten fat oxen, and twenty oxen out of the pastures, and a hundred sheep, besides deer, and gazelles, and roebucks, and fattened fowl.4:24 For he had dominion over all the region on this side the River, from Tiphsah even to Gaza, over all the kings on this side the River: and he had peace on all sides round about him.4:25 And Judah and Israel dwelt safely, every man under his vine and under his fig-tree, from Dan even to Beer-sheba, all the days of Solomon.4:26 And Solomon had forty thousand stalls of horses for his chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen.4:27 And those officers provided victuals for king Solomon, and for all that came to king Solomon's table, every man in his month; they let nothing be lacking.4:28 Barley also and straw for the horses and swift steeds brought they to the place where the officers were, every man according to his charge.4:29 And God gave Solomon wisdom and understanding exceedingly much, and largeness of heart, even as the sand that is on the sea-shore.4:30 And Solomon's wisdom excelled the wisdom of all the children of the east, and all the wisdom of Egypt.4:31 For he was wiser than all men; than Ethan the Ezrahite, and Heman, and Calcol, and Darda, the sons of Mahol: and his fame was in all the nations round about.4:32 And he spoke three thousand proverbs; and his songs were a thousand and five.4:33 And he spoke of trees, from the cedar that is in Lebanon even to the hyssop that springs out of the wall; he spoke also of beasts, and of birds, and of creeping things, and of fishes.4:34 And there came of all peoples to hear the wisdom of Solomon, from all kings of the earth, who had heard of his wisdom.5:1 And Hiram king of Tyre sent his servants to Solomon; for he had heard that they had anointed him king in the room of his father: for Hiram was ever a lover of David.5:2 And Solomon sent to Hiram, saying,5:3 You know how that David my father could not build a house for the name of Yahweh his God for the wars which were about him on every side, until Yahweh put them under the soles of his feet.5:4 But now Yahweh my God has given me rest on every side; there is neither adversary, nor evil occurrence.5:5 And, behold, I intend to build a house for the name of Yahweh my God, as Yahweh spoke to David my father, saying, Your son, whom I will set upon your throne in your room, he shall build the house for my name.5:6 Now therefore command you that they cut me cedar-trees out of Lebanon; and my servants shall be with your servants; and I will give you wages for your servants according to all that you shall say: for you know that there is not among us any that knows how to cut timber like to the Sidonians.5:7 And it came to pass, when Hiram heard the words of Solomon, that he rejoiced greatly, and said, Blessed be Yahweh this day, who has given to David a wise son over this great people.5:8 And Hiram sent to Solomon, saying, I have heard the message which you have sent to me: I will do all your desire concerning timber of cedar, and concerning timber of fir.5:9 My servants shall bring them down from Lebanon to the sea; and I will make them into rafts to go by sea to the place that you shall appoint me, and will cause them to be broken up there, and you shall receive them; and you shall accomplish my desire, in giving food for my household.5:10 So Hiram gave Solomon timber of cedar and timber of fir according to all his desire.5:11 And Solomon gave Hiram twenty thousand measures of wheat for food to his household, and twenty measures of pure oil: thus gave Solomon to Hiram year by year.5:12 And Yahweh gave Solomon wisdom, as he promised him; and there was peace between Hiram and Solomon; and they two made a league together.5:13 And king Solomon raised a levy out of all Israel; and the levy was thirty thousand men.5:14 And he sent them to Lebanon, ten thousand a month by courses; a month they were in Lebanon, and two months at home; and Adoniram was over the men subject to taskwork.5:15 And Solomon had 70,000 that bore burdens, and 80,000 that were hewers in the mountains;5:16 besides Solomon's chief officers that were over the work, 3,300, who bore rule over the people that wrought in the work.5:17 And the king commanded, and they hewed out great stones, costly stones, to lay the foundation of the house with wrought stone.5:18 And Solomon's builders and Hiram's builders and the Gebalites did fashion them, and prepared the timber and the stones to build the house.6:1 And it came to pass in the four hundred and eightieth year after the children of Israel were come out of the land of Egypt, in the fourth year of Solomon's reign over Israel, in the month Ziv, which is the second month, that he began to build the house of Yahweh.6:2 And the house which king Solomon built for Yahweh, the length of it was 60 cubits, and the breadth of it 20 cubits, and the height of it 30 cubits.6:3 And the porch before the temple of the house, 20 cubits was the length of it, according to the breadth of the house; and 10 cubits was the breadth of it before the house.6:4 And for the house he made windows of fixed lattice-work.6:5 And against the wall of the house he built stories round about, against the walls of the house round about, both of the temple and of the oracle; and he made side-chambers all around.6:6 The lowest story was 5 cubits broad, and the middle was 6 cubits broad, and the third was 7 cubits broad; for on the outside he made offsets from the wall of the house all round, so that the beams not have hold to the walls of the house.6:7 And the house, when it was in building, was built of stone made ready at the quarry; and there was neither hammer nor axe nor any tool of iron heard in the house, while it was in building.6:8 The door for the middle side-chambers was in the right side of the house: and they went up by winding stairs into the middle story, and out of the middle into the third.6:9 So he built the house, and finished it; and he covered the house with beams and planks of cedar.6:10 And he built the stories against all the house, each five cubits high: and they rested on the house with timber of cedar.6:11 And the word of Yahweh came to Solomon, saying,6:12 Concerning this house which you are building, if you will walk in my statutes, and execute my ordinances, and keep all my commandments to walk in them; then will I establish my word with you, which I spoke to David your father.6:13 And I will dwell among the children of Israel, and will not forsake my people Israel.6:14 So Solomon built the house, and finished it.6:15 And he built the walls of the house within with boards of cedar: from the floor of the house to the walls of the ceiling, he covered them on the inside with wood; and he covered the floor of the house with boards of fir.6:16 And he built twenty cubits on the hinder part of the house with boards of cedar from the floor to the walls of the ceiling: he built them for it within, for an oracle, even for the most holy place.6:17 And the house, that is, the temple before the oracle, was forty cubits long.6:18 And there was cedar on the house within, carved with bulbs and open flowers: all was cedar; there was no stone seen.6:19 And he prepared an oracle in the midst of the house within, to set there the ark of the covenant of Yahweh.6:20 And within the oracle was a space of twenty cubits in length, and twenty cubits in breadth, and twenty cubits in the height thereof; and he overlaid it with pure gold: and he covered the altar with cedar.6:21 So Solomon overlaid the house within with pure gold: and he drew chains of gold across before the oracle; and he overlaid it with gold.6:22 And the whole house he overlaid with gold, until all the house was finished: also the whole altar that belonged to the oracle he overlaid with gold.6:23 And in the oracle he made two cherubim of olive-wood, each ten cubits high.6:24 And five cubits was the one wing of the cherub, and five cubits the other wing of the cherub.  From the furthest part of the one wing to the furthest part of the other, was ten cubits.6:25 And the other cherub was ten cubits: both the cherubim were of one measure and one form.6:26 The height of the one cherub was ten cubits, and the same with the other cherub.6:27 And he set the cherubim within the inner house; and the wings of the cherubim were stretched forth, so that the wing of the one touched the one wall, and the wing of the other cherub touched the other wall; and their wings touched one another in the midst of the house.6:28 And he overlaid the cherubim with gold.6:29 And he carved all the walls of the house round about with carved figures of cherubim and palm-trees and open flowers, within and without.6:30 And the floor of the house he overlaid with gold, within and without.6:31 And for the entrance of the oracle he made doors of olive-wood: the lintel and door-posts were a fifth part of the wall.6:32 So he made two doors of olive-wood; and he carved upon them carvings of cherubim and palm-trees and open flowers, and overlaid them with gold; and he spread the gold upon the cherubim, and upon the palm-trees.6:33 So also made he for the entrance of the temple door-posts of olive-wood, out of a fourth part of the wall;6:34 and two doors of fir-wood: the two leaves of the one door were folding, and the two leaves of the other door were folding.6:35 And he carved upon it cherubim and palm-trees and open flowers; and he overlaid them with gold fitted upon the graven work.6:36 And he built the inner court with three courses of hewn stone, and a course of cedar beams.6:37 In the fourth year was the foundation of the house of Yahweh laid, in the month Ziv.6:38 And in the eleventh year, in the month Bul, which is the eighth month, was the house finished throughout all the parts thereof, and according to all the fashion of it.  So was he seven years in building it.7:1 And Solomon was building his own house thirteen years, and he finished all his house.7:2 For he built the house of the forest of Lebanon; the length of it was a hundred cubits, and the breadth of it fifty cubits, and the height of it thirty cubits, upon four rows of cedar pillars, with cedar beams upon the pillars.7:3 And it was covered with cedar above over the forty and five beams, that were upon the pillars; fifteen in a row.7:4 And there were beams in three rows, and window was over against window in three ranks.7:5 And all the doors and posts were made square with beams: and window was over against window in three ranks.7:6 And he made the porch of pillars; the length of it was fifty cubits, and the breadth of it thirty cubits; and a porch before them; and pillars and a threshold before them.7:7 And he made the porch of the throne where he was to judge, even the porch of judgment: and it was covered with cedar from floor to floor.7:8 And his house where he was to dwell, the other court within the porch, was of the like work.  He made also a house for Pharaoh's daughter (whom Solomon had taken to wife), similar to this porch.7:9 All these were of costly stones, even of hewn stone, according to measure, sawed with saws, within and without, even from the foundation to the coping, and so on the outside to the great court.7:10 And the foundation was of costly stones, even great stones, stones of ten cubits, and stones of eight cubits.7:11 And above were costly stones, even hewn stone, according to measure, and cedar-wood.7:12 And the great court round about had three courses of hewn stone, and a course of cedar beams; like as the inner court of the house of Yahweh, and the porch of the house.7:13 And king Solomon sent and fetched Hiram out of Tyre.7:14 He was the son of a widow of the tribe of Naphtali, and his father was a man of Tyre, a worker in brass; and he was filled with wisdom and understanding and skill, to work all works in brass.  And he came to king Solomon, and wrought all his work.7:15 For he fashioned the two pillars of brass, eighteen cubits high apiece: and a line of twelve cubits circumferred either of them.7:16 And he made two capitals of molten brass, to set upon the tops of the pillars: the height of the one capital was five cubits, and the height of the other capital was five cubits.7:17 There were nets of checker-work, and wreaths of chain-work, for the capitals which were upon the top of the pillars; seven for the one capital, and seven for the other capital.7:18 So he made the pillars; and there were two rows round about upon the one network, to cover the capitals that were upon the top of the pillars: and so did he for the other capital.7:19 And the capitals that were upon the top of the pillars in the porch were of lily-work, four cubits.7:20 And there were capitals above also upon the two pillars, close by the belly which was beside the network: and the pomegranates were two hundred, in rows round about upon the other capital.7:21 And he set up the pillars at the porch of the temple: and he set up the right pillar, and called the name thereof Jachin; and he set up the left pillar, and called the name thereof Boaz.7:22 And upon the top of the pillars was lily-work: so was the work of the pillars finished.7:23 And he made the molten sea of ten cubits from brim to brim, round in compass, and the height thereof was five cubits; and a line of thirty cubits circumferred it.7:24 And under the brim of it round about there were bulbs which did compass it, for ten cubits, compassing the sea round about: the bulbs were in two rows, cast when it was cast.7:25 It stood upon twelve oxen, three looking toward the north, and three looking toward the west, and three looking toward the south, and three looking toward the east; and the sea was set upon them above, and all their hinder parts were inward.7:26 And it was a handbreadth thick: and the brim thereof was wrought like the brim of a cup, like the flower of a lily: it held two thousand baths.7:27 And he made the ten bases of brass; four cubits was the length of one base, and four cubits the breadth thereof, and three cubits the height of it.7:28 And the work of the bases was on this manner: they had panels; and there were panels between the ledges;7:29 and on the panels that were between the ledges were lions, oxen, and cherubim; and upon the ledges there was a pedestal above; and beneath the lions and oxen were wreaths of hanging work.7:30 And every base had four brazen wheels, and axles of brass; and the four feet thereof had undersetters: beneath the laver were the undersetters molten, with wreaths at the side of each.7:31 And the mouth of it within the capital and above was a cubit: and the mouth thereof was round after the work of a pedestal, a cubit and a half; and also upon the mouth of it were gravings, and their panels were foursquare, not round.7:32 And the four wheels were underneath the panels; and the axletrees of the wheels were in the base: and the height of a wheel was a cubit and half a cubit.7:33 And the work of the wheels was like the work of a chariot wheel: their axletrees, and their felloes, and their spokes, and their naves, were all molten.7:34 And there were four undersetters at the four corners of each base: the undersetters thereof were of the base itself.7:35 And in the top of the base was there a round compass half a cubit high; and on the top of the base the stays thereof and the panels thereof were of the same.7:36 And on the plates of the stays thereof, and on the panels thereof, he engraved cherubim, lions, and palm-trees, according to the space of each, with wreaths round about.7:37 After this manner he made the ten bases: all of them had one casting, one measure, and one form.7:38 And he made ten lavers of brass: one laver contained forty baths; and every laver was four cubits; and upon very one of the ten bases one laver.7:39 And he set the bases, five on the right side of the house, and five on the left side of the house: and he set the sea on the right side of the house eastward, toward the south.7:40 And Hiram made the lavers, and the shovels, and the basins.  So Hiram made an end of doing all the work that he wrought for king Solomon in the house of Yahweh:7:41 the two pillars, and the two bowls of the capitals that were on the top of the pillars; and the two networks to cover the two bowls of the capitals that were on the top of the pillars;7:42 and the four hundred pomegranates for the two networks; two rows of pomegranates for each network, to cover the two bowls of the capitals that were upon the pillars;7:43 and the ten bases, and the ten lavers on the bases;7:44 and the one sea, and the twelve oxen under the sea;7:45 and the pots, and the shovels, and the basins: even all these vessels, which Hiram made for king Solomon, in the house of Yahweh, were of burnished brass.7:46 In the plain of the Jordan did the king cast them, in the clay ground between Succoth and Zarethan.7:47 And Solomon left all the vessels unweighed, because they were exceedingly many: the weight of the brass could not be found out.7:48 And Solomon made all the vessels that were in the house of Yahweh: the golden altar, and the table upon which the showbread was, of gold;7:49 and the candlesticks, five on the right side, and five on the left, before the oracle, of pure gold; and the flowers, and the lamps, and the tongs, of gold;7:50 and the cups, and the snuffers, and the basins, and the spoons, and the fire pans, of pure gold; and the hinges, both for the doors of the inner house, the most holy place, and for the doors of the nave of the temple, of gold.7:51 Thus all the work that king Solomon wrought in the house of Yahweh was finished.  And Solomon brought in the things which David his father had dedicated, even the silver, and the gold, and the vessels, and put them in the treasuries of the house of Yahweh.8:1 Then Solomon assembled the elders of Israel, and all the heads of the tribes, the princes of the fathers' houses of the children of Israel, to king Solomon in Jerusalem, to bring up the ark of the covenant of Yahweh out of the city of David, which is Zion.8:2 And all the men of Israel assembled themselves to king Solomon at the feast, in the month Ethanim, which is the seventh month.8:3 And all the elders of Israel came, and the priests took up the ark.8:4 And they brought up the ark of Yahweh, and the tent of meeting, and all the holy vessels that were in the Tent; even these did the priests and the Levites bring up.8:5 And king Solomon and all the congregation of Israel, that were assembled to him, were with him before the ark, sacrificing sheep and oxen, that could not be counted nor numbered for multitude.8:6 And the priests brought in the ark of the covenant of Yahweh to its place, into the oracle of the house, to the most holy place, even under the wings of the cherubim.8:7 For the cherubim spread forth their wings over the place of the ark, and the cherubim covered the ark and the staves thereof above.8:8 And the staves were so long that the ends of the staves were seen from the holy place before the oracle; but they were not seen without: and there they are to this day.8:9 There was nothing in the ark save the two tables of stone which Moses put there at Horeb, when Yahweh made a covenant with the children of Israel, when they came out of the land of Egypt.8:10 And it came to pass, when the priests were come out of the holy place, that the cloud filled the house of Yahweh,8:11 so that the priests could not stand to minister by reason of the cloud; for the glory of Yahweh filled the house of Yahweh.8:12 Then spoke Solomon, Yahweh has said that he would dwell in the thick darkness.8:13 I have surely built you a house of habitation, a place for you to dwell in for ever.8:14 And the king turned his face about, and blessed all the assembly of Israel: and all the assembly of Israel stood.8:15 And he said, Blessed be Yahweh, the God of Israel, who spoke with his mouth to David your father, and has with his hand fulfilled it, saying,8:16 Since the day that I brought forth my people Israel out of Egypt, I chose no city out of all the tribes of Israel to build a house, that my name might be there; but I chose David to be over my people Israel.8:17 Now it was in the heart of David my father to build a house for the name of Yahweh, the God of Israel.8:18 But Yahweh said to David my father, Whereas it was in your heart to build a house for my name, you did well that it was in your heart:8:19 nevertheless you shall not build the house; but your son that shall come forth out of your loins, he shall build the house for my name.8:20 And Yahweh has established his word that he spoke; for I am risen up in the room of David my father, and sit on the throne of Israel, as Yahweh promised, and have built the house for the name of Yahweh, the God of Israel.8:21 And there have I set a place for the ark, in which is the covenant of Yahweh, which he made with our fathers, when he brought them out of the land of Egypt.8:22 And Solomon stood before the altar of Yahweh in the presence of all the assembly of Israel, and spread forth his hands toward heaven;8:23 and he said, O Yahweh, the God of Israel, there is no God like you, in heaven above, or on earth beneath; who keeps covenant and lovingkindness with your servants, that walk before you with all their heart;8:24 who have kept with your servant David my father that which you did promise him: yes, you spoke with your mouth, and have fulfilled it with your hand, as it is this day.8:25 Now therefore, O Yahweh, the God of Israel, keep with your servant David my father that which you have promised him, saying, There shall not fail you a man in my sight to sit on the throne of Israel, if only your children take heed to their way, to walk before me as you have walked before me.8:26 Now therefore, O God of Israel, let your word, I pray you, be verified, which you spoke to your servant David my father.8:27 But will God in very deed dwell on the earth?  behold, heaven and the heaven of heavens cannot contain you; how much less this house that I have built!8:28 Yet have you respect to the prayer of your servant, and to his supplication, O Yahweh my God, to hearken to the cry and to the prayer which your servant prays before you this day;8:29 that your eyes may be open toward this house night and day, even toward the place whereof you have said, My name shall be there; to hearken to the prayer which your servant shall pray toward this place.8:30 And hearken you to the supplication of your servant, and of your people Israel, when they shall pray toward this place: yes, hear you in heaven your dwelling-place; and when you hear, forgive.8:31 If a man sin against his neighbor, and an oath be laid upon him to cause him to swear, and he come and swear before your altar in this house;8:32 then hear you in heaven, and do, and judge your servants, condemning the wicked, to bring his way upon his own head, and justifying the righteous, to give him according to his righteousness.8:33 When your people Israel are smitten down before the enemy, because they have sinned against you; if they turn again to you, and confess your name, and pray and make supplication to you in this house:8:34 then hear you in heaven, and forgive the sin of your people Israel, and bring them again to the land which you gave to their fathers.8:35 When heaven is shut up, and there is no rain, because they have sinned against you; if they pray toward this place, and confess your name, and turn from their sin, when you afflict them:8:36 then hear you in heaven, and forgive the sin of your servants, and of your people Israel, when you teach them the good way in which they should walk; and send rain upon your land, which you have given to your people for an inheritance.8:37 If there be in the land famine, if there be pestilence, if there be blasting or mildew, locust or caterpillar; if their enemy besiege them in the land of their cities; whatsoever plague, whatsoever sickness there be;8:38 whatever prayer and supplication is made by any man, or by all your people Israel, who shall know every man the plague of his own heart, and spread forth his hands toward this house:8:39 then hear you in heaven your dwelling-place, and forgive, and do, and render to every man according to all his ways, whose heart you know; (for you, even you only, know the hearts of all the children of men;)8:40 that they may fear you all the days that they live in the land which you gave to our fathers.8:41 Moreover concerning the foreigner, that is not of your people Israel, when he shall come out of a far country for your name's sake8:42 (for they shall hear of your great name, and of your mighty hand, and of your outstretched arm); when he shall come and pray toward this house;8:43 hear you in heaven your dwelling-place, and do according to all that the foreigner calls to you for; that all the peoples of the earth may know your name, to fear you, as does your people Israel, and that they may know that this house which I have built is called by my name.8:44 If your people go out to battle against their enemy, by whatsoever way you shall send them, and they pray to Yahweh toward the city which you have chosen, and toward the house which I have built for your name;8:45 then hear you in heaven their prayer and their supplication, and maintain their cause.8:46 If they sin against you (for there is no man that sins not), and you be angry with them, and deliver them to the enemy, so that they carry them away captive to the land of the enemy, far off or near;8:47 yet if they shall bethink themselves in the land whither they are carried captive, and turn again, and make supplication to you in the land of them that carried them captive, saying, We have sinned, and have done perversely, we have dealt wickedly;8:48 if they return to you with all their heart and with all their soul in the land of their enemies, who carried them captive, and pray to you toward their land, which you gave to their fathers, the city which you have chosen, and the house which I have built for your name:8:49 then hear you their prayer and their supplication in heaven your dwelling-place, and maintain their cause;8:50 and forgive your people who have sinned against you, and all their transgressions in which they have transgressed against you; and give them compassion before those who carried them captive, that they may have compassion on them8:51 (for they are your people, and your inheritance, which you brought forth out of Egypt, from the midst of the furnace of iron);8:52 that your eyes may be open to the supplication of your servant, and to the supplication of your people Israel, to hearken to them whenever they cry to you.8:53 For you did separate them from among all the peoples of the earth, to be your inheritance, as you spoke by Moses your servant, when you brought our fathers out of Egypt, O Lord Yahweh.8:54 And it was so, that, when Solomon had made an end of praying all this prayer and supplication to Yahweh, he arose from before the altar of Yahweh, from kneeling on his knees with his hands spread forth toward heaven.8:55 And he stood, and blessed all the assembly of Israel with a loud voice, saying,8:56 Blessed be Yahweh, that has given rest to his people Israel, according to all that he promised: there has not failed one word of all his good promise, which he promised by Moses his servant.8:57 Yahweh our God be with us, as he was with our fathers: let him not leave us, nor forsake us;8:58 that he may incline our hearts to him, to walk in all his ways, and to keep his commandments, and his statutes, and his ordinances, which he commanded our fathers.8:59 And let these my words, with which I have made supplication before Yahweh, be near to Yahweh our God day and night, that he maintain the cause of his servant, and the cause of his people Israel, as every day shall require;8:60 that all the peoples of the earth may know that Yahweh, he is God; there is none else.8:61 Let your heart therefore be perfect with Yahweh our God, to walk in his statutes, and to keep his commandments, as at this day.8:62 And the king, and all Israel with him, offered sacrifice before Yahweh.8:63 And Solomon offered for the sacrifice of peace offerings, which he offered to Yahweh, two and twenty thousand oxen, and a hundred and twenty thousand sheep.  So the king and all the children of Israel dedicated the house of Yahweh.8:64 The same day did the king hallow the middle of the court that was before the house of Yahweh; for there he offered the burnt offering, and the meal offering, and the fat of the peace offerings, because the brazen altar that was before Yahweh was too little to receive the burnt offering, and the meal offering, and the fat of the peace offerings.8:65 So Solomon held the feast at that time, and all Israel with him, a great assembly, from the entrance of Hamath to the brook of Egypt, before Yahweh our God, seven days and seven days, even fourteen days.8:66 On the eighth day he sent the people away; and they blessed the king, and went to their tents joyful and glad of heart for all the goodness that Yahweh had shown to David his servant, and to Israel his people.9:1 And it came to pass, when Solomon had finished the building of the house of Yahweh, and the king's house, and all Solomon's desire which he was pleased to do,9:2 that Yahweh appeared to Solomon the second time, as he had appeared to him at Gibeon.9:3 And Yahweh said to him, I have heard your prayer and your supplication, that you have made before me: I have hallowed this house, which you have built, to put my name there for ever; and my eyes and my heart shall be there perpetually.9:4 And as for you, if you will walk before me, as David your father walked, in integrity of heart, and in uprightness, to do according to all that I have commanded you, and will keep my statutes and my ordinances;9:5 then I will establish the throne of your kingdom over Israel for ever, according as I promised to David your father, saying, There shall not fail you a man upon the throne of Israel.9:6 But if ye shall turn away from following me, ye or your children, and not keep my commandments and my statutes which I have set before you, but shall go and serve other gods, and worship them;9:7 then will I cut off Israel out of the land which I have given them; and this house, which I have hallowed for my name, will I cast out of my sight; and Israel shall be a proverb and a byword among all peoples.9:8 And though this house is so high, yet shall every one that passes by it be astonished, and shall hiss; and they shall say, Why has Yahweh done thus to this land, and to this house?9:9 and they shall answer, Because they forsook Yahweh their God, who brought forth their fathers out of the land of Egypt, and laid hold on other gods, and worshipped them, and served them: therefore has Yahweh brought all this evil upon them.9:10 And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, during which Solomon had built the two houses, the house of Yahweh and the king's house9:11 (now Hiram the king of Tyre had furnished Solomon with cedar-trees and fir-trees, and with gold, according to all his desire), that then king Solomon gave Hiram twenty cities in the land of Galilee.9:12 And Hiram came out from Tyre to see the cities which Solomon had given him; and they pleased him not.9:13 And he said, What cities are these which you have given me, my brother?  And he called them the land of Cabul to this day.9:14 And Hiram sent to the king 120 talants of gold.9:15 And this is the reason of the levy which king Solomon raised, to build the house of Yahweh, and his own house, and Millo, and the wall of Jerusalem, and Hazor, and Megiddo, and Gezer.9:16 Pharaoh king of Egypt had gone up, and taken Gezer, and burnt it with fire, and slain the Canaanites that dwelt in the city, and given it for a portion to his daughter, Solomon's wife.9:17 And Solomon built Gezer, and Beth-horon the nether,9:18 and Baalath, and Tamar in the wilderness, in the land,9:19 and all the store-cities that Solomon had, and the cities for his chariots, and the cities for his horsemen, and that which Solomon desired to build for his pleasure in Jerusalem, and in Lebanon, and in all the land of his dominion.9:20 As for all the people that were left of the Amorites, the Hittites, the Perizzites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites, who were not of the children of Israel;9:21 their children that were left after them in the land, whom the children of Israel were not able utterly to destroy, of them did Solomon raise a levy of bondservants to this day.9:22 But of the children of Israel did Solomon make no bondservants; but they were the men of war, and his servants, and his princes, and his captains, and rulers of his chariots and of his horsemen.9:23 These were the chief officers that were over Solomon's work, five hundred and fifty, who bore rule over the people that wrought in the work.9:24 But Pharaoh's daughter came up out of the city of David to her house which Solomon had built for her: then did he build Millo.9:25 And three times a year did Solomon offer burnt offerings and peace offerings upon the altar which he built to Yahweh, burning incense with it, upon the altar that was before Yahweh.  So he finished the house.9:26 And king Solomon made a navy of ships in Ezion-geber, which is beside Eloth, on the shore of the Red Sea, in the land of Edom.9:27 And Hiram sent in the navy his servants, shipmen that had knowledge of the sea, with the servants of Solomon.9:28 And they came to Ophir, and fetched from there gold, four hundred and twenty talents, and brought it to king Solomon.10:1 And when the queen of Sheba heard of the fame of Solomon concerning the name of Yahweh, she came to prove him with hard questions.10:2 And she came to Jerusalem with a very great train, with camels that bore spices, and very much gold, and precious stones; and when she was come to Solomon, she communed with him of all that was in her heart.10:3 And Solomon told her all her questions: there was not anything hid from the king which he told her not.10:4 And when the queen of Sheba had seen all the wisdom of Solomon, and the house that he had built,10:5 and the food of his table, and the sitting of his servants, and the attendance of his ministers, and their apparel, and his cupbearers, and his ascent by which he went up to the house of Yahweh; there was no more spirit in her.10:6 And she said to the king, It was a true report that I heard in my own land of your acts, and of your wisdom.10:7 But I believed not the words, until I came, and my eyes had seen it: and, behold, the half was not told me; your wisdom and prosperity exceed the fame which I heard.10:8 Happy are your men, happy are these your servants, that stand continually before you, and that hear your wisdom.10:9 Blessed be Yahweh your God, who delighted in you, to set you on the throne of Israel: because Yahweh loved Israel for ever, therefore made he you king, to do justice and righteousness.10:10 And she gave the king a hundred and twenty talents of gold, and of spices very great store, and precious stones: there came no more such abundance of spices as these which the queen of Sheba gave to king Solomon.10:11 And the navy also of Hiram, that brought gold from Ophir, brought in from Ophir great plenty of almug-trees and precious stones.10:12 And the king made of the almug-trees pillars for the house of Yahweh, and for the king's house, harps also and psalteries for the singers: there came no such almug-trees, nor were seen, to this day.10:13 And king Solomon gave to the queen of Sheba all her desire, whatsoever she asked, besides that which Solomon gave her of his royal bounty.  So she turned, and went to her own land, she and her servants.10:14 Now the weight of gold that came to Solomon in one year was six hundred 66 talants of gold,10:15 besides that which the traders brought, and the traffic of the merchants, and of all the kings of the mingled people, and of the governors of the country.10:16 And king Solomon made 200 bucklers of beaten gold; 600 shekels of gold went to one buckler.10:17 And he made 300 shields of beaten gold; 3 pounds of gold went to one shield: and the king put them in the house of the forest of Lebanon.10:18 Moreover the king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it with the finest gold.10:19 There were six steps to the throne, and the top of the throne was round behind; and there were stays on either side by the place of the seat, and two lions standing beside the stays.10:20 And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other upon the six steps: there was not the like made in any kingdom.10:21 And all king Solomon's drinking vessels were of gold, and all the vessels of the house of the forest of Lebanon were of pure gold: none were of silver; it was nothing accounted of in the days of Solomon.10:22 For the king had at sea a navy of Tarshish with the navy of Hiram: once every three years came the navy of Tarshish, bringing gold, and silver, ivory, and apes, and peacocks.10:23 So king Solomon exceeded all the kings of the earth in riches and in wisdom.10:24 And all the earth sought the presence of Solomon, to hear his wisdom, which God had put in his heart.10:25 And they brought every man his tribute, vessels of silver, and vessels of gold, and raiment, and armor, and spices, horses, and mules, a rate year by year.10:26 And Solomon gathered together chariots and horsemen: and he had a thousand and four hundred chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen, that he bestowed in the chariot cities, and with the king at Jerusalem.10:27 And the king made silver to be in Jerusalem as stones, and cedars made he to be as the sycamore-trees that are in the lowland, for abundance.10:28 And the horses which Solomon had were brought out of Egypt; and the king's merchants received them in droves, each drove at a price.10:29 And a chariot came up and went out of Egypt for six hundred shekels of silver, and a horse for a hundred and fifty; and so for all the kings of the Hittites, and for the kings of Syria, did they bring them out by their means.11:1 Now king Solomon loved many foreign women, together with the daughter of Pharaoh, women of the Moabites, ammonites, Edomites, Sidonians, and Hittites;11:2 of the nations concerning which Yahweh said to the children of Israel, You shall not go among them, neither shall they come among you; for surely they will turn away your heart after their gods: Solomon clave to these in love.11:3 And he had seven hundred wives, princesses, and three hundred concubines; and his wives turned his heart away.11:4 For it came to pass, when Solomon was old, that his wives turned away his heart after other gods; and his heart was not perfect with Yahweh his God, as was the heart of David his father.11:5 For Solomon went after Ashtoreth the goddess of the Sidonians, and after Milcom the abomination of the Ammonites.11:6 And Solomon did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and went not fully after Yahweh, as did David his father.11:7 Then did Solomon build a high place for Chemosh the abomination of Moab, in the mount that is before Jerusalem, and for Molech the abomination of the children of Ammon.11:8 And so did he for all his foreign wives, who burnt incense and sacrificed to their gods.11:9 And Yahweh was angry with Solomon, because his heart was turned away from Yahweh, the God of Israel, who had appeared to him twice,11:10 and had commanded him concerning this thing, that he should not go after other gods: but he kept not that which Yahweh commanded.11:11 Wherefore Yahweh said to Solomon, Forasmuch as this is done by you, and you have not kept my covenant and my statutes, which I have commanded you, I will surely rend the kingdom from you, and will give it to your servant.11:12 Notwithstanding in your days I will not do it, for David your father's sake: but I will rend it out of the hand of your son.11:13 But, I will not rend away all the kingdom; but I will give one tribe to your son, for David my servant's sake, and for Jerusalem's sake which I have chosen.11:14 And Yahweh raised up an adversary to Solomon, Hadad the Edomite: he was of the king's seed in Edom.11:15 For it came to pass, when David was in Edom, and Joab the captain of the host was gone up to bury the slain, and had smitten every male in Edom11:16 (for Joab and all Israel remained there six months, until he had cut off every male in Edom);11:17 that Hadad fled, he and certain Edomites of his father's servants with him, to go into Egypt, Hadad being yet a little child.11:18 And they arose out of Midian, and came to Paran; and they took men with them out of Paran, and they came to Egypt, to Pharaoh king of Egypt, who gave him a house, and appointed him victuals, and gave him land.11:19 And Hadad found great favor in the sight of Pharaoh, so that he gave him to wife the sister of his own wife, the sister of Tahpenes the queen.11:20 And the sister of Tahpenes bore him Genubath his son, whom Tahpenes weaned in Pharaoh's house; and Genubath was in Pharaoh's house among the sons of Pharaoh.11:21 And when Hadad heard in Egypt that David slept with his fathers, and that Joab the captain of the host was dead, Hadad said to Pharaoh, Let me depart, that I may go to my own country.11:22 Then Pharaoh said to him, But what have you lacked with me, that, behold, you seek to go to your own country?  And he answered, Nothing: nevertheless, let me depart.11:23 And God raised up another adversary to him, Rezon the son of Eliada, who had fled from his lord Hadadezer king of Zobah.11:24 And he gathered men to him, and became captain over a troop, when David slew them of Zobah: and they went to Damascus, and dwelt therein, and reigned in Damascus.11:25 And he was an adversary to Israel all the days of Solomon, besides the mischief that Hadad did: and he abhorred Israel, and reigned over Syria.11:26 And Jeroboam the son of Nebat, an Ephraimite of Zeredah, a servant of Solomon, whose mother's name was Zeruah, a widow, he also lifted up his hand against the king.11:27 And this was the reason why he lifted up his hand against the king: Solomon built Millo, and repaired the breach of the city of David his father.11:28 And the man Jeroboam was a mighty man of valor; and Solomon saw the young man that he was industrious, and he gave him charge over all the labor of the house of Joseph.11:29 And it came to pass at that time, when Jeroboam went out of Jerusalem, that the prophet Ahijah the Shilonite found him in the way; now Ahijah had clad himself with a new garment; and they two were alone in the field.11:30 And Ahijah laid hold of the new garment that was on him, and rent it in twelve pieces.11:31 And he said to Jeroboam, Take you ten pieces; for thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Behold, I will rend the kingdom out of the hand of Solomon, and will give ten tribes to you11:32 (but he shall have one tribe, for my servant David's sake and for Jerusalem's sake, the city which I have chosen out of all the tribes of Israel);11:33 because that they have forsaken me, and have worshipped Ashtoreth the goddess of the Sidonians, Chemosh the god of Moab, and Milcom the god of the children of Ammon; and they have not walked in my ways, to do that which is right in my eyes, and to keep my statutes and my ordinances, as did David his father.11:34 However, I will not take the whole kingdom out of his hand; but I will make him prince all the days of his life, for David my servant's sake whom I chose, who kept my commandments and my statutes;11:35 but I will take the kingdom out of his son's hand, and will give it to you, even ten tribes.11:36 And to his son will I give one tribe, that David my servant may have a lamp alway before me in Jerusalem, the city which I have chosen me to put my name there.11:37 And I will take you, and you shall reign according to all that your soul desires, and shall be king over Israel.11:38 And it shall be, if you will hearken to all that I command you, and will walk in my ways, and do that which is right in my eyes, to keep my statutes and my commandments, as David my servant did; that I will be with you, and will build you a sure house, as I built for David, and will give Israel to you.11:39 And I will for this afflict the seed of David, but not for ever.11:40 Solomon sought therefore to kill Jeroboam; but Jeroboam arose, and fled into Egypt, to Shishak king of Egypt, and was in Egypt until the death of Solomon.11:41 Now the rest of the acts of Solomon, and all that he did, and his wisdom, are they not written in the book of the acts of Solomon?11:42 And the time that Solomon reigned in Jerusalem over all Israel was forty years.11:43 And Solomon slept with his fathers, and was buried in the city of David his father: and Rehoboam his son reigned in his stead.12:1 And Rehoboam went to Shechem: for all Israel were come to Shechem to make him king.12:2 And it came to pass, when Jeroboam the son of Nebat heard of it (for he was yet in Egypt, whither he had fled from the presence of king Solomon, and Jeroboam dwelt in Egypt,12:3 and they sent and called him), that Jeroboam and all the assembly of Israel came, and spoke to Rehoboam, saying,12:4 Your father made our yoke grievous: now therefore make you the grievous service of your father, and his heavy yoke which he put upon us, lighter, and we will serve you.12:5 And he said to them, Depart yet for three days, then come again to me.  And the people departed.12:6 And king Rehoboam took counsel with the old men, that had stood before Solomon his father while he yet lived, saying, What counsel give ye me to return answer to this people?12:7 And they spoke to him, saying, If you will be a servant to this people this day, and will serve them, and answer them, and speak good words to them, then they will be your servants for ever.12:8 But he forsook the counsel of the old men which they had given him, and took counsel with the young men that were grown up with him, that stood before him.12:9 And he said to them, What counsel give ye, that we may return answer to this people, who have spoken to me, saying, Make the yoke that your father did put upon us lighter?12:10 And the young men that were grown up with him spoke to him, saying, Thus shall you say to this people that spoke to you, saying, Your father made our yoke heavy, but make you it lighter to us; thus shall you speak to them, My little finger is thicker than my father's loins.12:11 And now whereas my father did lade you with a heavy yoke, I will add to your yoke: my father chastised you with whips, but I will chastise you with scorpions.12:12 So Jeroboam and all the people came to Rehoboam the third day, as the king commanded, saying, Come to me again the third day.12:13 And the king answered the people roughly, and forsook the counsel of the old men which they had given him,12:14 and spoke to them according to the counsel of the young men, saying, My father made your yoke heavy, but I will add to your yoke.  My father chastised you with whips, but I will chastise you with scorpions.12:15 So the king did not listen to the people; for it was a thing brought about by Yahweh, that he might establish his word, which Yahweh had spoken by Ahijah the Shilonite to Jeroboam the son of Nebat.12:16 And when all Israel saw that the king did not listen to them, the people answered the king, saying, What portion have we in David?  neither have we inheritance in the son of Jesse.  To your tents, O Israel: now see to your own house, David.  So Israel departed to their tents.12:17 But as for the children of Israel that dwelt in the cities of Judah, Rehoboam reigned over them.12:18 Then king Rehoboam sent Adoram, who was over the men subject to taskwork; and all Israel stoned him to death with stones.  And king Rehoboam made speed to get him up to his chariot, to flee to Jerusalem.12:19 So Israel rebelled against the house of David to this day.12:20 And it came to pass, when all Israel heard that Jeroboam was returned, that they sent and called him to the congregation, and made him king over all Israel: there was none that followed the house of David, but the tribe of Judah only.12:21 And when Rehoboam was come to Jerusalem, he assembled all the house of Judah, and the tribe of Benjamin, 180,000 chosen men, that were warriors, to fight against the house of Israel, to bring the kingdom again to Rehoboam the son of Solomon.12:22 But the word of God came to Shemaiah the man of God, saying,12:23 Speak to Rehoboam the son of Solomon, king of Judah, and to all the house of Judah and Benjamin, and to the rest of the people, saying,12:24 Thus says Yahweh, You shall not go up, nor fight against your brethren the children of Israel: return every man to his house; for this thing is of me.  So they hearkened to the word of Yahweh, and returned and went their way, according to the word of Yahweh.12:25 Then Jeroboam built Shechem in the hill-country of Ephraim, and dwelt therein; and he went out from there, and built Penuel.12:26 And Jeroboam said in his heart, Now will the kingdom return to the house of David:12:27 if this people go up to offer sacrifices in the house of Yahweh at Jerusalem, then will the heart of this people turn again to their lord, even to Rehoboam king of Judah; and they will kill me, and return to Rehoboam king of Judah.12:28 Whereupon the king took counsel, and made two calves of gold; and he said to them, It is too much for you to go up to Jerusalem: behold your gods, O Israel, which brought you up out of the land of Egypt.12:29 And he set the one in Beth-el, and the other put he in Dan.12:30 And this thing became a sin; for the people went to worship before the one, even to Dan.12:31 And he made houses of high places, and made priests from among all the people, that were not of the sons of Levi.12:32 And Jeroboam ordained a feast in the eighth month, on the fifteenth day of the month, like to the feast that is in Judah, and he went up to the altar; so did he in Beth-el, sacrificing to the calves that he had made: and he placed in Beth-el the priests of the high places that he had made.12:33 And he went up to the altar which he had made in Beth-el on the fifteenth day in the eighth month, even in the month which he had devised of his own heart: and he ordained a feast for the children of Israel, and went up to the altar, to burn incense.13:1 And, behold, there came a man of God out of Judah by the word of Yahweh to Beth-el: and Jeroboam was standing by the altar to burn incense.13:2 And he cried against the altar by the word of Yahweh, and said, O altar, altar, thus says Yahweh: Behold, a son shall be born to the house of David, Josiah by name; and upon you shall he sacrifice the priests of the high places that burn incense upon you, and men's bones shall they burn upon you.13:3 And he gave a sign the same day, saying, This is the sign which Yahweh has spoken: Behold, the altar shall be rent, and the ashes that are upon it shall be poured out.13:4 And it came to pass, when the king heard the saying of the man of God, which he cried against the altar in Beth-el, that Jeroboam put forth his hand from the altar, saying, Lay hold on him.  And his hand, which he put forth against him, dried up, so that he could not draw it back again to him.13:5 The altar also was rent, and the ashes poured out from the altar, according to the sign which the man of God had given by the word of Yahweh.13:6 And the king answered and said to the man of God, Entreat now the favor of Yahweh your God, and pray for me, that my hand may be restored me again.  And the man of God entreated Yahweh, and the king's hand was restored him again, and became as it was before.13:7 And the king said to the man of God, Come home with me, and refresh yourself, and I will give you a reward.13:8 And the man of God said to the king, If you will give me half your house, I will not go in with you, neither will I eat bread nor drink water in this place;13:9 for so was it charged me by the word of Yahweh, saying, You shall eat no bread, nor drink water, neither return by the way that you came.13:10 So he went another way, and returned not by the way that he came to Beth-el.13:11 Now there dwelt an old prophet in Beth-el; and one of his sons came and told him all the works that the man of God had done that day in Beth-el: the words which he had spoken to the king, them also they told to their father.13:12 And their father said to them, What way went he?  Now his sons had seen what way the man of God went, that came from Judah.13:13 And he said to his sons, Saddle me the donkey.  So they saddled him the donkey; and he rode upon it.13:14 And he went after the man of God, and found him sitting under an oak; and he said to him, are you the man of God that came from Judah?  And he said, I am.13:15 Then he said to him, Come home with me, and eat bread.13:16 And he said, I may not return with you, nor go in with you; neither will I eat bread nor drink water with you in this place:13:17 for it was said to me by the word of Yahweh, You shall eat no bread nor drink water there, nor turn again to go by the way that you came.13:18 And he said to him, I also am a prophet as you are; and an angel spoke to me by the word of Yahweh, saying, Bring him back with you into your house, that he may eat bread and drink water.  But he lied to him.13:19 So he went back with him, and did eat bread in his house, and drank water.13:20 And it came to pass, as they sat at the table, that the word of Yahweh came to the prophet that brought him back;13:21 and he cried to the man of God that came from Judah, saying, Thus says Yahweh, Forasmuch as you have been disobedient to the mouth of Yahweh, and have not kept the commandment which Yahweh your God commanded you,13:22 but came back, and have eaten bread and drunk water in the place of which he said to you, Eat no bread, and drink no water; your body shall not come to the sepulchre of your fathers.13:23 And it came to pass, after he had eaten bread, and after he had drunk, that he saddled for him the donkey, that is, for the prophet whom he had brought back.13:24 And when he was gone, a lion met him by the way, and slew him: and his body was cast in the way, and the donkey stood by it; the lion also stood by the body.13:25 And, behold, men passed by, and saw the body cast in the way, and the lion standing by the body; and they came and told it in the city where the old prophet dwelt.13:26 And when the prophet that brought him back from the way heard thereof, he said, It is the man of God, who was disobedient to the mouth of Yahweh: therefore Yahweh has delivered him to the lion, which has torn him, and slain him, according to the word of Yahweh, which he spoke to him.13:27 And he spoke to his sons, saying, Saddle me the donkey.  And they saddled it.13:28 And he went and found his body cast in the way, and the donkey and the lion standing by the body: the lion had not eaten the body, nor torn the donkey.13:29 And the prophet took up the body of the man of God, and laid it upon the donkey, and brought it back; and he came to the city of the old prophet, to mourn, and to bury him.13:30 And he laid his body in his own grave; and they mourned over him, saying, alas, my brother!13:31 And it came to pass, after he had buried him, that he spoke to his sons, saying, When I am dead, then bury me in the sepulchre in which the man of God is buried; lay my bones beside his bones.13:32 For the saying which he cried by the word of Yahweh against the altar in Beth-el, and against all the houses of the high places which are in the cities of Samaria, shall surely come to pass.13:33 After this thing Jeroboam returned not from his evil way, but made again from among all the people priests of the high places: whosoever would, he consecrated him, that there might be priests of the high places.13:34 And this thing became sin to the house of Jeroboam, even to cut it off, and to destroy it from off the face of the earth.14:1 At that time Abijah the son of Jeroboam fell sick.14:2 And Jeroboam said to his wife, arise, I pray you, and disguise yourself, that you be not known to be the wife of Jeroboam; and go to Shiloh: behold, there is Ahijah the prophet, who spoke concerning me that I should be king over this people.14:3 And take with you ten loaves, and cakes, and a cruse of honey, and go to him: he will tell you what shall become of the child.14:4 And Jeroboam's wife did so, and arose, and went to Shiloh, and came to the house of Ahijah.  Now Ahijah could not see; for his eyes were set by reason of his age.14:5 And Yahweh said to Ahijah, Behold, the wife of Jeroboam comes to inquire of you concerning her son; for he is sick: thus and thus shall you say to her; for it will be, when she comes in, that she will feign herself to be another woman.14:6 And it was so, when Ahijah heard the sound of her feet, as she came in at the door, that he said, Come in, you wife of Jeroboam; why do you pretend to be another?  for I am sent to you with heavy tidings.14:7 Go, tell Jeroboam, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel: Forasmuch as I exalted you from among the people, and made you prince over my people Israel,14:8 and rent the kingdom away from the house of David, and gave it to you; and yet you have not been as my servant David, who kept my commandments, and who followed me with all his heart, to do that only which was right in my eyes,14:9 but have done evil above all that were before you, and have gone and made you other gods, and molten images, to provoke me to anger, and have cast me behind your back:14:10 therefore, behold, I will bring evil upon the house of Jeroboam, and will cut off from Jeroboam every man-child, him that is shut up and him that is left at large in Israel, and will utterly sweep away the house of Jeroboam, as a man sweeps away dung, till it be all gone.14:11 Him that dies of Jeroboam in the city shall the dogs eat; and him that dies in the field shall the birds of the heavens eat: for Yahweh has spoken it.14:12 Arise therefore, go to your house: and when your feet enter into the city, the child shall die.14:13 And all Israel shall mourn for him, and bury him; for he only of Jeroboam shall come to the grave, because in him there is found some good thing toward Yahweh, the God of Israel, in the house of Jeroboam.14:14 Moreover Yahweh will raise him up a king over Israel, who shall cut off the house of Jeroboam that day: but what?  even now.14:15 For Yahweh will smite Israel, as a reed is shaken in the water; and he will root up Israel out of this good land which he gave to their fathers, and will scatter them beyond the River, because they have made their Asherim, provoking Yahweh to anger.14:16 And he will give Israel up because of the sins of Jeroboam, which he has sinned, and with which he has made Israel to sin.14:17 And Jeroboam's wife arose, and departed, and came to Tirzah: and as she came to the threshold of the house, the child died.14:18 And all Israel buried him, and mourned for him, according to the word of Yahweh, which he spoke by his servant Ahijah the prophet.14:19 And the rest of the acts of Jeroboam, how he warred, and how he reigned, behold, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel.14:20 And the days which Jeroboam reigned were two and twenty years: and he slept with his fathers, and Nadab his son reigned in his stead.14:21 And Rehoboam the son of Solomon reigned in Judah.  Rehoboam was forty and one years old when he began to reign, and he reigned seventeen years in Jerusalem, the city which Yahweh had chosen out of all the tribes of Israel, to put his name there: and his mother's name was Naamah the Ammonitess.14:22 And Judah did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and they provoked him to jealousy with their sins which they committed, beyond all that their fathers had done.14:23 For they also built them high places, and pillars, and Asherim, on every high hill, and under every green tree;14:24 and there were also sodomites in the land: they did according to all the abominations of the nations which Yahweh drove out before the children of Israel.14:25 And it came to pass in the fifth year of king Rehoboam, that Shishak king of Egypt came up against Jerusalem;14:26 and he took away the treasures of the house of Yahweh, and the treasures of the king's house; he even took away all: and he took away all the shields of gold which Solomon had made.14:27 And king Rehoboam made in their stead shields of brass, and committed them to the hands of the captains of the guard, who kept the door of the king's house.14:28 And it was so, that, as oft as the king went into the house of Yahweh, the guard bore them, and brought them back into the guard-chamber.14:29 Now the rest of the acts of Rehoboam, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?14:30 And there was war between Rehoboam and Jeroboam continually.14:31 And Rehoboam slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David: and his mother's name was Naamah the Ammonitess.  And Abijam his son reigned in his stead.15:1 Now in the eighteenth year of king Jeroboam the son of Nebat began Abijam to reign over Judah.15:2 Three years reigned he in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Maacah the daughter of Abishalom.15:3 And he walked in all the sins of his father, which he had done before him; and his heart was not perfect with Yahweh his God, as the heart of David his father.15:4 Nevertheless for David's sake did Yahweh his God give him a lamp in Jerusalem, to set up his son after him, and to establish Jerusalem;15:5 because David did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, and turned not aside from anything that he commanded him all the days of his life, save only in the matter of Uriah the Hittite.15:6 Now there was war between Rehoboam and Jeroboam all the days of his life.15:7 And the rest of the acts of Abijam, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?  And there was war between Abijam and Jeroboam.15:8 And Abijam slept with his fathers; and they buried him in the city of David: and Asa his son reigned in his stead.15:9 And in the twentieth year of Jeroboam king of Israel began Asa to reign over Judah.15:10 And forty and one years reigned he in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Maacah the daughter of Abishalom.15:11 And Asa did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, as did David his father.15:12 And he put away the sodomites out of the land, and removed all the idols that his fathers had made.15:13 And also Maacah his mother he removed from being queen, because she had made an abominable image for an Asherah; and Asa cut down her image, and burnt it at the brook Kidron.15:14 But the high places were not taken away: nevertheless the heart of Asa was perfect with Yahweh all his days.15:15 And he brought into the house of Yahweh the things that his father had dedicated, and the things that he himself had dedicated, silver, and gold, and vessels.15:16 And there was war between Asa and Baasha king of Israel all their days.15:17 And Baasha king of Israel went up against Judah, and built Ramah, that he might not allow any one to go out or come in to Asa king of Judah.15:18 Then Asa took all the silver and the gold that were left in the treasures of the house of Yahweh, and the treasures of the king's house, and delivered them into the hand of his servants; and king Asa sent them to Ben-hadad, the son of Tabrimmon, the son of Hezion, king of Syria, that dwelt at Damascus, saying,15:19 There is a league between me and you, between my father and your father: behold, I have sent to you a present of silver and gold; go, break your league with Baasha king of Israel, that he may depart from me.15:20 And Ben-hadad hearkened to king Asa, and sent the captains of his armies against the cities of Israel, and smote Ijon, and Dan, and Abel-beth-maacah, and all Chinneroth, with all the land of Naphtali.15:21 And it came to pass, when Baasha heard thereof, that he left off building Ramah, and dwelt in Tirzah.15:22 Then king Asa made a proclamation to all Judah; none was exempted: and they carried away the stones of Ramah, and the timber from it, with which Baasha had built; and king Asa used them to build Geba of Benjamin, and Mizpah.15:23 Now the rest of all the acts of Asa, and all his might, and all that he did, and the cities which he built, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?  But in the time of his old age he was diseased in his feet.15:24 And Asa slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David his father; and Jehoshaphat his son reigned in his stead.15:25 And Nadab the son of Jeroboam began to reign over Israel in the second year of Asa king of Judah; and he reigned over Israel two years.15:26 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and walked in the way of his father, and in his sin with which he made Israel to sin.15:27 And Baasha the son of Ahijah, of the house of Issachar, conspired against him; and Baasha smote him at Gibbethon, which belonged to the Philistines; for Nadab and all Israel were laying siege to Gibbethon.15:28 Even in the third year of Asa king of Judah did Baasha slay him, and reigned in his stead.15:29 And it came to pass that, as soon as he was king, he smote all the house of Jeroboam: he left not to Jeroboam any that breathed, until he had destroyed him; according to the saying of Yahweh, which he spoke by his servant Ahijah the Shilonite;15:30 for the sins of Jeroboam which he sinned, and with which he made Israel to sin, because of his provocation with which he provoked Yahweh, the God of Israel, to anger.15:31 Now the rest of the acts of Nadab, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?15:32 And there was war between Asa and Baasha king of Israel all their days.15:33 In the third year of Asa king of Judah began Baasha the son of Ahijah to reign over all Israel in Tirzah, and reigned twenty and four years.15:34 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and walked in the way of Jeroboam, and in his sin with which he made Israel to sin.16:1 And the word of Yahweh came to Jehu the son of Hanani against Baasha, saying,16:2 Forasmuch as I exalted you out of the dust, and made you prince over my people Israel, and you have walked in the way of Jeroboam, and have made my people Israel to sin, to provoke me to anger with their sins;16:3 behold, I will utterly sweep away Baasha and his house; and I will make your house like the house of Jeroboam the son of Nebat.16:4 Him that dies of Baasha in the city shall the dogs eat; and him that dies of his in the field shall the birds of the heavens eat.16:5 Now the rest of the acts of Baasha, and what he did, and his might, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?16:6 And Baasha slept with his fathers, and was buried in Tirzah; and Elah his son reigned in his stead.16:7 And moreover by the prophet Jehu the son of Hanani came the word of Yahweh against Baasha, and against his house, both because of all the evil that he did in the sight of Yahweh, to provoke him to anger with the work of his hands, in being like the house of Jeroboam, and because he smote him.16:8 In the twenty and sixth year of Asa king of Judah began Elah the son of Baasha to reign over Israel in Tirzah, and reigned two years.16:9 And his servant Zimri, captain of half his chariots, conspired against him.  Now he was in Tirzah, drinking himself drunk in the house of Arza, who was over the household in Tirzah:16:10 and Zimri went in and smote him, and killed him, in the twenty and seventh year of Asa king of Judah, and reigned in his stead.16:11 And it came to pass, when he began to reign, as soon as he sat on his throne, that he smote all the house of Baasha: he left him not a single man-child, neither of his kinsfolks, nor of his friends.16:12 Thus did Zimri destroy all the house of Baasha, according to the word of Yahweh, which he spoke against Baasha by Jehu the prophet,16:13 for all the sins of Baasha, and the sins of Elah his son, which they sinned, and with which they made Israel to sin, to provoke Yahweh, the God of Israel, to anger with their vanities.16:14 Now the rest of the acts of Elah, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?16:15 In the twenty and seventh year of Asa king of Judah did Zimri reign seven days in Tirzah.  Now the people were encamped against Gibbethon, which belonged to the Philistines.16:16 And the people that were encamped heard say, Zimri has conspired, and has also smitten the king: therefore all Israel made Omri, the captain of the host, king over Israel that day in the camp.16:17 And Omri went up from Gibbethon, and all Israel with him, and they besieged Tirzah.16:18 And it came to pass, when Zimri saw that the city was taken, that he went into the castle of the king's house, and burnt the king's house over him with fire, and died,16:19 for his sins which he sinned in doing that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, in walking in the way of Jeroboam, and in his sin which he did, to make Israel to sin.16:20 Now the rest of the acts of Zimri, and his treason that he wrought, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?16:21 Then were the people of Israel divided into two parts: half of the people followed Tibni the son of Ginath, to make him king; and half followed Omri.16:22 But the people that followed Omri prevailed against the people that followed Tibni the son of Ginath: so Tibni died, and Omri reigned.16:23 In the thirty-first year of Asa king of Judah began Omri to reign over Israel, and reigned twelve years: six years reigned he in Tirzah.16:24 And he bought the hill Samaria of Shemer for two talents of silver; and he built on the hill, and called the name of the city which he built, after the name of Shemer, the owner of the hill, Samaria.16:25 And Omri did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and dealt wickedly above all that were before him.16:26 For he walked in all the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, and in his sins with which he made Israel to sin, to provoke Yahweh, the God of Israel, to anger with their vanities.16:27 Now the rest of the acts of Omri which he did, and his might that he shown, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?16:28 So Omri slept with his fathers, and was buried in Samaria; and Ahab his son reigned in his stead.16:29 And in the thirty and eighth year of Asa king of Judah began Ahab the son of Omri to reign over Israel: and Ahab the son of Omri reigned over Israel in Samaria twenty and two years.16:30 And Ahab the son of Omri did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh above all that were before him.16:31 And it came to pass, as if it had been a light thing for him to walk in the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, that he took to wife Jezebel the daughter of Ethbaal king of the Sidonians, and went and served Baal, and worshipped him.16:32 And he reared up an altar for Baal in the house of Baal, which he had built in Samaria.16:33 And Ahab made the Asherah; and Ahab did yet more to provoke Yahweh, the God of Israel, to anger than all the kings of Israel that were before him.16:34 In his days did Hiel the Beth-elite build Jericho: he laid the foundation thereof with the loss of Abiram his first-born, and set up the gates thereof with the loss of his youngest son Segub, according to the word of Yahweh, which he spoke by Joshua the son of Nun.17:1 And Elijah the Tishbite, who was of the sojourners of Gilead, said to Ahab, as Yahweh, the God of Israel, lives, before whom I stand, there shall not be dew nor rain these years, but according to my word.17:2 And the word of Yahweh came to him, saying,17:3 Get yourself away from here, and turn you eastward, and hide yourself by the brook Cherith, that is before the Jordan.17:4 And it shall be, that you shall drink of the brook; and I have commanded the ravens to feed you there.17:5 So he went and did according to the word of Yahweh; for he went and dwelt by the brook Cherith, that is before the Jordan.17:6 And the ravens brought him bread and flesh in the morning, and bread and flesh in the evening; and he drank of the brook.17:7 And it came to pass after a while, that the brook dried up, because there was no rain in the land.17:8 And the word of Yahweh came to him, saying,17:9 Arise, go to Zarephath, which belongs to Sidon, and dwell there: behold, I have commanded a widow there to sustain you.17:10 So he arose and went to Zarephath; and when he came to the gate of the city, behold, a widow was there gathering sticks: and he called to her, and said, Fetch me, I pray you, a little water in a vessel, that I may drink.17:11 And as she was going to fetch it, he called to her, and said, Bring me, I pray you, a morsel of bread in your hand.17:12 And she said, as Yahweh your God lives, I have not a cake, but a handful of meal in the jar, and a little oil in the cruse: and, behold, I am gathering two sticks, that I may go in and dress it for me and my son, that we may eat it, and die.17:13 And Elijah said to her, Fear not; go and do as you have said; but make me thereof a little cake first, and bring it forth to me, and afterward make for you and for your son.17:14 For thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, The jar of meal shall not waste, neither shall the cruse of oil fail, until the day that Yahweh sends rain upon the earth.17:15 And she went and did according to the saying of Elijah: and she, and he, and her house, did eat many days.17:16 The jar of meal wasted not, neither did the cruse of oil fail, according to the word of Yahweh, which he spoke by Elijah.17:17 And it came to pass after these things, that the son of the woman, the mistress of the house, fell sick; and his sickness was so sore, that there was no breath left in him.17:18 And she said to Elijah, What have I to do with you, O you man of God?  you are come to me to bring my sin to remembrance, and to slay my son!17:19 And he said to her, Give me your son.  And he took him out of her bosom, and carried him up into the chamber, where he abode, and laid him upon his own bed.17:20 And he cried to Yahweh, and said, O Yahweh my God, have you also brought evil upon the widow with whom I sojourn, by slaying her son?17:21 And he stretched himself upon the child three times, and cried to Yahweh, and said, O Yahweh my God, I pray you, let this child's soul come into him again.17:22 And Yahweh hearkened to the voice of Elijah; and the soul of the child came into him again, and he revived.17:23 And Elijah took the child, and brought him down out of the chamber into the house, and delivered him to his mother; and Elijah said, See, your son lives.17:24 And the woman said to Elijah, Now I know that you are a man of God, and that the word of Yahweh in your mouth is truth.18:1 And it came to pass after many days, that the word of Yahweh came to Elijah, in the third year, saying, Go, show yourself to Ahab; and I will send rain upon the earth.18:2 And Elijah went to show himself to Ahab.  And the famine was sore in Samaria.18:3 And Ahab called Obadiah, who was over the household.  (Now Obadiah feared Yahweh greatly:18:4 for it was so, when Jezebel cut off the prophets of Yahweh, that Obadiah took a hundred prophets, and hid them by fifty in a cave, and fed them with bread and water.)18:5 And Ahab said to Obadiah, Go through the land, to all the fountains of water, and to all the brooks: peradventure we may find grass and save the horses and mules alive, that we lose not all the beasts.18:6 So they divided the land between them to pass throughout it: Ahab went one way by himself, and Obadiah went another way by himself.18:7 And as Obadiah was in the way, behold, Elijah met him: and he knew him, and fell on his face, and said, Is it you, my lord Elijah?18:8 And he answered him, It is I: go, tell your lord, Behold, Elijah is here.18:9 And he said, In what way have I sinned, that you would deliver your servant into the hand of Ahab, to slay me?18:10 As Yahweh your God lives, there is no nation or kingdom, whither my lord has not sent to seek you: and when they said, He is not here, he took an oath of the kingdom and nation, that they found you not.18:11 And now you say, Go, tell your lord, Behold, Elijah is here.18:12 And it will come to pass, as soon as I am gone from you, that the Spirit of Yahweh will carry you whither I know not; and so when I come and tell Ahab, and he cannot find you, he will slay me: but I your servant fear Yahweh from my youth.18:13 Was it not told my lord what I did when Jezebel slew the prophets of Yahweh, how I hid a hundred men of Yahweh's prophets by fifty in a cave, and fed them with bread and water?18:14 And now you say, Go, tell your lord, Behold, Elijah is here; and he will slay me.18:15 And Elijah said, as Yahweh of hosts lives, before whom I stand, I will surely show myself to him today.18:16 So Obadiah went to meet Ahab, and told him; and Ahab went to meet Elijah.18:17 And it came to pass, when Ahab saw Elijah, that Ahab said to him, Is it you, you troubler of Israel?18:18 And he answered, I have not troubled Israel; but you, and your father's house, in that ye have forsaken the commandments of Yahweh, and you have followed the Baalim.18:19 Now therefore send, and gather to me all Israel to mount Carmel, and the prophets of Baal four hundred and fifty, and the prophets of the Asherah four hundred, that eat at Jezebel's table.18:20 So Ahab sent to all the children of Israel, and gathered the prophets together to mount Carmel.18:21 And Elijah came near to all the people, and said, How long go ye limping between the two sides?  if Yahweh be God, follow him; but if Baal, then follow him.  And the people answered him not a word.18:22 Then said Elijah to the people, I, even I only, am left a prophet of Yahweh; but Baal's prophets are four hundred and fifty men.18:23 Let them therefore give us two bullocks; and let them choose one bullock for themselves, and cut it in pieces, and lay it on the wood, and put no fire under; and I will dress the other bullock, and lay it on the wood, and put no fire under.18:24 And call ye on the name of your god, and I will call on the name of Yahweh; and the God that answers by fire, let him be God.  And all the people answered and said, It is well spoken.18:25 And Elijah said to the prophets of Baal, Choose you one bullock for yourselves, and dress it first; for ye are many; and call on the name of your god, but put no fire under.18:26 And they took the bullock which was given them, and they dressed it, and called on the name of Baal from morning even until noon, saying, O Baal, hear us.  But there was no voice, nor any that answered.  And they leaped about the altar which was made.18:27 And it came to pass at noon, that Elijah mocked them, and said, Cry aloud; for he is a god: either he is musing, or he is gone aside, or he is on a journey, or peradventure he sleeps and must be awaked.18:28 And they cried aloud, and cut themselves after their manner with knives and lances, till the blood gushed out upon them.18:29 And it was so, when midday was past, that they prophesied until the time of the offering of the evening oblation; but there was neither voice, nor any to answer, nor any that regarded.18:30 And Elijah said to all the people, Come near to me; and all the people came near to him.  And he repaired the altar of Yahweh that was thrown down.18:31 And Elijah took twelve stones, according to the number of the tribes of the sons of Jacob, to whom the word of Yahweh came, saying, Israel shall be your name.18:32 And with the stones he built an altar in the name of Yahweh; and he made a trench about the altar, as great as would contain two measures of seed.18:33 And he put the wood in order, and cut the bullock in pieces, and laid it on the wood.  And he said, Fill four jars with water, and pour it on the burnt offering, and on the wood.18:34 And he said, Do it the second time; and they did it the second time.  And he said, Do it the third time; and they did it the third time.18:35 And the water ran round about the altar; and he filled the trench also with water.18:36 And it came to pass at the time of the offering of the evening oblation, that Elijah the prophet came near, and said, O Yahweh, the God of Abraham, of Isaac, and of Israel, let it be known this day that you are God in Israel, and that I am your servant, and that I have done all these things at your word.18:37 Hear me, O Yahweh, hear me, that this people may know that you, Yahweh, are God, and that you have turned their heart back again.18:38 Then the fire of Yahweh fell, and consumed the burnt offering, and the wood, and the stones, and the dust, and licked up the water that was in the trench.18:39 And when all the people saw it, they fell on their faces: and they said, Yahweh, he is God; Yahweh, he is God.18:40 and Elijah said to them, Take the prophets of Baal; let not one of them escape.  And they took them; and Elijah brought them down to the brook Kishon, and slew them there.18:41 And Elijah said to Ahab, Get you up, eat and drink; for there is the sound of abundance of rain.18:42 So Ahab went up to eat and to drink.  And Elijah went up to the top of Carmel; and he bowed himself down upon the earth, and put his face between his knees.18:43 And he said to his servant, Go up now, look toward the sea.  And he went up, and looked, and said, There is nothing.  And he said, Go again seven times.18:44 And it came to pass at the seventh time, that he said, Behold, there arises a cloud out of the sea, as small as a man's hand.  And he said, Go up, say to Ahab, Make ready your chariot, and go down, that the rain stop you not.18:45 And it came to pass in a little while, that the heavens grew black with clouds and wind, and there was a great rain.  And Ahab rode, and went to Jezreel:18:46 and the hand of Yahweh was on Elijah; and he girded up his loins, and ran before Ahab to the entrance of Jezreel.19:1 And Ahab told Jezebel all that Elijah had done, and withal how he had slain all the prophets with the sword.19:2 Then Jezebel send a messenger to Elijah, saying, So let the gods do to me, and more also, if I make not your life as the life of one of them by tomorrow about this time.19:3 And when he saw that, he arose, and went for his life, and came to Beer-sheba, which belongs to Judah, and left his servant there.19:4 But he himself went a day's journey into the wilderness, and came and sat down under a juniper-tree: and he requested for himself that he might die, and said, It is enough; now, O Yahweh, take away my life; for I am not better than my fathers.19:5 And he lay down and slept under a juniper-tree; and, behold, an angel touched him, and said to him, arise and eat.19:6 And he looked, and, behold, there was at his head a cake baken on the coals, and a cruse of water.  And he did eat and drink, and laid him down again.19:7 And the angel of Yahweh came again the second time, and touched him, and said, arise and eat, because the journey is too great for you.19:8 And he arose, and did eat and drink, and went in the strength of that food forty days and forty nights to Horeb the mount of God.19:9 And he came there to a cave, and lodged there; and, behold, the word of Yahweh came to him, and he said to him, What do you here, Elijah?19:10 And he said, I have been very jealous for Yahweh, the God of hosts; for the children of Israel have forsaken your covenant, thrown down your altars, and slain your prophets with the sword: and I, even I only, am left; and they seek my life, to take it away.19:11 And he said, Go forth, and stand upon the mountain before Yahweh.  And, behold, Yahweh passed by.  And a great and strong wind ripped the mountains, and broke into pieces the rocks before Yahweh; but Yahweh was not in the wind. And after the wind an earthquake; but Yahweh was not in the earthquake.19:12 And after the earthquake a fire; but Yahweh was not in the fire. And after the fire, there was a still, small voice.19:13 And it was so, when Elijah heard it, that he wrapped his face in his mantle, and went out, and stood in the entrance of the cave.  And, behold, there came a voice to him and said, What are you doing here, Elijah?19:14 And he said, I have been very jealous for Yahweh, the God of hosts.  Because the children of Israel have forsaken your covenant, thrown down your altars, and slain your prophets with the sword; and I, even only I, am left; and they are seeking my life, to take it away.19:15 And Yahweh said to him, Go, return on your way to the wilderness of Damascus: and when you come, you shall anoint Hazael to be king over Syria;19:16 and Jehu the son of Nimshi shall you anoint to be king over Israel; and Elisha the son of Shaphat of Abel-meholah shall you anoint to be prophet in your room.19:17 And it shall come to pass, that him that escapes from the sword of Hazael shall Jehu slay; and him that escapes from the sword of Jehu shall Elisha slay.19:18 Yet will I leave me seven thousand in Israel, all the knees which have not bowed to Baal, and every mouth which has not kissed him.19:19 So he departed there, and found Elisha the son of Shaphat, who was plowing, with twelve yoke of oxen before him, and he with the twelfth: and Elijah passed over to him, and cast his mantle upon him.19:20 And he left the oxen, and ran after Elijah, and said, Let me, I pray you, kiss my father and my mother, and then I will follow you.  And he said to him, Go back again; for what have I done to you?19:21 And he returned from following him, and took the yoke of oxen, and slew them, and boiled their flesh with the instruments of the oxen, and gave to the people, and they did eat.  Then he arose, and went after Elijah, and ministered to him.20:1 And Ben-hadad the king of Syria gathered all his host together; and there were thirty and two kings with him, and horses and chariots: and he went up and besieged Samaria, and fought against it.20:2 And he sent messengers to Ahab king of Israel, into the city, and said to him, Thus says Ben-hadad,20:3 Your silver and your gold is mine; your wives also and your children, even the goodliest, are mine.20:4 And the king of Israel answered and said, It is according to your saying, my lord, O king; I am yours, and all that I have.20:5 And the messengers came again, and said, Thus speaks Ben-hadad, saying, I sent indeed to you, saying, You shall deliver me your silver, and your gold, and your wives, and your children;20:6 but I will send my servants to you tomorrow about this time, and they shall search your house, and the houses of your servants; and it shall be, that whatsoever is pleasant in your eyes, they shall put it in their hand, and take it away.20:7 Then the king of Israel called all the elders of the land, and said, Mark, I pray you, and see how this man seeks mischief: for he sent to me for my wives, and for my children, and for my silver, and for my gold; and I denied him not.20:8 And all the elders and all the people said to him, Hearken you not, neither consent.20:9 Wherefore he said to the messengers of Ben-hadad, Tell my lord the king, all that you did send for to your servant at the first I will do; but this thing I may not do.  And the messengers departed, and brought him word again.20:10 And Ben-hadad sent to him, and said, The gods do so to me, and more also, if the dust of Samaria shall suffice for handfuls for all the people that follow me.20:11 And the king of Israel answered and said, Tell him, Let not him that girds on his armor boast himself as he that puts it off.20:12 And it came to pass, when Ben-hadad heard this message, as he was drinking, he and the kings, in the pavilions, that he said to his servants, Set yourselves in array.  And they set themselves in array against the city.20:13 And, behold, a prophet came near to Ahab king of Israel, and said, Thus says Yahweh, Have you seen all this great multitude?  behold, I will deliver it into your hand this day; and you shall know that I am Yahweh.20:14 And Ahab said, By whom?  And he said, Thus says Yahweh, By the young men of the princes of the provinces.  Then he said, Who shall begin the battle?  And he answered, You.20:15 Then he mustered the young men of the princes of the provinces, and they were two hundred and thirty-two: and after them he mustered all the people, even all the children of Israel, being seven thousand.20:16 And they went out at noon.  But Ben-hadad was drinking himself drunk in the pavilions, he and the kings, the thirty and two kings that helped him.20:17 And the young men of the princes of the provinces went out first; and Ben-hadad sent out, and they told him, saying, There are men come out from Samaria.20:18 And he said, Whether they are come out for peace, take them alive, or whether they are come out for war, taken them alive.20:19 So these went out of the city, the young men of the princes of the provinces, and the army which followed them.20:20 And they slew every one his man; and the Syrians fled, and Israel pursued them: and Ben-hadad the king of Syria escaped on a horse with horsemen.20:21 And the king of Israel went out, and smote the horses and chariots, and slew the Syrians with a great slaughter.20:22 And the prophet came near to the king of Israel, and said to him, Go, strengthen yourself, and mark, and see what you do; for at the return of the year the king of Syria will come up against you.20:23 And the servants of the king of Syria said to him, Their god is a god of the hills; therefore they were stronger than we: but let us fight against them in the plain, and surely we shall be stronger than they.20:24 And do this: take the kings away, every man out of his place, and put captains in their room;20:25 and number yourself an army, like the army that you have lost, horse for horse, and chariot for chariot; and we will fight against them in the plain, and surely we shall be stronger than they.  And he hearkened to their voice, and did so.20:26 And it came to pass at the return of the year, that Ben-hadad mustered the Syrians, and went up to Aphek, to fight against Israel.20:27 And the children of Israel were mustered, and were victualled, and went against them: and the children of Israel encamped before them like two little flocks of kids; but the Syrians filled the country.20:28 And a man of God came near and spoke to the king of Israel, and said, Thus says Yahweh, Because the Syrians have said, Yahweh is a god of the hills, but he is not a god of the valleys; therefore will I deliver all this great multitude into your hand, and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.20:29 And they encamped one over against the other seven days.  And so it was, that in the seventh day the battle was joined; and the children of Israel slew of the Syrians a hundred thousand footmen in one day.20:30 But the rest fled to Aphek, into the city; and the wall fell upon twenty and seven thousand men that were left.  And Ben-hadad fled, and came into the city, into an inner chamber.20:31 And his servants said to him, Behold now, we have heard that the kings of the house of Israel are merciful kings: let us, we pray you, put sackcloth on our loins, and ropes upon our heads, and go out to the king of Israel: peradventure he will save your life.20:32 So they girded sackcloth on their loins, and put ropes on their heads, and came to the king of Israel, and said, Your servant Ben-hadad says, I pray you, let me live.  And he said, Is he yet alive?  he is my brother.20:33 Now the men observed diligently, and hasted to catch whether it were his mind; and they said, Your brother Ben-hadad.  Then he said, Go ye, bring him.  Then Ben-hadad came forth to him; and he caused him to come up into the chariot.20:34 And Ben-hadad said to him, The cities which my father took from your father I will restore; and you shall make streets for you in Damascus, as my father made in Samaria.  And I, said Ahab, will let you go with this covenant.  So he made a covenant with him, and let him go.20:35 And a certain man of the sons of the prophets said to his fellow by the word of Yahweh, Smite me, I pray you.  And the man refused to smite him.20:36 Then said he to him, Because you have not obeyed the voice of Yahweh, behold, as soon as you are departed from me, a lion shall slay you.  And as soon as he was departed from him, a lion found him, and slew him.20:37 Then he found another man, and said, Smite me, I pray you.  And the man smote him, smiting and wounding him.20:38 So the prophet departed, and waited for the king by the way, and disguised himself with his headband over his eyes.20:39 And as the king passed by, he cried to the king; and he said, Your servant went out into the midst of the battle; and, behold, a man turned aside, and brought a man to me, and said, Keep this man: if by any means he be missing, then shall your life be for his life, or else you shall pay a talent of silver.20:40 And as your servant was busy here and there, he was gone.  And the king of Israel said to him, So shall your judgment be; you yourself have decided it.20:41 And he hasted, and took the headband away from his eyes; and the king of Israel discerned him that he was of the prophets.20:42 And he said to him, Thus says Yahweh, Because you have let go out of your hand the man whom I had devoted to destruction, therefore your life shall go for his life, and your people for his people.20:43 And the king of Israel went to his house heavy and displeased, and came to Samaria.21:1 And it came to pass after these things, that Naboth the Jezreelite had a vineyard, which was in Jezreel, hard by the palace of Ahab king of Samaria.21:2 And Ahab spoke to Naboth, saying, Give me your vineyard, that I may have it for a garden of herbs, because it is near to my house; and I will give you for it a better vineyard than it: or, if it seems good to you, I will give you the worth of it in money.21:3 And Naboth said to Ahab, Yahweh forbid it me, that I should give the inheritance of my fathers to you.21:4 And Ahab came into his house heavy and displeased because of the word which Naboth the Jezreelite had spoken to him; for he had said, I will not give you the inheritance of my fathers.  And he laid him down upon his bed, and turned away his face, and would eat no bread.21:5 But Jezebel his wife came to him, and said to him, Why is your spirit so sad, that you eat no bread?21:6 And he said to her, Because I spoke to Naboth the Jezreelite, and said to him, Give me your vineyard for money; or else, if it please you, I will give you another vineyard for it: and he answered, I will not give you my vineyard.21:7 And Jezebel his wife said to him, Do you now govern the kingdom of Israel?  arise, and eat bread, and let your heart be merry: I will give you the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite.21:8 So she wrote letters in Ahab's name, and sealed them with his seal, and sent the letters to the elders and to the nobles that were in his city, and that dwelt with Naboth.21:9 And she wrote in the letters, saying, Proclaim a fast, and set Naboth on high among the people:21:10 and set two men, base fellows, before him, and let them bear witness against him, saying, You did curse God and the king.  And then carry him out, and stone him to death.21:11 And the men of his city, even the elders and the nobles who dwelt in his city, did as Jezebel had sent to them, according as it was written in the letters which she had sent to them.21:12 They proclaimed a fast, and set Naboth on high among the people.21:13 And the two men, the base fellows, came in and sat before him: and the base fellows bore witness against him, even against Naboth, in the presence of the people, saying, Naboth did curse God and the king.  Then they carried him forth out of the city, and stoned him to death with stones.21:14 Then they sent to Jezebel, saying, Naboth is stoned, and is dead.21:15 And it came to pass, when Jezebel heard that Naboth was stoned, and was dead, that Jezebel said to Ahab, arise, take possession of the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite, which he refused to give you for money; for Naboth is not alive, but dead.21:16 And it came to pass, when Ahab heard that Naboth was dead, that Ahab rose up to go down to the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite, to take possession of it.21:17 And the word of Yahweh came to Elijah the Tishbite, saying,21:18 Arise, go down to meet Ahab king of Israel, who dwells in Samaria: behold, he is in the vineyard of Naboth, where he is gone down to take possession of it.21:19 And you shall speak to him, saying, Thus says Yahweh, Have you killed and also taken possession?  And you shall speak to him, saying, Thus says Yahweh, In the place where dogs licked the blood of Naboth shall dogs lick your blood, even yours.21:20 And Ahab said to Elijah, Have you found me, O my enemy?  And he answered, I have found you, because you have sold yourself to do that which is evil in the sight of Yahweh.21:21 Behold, I will bring evil upon you, and will utterly sweep you away, and I will cut off from Ahab every man-child, and him that is shut up and him that is left at large in Israel:21:22 and I will make your house like the house of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, and like the house of Baasha the son of Ahijah, because of the provocation with which you have provoked me to anger, and have caused Israel to sin.21:23 And about Jezebel also, Yahweh spoke, saying, The dogs shall eat Jezebel by the rampart of Jezreel.21:24 Him that dies of the family of Ahab, in the city the dogs shall eat; and that dies in the field the birds of the heaven shall eat.21:25 (But there was none of them like Ahab, who sold himself to do that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, whom Jezebel his wife stirred up.21:26 And he did very abominably in following idols, according to all that the Amorites did, whom Yahweh cast out before the children of Israel.)21:27 And it came to pass, when Ahab heard those words, that he tore his clothes, and put sackcloth on his flesh, and fasted, and lay in sackcloth, and went softly.21:28 And the word of Yahweh came to Elijah the Tishbite, saying,21:29 See how Ahab is humbling himself before me?  because he humbles himself before me, I will not bring the evil in his days; but rather in his son's days will I bring the evil upon his house.22:1 And they continued three years without war between Syria and Israel.22:2 And it came to pass in the third year, that Jehoshaphat the king of Judah came down to the king of Israel.22:3 And the king of Israel said to his servants, Know ye that Ramoth-gilead is ours, and we are still, and take it not out of the hand of the king of Syria?22:4 And he said to Jehoshaphat, Will you go with me to battle to Ramoth-gilead?  And Jehoshaphat said to the king of Israel, I am as you are, my people as your people, my horses as your horses.22:5 And Jehoshaphat said to the king of Israel, Inquire first, I pray you, for the word of Yahweh.22:6 Then the king of Israel gathered the prophets together, about four hundred men, and said to them, Shall I go against Ramoth-gilead to battle, or shall I forbear?  And they said, Go up; for the Lord will deliver it into the hand of the king.22:7 But Jehoshaphat said, Is there not here a prophet of Yahweh besides, that we may inquire of him?22:8 And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, there is yet one man by whom we may inquire of Yahweh, Micaiah the son of Imlah: but I hate him; for he does not prophesy good concerning me, but evil.  And Jehoshaphat said, Let not the king say so.22:9 Then the king of Israel called an officer, and said, Fetch quickly Micaiah the son of Imlah.22:10 Now the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah were sitting each on his throne, arrayed in their robes, in an open place at the entrance of the gate of Samaria; and all the prophets were prophesying before them.22:11 And Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah made him horns of iron, and said, Thus says Yahweh, With these shall you push the Syrians, until they be consumed.22:12 And all the prophets prophesied so, saying, Go up to Ramoth-gilead, and prosper; for Yahweh will deliver it into the hand of the king.22:13 And the messenger that went to call Micaiah spoke to him, saying, Behold now, the words of the prophets declare good to the king with one mouth: let your word, I pray you, be like the word of one of them, and speak good.22:14 And Micaiah said, as Yahweh lives, what Yahweh says to me, that will I speak.22:15 And when he was come to the king, the king said to him, Micaiah, shall we go to Ramoth-gilead to battle, or shall we forbear?  And he answered him, Go up and prosper; and Yahweh will deliver it into the hand of the king.22:16 And the king said to him, How many times shall I adjure you that you speak to me nothing but the truth in the name of Yahweh?22:17 And he said, I saw all Israel scattered upon the mountains, as sheep that have no shepherd: and Yahweh said, These have no master; let them return every man to his house in peace.22:18 And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell you that he would not prophesy good concerning me, but evil?22:19 And Micaiah said, Therefore hear you the word of Yahweh: I saw Yahweh sitting on his throne, and all the host of heaven standing by him on his right hand and on his left.22:20 And Yahweh said, Who shall entice Ahab, that he may go up and fall at Ramoth-gilead?  And one said on this manner; and another said on that manner.22:21 And there came forth a spirit, and stood before Yahweh, and said, I will entice him.22:22 And Yahweh said to him, With which?  And he said, I will go forth, and will be a lying spirit in the mouth of all his prophets.  And he said, You shall entice him, and shall prevail also: go forth, and do so.22:23 Now therefore, behold, Yahweh has put a lying spirit in the mouth of all these your prophets; and Yahweh has spoken evil concerning you.22:24 Then Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah came near, and smote Micaiah on the cheek, and said, Which way went the Spirit of Yahweh from me to speak to you?22:25 And Micaiah said, Behold, you shall see on that day, when you shall go into an inner chamber to hide yourself.22:26 And the king of Israel said, Take Micaiah, and carry him back to Amon the governor of the city, and to Joash the king's son;22:27 and say, Thus says the king, Put this fellow in the prison, and feed him with bread of affliction and with water of affliction, until I come in peace.22:28 And Micaiah said, If you return at all in peace, Yahweh has not spoken by me.  And he said, Hear, ye peoples, all of you.22:29 So the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah went up to Ramoth-gilead.22:30 And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, I will disguise myself, and go into the battle; but put you on your robes.  And the king of Israel disguised himself, and went into the battle.22:31 Now the king of Syria had commanded the thirty and two captains of his chariots, saying, Fight neither with small nor great, save only with the king of Israel.22:32 And it came to pass, when the captains of the chariots saw Jehoshaphat, that they said, Surely it is the king of Israel; and they turned aside to fight against him: and Jehoshaphat cried out.22:33 And it came to pass, when the captains of the chariots saw that it was not the king of Israel, that they turned back from pursuing him.22:34 And a certain man drew his bow at random, and struck the king of Israel between the joints of the armor: therefore he said to the driver of his chariot, Turn your hand, and carry me out of the host; for I am sore wounded.22:35 And the battle increased that day: and the king was stayed up in his chariot against the Syrians, and died at even; and the blood ran out of the wound into the bottom of the chariot.22:36 And there went a cry throughout the host about the going down of the sun, saying, Every man to his city, and every man to his country.22:37 So the king died, and was brought to Samaria; and they buried the king in Samaria.22:38 And they washed the chariot by the pool of Samaria; and the dogs licked up his blood (now the harlots washed themselves there); according to the word of Yahweh which he spoke.22:39 Now the rest of the acts of Ahab, and all that he did, and the ivory house which he built, and all the cities that he built, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?22:40 So Ahab slept with his fathers; and Ahaziah his son reigned in his stead.22:41 And Jehoshaphat the son of Asa began to reign over Judah in the fourth year of Ahab king of Israel.22:42 Jehoshaphat was thirty and five years old when he began to reign; and he reigned twenty and five years in Jerusalem.  And his mother's name was Azubah the daughter of Shilhi.22:43 And he walked in all the way of Asa his father; He turned not aside from it, doing that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh: however, the high places were not taken away; the people still sacrificed and burnt incense in the high places.22:44 And Jehoshaphat made peace with the king of Israel.22:45 Now the rest of the acts of Jehoshaphat, and his might that he showed, and how he warred, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?22:46 And the remnant of the sodomites, that remained in the days of his father Asa, he put away out of the land.22:47 And there was no king in Edom: a deputy was king.22:48 Jehoshaphat made ships of Tarshish to go to Ophir for gold: but they went not; for the ships were broken at Ezion-geber.22:49 Then said Ahaziah the son of Ahab to Jehoshaphat, Let my servants go with your servants in the ships.  But Jehoshaphat would not.22:50 And Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David his father; And Jehoram his son reigned in his stead.22:51 Ahaziah the son of Ahab began to reign over Israel in Samaria in the seventeenth year of Jehoshaphat king of Judah, and he reigned two years over Israel.22:52 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and walked in the way of his father, and in the way of his mother, and in the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, in which he made Israel to sin.22:53 And he served Baal, and worshipped him, and provoked to anger Yahweh, the God of Israel, according to all that his father had done.End of 1 Kings2 Kings1:1 And Moab rebelled against Israel after the death of Ahab.1:2 And Ahaziah fell down through the lattice in his upper chamber that was in Samaria, and was sick: and he sent messengers, and said to them, Go, inquire of Baal-zebub, the god of Ekron, whether I shall recover of this sickness.1:3 But the angel of Yahweh said to Elijah the Tishbite, arise, go up to meet the messengers of the king of Samaria, and say to them, Is it because there is no God in Israel, that ye go to inquire of Baal-zebub, the god of Ekron?1:4 Now therefore thus says Yahweh, You shall not come down from the bed whither you are gone up, but shall surely die.  And Elijah departed.1:5 And the messengers returned to him, and he said to them, Why is it that ye are returned?1:6 And they said to him, There came up a man to meet us, and said to us, Go, turn again to the king that sent you, and say to him, Thus says Yahweh, Is it because there is no God in Israel, that you send to inquire of Baal-zebub, the god of Ekron?  therefore you shall not come down from the bed whither you are gone up, but shall surely die.1:7 And he said to them, What manner of man was he that came up to meet you, and told you these words?1:8 And they answered him, He was a hairy man, and girt with a girdle of leather about his loins.  And he said, It is Elijah the Tishbite.1:9 Then the king sent to him a captain of fifty with his fifty.  And he went up to him: and, behold, he was sitting on the top of the hill.  And he spoke to him, O man of God, the king has said, Come down.1:10 And Elijah answered and said to the captain of fifty, If I be a man of God, let fire come down from heaven, and consume you and your fifty.  And there came down fire from heaven, and consumed him and his fifty.1:11 And again he sent to him another captain of fifty and his fifty.  And he answered and said to him, O man of God, thus has the king said, Come down quickly.1:12 And Elijah answered and said to them, If I be a man of God, let fire come down from heaven, and consume you and your fifty.  And the fire of God came down from heaven, and consumed him and his fifty.1:13 And again he sent the captain of a third fifty with his fifty.  And the third captain of fifty went up, and came and fell on his knees before Elijah, and besought him, and said to him, O man of God, I pray you, let my life, and the life of these fifty your servants, be precious in your sight.1:14 Behold, there came fire down from heaven, and consumed the two former captains of fifty with their fifties; but now let my life be precious in your sight.1:15 And the angel of Yahweh said to Elijah, Go down with him: be not afraid of him.  And he arose, and went down with him to the king.1:16 And he said to him, Thus says Yahweh, Forasmuch as you have sent messengers to inquire of Baal-zebub, the god of Ekron, is it because there is no God in Israel to inquire of his word?  therefore you shall not come down from the bed whither you are gone up, but shall surely die.1:17 So he died according to the word of Yahweh which Elijah had spoken.  And Jehoram began to reign in his stead in the second year of Jehoram the son of Jehoshaphat king of Judah; because he had no son.1:18 Now the rest of the acts of Ahaziah which he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?2:1 And it came to pass, when Yahweh would take up Elijah by a whirlwind into heaven, that Elijah went with Elisha from Gilgal.2:2 And Elijah said to Elisha, Tarry here, I pray you; for Yahweh has sent me as far as Beth-el.  And Elisha said, as Yahweh lives, and as your soul lives, I will not leave you.  So they went down to Beth-el.2:3 And the sons of the prophets that were at Beth-el came forth to Elisha, and said to him, Know you that Yahweh will take away your master from your head today?  And he said, Yes, I know it; hold ye your peace.2:4 And Elijah said to him, Elisha, tarry here, I pray you; for Yahweh has sent me to Jericho.  And he said, as Yahweh lives, and as your soul lives, I will not leave you.  So they came to Jericho.2:5 And the sons of the prophets that were at Jericho came near to Elisha, and said to him, Know you that Yahweh will take away your master from your head today?  And he answered, Yes, I know it; hold ye your peace.2:6 And Elijah said to him, Tarry here, I pray you; for Yahweh has sent me to the Jordan.  And he said, as Yahweh lives, and as your soul lives, I will not leave you.  And they two went on.2:7 And fifty men of the sons of the prophets  went, and stood over against them afar off: and they two stood by the Jordan.2:8 And Elijah took his mantle, and wrapped it together, and smote the waters, and they were divided here and there, so that they two went over on dry ground.2:9 And it came to pass, when they were gone over, that Elijah said to Elisha, ask what I shall do for you, before I am taken from you.  And Elisha said, I pray you, let a double portion of your spirit be upon me.2:10 And he said, You have asked a hard thing: nevertheless, if you see me when I am taken from you, it shall be so to you; but if not, it shall not be so.2:11 And it came to pass, as they still went on, and talked, that, behold, there appeared a chariot of fire, and horses of fire, which parted them both asunder; and Elijah went up by a whirlwind into heaven.2:12 And Elisha saw it, and he cried, My father, my father, the chariots of Israel and the horsemen thereof!  And he saw him no more: and he took hold of his own clothes, and rent them in two pieces.2:13 He took up also the mantle of Elijah that fell from him, and went back, and stood by the bank of the Jordan.2:14 And he took the mantle of Elijah that fell from him, and smote the waters, and said, Where is Yahweh, the God of Elijah?  and when he also had smitten the waters, they were divided here and there; and Elisha went over.2:15 And when the sons of the prophets that were at Jericho over against him saw him, they said, The spirit of Elijah does rest on Elisha.  And they came to meet him, and bowed themselves to the ground before him.2:16 And they said to him, Behold now, there are with your servants fifty strong men; let them go, we pray you, and seek your master, lest the Spirit of Yahweh has taken him up, and cast him upon some mountain, or into some valley.  And he said, You shall not send.2:17 And when they urged him till he was ashamed, he said, Send.  They sent therefore fifty men; and they sought three days, but found him not.2:18 And they came back to him, while he tarried at Jericho; and he said to them, Did I not say to you, Go not?2:19 And the men of the city said to Elisha, Behold, we pray you, the situation of this city is pleasant, as my lord sees: but the water is bad, and the land miscarrieth.2:20 And he said, Bring me a new cruse, and put salt therein.  And they brought it to him.2:21 And he went forth to the spring of the waters, and cast salt therein, and said, Thus says Yahweh, I have healed these waters; there shall not be from there any more death or miscarrying.2:22 So the waters were healed to this day, according to the word of Elisha which he spoke.2:23 And he went up from there to Beth-el; and as he was going up by the way, there came forth young lads out of the city, and mocked him, and said to him, Go up, you baldhead; go up, you baldhead.2:24 And he looked behind him and saw them, and cursed them in the name of Yahweh.  And there came forth two she-bears out of the wood, and mauled 42 lads of them.2:25 And he went from there to mount Carmel, and from there he returned to Samaria.3:1 Now Jehoram the son of Ahab began to reign over Israel in Samaria in the eighteenth year of Jehoshaphat king of Judah, and reigned twelve years.3:2 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, but not like his father, and like his mother; for he put away the pillar of Baal that his father had made.3:3 Nevertheless he cleaved to the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, with which he made Israel to sin; he departed not therefrom.3:4 Now Mesha king of Moab was a sheep-master; and he rendered to the king of Israel the wool of a hundred thousand lambs, and of a hundred thousand rams.3:5 But it came to pass, when Ahab was dead, that the king of Moab rebelled against the king of Israel.3:6 And king Jehoram went out of Samaria at that time, and mustered all Israel.3:7 And he went and sent to Jehoshaphat the king of Judah, saying, The king of Moab has rebelled against me: will you go with me against Moab to battle?  And he said, I will go up: I am as you are, my people as your people, my horses as your horses.3:8 And he said, Which way shall we go up?  And he answered, The way of the wilderness of Edom.3:9 So the king of Israel went, and the king of Judah, and the king of Edom; and they made a circuit of seven days' journey: and there was no water for the host, nor for the beasts that followed them.3:10 And the king of Israel said, alas! for Yahweh has called these three kings together to deliver them into the hand of Moab.3:11 But Jehoshaphat said, Is there not here a prophet of Yahweh, that we may inquire of Yahweh by him?  And one of the king of Israel's servants answered and said, Elisha the son of Shaphat is here, who poured water on the hands of Elijah.3:12 And Jehoshaphat said, The word of Yahweh is with him.  So the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat and the king of Edom went down to him.3:13 And Elisha said to the king of Israel, What have I to do with you?  go to the prophets of your father, and to the prophets of your mother.  And the king of Israel said to him, Nay; for Yahweh has called these three kings together to deliver them into the hand of Moab.3:14 And Elisha said, as Yahweh of hosts lives, before whom I stand, surely, were it not that I regard the presence of Jehoshaphat the king of Judah, I would not look toward you, nor see you.3:15 But now bring me a minstrel.  And it came to pass, when the minstrel played, that the hand of Yahweh came upon him.3:16 And he said, Thus says Yahweh, Make this valley full of trenches.3:17 For thus says Yahweh, You shall not see wind, neither shall ye see rain; yet that valley shall be filled with water, and ye shall drink, both ye and your cattle and your beasts.3:18 And this is but a light thing in the sight of Yahweh: he will also deliver the Moabites into your hand.3:19 And ye shall smite every fortified city, and every choice city, and shall fell every good tree, and stop all fountains of water, and mar every good piece of land with stones.3:20 And it came to pass in the morning, about the time of offering the oblation, that, behold, there came water by the way of Edom, and the country was filled with water.3:21 Now when all the Moabites heard that the kings were come up to fight against them, they gathered themselves together, all that were able to put on armor, and upward, and stood on the border.3:22 And they rose up early in the morning, and the sun shone upon the water, and the Moabites saw the water over against them as red as blood:3:23 and they said, This is blood; the kings are surely destroyed, and they have smitten each man his fellow: now therefore, Moab, to the spoil.3:24 And when they came to the camp of Israel, the Israelites rose up and smote the Moabites, so that they fled before them; and they went forward into the land smiting the Moabites.3:25 And they beat down the cities; and on every good piece of land they cast every man his stone, and filled it; and they stopped all the springs of water, and felled all the good trees, until only in Kir-hareseth had they left the stones thereof; but even it the slingers went about, and attacked it.3:26 And when the king of Moab saw that the battle was too sore for him, he took with him seven hundred men that drew sword, to break through to the king of Edom; but they could not.3:27 Then he took his eldest son that should have reigned in his stead, and offered him for a burnt offering upon the wall.  And there was great wrath against Israel: and they departed from him, and returned to their own land.4:1 Now there cried a certain woman of the wives of the sons of the prophets to Elisha, saying, Your servant my husband is dead; and you know that your servant did fear Yahweh: and the creditor is come to take to him my two children to be bondmen.4:2 And Elisha said to her, What shall I do for you?  tell me; what have you in the house?  And she said, Your handmaid has not anything in the house, save a pot of oil.4:3 Then he said, Go, borrow you vessels abroad of all your neighbors, even empty vessels; borrow not a few.4:4 And you shall go in, and shut the door upon you and upon your sons, and pour out into all those vessels; and you shall set aside that which is full.4:5 So she went from him, and shut the door upon her and upon her sons; they brought the vessels to her, and she poured out.4:6 And it came to pass, when the vessels were full, that she said to her son, Bring me yet a vessel.  And he said to her, There is not a vessel more.  And the oil stayed.4:7 Then she came and told the man of God.  And he said, Go, sell the oil, and pay your debt, and live you and your sons of the rest.4:8 And it fell on a day, that Elisha passed to Shunem, where was a great woman; and she constrained him to eat bread.  And so it was, that as oft as he passed by, he turned in there to eat bread.4:9 And she said to her husband, Behold now, I perceive that this is a holy man of God, that passes by us continually.4:10 Let us make, I pray you, a little chamber on the wall; and let us set for him there a bed, and a table, and a seat, and a candlestick: and it shall be, when he comes to us, that he shall turn in there.4:11 And it fell on a day, that he came there, and he turned into the chamber and lay there.4:12 And he said to Gehazi his servant, Call this Shunammite.  And when he had called her, she stood before him.4:13 And he said to him, Say now to her, Behold, you have been careful for us with all this care; what is to be done for you?  would you be spoken for to the king, or to the captain of the host?  And she answered, I dwell among my own people.4:14 And he said, What then is to be done for her?  And Gehazi answered, Verily she has no son, and her husband is old.4:15 And he said, Call her.  And when he had called her, she stood in the door.4:16 And he said, at this season, when the time comes round, you shall embrace a son.  And she said, Nay, my lord, you man of God, do not lie to your handmaid.4:17 And the woman conceived, and bore a son at that season, when the time came round, as Elisha had said to her.4:18 And when the child was grown, it fell on a day, that he went out to his father to the reapers.4:19 And he said to his father, My head, my head.  And he said to his servant, Carry him to his mother.4:20 And when he had taken him, and brought him to his mother, he sat on her knees till noon, and then died.4:21 And she went up and laid him on the bed of the man of God, and shut the door upon him, and went out.4:22 And she called to her husband, and said, Send me, I pray you, one of the servants, and one of the asses, that I may run to the man of God, and come again.4:23 And he said, Why will you go to him today?  it is neither new moon nor sabbath.  And she said, It shall be well.4:24 Then she saddled a donkey, and said to her servant, Drive, and go forward; slacken me not the riding, except I bid you.4:25 So she went, and came to the man of God to mount Carmel.  And it came to pass, when the man of God saw her afar off, that he said to Gehazi his servant, Behold, yonder is the Shunammite:4:26 run, I pray you, now to meet her, and say to her, Is it well with you?  is it well with your husband?  is it well with the child?  And she answered, It is well.4:27 And when she came to the man of God to the hill, she caught hold of his feet.  And Gehazi came near to thrust her away; but the man of God said, Let her alone: for her soul is vexed within her; and Yahweh has hid it from me, and has not told me.4:28 Then she said, Did I desire a son of my lord?  did I not say, Do not deceive me?4:29 Then he said to Gehazi, Gird up your loins, and take my staff in your hand, and go your way: if you meet any man, salute him not; and if any salute you, answer him not again: and lay my staff upon the face of the child.4:30 And the mother of the child said, as Yahweh lives, and as your soul lives, I will not leave you.  And he arose, and followed her.4:31 And Gehazi passed on before them, and laid the staff upon the face of the child; but there was neither voice, nor hearing.  Wherefore he returned to meet him, and told him, saying, The child is not awaked.4:32 And when Elisha was come into the house, behold, the child was dead, and laid upon his bed.4:33 He went in therefore, and shut the door upon the two of them, and prayed to Yahweh.4:34 And he went up, and lay upon the child, and put his mouth upon his mouth, and his eyes upon his eyes, and his hands upon his hands: and he stretched himself upon him; and the flesh of the child grew warm.4:35 Then he returned, and walked in the house once to and fro; and went up, and stretched himself upon him: and the child sneezed seven times, and the child opened his eyes.4:36 And he called Gehazi, and said, Call this Shunammite.  So he called her.  And when she was come in to him, he said, Take up your son.4:37 Then she went in, and fell at his feet, and bowed herself to the ground; and she took up her son, and went out.4:38 And Elisha came again to Gilgal.  And there was a famine in the land; and the sons of the prophets were sitting before him; and he said to his servant, Set the great pot on, and boil pottage for the sons of the prophets.4:39 And one went out into the field to gather herbs, and found a wild vine, and gathered wild gourds from it, his lap full, and came and shred them into the pot of pottage, not knowing what they were.4:40 So they poured it out for the men to eat.  And it came to pass, as they were eating of the pottage, that they cried out, and said, O man of God, there is death in the pot.  And they could not eat thereof.4:41 But he said, Then bring some meal.  And he cast it into the pot; and he said, Pour out for the people, that they may eat.  And there was no harm in the pot.4:42 And there came a man from Baal-shalishah, and brought the man of God bread of the first-fruits, twenty loaves of barley, and fresh ears of grain in his sack.  And he said, Give it to the people, that they may eat.4:43 And his servant said, What, should I set this before a hundred men?  But he said, Give the people, that they may eat; for thus says Yahweh, They shall eat, and shall leave some of it left over.4:44 So he set it before them, and they did eat, and left some of it, according to the word of Yahweh.5:1 Now Naaman, captain of the host of the king of Syria, was a great man with his master, and honorable, because by him Yahweh had given victory to Syria: he was also a mighty man of valor, but he was a leper.5:2 And the Syrians had gone out in bands, and had brought away captive out of the land of Israel a little maiden; and she waited on Naaman's wife.5:3 And she said to her mistress, Would that my lord were with the prophet that is in Samaria! Then he would heal him of his leprosy.5:4 And one went in, and told his lord, saying, Thus and thus said the maiden that is of the land of Israel.5:5 And the king of Syria said, Go now, and I will send a letter to the king of Israel.  And he departed, and took with him ten talents of silver, and six thousand pieces of gold, and ten changes of raiment.5:6 And he brought the letter to the king of Israel, saying, and now when this letter is come to you, behold, I have sent Naaman my servant to you, that you may heal him of his leprosy.5:7 And it came to pass, when the king of Israel had read the letter, that he tore his clothes, and said, am I God, to kill and to make alive, that this man sends orders to me to heal a man of his leprosy?  But consider, I pray you, and see how he seeks a quarrel against me.5:8 And it came about, that when Elisha the man of God heard that the king of Israel had rent his clothes, he sent word to the king, saying, Why have you rent your clothes?  Let him come now to me, and he shall know that there is a prophet in Israel.5:9 So Naaman came with his horses and with his chariots, and stood at the door of Elisha's house.5:10 And Elisha sent a messenger to him, saying, Go and wash in the Jordan seven times, and your flesh shall come back to you, and you shall be clean.5:11 But Naaman was angry, and went away, and said, Behold, I thought, He will surely come out to me, and stand, and call on the name of Yahweh his God, and wave his hand over the place, and heal the leper.5:12 Are not Abanah and Pharpar, the rivers of Damascus, better than all the waters of Israel?  Could I not wash in them, and be clean?  So he turned, and went away in a rage.5:13 And his servants came near, and spoke to him, and said, My father, if the prophet had bid you to do some great thing, would you not have done it?  How much rather then when he says to you, Wash, and be clean?5:14 Then went he down, and dipped himself seven times in the Jordan, according to the saying of the man of God; and his flesh came back, like the flesh of a little child, and he was clean.5:15 And he returned to the man of God, he and all his company, and came, and stood before him; and he said, Behold now, I know that there is no God in all the earth, except in Israel: now therefore, I pray you, accept a present from your servant.5:16 He however said, as Yahweh lives, before whom I stand, I will accept none.  And he kept urging him to take it; but he refused.5:17 And Naaman said, If not, yet, I pray you, let there be given to your servant two mules' burden of earth; for your servant will from now on offer neither burnt offering nor sacrifice to other gods; only to Yahweh.5:18 In the following matter may Yahweh pardon your servant.  When my master goes into the house of Rimmon to worship there, and he leans on my hand, and I bow myself in the house of Rimmon, when I bow myself in the house of Rimmon, may Yahweh pardon your servant in this matter.5:19 And he said to him, Go in peace.  So he departed from him a little way.5:20 But Gehazi the servant of Elisha the man of God, said, Behold, my master has spared this Naaman the Syrian, by not taking at his hands that which he brought.  As Yahweh lives, I will run after him, and accept somewhat from him.5:21 So Gehazi followed after Naaman.  And when Naaman saw someone running after him, he alighted from the chariot to meet him, and said, Is everything well?5:22 And he said, all is well.  My master has sent me, saying, Behold, even now there are come to me from the hill-country of Ephraim two young men of the sons of the prophets; give them, I pray you, a talent of silver, and two changes of clothes.5:23 And Naaman said, Be pleased to take two talents.  And he urged him, and bound two talents of silver in two bags, with two changes of clothes, and laid them upon two of his servants; and they carried them before [Gehazi].5:24 And when he came to the hill, he took them from their hand, and laid them in the house; and he sent the men away, and they departed.5:25 And went in, and stood before his master.  And Elisha said to him, Where are you coming from, Gehazi?  And he said, Your servant went nowhere.5:26 And he said to him, Did not my heart go with you, when the man turned from his chariot to meet you?  Is it a time to receive money, and to receive garments, and oliveyards and vineyards, and sheep and oxen, and men-servants and maid-servants?5:27 The leprosy therefore of Naaman shall cleave to you, and to your seed for ever.  And [Gehazi] went out from his presence a leper as white as snow.6:1 And the sons of the prophets said to Elisha, Behold now, the place where we dwell before you is too cramped for us.6:2 Let us go, we pray you, to the Jordan, and take there every man a beam, and let us make us a place there, where we may dwell.  And he answered, Go ahead.6:3 And one said, Be pleased, I pray you, to go with your servants.  And he answered, I will go.6:4 So he went with them.  And when they came to the Jordan, they cut down wood.6:5 But as one was felling a pole, the axe-head fell into the water; and he cried, and said, alas, my master!  (For it was borrowed.)6:6 And the man of God said, Where did it fall?  And he showed him the place.  And he cut down a stick, and cast it in there, and caused the iron to swim.6:7 And he said, Take it up to you.  So he put out his hand, and took it.6:8 Now the king of Syria was warring against Israel; and he took counsel with his servants, saying, In such and such a place shall be my camp.6:9 And the man of God sent to the king of Israel, saying, Beware that you pass not such a place; for there the Syrians are coming down.6:10 And the king of Israel sent to the place which the man of God told him and warned him of; and he saved himself there, not once nor twice.6:11 And the heart of the king of Syria was sore troubled for this thing; and he called his servants, and said to them, Will ye not show me which of us is for the king of Israel?6:12 And one of his servants said, Nay, my lord, O king; but Elisha, the prophet that is in Israel, tells the king of Israel the words that you speak in your bedchamber.6:13 And he said, Go and see where he is, that I may send and fetch him.  And it was told him, saying, Behold, he is in Doesan.6:14 Therefore sent he there horses, and chariots, and a great host: and they came by night, and surrounded the city.6:15 And when the servant of the man of God was risen early, and gone forth, behold, a host with horses and chariots was round about the city.  And his servant said to him, alas, my master! how shall we do?6:16 And he answered, Fear not; for they that are with us are more than they that are with them.6:17 And Elisha prayed, and said, Yahweh, I pray you, open his eyes, that he may see.  And Yahweh opened the eyes of the young man; and he saw: and, behold, the mountain was full of horses and chariots of fire round about Elisha.6:18 And when they came down to him, Elisha prayed to Yahweh, and said, Strike this people, I pray you, with blindness.  And he smote them with blindness according to the word of Elisha.6:19 And Elisha said to them, This is not the way, neither is this the city: follow me, and I will bring you to the man whom ye seek.  And he led them to Samaria.6:20 And it came to pass, when they were come into Samaria, that Elisha said, Yahweh, open the eyes of these men, that they may see.  And Yahweh opened their eyes, and they saw; and, behold, they were in the midst of Samaria.6:21 And the king of Israel said to Elisha, when he saw them, My father, shall I smite them?  shall I smite them?6:22 And he answered, You shall not smite them: would you smite those whom you have taken captive with your sword and with your bow?  set bread and water before them, that they may eat and drink, and go to their master.6:23 And he prepared great provision for them; and when they had eaten and drunk, he sent them away, and they went to their master.  And the bands of Syria came no more into the land of Israel.6:24 And it came to pass after this, that Benhadad king of Syria gathered all his host, and went up, and besieged Samaria.6:25 And there was a great famine in Samaria: and, behold, they besieged it, until a donkey's head was sold for 80 pieces of silver, and the fourth part of a kab of dove's dung for 5 pieces of silver.6:26 And as the king of Israel was passing by upon the wall, there cried a woman to him, saying, Help, my lord, O king.6:27 And he said, If Yahweh does not help you, from where shall I help you?  out of the threshing-floor, or out of the winepress?6:28 And the king said to her, What ails you?  And she answered, This woman said to me, Give your son, so we may eat him today, and we will eat my son tomorrow.6:29 So we boiled my son, and did eat him: and I said to her on the next day, Give your son, so we may eat him; but she has hidden her son.6:30 And it came to pass, when the king heard the words of the woman, that he rent his clothes (now he was passing by upon the wall); and the people looked, and, behold, he had sackcloth within upon his flesh.6:31 Then he said, God do so to me, and more also, if the head of Elisha the son of Shaphat shall stand on him this day.6:32 But Elisha was sitting in his house, and the elders were sitting with him; and the king sent a man out from his presence: but before the messenger came to him, he said to the elders, Do you see how this son of a murderer has sent to take away my head?  look, when the messenger comes, shut the door, and hold the door fast against him: is not the sound of his master's feet behind him?6:33 And while he was yet talking with them, behold, the messenger came down to him: and he said, Behold, this evil is of Yahweh; why should I wait for Yahweh any longer?7:1 And Elisha said, Hear ye the word of Yahweh: thus says Yahweh, Tomorrow about this time shall a measure of fine flour be sold for a shekel, and two measures of barley for a shekel, in the gate of Samaria.7:2 Then the captain on whose hand the king leaned answered the man of God, and said, Behold, if Yahweh should make windows in heaven, might this thing be?  And he said, Behold, you shall see it with your eyes, but shall not eat thereof.7:3 Now there were four leprous men at the entrance of the gate: and they said one to another, Why sit we here until we die?7:4 If we say, We will enter into the city, then the famine is in the city, and we shall die there; and if we sit still here, we die also.  Now therefore come, and let us fall to the host of the Syrians: if they save us alive, we shall live; and if they kill us, we shall but die.7:5 And they rose up in the twilight, to go to the camp of the Syrians; and when they were come to the outermost part of the camp of the Syrians, behold, there was no man there.7:6 For the Lord had made the host of the Syrians to hear a noise of chariots, and a noise of horses, even the noise of a great host: and they said one to another, Lo, the king of Israel has hired against us the kings of the Hittites, and the kings of the Egyptians, to come upon us.7:7 Wherefore they arose and fled in the twilight, and left their tents, and their horses, and their asses, even the camp as it was, and fled for their life.7:8 And when these lepers came to the outermost part of the camp, they went into one tent, and did eat and drink, and carried there silver, and gold, and raiment, and went and hid it; and they came back, and entered into another tent, and carried there also, and went and hid it.7:9 Then they said one to another, We do not well; this day is a day of good tidings, and we hold our peace: if we tarry till the morning light, punishment will overtake us; now therefore come, let us go and tell the king's household.7:10 So they came and called to the porter of the city; and they told them, saying, We came to the camp of the Syrians, and, behold, there was no man there, neither voice of man, but the horses tied, and the asses tied, and the tents as they were.7:11 And he called the porters; and they told it to the king's household within.7:12 And the king arose in the night, and said to his servants, I will now show you what the Syrians have done to us.  They know that we are hungry; therefore are they gone out of the camp to hide themselves in the field, saying, When they come out of the city, we shall take them alive, and get into the city.7:13 And one of his servants answered and said, Let some take, I pray you, five of the horses that remain, which are left in the city (behold, they are as all the multitude of Israel that are left in it; behold, they are as all the multitude of Israel that are consumed); and let us send and see.7:14 They took therefore two chariots with horses; and the king sent after the host of the Syrians, saying, Go and see.7:15 And they went after them to the Jordan: and, lo, all the way was full of garments and vessels, which the Syrians had cast away in their haste.  And the messengers returned, and told the king.7:16 And the people went out, and plundered the camp of the Syrians.  So a measure of fine flour was sold for a shekel, and two measures of barley for a shekel, according to the word of Yahweh.7:17 And the king appointed the captain on whose hand he leaned to have the charge of the gate: and the people trod upon him in the gate, and he died as the man of God had said, who spoke when the king came down to him.7:18 And it came to pass, as the man of God had spoken to the king, saying, Two measures of barley for a shekel, and a measure of fine flour for a shekel, shall be tomorrow about this time in the gate of Samaria;7:19 and that captain answered the man of God, and said, Now, behold, if Yahweh should make windows in heaven, might such a thing be?  and he said, Behold, you shall see it with your eyes, but shall not eat thereof:7:20 it came to pass even so to him; for the people trod upon him in the gate, and he died.8:1 Now Elisha had spoken to the woman, whose son he had restored to life, saying, arise, and go you and your household, and sojourn wheresoever you can sojourn: for Yahweh has called for a famine; and it shall also come upon the land seven years.8:2 And the woman arose, and did according to the word of the man of God; and she went with her household, and sojourned in the land of the Philistines seven years.8:3 And it came to pass at the seven years' end, that the woman returned out of the land of the Philistines: and she went forth to cry to the king for her house and for her land.8:4 Now the king was talking with Gehazi the servant of the man of God, saying, Tell me, I pray you, all the great things that Elisha has done.8:5 And it came to pass, as he was telling the king how he had restored to life him that was dead, that, behold, the woman, whose son he had restored to life, cried to the king for her house and for her land.  And Gehazi said, My lord, O king, this is the woman, and this is her son, whom Elisha restored to life.8:6 And when the king asked the woman, she told him.  So the king appointed to her a certain officer, saying, Restore all that was hers, and all the fruits of the field since the day that she left the land, even until now.8:7 And Elisha came to Damascus; and Benhadad the king of Syria was sick; and it was told him, saying, The man of God is come here.8:8 And the king said to Hazael, Take a present in your hand, and go, meet the man of God, and inquire of Yahweh by him, saying, Shall I recover of this sickness?8:9 So Hazael went to meet him, and took a present with him, even of every good thing of Damascus, forty camels' burden, and came and stood before him, and said, Your son Benhadad king of Syria has sent me to you, saying, Shall I recover of this sickness?8:10 And Elisha said to him, Go, say to him, You shall surely recover.  Though Yahweh has shown me that he shall surely die.8:11 And Elisha settled his countenance stedfastly upon him, until he was ashamed.  Then the man of God wept.8:12 And Hazael said, Why does my lord weep?  And he answered, Because I know the evil that you will do to the children of Israel: their strongholds will you set on fire, and their young men will you slay with the sword, and will dash in pieces their little ones, and rip up their women with child.8:13 And Hazael said, But what is your servant, who is but a dog, that he should do this great thing?  And Elisha answered, Yahweh has shown me that you shall be king over Syria.8:14 Then he departed from Elisha, and came to his master; who said to him, What said Elisha to you?  And he answered, He told me that you would surely recover.8:15 And it came to pass on the morrow, that he took the coverlet, and dipped it in water, and spread it on his face, so that he died: and Hazael reigned in his stead.8:16 And in the fifth year of Joram the son of Ahab king of Israel, Jehoshaphat being then king of Judah, Jehoram the son of Jehoshaphat king of Judah began to reign.8:17 Thirty and two years old was he when he began to reign; and he reigned eight years in Jerusalem.8:18 And he walked in the way of the kings of Israel, as did the house of Ahab: for he had the daughter of Ahab to wife; and he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh.8:1 Yet Juda Yahweh would not destroy, for David his servant's sake, as he promised him to give to him a lamp for his children alway.8:20 In his days Edom revolted from under the hand of Judah, and made a king over themselves.8:21 Then Joram passed over to Zair, and all his chariots with him: and he rose up by night, and smote the Edomites that surrounded him about, and the captains of the chariots; and the people fled to their tents.8:22 So Edom revolted from under the hand of Judah to this day.  Then did Libnah revolt at the same time.8:23 And the rest of the acts of Joram, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?8:24 And Joram slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David; and Ahaziah his son reigned in his stead.8:25 In the twelfth year of Joram the son of Ahab king of Israel did Ahaziah the son of Jehoram king of Judah begin to reign.8:26 Two and twenty years old was Ahaziah when he began to reign; and he reigned one year in Jerusalem.  And his mother's name was Athaliah the daughter of Omri king of Israel.8:27 And he walked in the way of the house of Ahab, and did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, as did the house of Ahab; for he was the son-in-law of the house of Ahab.8:28 And he went with Joram the son of Ahab to war against Hazael king of Syria at Ramoth-gilead: and the Syrians wounded Joram.8:29 And king Joram returned to be healed in Jezreel of the wounds which the Syrians had given him at Ramah, when he fought against Hazael king of Syria.  And Ahaziah the son of Jehoram king of Judah went down to see Joram the son of Ahab in Jezreel, because he was sick.9:1 And Elisha the prophet called one of the sons of the prophets, and said to him, Gird up your loins, and take this vial of oil in your hand, and go to Ramoth-gilead.9:2 And when you come there, look out there Jehu the son of Jehoshaphat the son of Nimshi, and go in, and make him arise up from among his brethren, and carry him to an inner chamber.9:3 Then take the vial of oil, and pour it on his head, and say, Thus says Yahweh, I have anointed you king over Israel.  Then open the door, and flee, and tarry not.9:4 So the young man, even the young man the prophet, went to Ramoth-gilead.9:5 And when he came, behold, the captains of the host were sitting; and he said, I have an errand to you, O captain.  And Jehu said, To which of us all?  And he said, To you, O captain.9:6 And he arose, and went into the house; and he poured the oil on his head, and said to him, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, I have anointed you king over the people of Yahweh, even over Israel.9:7 And you shall smite the house of Ahab your master, that I may avenge the blood of my servants the prophets, and the blood of all the servants of Yahweh, at the hand of Jezebel.9:8 For the whole house of Ahab shall perish; and I will cut off from Ahab every man-child, and him that is shut up and him that is left at large in Israel.9:9 And I will make the house of Ahab like the house of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, and like the house of Baasha the son of Ahijah.9:10 And the dogs shall eat Jezebel in the portion of Jezreel, and there shall be none to bury her.  And he opened the door, and fled.9:11 Then Jehu came forth to the servants of his lord: and one said to him, Is all well?  why came this mad fellow to you?  And he said to them, You know the man and what his talk was.9:12 And they said, It is false; tell us now.  And he said, Thus and thus spoke he to me, saying, Thus says Yahweh, I have anointed you king over Israel.9:13 Then they hasted, and took every man his garment, and put it under him on the top of the stairs, and blew the trumpet, saying, Jehu is king.9:14 So Jehu the son of Jehoshaphat the son of Nimshi conspired against Joram.  (Now Joram was keeping Ramoth-gilead, he and all Israel, because of Hazael king of Syria;9:15 but king Joram was returned to be healed in Jezreel of the wounds which the Syrians had given him, when he fought with Hazael king of Syria.) And Jehu said, If this be your mind, then let none escape and go forth out of the city, to go to tell it in Jezreel.9:16 So Jehu rode in a chariot, and went to Jezreel; for Joram lay there.  And Ahaziah king of Judah was come down to see Joram.9:17 Now the watchman was standing on the tower in Jezreel, and he spied the company of Jehu as he came, and said, I see a company.  And Joram said, Take a horseman, and send to meet them, and let him say, Is it peace?9:18 So there went one on horseback to meet him, and said, Thus says the king, Is it peace?  And Jehu said, What have you to do with peace?  turn you behind me.  And the watchman told, saying, The messenger came to them, but he comes not back.9:19 Then he sent out a second on horseback, who came to them, and said, Thus says the king, Is it peace?  And Jehu answered, What have you to do with peace?  turn you behind me.9:20 And the watchman told, saying, He came even to them, and comes not back: and the driving is like the driving of Jehu the son of Nimshi; for he drives furiously.9:21 And Joram said, Make ready.  And they made ready his chariot.  And Joram king of Israel and Ahaziah king of Judah went out, each in his chariot, and they went out to meet Jehu, and found him in the portion of Naboth the Jezreelite.9:22 And it came to pass, when Joram saw Jehu, that he said, Is it peace, Jehu?  And he answered, What peace, so long as the whoredoms of your mother Jezebel and her witchcrafts are so many?9:23 And Joram turned his hands, and fled, and said to Ahaziah, There is treachery, O Ahaziah.9:24 And Jehu drew his bow with his full strength, and smote Joram between his arms; and the arrow went out at his heart, and he sunk down in his chariot.9:25 Then said Jehu to Bidkar his captain, Take up, and cast him in the portion of the field of Naboth the Jezreelite; for remember how that, when I and you rode together after Ahab his father, Yahweh laid this burden upon him:9:26 Surely I have seen yesterday the blood of Naboth, and the blood of his sons, says Yahweh; and I will requite you in this plat, says Yahweh.  Now therefore take and cast him into the plat of ground, according to the word of Yahweh.9:27 But when Ahaziah the king of Judah saw this, he fled by the way of the garden-house.  And Jehu followed after him, and said, Smite him also in the chariot: and they smote him at the ascent of Gur, which is by Ibleam.  And he fled to Megiddo, and died there.9:28 And his servants carried him in a chariot to Jerusalem, and buried him in his sepulchre with his fathers in the city of David.9:29 And in the eleventh year of Joram the son of Ahab began Ahaziah to reign over Judah.9:30 And when Jehu was come to Jezreel, Jezebel heard of it; and she painted her eyes, and attired her head, and looked out at the window.9:31 And as Jehu entered in at the gate, she said, Is it peace, you Zimri, your master's murderer?9:32 And he lifted up his face to the window, and said, Who is on my side?  who?  And there looked out to him two or three eunuchs.9:33 And he said, Throw her down.  So they threw her down; and some of her blood was sprinkled on the wall, and on the horses: and he trod her under foot.9:34 And when he was come in, he did eat and drink; and he said, See now to this cursed woman, and bury her; for she is a king's daughter.9:35 And they went to bury her; but they found no more of her than the skull, and the feet, and the palms of her hands.9:36 Wherefore they came back, and told him.  And he said, This is the word of Yahweh, which he spoke by his servant Elijah the Tishbite, saying, In the portion of Jezreel shall the dogs eat the flesh of Jezebel;9:37 and the body of Jezebel shall be as dung upon the face of the field in the portion of Jezreel, so that they shall not say, This is Jezebel.10:1 Now Ahab had seventy sons in Samaria.  And Jehu wrote letters, and sent to Samaria, to the rulers of Jezreel, even the elders, and to them that brought up the sons of Ahab, saying,10:2 And now as soon as this letter comes to you, seeing your master's sons are with you, and there are with you chariots and horses, a fortified city also, and armor;10:3 look ye out the best and meet of your master's sons, and set him on his father's throne, and fight for your master's house.10:4 But they were exceedingly afraid, and said, Behold, the two kings stood not before him: how then shall we stand?10:5 And he that was over the household, and he that was over the city, the elders also, and they that brought up the children, sent to Jehu, saying, We are your servants, and will do all that you shall bid us; we will not make any man king: do you that which is good in your eyes.10:6 Then he wrote a letter the second time to them, saying, If ye be on my side, and if ye will hearken to my voice, take ye the heads of the men your master's sons, and come to me to Jezreel by tomorrow this time.  Now the king's sons, being seventy persons, were with the great men of the city, who brought them up.10:7 And it came to pass, when the letter came to them, that they took the king's sons, and slew them, even seventy persons, and put their heads in baskets, and sent them to him to Jezreel.10:8 And there came a messenger, and told him, saying, They have brought the heads of the king's sons.  And he said, Lay ye them in two heaps at the entrance of the gate until the morning.10:9 And it came to pass in the morning, that he went out, and stood, and said to all the people, You are righteous: behold, I conspired against my master, and slew him; but who smote all these?10:10 Know now that there shall fall to the earth nothing of the word of Yahweh, which Yahweh spoke concerning the house of Ahab: for Yahweh has done that which he spoke by his servant Elijah.10:11 So Jehu smote all that remained of the house of Ahab in Jezreel, and all his great men, and his familiar friends, and his priests, until he left him none remaining.10:12 And he arose and departed, and went to Samaria.  And as he was at the shearing-house of the shepherds in the way,10:13 Jehu met with the brethren of Ahaziah king of Judah, and said, Who are ye?  And they answered, We are the brethren of Ahaziah: and we go down to salute the children of the king and the children of the queen.10:14 And he said, Take them alive.  And they took them alive, and slew them at the pit of the shearing-house, even two and forty men; neither left he any of them.10:15 And when he was departed there, he lighted on Jehonadab the son of Rechab coming to meet him; and he saluted him, and said to him, Is your heart right, as my heart is with your heart?  And Jehonadab answered, It is.  If it be, give me your hand.  And he gave him his hand; and he took him up to him into the chariot.10:16 And he said, Come with me, and see my zeal for Yahweh.  So they made him ride in his chariot.10:17 And when he came to Samaria, he smote all that remained to Ahab in Samaria, till he had destroyed him, according to the word of Yahweh, which he spoke to Elijah.10:18 And Jehu gathered all the people together, and said to them, ahab served Baal a little; but Jehu will serve him much.10:19 Now therefore call to me all the prophets of Baal, all his worshippers, and all his priests; let none be wanting: for I have a great sacrifice to do to Baal; whosoever shall be wanting, he shall not live.  But Jehu did it in subtlety, to the intent that he might destroy the worshippers of Baal.10:20 And Jehu said, Sanctify a solemn assembly for Baal.  And they proclaimed it.10:21 And Jehu sent through all Israel: and all the worshippers of Baal came, so that there was not a man left that came not.  And they came into the house of Baal; and the house of Baal was filled from one end to another.10:22 And he said to him that was over the vestry, Bring forth vestments for all the worshippers of Baal.  And he brought them forth vestments.10:23 And Jehu went, and Jehonadab the son of Rechab, into the house of Baal; and he said to the worshippers of Baal, Search, and look that there be here with you none of the servants of Yahweh, but the worshippers of Baal only.10:24 And they went in to offer sacrifices and burnt offerings.  Now Jehu had appointed him 80 men outside, and said, If any of the men whom I bring into your hands escape, he that lets him go, his life shall be for the life of him.10:25 And it came to pass, as soon as he had made an end of offering the burnt offering, that Jehu said to the guard and to the captains, Go in, and slay them; let no one come out.  And they struck them with the edge of the sword; and the guard and the captains cast them out, and went to the city of the house of Baal.10:26 And they brought forth the pillars that were in the house of Baal, and burned them.10:27 And they broke down the pillar of Baal, and broke down the house of Baal, and made it a draught-house, to this day.10:28 Thus Jehu destroyed Baal out of Israel.10:29 However, from the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, with which he caused Israel to sin, Jehu departed not from after them, that is, the golden calves that were in Beth-el, and that were in Dan.10:30 And Yahweh said to Jehu, Because you have done well in executing that which is right in my eyes, and have done to the house of Ahab according to all that was in my heart, your sons of the fourth generation shall sit on the throne of Israel.10:31 But Jehu took no heed to walk in the law of Yahweh, the God of Israel, with all his heart: he departed not from the sins of Jeroboam, with which he made Israel to sin.10:32 In those days Yahweh began to cut off from Israel: and Hazael smote them in all the borders of Israel;10:33 from the Jordan eastward, all the land of Gilead, the Gadites, and the Reubenites, and the Manassites, from Aroer, which is by the valley of the Arnon, even Gilead and Bashan.10:34 Now the rest of the acts of Jehu, and all that he did, and all his might, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?10:35 And Jehu slept with his fathers; and they buried him in Samaria.  And Jehoahaz his son reigned in his stead.10:36 And the time that Jehu reigned over Israel in Samaria was twenty and eight years.11:1 Now when Athaliah the mother of Ahaziah saw that her son was dead, she arose and destroyed all the seed royal.11:2 But Jehosheba, the daughter of king Joram, sister of Ahaziah, took Joash the son of Ahaziah, and stole him away from among the king's sons that were slain, even him and his nurse, and put them in the bedchamber; and they hid him from Athaliah, so that he was not slain;11:3 And he was with her hid in the house of Yahweh six years.  And Athaliah reigned over the land.11:4 And in the seventh year Jehoiada sent and fetched the captains over hundreds of the Carites and of the guard, and brought them to him into the house of Yahweh; and he made a covenant with them, and took an oath of them in the house of Yahweh, and showed them the king's son.11:5 And he commanded them, saying, This is the thing that ye shall do: a third part of you, that come in on the sabbath, shall be keepers of the watch of the king's house;11:6 And a third part shall be at the gate Sur; and a third part at the gate behind the guard: so shall ye keep the watch of the house, and be a barrier.11:7 And the two companies of you, even all that go forth on the sabbath, shall keep the watch of the house of Yahweh about the king.11:8 And ye shall compass the king round about, every man with his weapons in his hand; and he that comes within the ranks, let him be slain: and be ye with the king when he goes out, and when he comes in.11:9 And the captains over hundreds did according to all that Jehoiada the priest commanded; and they took every man his men, those that were to come in on the sabbath, with those that were to go out on the sabbath, and came to Jehoiada the priest.11:10 And the priest delivered to the captains over hundreds the spears and shields that had been king David's, which were in the house of Yahweh.11:11 And the guard stood, every man with his weapons in his hand, from the right side of the house to the left side of the house, along by the altar and the house, by the king round about.11:12 Then he brought out the king's son, and put the crown upon him, and gave him the testimony; and they made him king, and anointed him; and they clapped their hands, and said, Long live the king.11:13 And when Athaliah heard the noise of the guard and of the people, she came to the people into the house of Yahweh:11:14 and she looked, and, behold, the king stood by the pillar, as the manner was, and the captains and the trumpets by the king; and all the people of the land rejoiced, and blew trumpets.  Then Athaliah rent her clothes, and cried, Treason!  Treason!11:15 And Jehoiada the priest commanded the captains of hundreds that were set over the host, and said to them, Have her forth between the ranks; and him that follows her slay with the sword.  For the priest said, Let her not be slain in the house of Yahweh.11:16 So they made way for her; and she went by the way of the horses' entry to the king's house: and there was she slain.11:17 And Jehoiada made a covenant between Yahweh and the king and the people, that they should be Yahweh's people; between the king also and the people.11:18 And all the people of the land went to the house of Baal, and broke it down; his altars and his images broke they in pieces thoroughly, and slew Mattan the priest of Baal before the altars.  And the priest appointed officers over the house of Yahweh.11:19 And he took the captains over hundreds, and the Carites, and the guard, and all the people of the land; and they brought down the king from the house of Yahweh, and came by the way of the gate of the guard to the king's house.  And he sat on the throne of the kings.11:20 So all the people of the land rejoiced, and the city was quiet.  And Athaliah they had slain with the sword at the king's house.11:21 Jehoash was seven years old when he began to reign.12:1 In the seventh year of Jehu began Jehoash to reign; and he reigned forty years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Zibiah of Beer-sheba.12:2 And Jehoash did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh all his days in which Jehoiada the priest instructed him.12:3 However, the high places were not taken away; the people still sacrificed and burnt incense in the high places.12:4 And Jehoash said to the priests, all the money of the hallowed things that is brought into the house of Yahweh, in current money, the money of the persons for whom each man is rated, and all the money that it comes into any man's heart to bring into the house of Yahweh,12:5 let the priests take it to them, every man from his acquaintance; and they shall repair the breaches of the house, wheresoever any breach shall be found.12:6 But it was so, that in the three and twentieth year of king Jehoash the priests had not repaired the breaches of the house.12:7 Then king Jehoash called for Jehoiada the priest, and for the other priests, and said to them, Why repair ye not the breaches of the house?  now therefore take no more money from your acquaintance, but deliver it for the breaches of the house.12:8 And the priests consented that they should take no more money from the people, neither repair the breaches of the house.12:9 But Jehoiada the priest took a chest, and bored a hole in the lid of it, and set it beside the altar, on the right side as one comes into the house of Yahweh: and the priests that kept the threshold put therein all the money that was brought into the house of Yahweh.12:10 And it was so, when they saw that there was much money in the chest, that the king's scribe and the high priest came up, and they put up in bags and counted the money that was found in the house of Yahweh.12:11 And they gave the money that was weighed out into the hands of them that did the work, that had the oversight of the house of Yahweh: and they paid it out to the carpenters and the builders, that wrought upon the house of Yahweh,12:12 and to the masons and the hewers of stone, and for buying timber and hewn stone to repair the breaches of the house of Yahweh, and for all that was laid out for the house to repair it.12:13 But there were not made for the house of Yahweh cups of silver, snuffers, basins, trumpets, any vessels of gold, or vessels of silver, of the money that was brought into the house of Yahweh;12:14 for they gave that to them that did the work, and used it to repair the house of Yahweh.12:15 Moreover they reckoned not with the men, into whose hand they delivered the money to give to them that did the work; for they dealt faithfully.12:16 The money for the trespass offerings, and the money for the sin offerings, was not brought into the house of Yahweh: it was the priests'.12:17 Then Hazael king of Syria went up, and fought against Gath, and took it; and Hazael set his face to go up to Jerusalem.12:18 And Jehoash king of Judah took all the hallowed things that Jehoshaphat and Jehoram and Ahaziah, his fathers, kings of Judah, had dedicated, and his own hallowed things, and all the gold that was found in the treasures of the house of Yahweh, and of the king's house, and sent it to Hazael king of Syria: and he went away from Jerusalem.12:19 Now the rest of the acts of Joash, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?12:20 And his servants arose, and made a conspiracy, and smote Joash at the house of Millo, on the way that goes down to Silla.12:21 For Jozacar the son of Shimeath, and Jehozabad the son of Shomer, his servants, smote him, and he died; and they buried him with his fathers in the city of David: and Amaziah his son reigned in his stead.13:1 In the three and twentieth year of Joash the son of Ahaziah, king of Judah, Jehoahaz the son of Jehu began to reign over Israel in Samaria, and reigned seventeen years.13:2 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, and followed the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, with which he made Israel to sin; he departed not therefrom.13:3 And the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Israel, and he delivered them into the hand of Hazael king of Syria, and into the hand of Benhadad the son of Hazael, continually.13:4 And Jehoahaz besought Yahweh, and Yahweh hearkened to him; for he saw the oppression of Israel, how that the king of Syria oppressed them.13:5 (And Yahweh gave Israel a saviour, so that they went out from under the hand of the Syrians; and the children of Israel dwelt in their tents as beforetime.13:6 Nevertheless they departed not from the sins of the house of Jeroboam, with which he made Israel to sin, but walked therein: and there remained the Asherah also in Samaria.)13:7 For he left not to Jehoahaz of the people save fifty horsemen, and ten chariots, and ten thousand footmen; for the king of Syria destroyed them, and made them like the dust in threshing.13:8 Now the rest of the acts of Jehoahaz, and all that he did, and his might, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?13:9 And Jehoahaz slept with his fathers; and they buried him in Samaria: and Joash his son reigned in his stead.13:10 In the thirty and seventh year of Joash king of Judah began Jehoash the son of Jehoahaz to reign over Israel in Samaria, and reigned sixteen years.13:11 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh; he departed not from all the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, with which he made Israel to sin; but he walked therein.13:12 Now the rest of the acts of Joash, and all that he did, and his might with which he fought against Amaziah king of Judah, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?13:13 And Joash slept with his fathers; and Jeroboam sat upon his throne: and Joash was buried in Samaria with the kings of Israel.13:14 Now Elisha was fallen sick of his sickness form which he died: and Joash the king of Israel came down to him, and wept over him, and said, My father, my father, the chariots of Israel and the horsemen thereof!13:15 And Elisha said to him, Take bow and arrows.  And he took to him bow and arrows.13:16 And he said to the king of Israel, Put your hand upon the bow; and he put his hand upon it.  And Elisha laid his hands upon the king's hands.13:17 And he said, Open the window eastward; and he opened it.  Then Elisha said, Shoot; and he shot.  And he said, Yahweh's arrow of victory, even the arrow of victory over Syria; for you shall smite the Syrians in Aphek, till you have consumed them.13:18 And he said, Take the arrows; and he took them.  And he said to the king of Israel, Strike upon the ground; and he struck three times, and stopped.13:19 And the man of God was angry with him, and said, You should have struck five or six times: then you would have struck Syria till you had consumed it, whereas now you shall strike Syria but three times.13:20 And Elisha died, and they buried him.  Now the bands of the Moabites invaded the land at the coming in of the year.13:21 And it came to pass, as they were burying a man, that, behold, they spied a band; and they cast the man into the sepulchre of Elisha: and as soon as the man touched the bones of Elisha, he revived, and stood up on his feet.13:22 And Hazael king of Syria oppressed Israel all the days of Jehoahaz.13:23 But Yahweh was gracious to them, and had compassion on them, and had respect to them, because of his covenant with Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and would not destroy them, neither cast he them from his presence as yet.13:24 And Hazael king of Syria died; and Benhadad his son reigned in his stead.13:25 And Jehoash the son of Jehoahaz took again out of the hand of Benhadad the son of Hazael the cities which he had taken out of the hand of Jehoahaz his father by war.  Three times did Joash smite him, and recovered the cities of Israel.14:1 In the second year of Joash son of Joahaz king of Israel began Amaziah the son of Joash king of Judah to reign.14:2 He was twenty and five years old when he began to reign; and he reigned twenty and nine years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Jehoaddin of Jerusalem.14:3 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, yet not like David his father: he did according to all that Joash his father had done.14:4 However, the high places were not taken away: the people still sacrificed and burnt incense in the high places.14:5 And it came to pass, as soon as the kingdom was established in his hand, that he slew his servants who had slain the king his father:14:6 but the children of the murderers he put not to death; according to that which is written in the book of the law of Moses, as Yahweh commanded, saying, The fathers shall not be put to death for the children, nor the children be put to death for the fathers; but every man shall die for his own sin.14:7 He slew of Edom in the Valley of Salt ten thousand, and took Sela by war, and called the name of it Jokyoul, to this day.14:8 Then Amaziah sent messengers to Jehoash, the son of Jehoahaz son of Jehu, king of Israel, saying, Come, let us look one another in the face.14:9 And Jehoash the king of Israel sent to Amaziah king of Judah, saying, The thistle that was in Lebanon sent to the cedar that was in Lebanon, saying, Give your daughter to my son to wife: and there passed by a wild beast that was in Lebanon, and trod down the thistle.14:10 You have indeed smitten Edom, and your heart has lifted you up: glory thereof, and abide at home; for why should you meddle to your hurt, that you should fall, even you, and Judah with you?14:11 But Amaziah would not hear.  So Jehoash king of Israel went up; and he and Amaziah king of Judah looked one another in the face at Beth-shemesh, which belongs to Judah.14:12 And Judah was put to the worse before Israel; and they fled every man to his tent.14:13 And Jehoash king of Israel took Amaziah king of Judah, the son of Jehoash the son of Ahaziah, at Beth-shemesh, and came to Jerusalem, and broke down the wall of Jerusalem from the gate of Ephraim to the corner gate, four hundred cubits.14:14 And he took all the gold and silver, and all the vessels that were found in the house of Yahweh, and in the treasures of the king's house, the hostages also, and returned to Samaria.14:15 Now the rest of the acts of Jehoash which he did, and his might, and how he fought with Amaziah king of Judah, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?14:16 And Jehoash slept with his fathers, and was buried in Samaria with the kings of Israel; and Jeroboam his son reigned in his stead.14:17 And Amaziah the son of Joash king of Judah lived after the death of Jehoash son of Jehoahaz king of Israel fifteen years.14:18 Now the rest of the acts of Amaziah, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?14:19 And they made a conspiracy against him in Jerusalem; and he fled to Lachish: but they sent after him to Lachish, and slew him there.14:20 And they brought him upon horses; and he was buried at Jerusalem with his fathers in the city of David.14:21 And all the people of Judah took Azariah, who was sixteen years old, and made him king in the room of his father Amaziah.14:22 He built Elath, and restored it to Judah, after that the king slept with his fathers.14:23 In the fifteenth year of Amaziah the son of Joash king of Judah Jeroboam the son of Joash king of Israel began to reign in Samaria, and reigned forty and one years.14:24 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh: he departed not from all the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, with which he made Israel to sin.14:25 He restored the border of Israel from the entrance of Hamath to the sea of the Arabah, according to the word of Yahweh, the God of Israel, which he spoke by his servant Jonah the son of Amittai, the prophet, who was of Gath-hepher.14:26 For Yahweh saw the affliction of Israel, that it was very bitter; for there was none shut up nor left at large, neither was there any helper for Israel.14:27 And Yahweh said not that he would blot out the name of Israel from under heaven; but he saved them by the hand of Jeroboam the son of Joash.14:28 Now the rest of the acts of Jeroboam, and all that he did, and his might, how he warred, and how he recovered Damascus, and Hamath, which had belonged to Judah, for Israel, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?14:29 And Jeroboam slept with his fathers, even with the kings of Israel; and Zechariah his son reigned in his stead.15:1 In the twenty and seventh year of Jeroboam king of Israel began Azariah son of Amaziah king of Judah to reign.15:2 Sixteen years old was he when he began to reign; and he reigned two and fifty years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Jecoliah of Jerusalem.15:3 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, according to all that his father Amaziah had done.15:4 However, the high places were not taken away: the people still sacrificed and burnt incense in the high places.15:5 And Yahweh smote the king, so that he was a leper to the day of his death, and dwelt in a separate house.  And Jotham the king's son was over the household, judging the people of the land.15:6 Now the rest of the acts of Azariah, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?15:7 And Azariah slept with his fathers; and they buried him with his fathers in the city of David: and Jotham his son reigned in his stead.15:8 In the thirty and eighth year of Azariah king of Judah did Zechariah the son of Jeroboam reign over Israel in Samaria six months.15:9 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, as his fathers had done: he departed not from the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, with which he made Israel to sin.15:10 And Shallum the son of Jabesh conspired against him, and smote him before the people, and slew him, and reigned in his stead.15:11 Now the rest of the acts of Zechariah, behold, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel.15:12 This was the word of Yahweh which he spoke to Jehu, saying, Your sons to the fourth generation shall sit upon the throne of Israel.  And so it came to pass.15:13 Shallum the son of Jabesh began to reign in the nine and thirtieth year of Uzziah king of Judah; and he reigned the space of a month in Samaria.15:14 And Menahem the son of Gadi went up from Tirzah, and came to Samaria, and smote Shallum the son of Jabesh in Samaria, and slew him, and reigned in his stead.15:15 Now the rest of the acts of Shallum, and his conspiracy which he made, behold, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel.15:16 Then Menahem smote Tiphsah, and all that were therein, and the borders thereof, from Tirzah: because they opened not to him, therefore he smote it; and all the women therein that were with child he ripped up.15:17 In the nine and thirtieth year of Azariah king of Judah began Menahem the son of Gadi to reign over Israel, and reigned ten years in Samaria.15:18 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh: he departed not all his days from the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, with which he made Israel to sin.15:19 There came against the land Pul the king of Assyria; and Menahem gave Pul a thousand talents of silver, that his hand might be with him to confirm the kingdom in his hand.15:20 And Menahem exacted the money of Israel, even of all the mighty men of wealth, of each man fifty shekels of silver, to give to the king of Assyria.  So the king of Assyria turned back, and stayed not there in the land.15:21 Now the rest of the acts of Menahem, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?15:22 And Menahem slept with his fathers; and Pekahiah his son reigned in his stead.15:23 In the fiftieth year of Azariah king of Judah Pekahiah the son of Menahem began to reign over Israel in Samaria, and reigned two years.15:24 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh: he departed not from the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, with which he made Israel to sin.15:25 And Pekah the son of Remaliah, his captain, conspired against him, and smote him in Samaria, in the castle of the king's house, with Argob and Arieh; and with him were fifty men of the Gileadites: and he slew him, and reigned in his stead.15:26 Now the rest of the acts of Pekahiah, and all that he did, behold, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel.15:27 In the two and fiftieth year of Azariah king of Judah Pekah the son of Remaliah began to reign over Israel in Samaria, and reigned twenty years.15:28 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh: he departed not from the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, with which he made Israel to sin.15:29 In the days of Pekah king of Israel came Tiglath-pileser king of Assyria, and took Ijon, and Abel-beth-maacah, and Janoah, and Kedesh, and Hazor, and Gilead, and Galilee, all the land of Naphtali; and he carried them captive to Assyria.15:30 And Hoshea the son of Elah made a conspiracy against Pekah the son of Remaliah, and smote him, and slew him, and reigned in his stead, in the twentieth year of Jotham the son of Uzziah.15:31 Now the rest of the acts of Pekah, and all that he did, behold, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel.15:32 In the second year of Pekah the son of Remaliah king of Israel began Jotham the son of Uzziah king of Judah to reign.15:33 Five and twenty years old was he when he began to reign; and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Jerusha the daughter of Zadok.15:34 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh; he did according to all that his father Uzziah had done.15:35 However, the high places were not taken away: the people still sacrificed and burned incense in the high places.  He built the upper gate of the house of Yahweh.15:36 Now the rest of the acts of Jotham, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?15:37 In those days Yahweh began to send against Judah Rezin the king of Syria, and Pekah the son of Remaliah.15:38 And Jotham slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David his father: and Ahaz his son reigned in his stead.16:1 In the seventeenth year of Pekah the son of Remaliah Ahaz the son of Jotham king of Judah began to reign.16:2 Twenty years old was Ahaz when he began to reign; and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem: and he did not that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh his God, like David his father.16:3 But he walked in the way of the kings of Israel, yes, and made his son to pass through the fire, according to the abominations of the nations, whom Yahweh cast out from before the children of Israel.16:4 And he sacrificed and burnt incense in the high places, and on the hills, and under every green tree.16:5 Then Rezin king of Syria and Pekah son of Remaliah king of Israel came up to Jerusalem to war: and they besieged Ahaz, but could not overcome him.16:6 At that time Rezin king of Syria recovered Elath to Syria, and drove the Jews from Elath; and the Syrians came to Elath, and dwelt there, to this day.16:7 So Ahaz sent messengers to Tiglath-pileser king of Assyria, saying, I am your servant and your son: come up, and save me out of the hand of the king of Syria, and out of the hand of the king of Israel, who rise up against me.16:8 And Ahaz took the silver and gold that was found in the house of Yahweh, and in the treasures of the king's house, and sent it for a present to the king of Assyria.16:9 And the king of Assyria hearkened to him; and the king of Assyria went up against Damascus, and took it, and carried the people of it captive to Kir, and slew Rezin.16:10 And king Ahaz went to Damascus to meet Tiglath-pileser king of Assyria, and saw the altar that was at Damascus; and king Ahaz sent to Urijah the priest the fashion of the altar, and the pattern of it, according to all the workmanship thereof.16:11 And Urijah the priest built an altar: according to all that king Ahaz had sent from Damascus, so did Urijah the priest make it against the coming of king Ahaz from Damascus.16:12 And when the king was come from Damascus, the king saw the altar: and the king drew near to the altar, and offered upon it.16:13 And he burnt his burnt offering and his meal offering, and poured his drink offering, and sprinkled the blood of his peace offerings, upon the altar.16:14 And the brazen altar, which was before Yahweh, he brought from the forefront of the house, from between his altar and the house of Yahweh, and put it on the north side of his altar.16:15 And king Ahaz commanded Urijah the priest, saying, Upon the great altar burn the morning burnt offering, and the evening meal offering, and the king's burnt offering, and his meal offering, with the burnt offering of all the people of the land, and their meal offering, and their drink offerings; and sprinkle upon it all the blood of the burnt offering, and all the blood of the sacrifice: but the brazen altar shall be for me to inquire by.16:16 Thus did Urijah the priest, according to all that king Ahaz commanded.16:17 And king Ahaz cut off the panels of the bases, and removed the laver from off them, and took down the sea from off the brazen oxen that were under it, and put it upon a pavement of stone.16:18 And the covered way for the sabbath that they had built in the house, and the king's entry without, turned he to the house of Yahweh, because of the king of Assyria.16:19 Now the rest of the acts of Ahaz which he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?16:20 And Ahaz slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David: and Hezekiah his son reigned in his stead.17:1 In the twelfth year of Ahaz king of Judah began Hoshea the son of Elah to reign in Samaria over Israel, and reigned nine years.17:2 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, yet not as the kings of Israel that were before him.17:3 Against him came up Shalmaneser king of Assyria; and Hoshea became his servant, and brought him tribute.17:4 And the king of Assyria found conspiracy in Hoshea; for he had sent messengers to So king of Egypt, and offered no tribute to the king of Assyria, as he had done year by year: therefore the king of Assyria shut him up, and bound him in prison.17:5 Then the king of Assyria came up throughout all the land, and went up to Samaria, and besieged it three years.17:6 In the ninth year of Hoshea the king of Assyria took Samaria, and carried Israel away to Assyria, and placed them in Halah, and on the Habor, the river of Gozan, and in the cities of the Medes.17:7 And it was so, because the children of Israel had sinned against Yahweh their God, who brought them up out of the land of Egypt from under the hand of Pharaoh king of Egypt, and had feared other gods,17:8 and walked in the statutes of the nations, whom Yahweh cast out from before the children of Israel, and of the kings of Israel, which they made.17:9 And the children of Israel did secretly things that were not right against Yahweh their God: and they built them high places in all their cities, from the tower of the watchmen to the fortified city;17:10 and they set them up pillars and Asherim upon every high hill, and under every green tree;17:11 and there they burnt incense in all the high places, as did the nations whom Yahweh carried away before them; and they wrought wicked things to provoke Yahweh to anger;17:12 and they served idols, whereof Yahweh had said to them, You shall not do this thing.17:13 Yet Yahweh testified to Israel, and to Judah, by every prophet, and every seer, saying, Turn ye from your evil ways, and keep my commandments and my statutes, according to all the law which I commanded your fathers, and which I sent to you by my servants the prophets.17:14 Notwithstanding, they would not hear, but hardened their neck, like to the neck of their fathers, who believed not in Yahweh their God.17:15 And they rejected his statutes, and his covenant that he made with their fathers, and his testimonies which he testified to them; and they followed vanity, and became vain, and went after the nations that were round about them, concerning whom Yahweh had charged them that they should not do like them.17:16 And they forsook all the commandments of Yahweh their God, and made them molten images, even two calves, and made an Asherah, and worshipped all the host of heaven, and served Baal.17:17 And they caused their sons and their daughters to pass through the fire, and used divination and enchantments, and sold themselves to do that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, to provoke him to anger.17:18 Therefore Yahweh was very angry with Israel, and removed them out of his sight: there was none left but the tribe of Judah only.17:19 Also Judah kept not the commandments of Yahweh their God, but walked in the statutes of Israel which they made.17:20 And Yahweh rejected all the seed of Israel, and afflicted them, and delivered them into the hand of spoilers, until he had cast them out of his sight.17:21 For he rent Israel from the house of David; and they made Jeroboam the son of Nebat king: and Jeroboam drove Israel from following Yahweh, and made them sin a great sin.17:22 And the children of Israel walked in all the sins of Jeroboam which he did; they departed not from them;17:23 until Yahweh removed Israel out of his sight, as he spoke by all his servants the prophets.  So Israel was carried away out of their own land to Assyria to this day.17:24 And the king of Assyria brought men from Babylon, and from Cuthah, and from Avva, and from Hamath and Sepharvaim, and placed them in the cities of Samaria instead of the children of Israel; and they possessed Samaria, and dwelt in the cities thereof.17:25 And so it was, at the beginning of their dwelling there, that they feared not Yahweh: therefore Yahweh sent lions among them, which killed some of them.17:26 Wherefore they spoke to the king of Assyria, saying, The nations which you have carried away, and placed in the cities of Samaria, know not the law of the god of the land: therefore he has sent lions among them, and, behold, they slay them, because they know not the law of the god of the land.17:27 Then the king of Assyria commanded, saying, Carry there one of the priests whom ye brought from there; and let them go and dwell there, and let him teach them the law of the god of the land.17:28 So one of the priests whom they had carried away from Samaria came and dwelt in Beth-el, and taught them how they should fear Yahweh.17:29 Nevertheless every nation made gods of their own, and put them in the houses of the high places which the Samaritans had made, every nation in their cities in which they dwelt.17:30 And the men of Babylon made Succoth-benoth, and the men of Cuth made Nergal, and the men of Hamath made Ashima,17:31 and the Avvites made Nibhaz and Tartak; and the Sepharvites burnt their children in the fire to Adrammelech and Anammelech, the gods of Sepharvaim.17:32 So they feared Yahweh, and made to them from among themselves priests of the high places, who sacrificed for them in the houses of the high places.17:33 They feared Yahweh, and served their own gods, after the manner of the nations from among whom they had been carried away.17:34 To this day they do after the former manner: they fear not Yahweh, neither do they after their statutes, or after their ordinances, or after the law or after the commandment which Yahweh commanded the children of Jacob, whom he named Israel;17:35 with whom Yahweh had made a covenant, and charged them, saying, You shall not fear other gods, nor bow yourselves to them, nor serve them, nor sacrifice to them:17:36 but Yahweh, who brought you up out of the land of Egypt with great power and with an outstretched arm, him shall ye fear, and to him shall ye bow yourselves, and to him shall ye sacrifice:17:37 and the statutes and the ordinances, and the law and the commandment, which he wrote for you, ye shall observe to do for evermore; and ye shall not fear other gods:17:38 and the covenant that I have made with you ye shall not forget; neither shall ye fear other gods:17:39 but Yahweh your God shall ye fear; and he will deliver you out of the hand of all your enemies.17:40 However, they did not hearken, but did after their former manner.17:41 So these nations feared Yahweh, and served their graven images; their children likewise, and their children's children, as did their fathers, so do they to this day.18:1 Now it came to pass in the third year of Hoshea son of Elah king of Israel, that Hezekiah the son of Ahaz king of Judah began to reign.18:2 Twenty and five years old was he when he began to reign; and he reigned twenty and nine years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Abi the daughter of Zechariah.18:3 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, according to all that David his father had done.18:4 He removed the high places, and broke the pillars, and cut down the Asherah: and he broke in pieces the brazen serpent that Moses had made; for to those days the children of Israel did burn incense to it; and he called it Nehushtan.18:5 He trusted in Yahweh, the God of Israel; so that after him was none like him among all the kings of Judah, nor among them that were before him.18:6 For he clave to Yahweh; he departed not from following him, but kept his commandments, which Yahweh commanded Moses.18:7 And Yahweh was with him; wherever he went forth he prospered: and he rebelled against the king of Assyria, and served him not.18:8 He smote the Philistines to Gaza and the borders thereof, from the tower of the watchmen to the fortified city.18:9 And it came to pass in the fourth year of king Hezekiah, which was the seventh year of Hoshea son of Elah king of Israel, that Shalmaneser king of Assyria came up against Samaria, and besieged it.18:10 And at the end of three years they took it: in the sixth year of Hezekiah, which was the ninth year of Hoshea king of Israel, Samaria was taken.18:11 And the king of Assyria carried Israel away to Assyria, and put them in Halah, and on the Habor, the river of Gozan, and in the cities of the Medes,18:12 because they obeyed not the voice of Yahweh their God, but transgressed his covenant, even all that Moses the servant of Yahweh commanded, and would not hear it, nor do it.18:13 Now in the fourteenth year of king Hezekiah did Sennacherib king of Assyria come up against all the fortified cities of Judah, and took them.18:14 And Hezekiah king of Judah sent to the king of Assyria to Lachish, saying, I have offended; return from me: that which you put on me will I bear.  And the king of Assyria appointed to Hezekiah king of Judah three hundred talents of silver and thirty talents of gold.18:15 And Hezekiah gave him all the silver that was found in the house of Yahweh, and in the treasures of the king's house.18:16 At that time did Hezekiah cut off the gold from the doors of the temple of Yahweh, and from the pillars which Hezekiah king of Judah had overlaid, and gave it to the king of Assyria.18:17 And the king of Assyria sent Tartan and Rab-saris and Rabshakeh from Lachish to king Hezekiah with a great army to Jerusalem.  And they went up and came to Jerusalem.  And when they were come up, they came and stood by the conduit of the upper pool, which is in the highway of the fuller's field.18:18 And when they had called to the king, there came out to them Eliakim the son of Hilkiah, who was over the household, and Shebnah the scribe, and Joah the son of Asaph the recorder.18:19 And Rabshakeh said to them, Say ye now to Hezekiah, Thus says the great king, the king of Assyria, What confidence is this in which you trust?18:20 You say (but they are but vain words), There is counsel and strength for the war.  Now on whom do you trust, that you have rebelled against me?18:21 Now, behold, you trust upon the staff of this bruised reed, even upon Egypt; whereon if a man lean, it will go into his hand, and pierce it: so is Pharaoh king of Egypt to all that trust on him.18:22 But if ye say to me, We trust in Yahweh our God; is not that he, whose high places and whose altars Hezekiah has taken away, and has said to Judah and to Jerusalem, You shall worship before this altar in Jerusalem?18:23 Now therefore, I pray you, give pledges to my master the king of Assyria, and I will give you two thousand horses, if you be able on your part to set riders upon them.18:24 How then can you turn away the face of one captain of the least of my master's servants, and put your trust on Egypt for chariots and for horsemen?18:25 Am I now come up without Yahweh against this place to destroy it?  Yahweh said to me, Go up against this land, and destroy it.18:26 Then said Eliakim the son of Hilkiah, and Shebnah, and Joah, to Rabshakeh, Speak, I pray you, to your servants in the Syrian language; for we understand it: and speak not with us in the Jews' language, in the ears of the people that are on the wall.18:27 But Rabshakeh said to them, Has my master sent me to your master, and to you, to speak these words?  has he not sent me to the men that sit on the wall, to eat their own dung, and to drink their own water with you?18:28 Then Rabshakeh stood, and cried with a loud voice in the Jews' language, and spoke, saying, Hear ye the word of the great king, the king of Assyria.18:29 Thus says the king, Let not Hezekiah deceive you; for he will not be able to deliver you out of his hand:18:30 neither let Hezekiah make you trust in Yahweh, saying, Yahweh will surely deliver us, and this city shall not be given into the hand of the king of Assyria.18:31 Hearken not to Hezekiah: for Thus says the king of Assyria, Make your peace with me, and come out to me; and eat ye every one from his vine, and every one from his fig-tree, and drink ye every one the waters of his own cistern;18:32 Until I come and take you away to a land like your own land, a land of grain and new wine, a land of bread and vineyards, a land of olive-trees and of honey, that ye may live, and not die: and hearken not to Hezekiah, when he persuades you, saying, Yahweh will deliver us.18:33 Has any of the gods of the nations ever delivered his land out of the hand of the king of Assyria?18:34 Where are the gods of Hamath, and of Arpad?  where are the gods of Sepharvaim, of Hena, and Ivvah?  have they delivered Samaria out of my hand?18:35 Who are they among all the gods of the countries, that have delivered their country out of my hand, that Yahweh should deliver Jerusalem out of my hand?18:36 But the people held their peace, and answered him not a word; for the king's commandment was, saying, answer him not.18:37 Then came Eliakim the son of Hilkiah, who was over the household, and Shebna the scribe, and Joah the son of Asaph the recorder, to Hezekiah with their clothes rent, and told him the words of Rabshakeh.19:1 And it came to pass, when king Hezekiah heard it, that he rent his clothes, and covered himself with sackcloth, and went into the house of Yahweh.19:2 And he sent Eliakim, who was over the household, and Shebna the scribe, and the elders of the priests, covered with sackcloth, to Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz.19:3 And they said to him, Thus says Hezekiah, This day is a day of trouble, and of rebuke, and of disgrace; for the children are come to the birth, and there is not strength to bring forth.19:4 It may be Yahweh your God will hear all the words of Rabshakeh, whom the king of Assyria his master has sent to defy the living God, and will rebuke the words which Yahweh your God has heard: therefore lift up your prayer for the remnant that is left.19:5 So the servants of king Hezekiah came to Isaiah.19:6 And Isaiah said to them, Thus shall ye say to your master, Thus says Yahweh, Be not afraid of the words that you have heard, with which the servants of the king of Assyria have blasphemed me.19:7 Behold, I will put a spirit in him, and he shall hear tidings, and shall return to his own land; and I will cause him to fall by the sword in his own land.19:8 So Rabshakeh returned, and found the king of Assyria warring against Libnah; for he had heard that he was departed from Lachish.19:9 And when he heard say of Tirhakah king of Ethiopia, Behold, he is come out to fight against you, he sent messengers again to Hezekiah, saying,19:10 Thus shall ye speak to Hezekiah king of Judah, saying, Let not your God in whom you trust deceive you, saying, Jerusalem shall not be given into the hand of the king of Assyria.19:11 Behold, you have heard what the kings of Assyria have done to all lands, by destroying them utterly: and shall you be delivered?19:12 Have the gods of the nations delivered them, which my fathers have destroyed, Gozan, and Haran, and Rezeph, and the children of Eden that were in Telassar?19:13 Where is the king of Hamath, and the king of Arpad, and the king of the city of Sepharvaim, of Hena, and Ivvah?19:14 And Hezekiah received the letter from the hand of the messengers, and read it; and Hezekiah went up to the house of Yahweh, and spread it before Yahweh.19:15 And Hezekiah prayed before Yahweh, and said, O Yahweh, the God of Israel, that sits above the cherubim, you are the God, even you alone, of all the kingdoms of the earth; you have made heaven and earth.19:16 Incline your ear, O Yahweh, and hear; open your eyes, O Yahweh, and see; and hear the words of Sennacherib, with which he has sent him to defy the living God.19:17 Of a truth, Yahweh, the kings of Assyria have laid waste the nations and their lands,19:18 and have cast their gods into the fire; for they were no gods, but the work of men's hands, wood and stone; therefore they have destroyed them.19:19 Now therefore, O Yahweh our God, save you us, I beseech you, out of his hand, that all the kingdoms of the earth may know that you Yahweh are God alone.19:20 Then Isaiah the son of Amoz sent to Hezekiah, saying, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Whereas you have prayed to me against Sennacherib king of Assyria, I have heard you.19:21 This is the word that Yahweh has spoken concerning him: The virgin daughter of Zion has despised you and laughed you to scorn; the daughter of Jerusalem has shaken her head at you.19:22 Whom have you defied and blasphemed?  and against whom have you exalted your voice and lifted up your eyes on high?  even against the Holy One of Israel.19:23 By your messengers you have defied the Lord, and have said, With the multitude of my chariots am I come up to the height of the mountains, to the innermost parts of Lebanon; and I will cut down the tall cedars thereof, and the choice fir-trees thereof; and I will enter into his farthest lodging-place, the forest of his fruitful field.19:24 I have dug and drunk strange waters, and with the sole of my feet will I dry up all the rivers of Egypt.19:25 Have you not heard how I have done it long ago, and formed it of ancient times?  now have I brought it to pass, that it should be yours to lay waste fortified cities into ruinous heaps.19:26 Therefore their inhabitants were of small power, they were dismayed and confounded; they were as the grass of the field, and as the green herb, as the grass on the housetops, and as grain blasted before it is grown up.19:27 But I know your sitting down, and your going out, and your coming in, and your raging against me.19:28 Because of your raging against me, and because your arrogance is come up into my ears, therefore will I put my hook in your nose, and my bridle in your lips, and I will turn you back by the way by which you came.19:29 And this shall be the sign to you: You shall eat this year that which grows of itself, and in the second year that which springs of the same; and in the third year sow ye, and reap, and plant vineyards, and eat the fruit thereof.19:30 And the remnant that is escaped of the house of Judah shall again take root downward, and bear fruit upward.19:31 For out of Jerusalem shall go forth a remnant, and out of mount Zion they that shall escape: the zeal of Yahweh shall perform this.19:32 Therefore thus says Yahweh concerning the king of Assyria, He shall not come to this city, nor shoot an arrow there, neither shall he come before it with shield, nor cast up a mound against it.19:33 By the way that he came, by the same shall he return, and he shall not come to this city, says Yahweh.19:34 For I will defend this city to save it, for my own sake, and for my servant David's sake.19:35 And it came to pass that night, that the angel of Yahweh went forth, and smote in the camp of the Assyrians 185,000 thousand: and when men arose early in the morning, behold, these were all dead bodies.19:36 So Sennacherib king of Assyria departed, and went and returned, and dwelt at Nineveh.19:37 And it came to pass, as he was worshipping in the house of Nisroch his god, that Adrammelech and Sharezer smote him with the sword: and they escaped into the land of Ararat.  And Esar-haddon his son reigned in his stead.20:1 In those days was Hezekiah sick to death.  And Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz came to him, and said to him, Thus says Yahweh, Set your house in order: for you shall die, and not live.20:2 Then he turned his face to the wall, and prayed to Yahweh, saying,20:3 Remember now, O Yahweh, I beseech you, how I have walked before you in truth and with a perfect heart, and have done that which is good in your sight.  And Hezekiah wept sore.20:4 And it came to pass, before Isaiah was gone out into the middle part of the city, that the word of Yahweh came to him, saying,20:5 Turn back, and say to Hezekiah the prince of my people, Thus says Yahweh, the God of David your father, I have heard your prayer, I have seen your tears: behold, I will heal you; on the third day you shall go up to the house of Yahweh.20:6 And I will add to your days fifteen years; and I will deliver you and this city out of the hand of the king of Assyria; and I will defend this city for my own sake, and for my servant David's sake.20:7 And Isaiah said, Take a cake of figs.  And they took and laid it on the boil, and he recovered.20:8 And Hezekiah said to Isaiah, What shall be the sign that Yahweh will heal me, and that I shall go up to the house of Yahweh the third day?20:9 And Isaiah said, This shall be the sign to you from Yahweh, that Yahweh will do the thing that he has spoken: shall the shadow go forward ten steps, or go back ten steps?20:10 And Hezekiah answered, It is a light thing for the shadow to decline ten steps: nay, but let the shadow return backward ten steps.20:11 And Isaiah the prophet cried to Yahweh; and he brought the shadow ten steps backward, by which it had gone down on the dial of Ahaz.20:12 At that time Berodach-baladan the son of Baladan, king of Babylon, sent letters and a present to Hezekiah; for he had heard that Hezekiah had been sick.20:13 And Hezekiah hearkened to them, and showed them all the house of his precious things, the silver, and the gold, and the spices, and the precious oil, and the house of his armor, and all that was found in his treasures: there was nothing in his house, nor in all his dominion, that Hezekiah showed them not.20:14 Then came Isaiah the prophet to king Hezekiah, and said to him, What did these men say?  and from where did they come to you?  And Hezekiah said, They are come from a far country, even from Babylon.20:15 And he said, What have they seen in your house?  And Hezekiah answered, all that is in my house have they seen: there is nothing among my treasures that I have not shown them.20:16 And Isaiah said to Hezekiah, Hear the word of Yahweh.20:17 Behold, the days come, that all that is in your house, and that which your fathers have laid up in store to this day, shall be carried to Babylon: nothing shall be left, says Yahweh.20:18 And of your sons that shall issue from you, whom you shall beget, shall they take away; and they shall be eunuchs in the palace of the king of Babylon.20:19 Then said Hezekiah to Isaiah, Good is the word of Yahweh which you have spoken.  He said moreover, Is it not so, if peace and truth shall be in my days?20:20 Now the rest of the acts of Hezekiah, and all his might, and how he made the pool, and the conduit, and brought water into the city, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?20:21 And Hezekiah slept with his fathers; and Manasseh his son reigned in his stead.21:1 Manasseh was twelve years old when he began to reign; and he reigned five and fifty years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Hephzibah.21:2 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, after the abominations of the nations whom Yahweh cast out before the children of Israel.21:3 For he built again the high places which Hezekiah his father had destroyed; and he reared up altars for Baal, and made an Asherah, as did Ahab king of Israel, and worshipped all the host of heaven, and served them.21:4 And he built altars in the house of Yahweh, whereof Yahweh said, In Jerusalem will I put my name.21:5 And he built altars for all the host of heaven in the two courts of the house of Yahweh.21:6 And he made his son to pass through the fire, and practised augury, and used enchantments, and dealt with them that had familiar spirits, and with wizards: he wrought much evil in the sight of Yahweh, to provoke him to anger.21:7 And he set the graven image of Asherah, that he had made, in the house of which Yahweh said to David and to Solomon his son, In this house, and in Jerusalem, which I have chosen out of all the tribes of Israel, will I put my name for ever;21:8 neither will I cause the feet of Israel to wander any more out of the land which I gave their fathers, if only they will observe to do according to all that I have commanded them, and according to all the law that my servant Moses commanded them.21:9 But they hearkened not: and Manasseh seduced them to do that which is evil more than did the nations whom Yahweh destroyed before the children of Israel.21:10 And Yahweh spoke by his servants the prophets, saying,21:11 Because Manasseh king of Judah has done these abominations, and has done wickedly above all that the Amorites did, that were before him, and has made Judah also to sin with his idols;21:12 therefore thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Behold, I bring such evil upon Jerusalem and Judah, that whosoever hears of it, both his ears shall tingle.21:13 And I will stretch over Jerusalem the line of Samaria, and the plummet of the house of Ahab; and I will wipe Jerusalem as a man wipes a dish, wiping it and turning it upside down.21:14 And I will cast off the remnant of my inheritance, and deliver them into the hand of their enemies; and they shall become a prey and a spoil to all their enemies;21:15 because they have done that which is evil in my sight, and have provoked me to anger, since the day their fathers came forth out of Egypt, even to this day.21:16 Moreover Manasseh shed innocent blood very much, till he had filled Jerusalem from one end to another; besides his sin with which he made Judah to sin, in doing that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh.21:17 Now the rest of the acts of Manasseh, and all that he did, and his sin that he sinned, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?21:18 And Manasseh slept with his fathers, and was buried in the garden of his own house, in the garden of Uzza: and Amon his son reigned in his stead.21:19 Amon was twenty and two years old when he began to reign; and he reigned two years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Meshullemeth the daughter of Haruz of Jotbah.21:20 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, as did Manasseh his father.21:21 And he walked in all the way that his father walked in, and served the idols that his father served, and worshipped them:21:22 and he forsook Yahweh, the God of his fathers, and walked not in the way of Yahweh.21:23 And the servants of Amon conspired against him, and put the king to death in his own house.21:24 But the people of the land slew all them that had conspired against king Amon; and the people of the land made Josiah his son king in his stead.21:25 Now the rest of the acts of Amon which he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?21:26 And he was buried in his sepulchre in the garden of Uzza: and Josiah his son reigned in his stead.22:1 Josiah was eight years old when he began to reign; and he reigned thirty and one years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Jedidah the daughter of Adaiah of Bozkath.22:2 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, and walked in all the way of David his father, and turned not aside to the right hand or to the left.22:3 And it came to pass in the eighteenth year of king Josiah, that the king sent Shaphan, the son of Azaliah the son of Meshullam, the scribe, to the house of Yahweh, saying,22:4 Go up to Hilkiah the high priest, that he may sum the money which is brought into the house of Yahweh, which the keepers of the threshold have gathered of the people:22:5 and let them deliver it into the hand of the workmen that have the oversight of the house of Yahweh; and let them give it to the workmen that are in the house of Yahweh, to repair the breaches of the house,22:6 to the carpenters, and to the builders, and to the masons, and for buying timber and hewn stone to repair the house.22:7 However there was no reckoning made with them of the money that was delivered into their hand; for they dealt faithfully.22:8 And Hilkiah the high priest said to Shaphan the scribe, I have found the book of the law in the house of Yahweh.  And Hilkiah delivered the book to Shaphan, and he read it.22:9 And Shaphan the scribe came to the king, and brought word back to the king, and said, Your servants have emptied out the money that was found in the house, and have delivered it into the hand of the workmen that have the oversight of the house of Yahweh.22:10 And Shaphan the scribe said to the king, as follows, Hilkiah the priest has delivered me a book.  And Shaphan read it before the king.22:11 And it came to pass, when the king had heard the words of the book of the law, that he rent his clothes.22:12 And the king commanded Hilkiah the priest, and Ahikam the son of Shaphan, and Achbor the son of Micaiah, and Shaphan the scribe, and Asaiah the king's servant, saying,22:13 Go ye, inquire of Yahweh for me, and for the people, and for all Judah, concerning the words of this book that is found; for great is the wrath of Yahweh that is kindled against us, because our fathers have not hearkened to the words of this book, to do according to everything that is written concerning us.22:14 So Hilkiah the priest, and Ahikam, and Achbor, and Shaphan, and Asaiah, went to Huldah the prophetess, the wife of Shallum the son of Tikvah, the son of Harhas, keeper of the wardrobe (now she dwelt in Jerusalem in the second quarter); and they communed with her.22:15 And she said to them, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel: Tell ye the man that sent you to me,22:16 Thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, and upon the inhabitants thereof, even all the words of the book which the king of Judah has read.22:17 Because they have forsaken me, and have burned incense to other gods, that they might provoke me to anger with all the work of their hands, therefore my wrath shall be kindled against this place, and it shall not be quenched.22:18 But to the king of Judah, who sent you to inquire of Yahweh, thus shall ye say to him, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel: As touching the words which you have heard,22:19 because your heart was tender, and you did humble yourself before Yahweh, when you heard what I spoke against this place, and against the inhabitants thereof, that they should become a desolation and a curse, and have rent your clothes, and wept before me; I also have heard you, says Yahweh.22:20 Therefore, behold, I will gather you to your fathers, and you shall be gathered to your grave in peace, neither shall your eyes see all the evil which I will bring upon this place.  And they brought the king word again.23:1 And the king sent, and they gathered to him all the elders of Judah and of Jerusalem.23:2 And the king went up to the house of Yahweh, and all the men of Judah and all the inhabitants of Jerusalem with him, and the priests, and the prophets, and all the people, both small and great: and he read in their ears all the words of the book of the covenant which was found in the house of Yahweh.23:3 And the king stood by the pillar, and made a covenant before Yahweh, to walk after Yahweh, and to keep his commandments, and his testimonies, and his statutes, with all his heart, and all his soul, to confirm the words of this covenant that were written in this book: and all the people stood to the covenant.23:4 And the king commanded Hilkiah the high priest, and the priests of the second order, and the keepers of the threshold, to bring forth out of the temple of Yahweh all the vessels that were made for Baal, and for the Asherah, and for all the host of heaven, and he burned them without Jerusalem in the fields of the Kidron, and carried the ashes of them to Beth-el.23:5 And he put down the idolatrous priests, whom the kings of Judah had ordained to burn incense in the high places in the cities of Judah, and in the places round about Jerusalem; them also that burned incense to Baal, to the sun, and to the moon, and to the planets, and to all the host of heaven.23:6 And he brought out the Asherah from the house of Yahweh, without Jerusalem, to the brook Kidron, and burned it at the brook Kidron, and beat it to dust, and cast the dust thereof upon the graves of the common people.23:7 And he broke down the houses of the sodomites, that were in the house of Yahweh, where the women wove hangings for the Asherah.23:8 And he brought all the priests out of the cities of Judah, and defiled the high places where the priests had burned incense, from Geba to Beer-sheba; and he broke down the high places of the gates that were at the entrance of the gate of Joshua the governor of the city, which were on a man's left hand at the gate of the city.23:9 Nevertheless the priests of the high places came not up to the altar of Yahweh in Jerusalem, but they did eat unleavened bread among their brethren.23:10 And he defiled Topheth, which is in the valley of the children of Hinnom, that no man might make his son or his daughter to pass through the fire to Molech.23:11 And he took away the horses that the kings of Judah had given to the sun, at the entrance of the house of Yahweh, by the chamber of Nathan-melech the chamberlain, which was in the precincts; and he burned the chariots of the sun with fire.23:12 And the altars that were on the roof of the upper chamber of Ahaz, which the kings of Judah had made, and the altars which Manasseh had made in the two courts of the house of Yahweh, did the king break down, and beat them down from there, and cast the dust of them into the brook Kidron.23:13 And the high places that were before Jerusalem, which were on the right hand of the mount of corruption, which Solomon the king of Israel had built for Ashtoreth the abomination of the Sidonians, and for Chemosh the abomination of Moab, and for Milcom the abomination of the children of Ammon, did the king defile.23:14 And he broke in pieces the pillars, and cut down the Asherim, and filled their places with the bones of men.23:15 Moreover the altar that was at Beth-el, and the high place which Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who made Israel to sin, had made, even that altar and the high place he broke down; and he burned the high place and beat it to dust, and burned the Asherah.23:16 And as Josiah turned himself, he spied the sepulchres that were there in the mount; and he sent, and took the bones out of the sepulchres, and burned them upon the altar, and defiled it, according to the word of Yahweh which the man of God proclaimed, who proclaimed these things.23:17 Then he said, What monument is that which I see?  And the men of the city told him, It is the sepulchre of the man of God, who came from Judah, and proclaimed these things that you have done against the altar of Beth-el.23:18 And he said, Let him be; let no man move his bones.  So they let his bones alone, with the bones of the prophet that came out of Samaria.23:19 And all the houses also of the high places that were in the cities of Samaria, which the kings of Israel had made to provoke Yahweh to anger, Josiah took away, and did to them according to all the acts that he had done in Beth-el.23:20 And he slew all the priests of the high places that were there, upon the altars, and burned men's bones upon them; and he returned to Jerusalem.23:21 And the king commanded all the people, saying, Keep the passover to Yahweh your God, as it is written in this book of the covenant.23:22 Surely there was not kept such a passover from the days of the judges that judged Israel, nor in all the days of the kings of Israel, nor of the kings of Judah;23:23 but in the eighteenth year of king Josiah was this passover kept to Yahweh in Jerusalem.23:24 Moreover them that had familiar spirits, and the wizards, and the teraphim, and the idols, and all the abominations that were seen in the land of Judah and in Jerusalem, did Josiah put away, that he might confirm the words of the law which were written in the book that Hilkiah the priest found in the house of Yahweh.23:25 And like to him was there no king before him, that turned to Yahweh with all his heart, and with all his soul, and with all his might, according to all the law of Moses; neither after him arose there any like him.23:26 Notwithstanding, Yahweh turned not from the fierceness of his great wrath, with which his anger was kindled against Judah, because of all the provocations with which Manasseh had provoked him.23:27 And Yahweh said, I will remove Judah also out of my sight, as I have removed Israel, and I will cast off this city which I have chosen, even Jerusalem, and the house of which I said, My name shall be there.23:28 Now the rest of the acts of Josiah, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?23:29 In his days Pharaoh-necoh king of Egypt went up against the king of Assyria to the river Euphrates: and king Josiah went against him; and Pharaoh-necoh slew him at Megiddo, when he had seen him.23:30 And his servants carried him in a chariot dead from Megiddo, and brought him to Jerusalem, and buried him in his own sepulchre.  And the people of the land took Jehoahaz the son of Josiah, and anointed him, and made him king in his father's stead.23:31 Jehoahaz was twenty and three years old when he began to reign; and he reigned three months in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Hamutal the daughter of Jeremiah of Libnah.23:32 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, according to all that his fathers had done.23:33 And Pharaoh-necoh put him in bonds at Riblah in the land of Hamath, that he might not reign in Jerusalem; and put the land to a tribute of a hundred talents of silver, and a talent of gold.23:34 And Pharaoh-necoh made Eliakim the son of Josiah king in the room of Josiah his father, and changed his name to Jehoiakim: but he took Jehoahaz away; and he came to Egypt, and died there.23:35 And Jehoiakim gave the silver and the gold to Pharaoh; but he taxed the land to give the money according to the commandment of Pharaoh: he exacted the silver and the gold of the people of the land, of every one according to his taxation, to give it to Pharaoh-necoh.23:36 Jehoiakim was twenty and five years old when he began to reign; and he reigned eleven years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Zebidah the daughter of Pedaiah of Rumah.23:37 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, according to all that his fathers had done.24:1 In his days Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon came up, and Jehoiakim became his servant three years: then he turned and rebelled against him.24:2 And Yahweh sent against him bands of the Chaldeans, and bands of the Syrians, and bands of the Moabites, and bands of the children of Ammon, and sent them against Judah to destroy it, according to the word of Yahweh, which he spoke by his servants the prophets.24:3 Surely at the commandment of Yahweh came this upon Judah, to remove them out of his sight, for the sins of Manasseh, according to all that he did,24:4 and also for the innocent blood that he shed; for he filled Jerusalem with innocent blood: and Yahweh would not pardon.24:5 Now the rest of the acts of Jehoiakim, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?24:6 So Jehoiakim slept with his fathers; and Jehoiachin his son reigned in his stead.24:7 And the king of Egypt came not again any more out of his land; for the king of Babylon had taken, from the brook of Egypt to the river Euphrates, all that pertained to the king of Egypt.24:8 Jehoiachin was eighteen years old when he began to reign; and he reigned in Jerusalem three months: and his mother's name was Nehushta the daughter of Elnathan of Jerusalem.24:9 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, according to all that his father had done.24:10 At that time the servants of Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon came up to Jerusalem, and the city was besieged.24:11 And Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon came to the city, while his servants were besieging it;24:12 and Jehoiachin the king of Judah went out to the king of Babylon, he, and his mother, and his servants, and his princes, and his officers: and the king of Babylon took him in the eighth year of his reign.24:13 And he carried out there all the treasures of the house of Yahweh, and the treasures of the king's house, and cut in pieces all the vessels of gold, which Solomon king of Israel had made in the temple of Yahweh, as Yahweh had said.24:14 And he carried away all Jerusalem, and all the princes, and all the mighty men of valor, even ten thousand captives, and all the craftsmen and the smiths; none remained, save the poorest sort of the people of the land.24:15 And he carried away Jehoiachin to Babylon; and the king's mother, and the king's wives, and his officers, and the chief men of the land, carried he into captivity from Jerusalem to Babylon.24:16 And all the men of might, even seven thousand, and the craftsmen and the smiths a thousand, all of them strong and apt for war, even them the king of Babylon brought captive to Babylon.24:17 And the king of Babylon made Mattaniah, Jehoiachin's father's brother, king is his stead, and changed his name to Zedekiah.24:18 Zedekiah was twenty and one years old when he began to reign; and he reigned eleven years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Hamutal the daughter of Jeremiah of Libnah.24:19 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, according to all that Jehoiakim had done.24:20 For through the anger of Yahweh did it come to pass in Jerusalem and Judah, until he had cast them out from his presence.  And Zedekiah rebelled against the king of Babylon.25:1 And it came to pass in the ninth year of his reign, in the tenth month, in the tenth day of the month, that Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon came, he and all his army, against Jerusalem, and encamped against it; and they built forts against it round about.25:2 So the city was besieged to the eleventh year of king Zedekiah.25:3 On the ninth day of the fourth month the famine was sore in the city, so that there was no bread for the people of the land.25:4 Then a breach was made in the city, and all the men of war fled by night by the way of the gate between the two walls, which was by the king's garden (now the Chaldeans were against the city round about); and the king went by the way of the Arabah.25:5 But the army of the Chaldeans pursued after the king, and overtook him in the plains of Jericho; and all his army was scattered from him.25:6 Then they took the king, and carried him up to the king of Babylon to Riblah; and they gave judgment upon him.25:7 And they slew the sons of Zedekiah before his eyes, and put out the eyes of Zedekiah, and bound him in fetters, and carried him to Babylon.25:8 Now in the fifth month, on the seventh day of the month, which was the nineteenth year of king Nebuchadnezzar, king of Babylon, came Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard, a servant of the king of Babylon, to Jerusalem.25:9 And he burnt the house of Yahweh, and the king's house; and all the houses of Jerusalem, even every great house, burnt he with fire.25:10 And all the army of the Chaldeans, that were with the captain of the guard, broke down the walls of Jerusalem round about.25:11 And the residue of the people that were left in the city, and those that fell away, that fell to the king of Babylon, and the residue of the multitude, did Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard carry away captive.25:12 But the captain of the guard left of the poorest of the land to be vinedressers and husbandmen.25:13 And the pillars of brass that were in the house of Yahweh, and the bases and the brazen sea that were in the house of Yahweh, did the Chaldeans break in pieces, and carried the brass of them to Babylon.25:14 And the pots, and the shovels, and the snuffers, and the spoons, and all the vessels of brass with which they ministered, took they away.25:15 And the firepans, and the basins, that which was of gold, in gold, and that which was of silver, in silver, the captain of the guard took away.25:16 The two pillars, the one sea, and the bases, which Solomon had made for the house of Yahweh, the brass of all these vessels was without weight.25:17 The height of the one pillar was eighteen cubits, and a capital of brass was upon it; and the height of the capital was three cubits, with network and pomegranates upon the capital round about, all of brass: and like to these had the second pillar with network.25:18 And the captain of the guard took Seraiah the chief priest, and Zephaniah the second priest, and the three keepers of the threshold:25:19 and out of the city he took an officer that was set over the men of war; and five men of them that saw the king's face, who were found in the city; and the scribe, the captain of the host, who mustered the people of the land; and 60 men of the people of the land, that were found in the city.25:20 And Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard took them, and brought them to the king of Babylon to Riblah.25:21 And the king of Babylon smote them, and put them to death at Riblah in the land of Hamath.  So Judah was carried away captive out of his land.25:22 And as for the people that were left in the land of Judah, whom Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon had left, even over them he made Gedaliah the son of Ahikam, the son of Shaphan, governor.25:23 Now when all the captains of the forces, they and their men, heard that the king of Babylon had made Gedaliah governor, they came to Gedaliah to Mizpah, even Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and Johanan the son of Kareah, and Seraiah the son of Tanhumeth the Netophathite, and Jaazaniah the son of the Maacathite, they and their men.25:24 And Gedaliah swore to them and to their men, and said to them, Fear not because of the servants of the Chaldeans: dwell in the land, and serve the king of Babylon, and it shall be well with you.25:25 But it came to pass in the seventh month, that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, the son of Elishama, of the seed royal, came, and ten men with him, and smote Gedaliah, so that he died, and the Jews and the Chaldeans that were with him at Mizpah.25:26 And all the people, both small and great, and the captains of the forces, arose, and came to Egypt; for they were afraid of the Chaldeans.25:27 And it came to pass in the seven and thirtieth year of the captivity of Jehoiachin king of Judah, in the twelfth month, on the seven and twentieth day of the month, that Evil-merodach king of Babylon, in the year that he began to reign, did lift up the head  of Jehoiachin king of Judah out of prison;25:28 and he spoke kindly to him, and set his throne above the throne of the kings that were with him in Babylon,25:29 and changed his prison garments.  And Jehoiachin did eat bread before him continually all the days of his life:25:30 and for his allowance, there was a continual allowance given him of the king, every day a portion, all the days of his life.End of 2 Kings1 Chronicles1:1 Adam, Seth, Enosh,1:2 Kenan, Mahalalel, Jared,1:3 Enoch, Methuselah, Lamech,1:4 Noah, Shem, Ham, and Japheth.1:5 The sons of Japheth: Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and Tubal, and Meshech, and Tiras.1:6 And the sons of Gomer: Ashkenaz, and Diphath, and Togarmah.1:7 And the sons of Javan: Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Rodanim.1:8 The sons of Ham: Cush, and Mizraim, Put, and Canaan.1:9 And the sons of Cush: Seba, and Havilah, and Sabta, and Raama, and Sabteca.  And the sons of Raamah: Sheba, and Dedan.1:10 And Cush begat Nimrod; he began to be a mighty one in the earth.1:11 And Mizraim begat Ludim, and Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim,1:12 and Pathrusim, and Casluhim (from where came the Philistines), and Caphtorim.1:13 And Canaan begat Sidon his first-born, and Heth,1:14 and the Jebusite, and the Amorite, and the Girgashite,1:15 and the Hivite, and the Arkite, and the Sinite,1:16 and the Arvadite, and the Zemarite, and the Hamathite.1:17 The sons of Shem: Elam, and Asshur, and Arpachshad, and Lud, and Aram, and Uz, and Hul, and Gether, and Meshech.1:18 And Arpachshad begat Shelah, and Shelah begat Eber.1:19 And to Eber were born two sons: the name of the one was Peleg; for in his days the earth was divided; and his brother's name was Joktan.1:20 And Joktan begat Almodad, and Sheleph, and Hazarmaveth, and Jerah,1:21 and Hadoram, and Uzal, and Diklah,1:22 and Ebal, and Abimael, and Sheba,1:23 and Ophir, and Havilah, and Jobab.  All these were the sons of Joktan.1:24 Shem, arpachshad, Shelah,1:25 Eber, Peleg, Reu,1:26 Serug, Nahor, Terah,1:27 Abram (the same is Abraham).1:28 The sons of Abraham: Isaac, and Ishmael.1:29 These are their generations: the first-born of Ishmael, Nebaioth; then Kedar, and Adbeel, and Mibsam,1:30 Mishma, and Dumah, Massa, Hadad, and Tema,1:31 Jetur, Naphish, and Kedemah.  These are the sons of Ishmael.1:32 And the sons of Keturah, abraham's concubine: she bore Zimran, and Jokshan, and Medan, and Midian, and Ishbak, and Shuah.  And the sons of Jokshan: Sheba, and Dedan.1:33 And the sons of Midian: Ephah, and Epher, and Hanoch, and Abida, and Eldaah.  All these were the sons of Keturah.1:34 And Abraham begat Isaac.  The sons of Isaac: Esau, and Israel.1:35 The sons of Esau: Eliphaz, Reuel, and Jeush, and Jalam, and Korah.1:36 The sons of Eliphaz: Teman, and Omar, Zephi, and Gatam, Kenaz, and Timna, and Amalek.1:37 The sons of Reuel: Nahath, Zerah, Shammah, and Mizzah.1:38 And the sons of Seir: Lotan, and Shobal, and Zibeon, and Anah, and Dishon, and Ezer, and Dishan.1:39 And the sons of Lotan: Hori, and Homam; and Timna was Lotan's sister.1:40 The sons of Shobal: Alian, and Manahath, and Ebal, Shephi, and Onam.  And the sons of Zibeon: Aiah, and Anah.1:41 The sons of Anah: Dishon.  And the sons of Dishon: Hamran, and Eshban, and Ithran, and Cheran.1:42 The sons of Ezer: Bilhan, and Zaavan, Jaakan.  The sons of Dishan: Uz, and Aran.1:43 Now these are the kings that reigned in the land of Edom, before there resigned any king over the children of Israel: Bela the son of Beor; and the name of his city was Dinhabah.1:44 And Bela died, and Jobab the son of Zerah of Bozrah reigned in his stead.1:45 And Jobab died, and Husham of the land of the Temanites reigned in his stead.1:46 And Husham died, and Hadad the son of Bedad, who smote Midian in the field of Moab, reigned in his stead; and the name of his city was Avith.1:47 And Hadad died, and Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead.1:48 And Samlah died, and Shaul of Rehoboth by the River reigned in his stead.1:49 And Shaul died, and Baal-hanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead.1:50 And Baal-hanan died, and Hadad reigned in his stead; and the name of his city was Pai: and his wife's name was Mehetabel, the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Me-zahab.1:51 And Hadad died.  And the chiefs of Edom were: chief Timna, chief Aliah, chief Jetheth,1:52 chief Oholibamah, chief Elah, chief Pinon,1:53 chief Kenaz, chief Teman, chief Mibzar,1:54 chief Magdiel, chief Iram.  These are the chiefs of Edom.2:1 These are the sons of Israel: Reuben, Simeon, Levi, and Judah, Issachar, and Zebulun,2:2 Dan, Joseph, and Benjamin, Naphtali, Gad, and Asher.2:3 The sons of Judah: Er, and Onan, and Shelah; which three were born to him of Shua's daughter the Canaanitess.  And Er, Judah's first-born, was wicked in the sight of Yahweh; and he slew him.2:4 And Tamar his daughter-in-law bore him Perez and Zerah.  All the sons of Judah were five.2:5 The sons of Perez: Hezron, and Hamul.2:6 And the sons of Zerah: Zimri, and Ethan, and Heman, and Calcol, and Dara; five of them in all.2:7 And the sons of Carmi: Achar, the troubler of Israel, who committed a trespass in the devoted thing.2:8 And the sons of Ethan: Azariah.2:9 The sons also of Hezron, that were born to him: Jerahmeel, and Ram, and Chelubai.2:10 And Ram begat Amminadab, and Amminadab begat Nahshon, prince of the children of Judah;2:11 and Nahshon begat Salma, and Salma begat Boaz,2:12 and Boaz begat Obed, and Obed begat Jesse;2:13 and Jesse begat his first-born Eliab, and Abinadab the second, and Shimea the third,2:14 Nethanel the fourth, Raddai the fifth,2:15 Ozem the sixth, David the seventh;2:16 and their sisters were Zeruiah and Abigail.  And the sons of Zeruiah: Abishai, and Joab, and Asahel, three.2:17 And Abigail bore Amasa; and the father of Amasa was Jether the Ishmaelite.2:18 And Caleb the son of Hezron begat children of Azubah his wife, and of Jerioth; and these were her sons: Jesher, and Shobab, and Ardon.2:19 And Azubah died, and Caleb took to him Ephrath, who bore him Hur.2:20 And Hur begat Uri, and Uri begat Bezalel.2:21 And afterward Hezron went in to the daughter of Machir the father of Gilead, whom he took to wife when he was sixty years old; and she bore him Segub.2:22 And Segub begat Jair, who had three and twenty cities in the land of Gilead.2:23 And Geshur and Aram took the towns of Jair from them, with Kenath, and the villages thereof, even 60 cities.  All these were the sons of Machir the father of Gilead.2:24 And after that Hezron was dead in Caleb-ephrathah, then Abijah Hezron's wife bore him Ashhur the father of Tekoa.2:25 And the sons of Jerahmeel the first-born of Hezron were Ram the first-born, and Bunah, and Oren, and Ozem, ahijah.2:26 And Jerahmeel had another wife, whose name was Atarah; she was the mother of Onam.2:27 And the sons of Ram the first-born of Jerahmeel were Maaz, and Jamin, and Eker.2:28 And the sons of Onam were Shammai, and Jada.  And the sons of Shammai: Nadab, and Abishur.2:29 And the name of the wife of Abishur was Abihail; and she bore him Ahban, and Molid.2:30 And the sons of Nadab: Seled, and Appaim; but Seled died without children.2:31 And the sons of Appaim: Ishi.  And the sons of Ishi: Sheshan.  And the sons of Sheshan: Ahlai.2:32 And the sons of Jada the brother of Shammai: Jether, and Jonathan; and Jether died without children.2:33 And the sons of Jonathan: Peleth, and Zaza.  These were the sons of Jerahmeel.2:34 Now Sheshan had no sons, but daughters.  And Sheshan had a servant, an Egyptian, whose name was Jarha.2:35 And Sheshan gave his daughter to Jarha his servant to wife; and she bore him Attai.2:36 And Attai begat Nathan, and Nathan begat Zabad,2:37 and Zabad begat Ephlal, and Ephlal begat Obed,2:38 and Obed begat Jehu, and Jehu begat Azariah,2:39 and Azariah begat Helez, and Helez begat Eleasah,2:40 and Eleasah begat Sismai, and Sismai begat Shallum,2:41 and Shallum begat Jekamiah, and Jekamiah begat Elishama.2:42 And the sons of Caleb the brother of Jerahmeel were Mesha his first-born, who was the father of Ziph; and the sons of Mareshah the father of Hebron.2:43 And the sons of Hebron: Korah, and Tappuah, and Rekem, and Shema.2:44 And Shema begat Raham, the father of Jorkeam; and Rekem begat Shammai.2:45 And the son of Shammai was Maon; and Maon was the father of Beth-zur.2:46 And Ephah, Caleb's concubine, bore Haran, and Moza, and Gazez; and Haran begat Gazez.2:47 And the sons of Jahdai: Regem, and Jothan, and Geshan, and Pelet, and Ephah, and Shaaph.2:48 Maacah, Caleb's concubine, bore Sheber and Tirhanah.2:49 She bore also Shaaph the father of Madmannah, Sheva the father of Machbena, and the father of Gibea; and the daughter of Caleb was Achsah.2:50 These were the sons of Caleb, the son of Hur, the first-born of Ephrathah: Shobal the father of Kiriath-jearim,2:51 Salma the father of Beth-lehem, Hareph the father of Beth-gader.2:52 And Shobal the father of Kiriath-jearim had sons: Haroeh, half of the Menuhoth.2:53 And the families of Kiriath-jearim: The Ithrites, and the Puthites, and the Shumathites, and the Mishraites; of them came the Zorathites and the Eshtaolites.2:54 The sons of Salma: Beth-lehem, and the Netophathites, atroth-beth-joab, and half of the Manahathites, the Zorites.2:55 And the families of scribes that dwelt at Jabez: the Tirathites, the Shimeathites, the Sucathites.  These are the Kenites that came of Hammath, the father of the house of Rechab.3:1 Now these were the sons of David, that were born to him in Hebron: the first-born, amnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess; the second, Daniel, of Abigail the Carmelitess;3:2 the third, absalom the son of Maacah the daughter of Talmai king of Geshur; the fourth, adonijah the son of Haggith;3:3 the fifth, Shephatiah of Abital; the sixth, Ithream by Eglah his wife:3:4 six were born to him in Hebron; and there he reigned seven years and six months.  And in Jerusalem he reigned thirty and three years;3:5 and these were born to him in Jerusalem: Shimea, and Shobab, and Nathan, and Solomon, four, of Bath-shua the daughter of Ammiel;3:6 and Ibhar, and Elishama, and Eliphelet,3:7 and Nogah, and Nepheg, and Japhia,3:8 and Elishama, and Eliada, and Eliphelet, nine.3:9 All these were the sons of David, besides the sons of the concubines; and Tamar was their sister.3:10 And Solomon's son was Rehoboam, abijah his son, asa his son, Jehoshaphat his son,3:11 Joram his son, ahaziah his son, Joash his son,3:12 Amaziah his son, azariah his son, Jotham his son,3:13 Ahaz his son, Hezekiah his son, Manasseh his son,3:14 Amon his son, Josiah his son.3:15 And the sons of Josiah: the first-born Johanan, the second Jehoiakim, the third Zedekiah, the fourth Shallum.3:16 And the sons of Jehoiakim: Jeconiah his son, Zedekiah his son.3:17 And the sons of Jeconiah, the captive: Shealtiel his son,3:18 and Malchiram, and Pedaiah, and Shenazzar, Jekamiah, Hoshama, and Nedabiah.3:19 And the sons of Pedaiah: Zerubbabel, and Shimei.  And the sons of Zerubbabel: Meshullam, and Hananiah; and Shelomith was their sister;3:20 and Hashubah, and Ohel, and Berechiah, and Hasadiah, Jushab-hesed, five.3:21 And the sons of Hananiah: Pelatiah, and Jeshaiah; the sons of Rephaiah, the sons of Arnan, the sons of Obadiah, the sons of Shecaniah.3:22 And the sons of Shecaniah: Shemaiah.  And the sons of Shemaiah: Hattush, and Igal, and Bariah, and Neariah, and Shaphat, six.3:23 And the sons of Neariah: Elioenai, and Hizkiah, and Azrikam, three.3:24 And the sons of Elioenai: Hodaviah, and Eliashib, and Pelaiah, and Akkub, and Johanan, and Delaiah, and Anani, seven.4:1 The sons of Judah: Perez, Hezron, and Carmi, and Hur, and Shobal.4:2 And Reaiah the son of Shobal begat Jahath; and Jahath begat Ahumai and Lahad.  These are the families of the Zorathites.4:3 And these were the sons of the father of Etam: Jezreel, and Ishma, and Idbash; and the name of their sister was Hazzelelponi;4:4 and Penuel the father of Gedor, and Ezer the father of Hushah.  These are the sons of Hur, the first-born of Ephrathah, the father of Beth-lehem.4:5 And Ashhur the father of Tekoa had two wives, Helah and Naarah.4:6 And Naarah bore him Ahuzzam, and Hepher, and Temeni, and Haahashtari.  These were the sons of Naarah.4:7 And the sons of Helah were Zereth, Izhar, and Ethnan.4:8 And Hakkoz begat Anub, and Zobebah, and the families of Aharhel the son of Harum.4:9 And Jabez was more honorable than his brethren: and his mother called his name Jabez, saying, Because I bore him with sorrow.4:10 And Jabez called on the God of Israel, saying, Oh that you would bless me indeed, and enlarge my border, and that your hand might be with me, and that you would keep me from evil, that it be not to my sorrow! And God granted him that which he requested.4:11 And Chelub the brother of Shuhah begat Mehir, who was the father of Eshton.4:12 And Eshton begat Beth-rapha, and Paseah, and Tehinnah the father of Ir-nahash.  These are the men of Recah.4:13 And the sons of Kenaz: Othniel, and Seraiah.  And the sons of Othniel: Hathath.4:14 And Meonothai begat Ophrah: and Seraiah begat Joab the father of Ge-harashim; for they were craftsmen.4:15 And the sons of Caleb the son of Jephunneh: Iru, Elah, and Naam; and the sons of Elah; and Kenaz.4:16 And the sons of Jehallelel: Ziph, and Ziphah, Tiria, and Asarel.4:17 And the sons of Ezrah: Jether, and Mered, and Epher, and Jalon; and she bore Miriam, and Shammai, and Ishbah the father of Eshtemoa.4:18 And his wife the Jewess bore Jered the father of Gedor, and Heber the father of Soco, and Jekuthiel the father of Zanoah.  And these are the sons of Bithiah the daughter of Pharaoh, whom Mered took.4:19 And the sons of the wife of Hodiah, the sister of Naham, were the father of Keilah the Garmite, and Eshtemoa the Maacathite.4:20 And the sons of Shimon: Amnon, and Rinnah, Ben-hanan, and Tilon.  And the sons of Ishi: Zoheth, and Ben-zoheth.4:21 The sons of Shelah the son of Judah: Er the father of Lecah, and Laadah the father of Mareshah, and the families of the house of them that wrought fine linen, of the house of Ashbea;4:22 and Jokim, and the men of Cozeba, and Joash, and Saraph, who had dominion in Moab, and Jashubilehem.  And the records are ancient.4:23 These were the potters, and the inhabitants of Netaim and Gederah: there they dwelt with the king for his work.4:24 The sons of Simeon: Nemuel, and Jamin, Jarib, Zerah, Shaul;4:25 Shallum his son, Mibsam his son, Mishma his son.4:26 And the sons of Mishma: Hammuel his son, Zaccur his son, Shimei his son.4:27 And Shimei had sixteen sons and six daughters; but his brethren had not many children, neither did all their family multiply like to the children of Judah.4:28 And they dwelt at Beer-sheba, and Moladah, and Hazarshual,4:29 and at Bilhah, and at Ezem, and at Tolad,4:30 and at Bethuel, and at Hormah, and at Ziklag,4:31 and at Beth-marcaboth, and Hazar-susim, and at Beth-biri, and at Shaaraim.  These were their cities to the reign of David.4:32 And their villages were Etam, and Ain, Rimmon, and Tochen, and Ashan, five cities;4:33 and all their villages that were round about the same cities, to Baal.  These were their habitations, and they have their genealogy.4:34 And Meshobab, and Jamlech, and Joshah the son of Amaziah,4:35 and Joel, and Jehu the son of Joshibiah, the son of Seraiah, the son of Asiel,4:36 and Elioenai, and Jaakobah, and Jeshohaiah, and Asaiah, and Adiel, and Jesimiel, and Benaiah,4:37 and Ziza the son of Shiphi, the son of Allon, the son of Jedaiah, the son of Shimri, the son of Shemaiah-4:38 these mentioned by name were princes in their families: and their fathers' houses increased greatly.4:39 And they went to the entrance of Gedor, even to the east side of the valley, to seek pasture for their flocks.4:40 And they found fat pasture and good, and the land was wide, and quiet, and peaceable; for they that dwelt there aforetime were of Ham.4:41 And these written by name came in the days of Hezekiah king of Judah, and smote their tents, and the Meunim that were found there, and destroyed them utterly to this day, and dwelt in their stead; because there was pasture there for their flocks.4:42 And some of them, even of the sons of Simeon, five hundred men, went to mount Seir, having for their captains Pelatiah, and Neariah, and Rephaiah, and Uzziel, the sons of Ishi.4:43 And they smote the remnant of the Amalekites that escaped, and have dwelt there to this day.5:1 And the sons of Reuben the first-born of Israel (for he was the first-born; but, forasmuch as he defiled his father's couch, his birthright was given to the sons of Joseph the son of Israel; and the genealogy is not to be reckoned after the birthright.5:2 For Judah prevailed above his brethren, and of him came the prince; but the birthright was Joseph's:)5:3 the sons of Reuben the first-born of Israel: Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi.5:4 The sons of Joel: Shemaiah his son, Gog his son, Shimei his son,5:5 Micah his son, Reaiah his son, Baal his son,5:6 Beerah his son, whom Tilgath-pilneser  king of Assyria carried away captive: he was prince of the Reubenites.5:7 And his brethren by their families, when the genealogy of their generations was reckoned: the chief, Jeiel, and Zechariah,5:8 and Bela the son of Azaz, the son of Shema, the son of Joel, who dwelt in Aroer, even to Nebo and Baal-meon:5:9 and eastward he dwelt even to the entrance of the wilderness from the river Euphrates, because their cattle were multiplied in the land of Gilead.5:10 And in the days of Saul, they made war with the Hagrites, who fell by their hand; and they dwelt in their tents throughout all the land east of Gilead.5:11 And the sons of Gad dwelt over against them, in the land of Bashan to Salecah:5:12 Joel the chief, and Shapham the second, and Janai, and Shaphat in Bashan.5:13 And their brethren of their fathers' houses: Michael, and Meshullam, and Sheba, and Jorai, and Jacan, and Zia, and Eber, seven.5:14 These were the sons of Abihail, the son of Huri, the son of Jaroah, the son of Gilead, the son of Michael, the son of Jeshishai, the son of Jahdo, the son of Buz;5:15 Ahi the son of Abdiel, the son of Guni, chief of their fathers' houses.5:16 And they dwelt in Gilead in Bashan, and in its towns, and in all the suburbs of Sharon, as far as their borders.5:17 All these were reckoned by genealogies in the days of Jotham king of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam king of Israel.5:18 The sons of Reuben, and the Gadites, and the half-tribe of Manasseh, of valiant men, men able to bear buckler and sword, and to shoot with bow, and skilful in war, were 44,760, that were able to go forth to war.5:19 And they made war with the Hagrites, with Jetur, and Naphish, and Nodab.5:20 And they were helped against them, and the Hagrites were delivered into their hand, and all that were with them; for they cried to God in the battle, and he was entreated of them, because they put their trust in him.5:21 And they took away their cattle; of their camels fifty thousand, and of sheep two hundred and fifty thousand, and of asses two thousand, and of men a hundred thousand.5:22 For there fell many slain, because the war was of God.  And they dwelt in their stead until the captivity.5:23 And the children of the half-tribe of Manasseh dwelt in the land: they increased from Bashan to Baal-hermon and Senir and mount Hermon.5:24 And these were the heads of their fathers' houses: even Epher, and Ishi, and Eliel, and Azriel, and Jeremiah, and Hodaviah, and Jahdiel, mighty men of valor, famous men, heads of their fathers' houses.5:25 And they trespassed against the God of their fathers, and played the harlot after the gods of the peoples of the land, whom God destroyed before them.5:26 And the God of Israel stirred up the spirit of Pul king of Assyria, and the spirit of Tilgath-pilneser king of Assyria, and he carried them away, even the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half-tribe of Manasseh, and brought them to Halah, and Habor, and Hara, and to the river of Gozan, to this day.6:1 The sons of Levi: Gershon, Kohath, and Merari.6:2 And the sons of Kohath: Amram, Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel.6:3 And the children of Amram: Aaron, and Moses, and Miriam.  And the sons of Aaron: Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar.6:4 Eleazar begat Phinehas, Phinehas begat Abishua,6:5 and Abishua begat Bukki, and Bukki begat Uzzi,6:6 and Uzzi begat Zerahiah, and Zerahiah begat Meraioth,6:7 Meraioth begat Amariah, and Amariah begat Ahitub,6:8 and Ahitub begat Zadok, and Zadok begat Ahimaaz,6:9 and Ahimaaz begat Azariah, and Azariah begat Johanan,6:10 and Johanan begat Azariah, (he it is that executed the priest's office in the house that Solomon built in Jerusalem),6:11 and Azariah begat Amariah, and Amariah begat Ahitub,6:12 and Ahitub begat Zadok, and Zadok begat Shallum,6:13 and Shallum begat Hilkiah, and Hilkiah begat Azariah,6:14 and Azariah begat Seraiah, and Seraiah begat Jehozadak;6:15 And Jehozadak went into captivity, when Yahweh carried away Judah and Jerusalem by the hand of Nebuchadnezzar.6:16 The sons of Levi: Gershom, Kohath, and Merari.6:17 And these are the names of the sons of Gershom: Libni and Shimei.6:18 And the sons of Kohath were Amram, and Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel.6:19 The sons of Merari: Mahli and Mushi.  And these are the families of the Levites according to their fathers' houses.6:20 Of Gershom: Libni his son, Jahath his son, Zimmah his son,6:21 Joah his son, Iddo his son, Zerah his son, Jeatherai his son.6:22 The sons of Kohath: Amminadab his son, Korah his son, assir his son,6:23 Elkanah his son, and Ebiasaph his son, and Assir his son,6:24 Tahath his son, Uriel his son, Uzziah his son, and Shaul his son.6:25 And the sons of Elkanah: Amasai, and Ahimoth.6:26 As for Elkanah, the sons of Elkanah: Zophai his son, and Nahath his son,6:27 Eliab his son, Jeroham his son, Elkanah his son.6:28 And the sons of Samuel: the first-born Joel, and the second Abijah.6:29 The sons of Merari: Mahli, Libni his son, Shimei his son, Uzzah his son,6:30 Shimea his son, Haggiah his son, asaiah his son.6:31 And these are they whom David set over the service of song in the house of Yahweh, after that the ark had rest.6:32 And they ministered with song before the tabernacle of the tent of meeting, until Solomon had built the house of Yahweh in Jerusalem: and they waited on their office according to their order.6:33 And these are they that waited, and their sons.  Of the sons of the Kohathites: Heman the singer, the son of Joel, the son of Samuel,6:34 the son of Elkanah, the son of Jeroham, the son of Eliel, the son of Toah,6:35 the son of Zuph, the son of Elkanah, the son of Mahath, the son of Amasai,6:36 the son of Elkanah, the son of Joel, the son of Azariah, the son of Zephaniah,6:37 the son of Tahath, the son of Assir, the son of Ebiasaph, the son of Korah,6:38 the son of Izhar, the son of Kohath, the son of Levi, the son of Israel.6:39 And his brother Asaph, who stood on his right hand, even Asaph the son of Berechiah, the son of Shimea,6:40 the son of Michael, the son of Baaseiah, the son of Malchijah,6:41 the son of Ethni, the son of Zerah, the son of Adaiah,6:42 the son of Ethan, the son of Zimmah, the son of Shimei,6:43 the son of Jahath, the son of Gershom, the son of Levi.6:44 And on the left hand their brethren the sons of Merari: Ethan the son of Kishi, the son of Abdi, the son of Malluch,6:45 the son of Hashabiah, the son of Amaziah, the son of Hilkiah,6:46 the son of Amzi, the son of Bani, the son of Shemer,6:47 the son of Mahli, the son of Mushi, the son of Merari, the son of Levi.6:48 And their brethren the Levites were appointed for all the service of the tabernacle of the house of God.6:49 But Aaron and his sons offered upon the altar of burnt offering, and upon the altar of incense, for all the work of the most holy place, and to make atonement for Israel, according to all that Moses the servant of God had commanded.6:50 And these are the sons of Aaron: Eleazar his son, Phinehas his son, abishua his son,6:51 Bukki his son, Uzzi his son, Zerahiah his son,6:52 Meraioth his son, amariah his son, ahitub his son,6:53 Zadok his son, ahimaaz his son.6:54 Now these are their dwelling-places according to their encampments in their borders: to the sons of Aaron, of the families of the Kohathites (for theirs was the first lot),6:55 to them they gave Hebron in the land of Judah, and the suburbs thereof round about it;6:56 but the fields of the city, and the villages thereof, they gave to Caleb the son of Jephunneh.6:57 And to the sons of Aaron they gave the cities of refuge, Hebron; Libnah also with its suburbs, and Jattir, and Eshtemoa with its suburbs,6:58 and Hilen with its suburbs, Debir with its suburbs,6:59 and Ashan with its suburbs, and Beth-shemesh with its suburbs;6:60 and out of the tribe of Benjamin, Geba with its suburbs, and Allemeth with its suburbs, and Anathoth with its suburbs.  All their cities throughout their families were thirteen cities.6:61 And to the rest of the sons of Kohath were given by lot, out of the family of the tribe, out of the half-tribe, the half of Manasseh, ten cities.6:62 And to the sons of Gershom, according to their families, out of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe of Naphtali, and out of the tribe of Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen cities.6:63 To the sons of Merari were given by lot, according to their families, out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zebulun, twelve cities.6:64 And the children of Israel gave to the Levites the cities with their suburbs.6:65 And they gave by lot out of the tribe of the children of Judah, and out of the tribe of the children of Simeon, and out of the tribe of the children of Benjamin, these cities which are mentioned by name.6:66 And some of the families of the sons of Kohath had cities of their borders out of the tribe of Ephraim.6:67 And they gave to them the cities of refuge, Shechem in the hill-country of Ephraim with its suburbs; Gezer also with its suburbs,6:68 and Jokmeam with its suburbs, and Beth-horon with its suburbs,6:69 and Aijalon with its suburbs, and Gath-rimmon with its suburbs;6:70 and out of the half-tribe of Manasseh, aner with its suburbs, and Bileam with its suburbs, for the rest of the family of the sons of Kohath.6:71 To the sons of Gershom were given, out of the family of the half-tribe of Manasseh, Golan in Bashan with its suburbs, and Ashtaroth with its suburbs;6:72 and out of the tribe of Issachar, Kedesh with its suburbs, Daberath with its suburbs,6:73 and Ramoth with its suburbs, and Anem with its suburbs;6:74 and out of the tribe of Asher, Mashal with its suburbs, and Abdon with its suburbs,6:75 and Hukok with its suburbs, and Rehob with its suburbs;6:76 and out of the tribe of Naphtali, Kedesh in Galilee with its suburbs, and Hammon with its suburbs, and Kiriathaim with its suburbs.6:77 To the rest of the Levites, the sons of Merari, were given, out of the tribe of Zebulun, Rimmono with its suburbs, Tabor with its suburbs;6:78 and beyond the Jordan at Jericho, on the east side of the Jordan, were given them, out of the tribe of Reuben, Bezer in the wilderness with its suburbs, and Jahzah with its suburbs,6:79 and Kedemoth with its suburbs, and Mephaath with its suburbs;6:80 and out of the tribe of Gad, Ramoth in Gilead with its suburbs, and Mahanaim with its suburbs,6:81 and Heshbon with its suburbs, and Jazer with its suburbs.7:1 And of the sons of Issachar: Tola, and Puah, Jashub, and Shimron, four.7:2 And the sons of Tola: Uzzi, and Rephaiah, and Jeriel, and Jahmai, and Ibsam, and Shemuel, heads of their fathers' houses, houses of Tola; mighty men of valor in their generations: their number in the days of David was 22,600.7:3 And the sons of Uzzi: Izrahiah.  And the sons of Izrahiah: Michael, and Obadiah, and Joel, Isshiah, five; all of them chief men.7:4 And with them, by their generations, after their fathers' houses, were bands of the host for war, 36,000; for they had many wives and sons.7:5 And their brethren among all the families of Issachar, mighty men of valor, reckoned in all by genealogy, were 87,000.7:6 The sons of Benjamin: Bela, and Becher, and Jediael, three.7:7 And the sons of Bela: Ezbon, and Uzzi, and Uzziel, and Jerimoth, and Iri, five; heads of fathers' houses, mighty men of valor; and they were reckoned by genealogy 22,034.7:8 And the sons of Becher: Zemirah, and Joash, and Eliezer, and Elioenai, and Omri, and Jeremoth, and Abijah, and Anathoth, and Alemeth.  All these were the sons of Becher.7:9 And they were reckoned by genealogy, after their generations, heads of their fathers' houses, mighty men of valor, 20,200.7:10 And the sons of Jediael: Bilhan.  And the sons of Bilhan: Jeush, and Benjamin, and Ehud, and Chenaanah, and Zethan, and Tarshish, and Ahishahar.7:11 All these were sons of Jediael, according to the heads of their fathers' houses, mighty men of valor, 17,200, that were able to go forth in the host for war.7:12 Shuppim also, and Huppim, the sons of Ir, Hushim, the sons of Aher.7:13 The sons of Naphtali: Jahziel, and Guni, and Jezer, and Shallum, the sons of Bilhah.7:14 The sons of Manasseh: Asriel, whom his concubine the Aramitess bore: she bore Machir the father of Gilead:7:15 and Machir took a wife of Huppim and Shuppim, whose sister's name was Maacah; and the name of the second was Zelophehad: and Zelophehad had daughters.7:16 And Maacah the wife of Machir bore a son, and she called his name Peresh; and the name of his brother was Sheresh; and his sons were Ulam and Rakem.7:17 And the sons of Ulam: Bedan.  These were the sons of Gilead the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh.7:18 And his sister Hammolecheth bore Ishhod, and Abiezer, and Mahlah.7:19 And the sons of Shemida were Ahian, and Shechem, and Likhi, and Aniam.7:20 And the sons of Ephraim: Shuthelah, and Bered his son, and Tahath his son, and Eleadah his son, and Tahath his son,7:21 and Zabad his son, and Shuthelah his son, and Ezer, and Elead, whom the men of Gath that were born in the land slew, because they came down to take away their cattle.7:22 And Ephraim their father mourned many days, and his brethren came to comfort him.7:23 And he went in to his wife, and she conceived, and bore a son, and he called his name Beriah, because it went evil with his house.7:24 And his daughter was Sheerah, who built Beth-horon the nether and the upper, and Uzzen-sheerah.7:25 And Rephah was his son, and Resheph, and Telah his son, and Tahan his son,7:26 Ladan his son, ammihud his son, Elishama his son,7:27 Nun his son, Joshua his son.7:28 And their possessions and habitations were Beth-el and the towns thereof, and eastward Naaran, and westward Gezer, with the towns thereof; Shechem also and the towns thereof, to Azzah and the towns thereof;7:29 and by the borders of the children of Manasseh, Beth-shean and its towns, Taanach and its towns, Megiddo and its towns, Dor and its towns.  In these dwelt the children of Joseph the son of Israel.7:30 The sons of Asher: Imnah, and Ishvah, and Ishvi, and Beriah, and Serah their sister.7:31 And the sons of Beriah: Heber, and Malchiel, who was the father of Birzaith.7:32 And Heber begat Japhlet, and Shomer, and Hotham, and Shua their sister.7:33 And the sons of Japhlet: Pasach, and Bimhal, and Ashvath.  These are the children of Japhlet.7:34 And the sons of Shemer: Ahi, and Rohgah, Jehubbah, and Aram.7:35 And the sons of Helem his brother: Zophah, and Imna, and Shelesh, and Amal.7:36 The sons of Zophah: Suah, and Harnepher, and Shual, and Beri, and Imrah,7:37 Bezer, and Hod, and Shamma, and Shilshah, and Ithran, and Beera.7:38 And the sons of Jether: Jephunneh, and Pispa, and Ara.7:39 And the sons of Ulla: Arah, and Hanniel, and Rizia.7:40 All these were the children of Asher, heads of the fathers' houses, choice and mighty men of valor, chief of the princes.  And the number of them reckoned by genealogy for service in war was twenty and six thousand men.8:1 And Benjamin begat Bela his first-born, ashbel the second, and Aharah the third,8:2 Nohah the fourth, and Rapha the fifth.8:3 And Bela had sons: Addar, and Gera, and Abihud,8:4 and Abishua, and Naaman, and Ahoah,8:5 and Gera, and Shephuphan, and Huram.8:6 And these are the sons of Ehud: these are the heads of fathers' houses of the inhabitants of Geba, and they carried them captive to Manahath:8:7 and Naaman, and Ahijah, and Gera, he carried them captive: and he begat Uzza and Ahihud.8:8 And Shaharaim begat children in the field of Moab, after he had sent them away; Hushim and Baara were his wives.8:9 And he begat of Hodesh his wife, Jobab, and Zibia, and Mesha, and Malcam,8:10 and Jeuz, and Shachia, and Mirmah.  These were his sons, heads of fathers' houses.8:11 And of Hushim he begat Abitub and Elpaal.8:12 And the sons of Elpaal: Eber, and Misham, and Shemed, who built Ono and Lod, with the towns thereof;8:13 and Beriah, and Shema, who were heads of fathers' houses of the inhabitants of Aijalon, who put to flight the inhabitants of Gath;8:14 and Ahio, Shashak, and Jeremoth,8:15 and Zebadiah, and Arad, and Eder,8:16 and Michael, and Ishpah, and Joha, the sons of Beriah,8:17 and Zebadiah, and Meshullam, and Hizki, and Heber,8:18 and Ishmerai, and Izliah, and Jobab, the sons of Elpaal,8:19 and Jakim, and Zichri, and Zabdi,8:20 and Elienai, and Zillethai, and Eliel,8:21 and Adaiah, and Beraiah, and Shimrath, the sons of Shimei,8:22 and Ishpan, and Eber, and Eliel,8:23 and Abdon, and Zichri, and Hanan,8:24 and Hananiah, and Elam, and Anthothijah,8:25 and Iphdeiah, and Penuel, the sons of Shashak,8:26 and Shamsherai, and Shehariah, and Athaliah,8:27 and Jaareshiah, and Elijah, and Zichri, the sons of Jeroham.8:28 These were heads of fathers' houses throughout their generations, chief men: these dwelt in Jerusalem.8:29 And in Gibeon there dwelt the father of Gibeon, Jeiel, whose wife's name was Maacah;8:30 and his first-born son Abdon, and Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Nadab,8:31 and Gedor, and Ahio, and Zecher.8:32 And Mikloth begat Shimeah.  And they also dwelt with their brethren in Jerusalem, over against their brethren.8:33 And Ner begat Kish; and Kish begat Saul; and Saul begat Jonathan, and Malchi-shua, and Abinadab, and Eshbaal.8:34 And the son of Jonathan was Merib-baal; and Merib-baal begat Micah.8:35 And the sons of Micah: Pithon, and Melech, and Tarea, and Ahaz.8:36 And Ahaz begat Jehoaddah; and Jehoaddah begat Alemeth, and Azmaveth, and Zimri; and Zimri begat Moza.8:37 And Moza begat Binea; Raphah was his son, Eleasah his son, azel his son.8:38 And Azel had six sons, whose names are these: Azrikam, Bocheru, and Ishmael, and Sheariah, and Obadiah, and Hanan.  All these were the sons of Azel.8:39 And the sons of Eshek his brother: Ulam his first-born, Jeush the second, and Eliphelet the third.8:40 And the sons of Ulam were mighty men of valor, archers, and had many sons, and sons' sons, a hundred and fifty.  All these were of the sons of Benjamin.9:1 So all Israel were reckoned by genealogies; and, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel: and Judah was carried away captive to Babylon for their transgression.9:2 Now the first inhabitants that dwelt in their possessions in their cities were Israel, the priests, the Levites, and the Nethinim.9:3 And in Jerusalem dwelt of the children of Judah, and of the children of Benjamin, and of the children of Ephraim and Manasseh:9:4 Uthai the son of Ammihud, the son of Omri, the son of Imri, the son of Bani, of the children of Perez the son of Judah.9:5 And of the Shilonites: Asaiah the first-born, and his sons.9:6 And of the sons of Zerah: Jeuel, and their brethren, six hundred and ninety.9:7 And of the sons of Benjamin: Sallu the son of Meshullam, the son of Hodaviah, the son of Hassenuah,9:8 and Ibneiah the son of Jeroham, and Elah the son of Uzzi, the son of Michri, and Meshullam the son of Shephatiah, the son of Reuel, the son of Ibnijah;9:9 and their brethren, according to their generations, nine hundred and fifty and six.  All these men were heads of fathers' houses by their fathers' houses.9:10 And of the priests: Jedaiah, and Jehoiarib, Jachin,9:11 and Azariah the son of Hilkiah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Zadok, the son of Meraioth, the son of Ahitub, the ruler of the house of God;9:12 and Adaiah the son of Jeroham, the son of Pashhur, the son of Malchijah, and Maasai the son of Adiel, the son of Jahzerah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Meshillemith, the son of Immer;9:13 and their brethren, heads of their fathers' houses, 1,760; very able men for the work of the service of the house of God.9:14 And of the Levites: Shemaiah the son of Hasshub, the son of Azrikam, the son of Hashabiah, of the sons of Merari;9:15 and Bakbakkar, Heresh, and Galal, and Mattaniah the son of Mica, the son of Zichri, the son of Asaph,9:16 and Obadiah the son of Shemaiah, the son of Galal, the son of Jeduthun, and Berechiah the son of Asa, the son of Elkanah, that dwelt in the villages of the Netophathites.9:17 And the porters: Shallum, and Akkub, and Talmon, and Ahiman, and their brethren (Shallum was the chief),9:18 who hitherto waited in the king's gate eastward: they were the porters for the camp of the children of Levi.9:19 And Shallum the son of Kore, the son of Ebiasaph, the son of Korah, and his brethren, of his father's house, the Korahites, were over the work of the service, keepers of the thresholds of the tent: and their fathers had been over the camp of Yahweh, keepers of the entry.9:20 And Phinehas the son of Eleazar was ruler over them in time past, and Yahweh was with him.9:21 Zechariah the son of Meshelemiah was porter of the door of the tent of meeting.9:22 All these that were chosen to be porters in the thresholds were two hundred and twelve.  These were reckoned by genealogy in their villages, whom David and Samuel the seer did ordain in their office of trust.9:23 So they and their children had the oversight of the gates of the house of Yahweh, even the house of the tent, by wards.9:24 On the four sides were the porters, toward the east, west, north, and south.9:25 And their brethren, in their villages, were to come in every seven days from time to time to be with them:9:26 for the four chief porters, who were Levites, were in an office of trust, and were over the chambers and over the treasuries in the house of God.9:27 And they lodged round about the house of God, because the charge of it was upon them; and to them pertained the opening thereof morning by morning.9:28 And certain of them had charge of the vessels of service; for by count were these brought in and by count were these taken out.9:29 Some of them also were appointed over the furniture, and over all the vessels of the sanctuary, and over the fine flour, and the wine, and the oil, and the frankincense, and the spices.9:30 And some of the sons of the priests prepared the confection of the spices.9:31 And Mattithiah, one of the Levites, who was the first-born of Shallum the Korahite, had the office of trust over the things that were baked in pans.9:32 And some of their brethren, of the sons of the Kohathites, were over the showbread, to prepare it every sabbath.9:33 And these are the singers, heads of fathers' houses of the Levites, who dwelt in the chambers and were free from other service; for they were employed in their work day and night.9:34 These were heads of fathers' houses of the Levites, throughout their generations, chief men: these dwelt at Jerusalem.9:35 And in Gibeon there dwelt the father of Gibeon, Jeiel, whose wife's name was Maacah:9:36 and his first-born son Abdon, and Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Ner, and Nadab,9:37 and Gedor, and Ahio, and Zechariah, and Mikloth.9:38 And Mikloth begat Shimeam.  And they also dwelt with their brethren in Jerusalem, over against their brethren.9:39 And Ner begat Kish; and Kish begat Saul; and Saul begat Jonathan, and Malchishua, and Abinadab, and Eshbaal.9:40 And the son of Jonathan was Merib-baal; and Merib-baal begat Micah.9:41 And the sons of Micah: Pithon, and Melech, and Tahrea, and Ahaz.9:42 And Ahaz begat Jarah; and Jarah begat Alemeth, and Azmaveth, and Zimri; and Zimri begat Moza;9:43 and Moza begat Binea; and Rephaiah his son, Eleasah his son, azel his son.9:44 And Azel had six sons, whose names are these: Azrikam, Bocheru, and Ishmael, and Sheariah, and Obadiah, and Hanan: these were the sons of Azel.10:1 Now the Philistines fought against Israel: and the men of Israel fled from before the Philistines, and fell down slain in mount Gilboa.10:2 And the Philistines followed hard after Saul and after his sons; and the Philistines slew Jonathan, and Abinadab, and Malchi-shua, the sons of Saul.10:3 And the battle went sore against Saul, and the archers overtook him; and he was distressed by reason of the archers.10:4 Then said Saul to his armor-bearer, Draw your sword, and thrust me through with it, lest these uncircumcised come and abuse me.  But his armor-bearer would not; for he was sore afraid.  Therefore Saul took his sword, and fell upon it.10:5 And when his armor-bearer saw that Saul was dead, he likewise fell upon his sword, and died.10:6 So Saul died, and his three sons; and all his house died together.10:7 And when all the men of Israel that were in the valley saw that they fled, and that Saul and his sons were dead, they forsook their cities, and fled; and the Philistines came and dwelt in them.10:8 And it came to pass on the morrow, when the Philistines came to strip the slain, that they found Saul and his sons fallen in mount Gilboa.10:9 And they stripped him, and took his head, and his armor, and sent into the land of the Philistines round about, to carry the tidings to their idols, and to the people.10:10 And they put his armor in the house of their gods, and fastened his head in the house of Dagon.10:11 And when all Jabesh-gilead heard all that the Philistines had done to Saul,10:12 all the valiant men arose, and took away the body of Saul, and the bodies of his sons, and brought them to Jabesh, and buried their bones under the oak in Jabesh, and fasted seven days.10:13 So Saul died for his trespass which he committed against Yahweh, because of the word of Yahweh, which he kept not; and also for that he asked counsel of one that had a familiar spirit, to inquire thereby,10:14 and inquired not of Yahweh: therefore he slew him, and turned the kingdom to David the son of Jesse.11:1 Then all Israel gathered themselves to David to Hebron, saying, Behold, we are your bone and your flesh.11:2 In times past, even when Saul was king, it was you that led out and brought in Israel: and Yahweh your God said to you, You shall be shepherd of my people Israel, and you shall be prince over my people Israel.11:3 So all the elders of Israel came to the king to Hebron; and David made a covenant with them in Hebron before Yahweh; and they anointed David king over Israel, according to the word of Yahweh by Samuel.11:4 And David and all Israel went to Jerusalem (the same is Jebus); and the Jebusites, the inhabitants of the land, were there.11:5 And the inhabitants of Jebus said to David, You shall not come in here.  Nevertheless David took the stronghold of Zion; the same is the city of David.11:6 And David said, Whosoever strikes the Jebusites first shall be chief and captain.  And Joab the son of Zeruiah went up first, and was made chief.11:7 And David dwelt in the stronghold; therefore they called it the city of David.11:8 And he built the city round about, from Millo even round about; and Joab repaired the rest of the city.11:9 And David became greater and greater; for Yahweh of hosts was with him.11:10 Now these are the chief of the mighty men whom David had, who showed themselves strong with him in his kingdom, together with all Israel, to make him king, according to the word of Yahweh concerning Israel.11:11 And this is the number of the mighty men whom David had: Jashobeam, the son of a Hachmonite, the chief of the thirty; he lifted up his spear against three hundred and slew them at one time.11:12 And after him was Eleazar the son of Dodo, the Ahohite, who was one of the three mighty men.11:13 He was with David at Pasdammim, and there the Philistines were gathered together to battle, where was a plot of ground full of barley; and the people fled from before the Philistines.11:14 And they stood in the midst of the plot, and defended it, and slew the Philistines; and Yahweh saved them by a great victory.11:15 And three of the thirty chief men went down to the rock to David, into the cave of Adullam; and the host of the Philistines were encamped in the valley of Rephaim.11:16 And David was then in the stronghold, and the garrison of the Philistines was then in Beth-lehem.11:17 And David longed, and said, Oh that one would give me water to drink of the well of Beth-lehem, which is by the gate!11:18 And the three broke through the host of the Philistines, and drew water out of the well of Beth-lehem, that was by the gate, and took it, and brought it to David: but David would not drink thereof, but poured it out to Yahweh,11:19 and said, My God forbid it me, that I should do this: shall I drink the blood of these men that have put their lives in jeopardy?  for with the jeopardy of their lives they brought it.  Therefore he would not drink it.  These things did the three mighty men.11:20 And Abishai, the brother of Joab, he was chief of the three; for he lifted up his spear against three hundred and slew them, and had a name among the three.11:21 Of the three, he was more honorable than the two, and was made their captain: nevertheless he attained not to the first three.11:22 Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, the son of a valiant man of Kabzeel, who had done mighty deeds, he slew the two sons of Ariel of Moab: he went down also and slew a lion in the midst of a pit in time of snow.11:23 And he slew an Egyptian, a man of great stature, five cubits high; and in the Egyptian's hand was a spear like a weaver's beam; and he went down to him with a staff, and plucked the spear out of the Egyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear.11:24 These things did Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and had a name among the three mighty men.11:25 Behold, he was more honorable than the thirty, but he attained not to the first three: and David set him over his guard.11:26 Also the mighty men of the armies: Asahel the brother of Joab, Elhanan the son of Dodo of Beth-lehem,11:27 Shammoth the Harorite, Helez the Pelonite,11:28 Ira the son of Ikkesh the Tekoite, abiezer the Anathothite,11:29 Sibbecai the Hushathite, Ilai the Ahohite,11:30 Maharai the Netophathite, Heled the son of Baanah the Netophathite,11:31 Ithai the son of Ribai of Gibeah of the children of Benjamin, Benaiah the Pirathonite,11:32 Hurai of the brooks of Gaash, abiel the Arbathite,11:33 Azmaveth the Baharumite, Eliahba the Shaalbonite,11:34 the sons of Hashem the Gizonite, Jonathan the son of Shagee the Hararite,11:35 Ahiam the son of Sacar the Hararite, Eliphal the son of Ur,11:36 Hepher the Mecherathite, ahijah the Pelonite,11:37 Hezro the Carmelite, Naarai the son of Ezbai,11:38 Joel the brother of Nathan, Mibhar the son of Hagri,11:39 Zelek the Ammonite, Naharai the Berothite, the armorbearer of Joab the son of Zeruiah,11:40 Ira the Ithrite, Gareb the Ithrite,11:41 Uriah the Hittite, Zabad the son of Ahlai,11:42 Adina the son of Shiza the Reubenite, a chief of the Reubenites, and thirty with him,11:43 Hanan the son of Maacah, and Joshaphat the Mithnite,11:44 Uzzia the Ashterathite, Shama and Jeiel the sons of Hotham the Aroerite,11:45 Jediael the son of Shimri, and Joha his brother, the Tizite,11:46 Eliel the Mahavite, and Jeribai, and Joshaviah, the sons of Elnaam, and Ithmah the Moabite,11:47 Eliel, and Obed, and Jaasiel the Mezobaite.12:1 Now these are they that came to David to Ziklag, while he yet kept himself close because of Saul the son of Kish; and they were among the mighty men, his helpers in war.12:2 They were armed with bows, and could use both the right hand and the left in slinging stones and in shooting arrows from the bow: they were of Saul's brethren of Benjamin.12:3 The chief was Ahiezer; then Joash, the sons of Shemaah the Gibeathite, and Jeziel, and Pelet, the sons of Azmaveth, and Beracah, and Jehu the Anathothite,12:4 and Ishmaiah the Gibeonite, a mighty man among the thirty, and over the thirty, and Jeremiah, and Jahaziel, and Johanan, and Jozabad the Gederathite,12:5 Eluzai, and Jerimoth, and Bealiah, and Shemariah, and Shephatiah the Haruphite,12:6 Elkanah, and Isshiah, and Azarel, and Joezer, and Jashobeam, the Korahites,12:7 and Joelah, and Zebadiah, the sons of Jeroham of Gedor.12:8 And of the Gadites there separated themselves to David to the stronghold in the wilderness, mighty men of valor, men trained for war, that could handle shield and spear; whose faces were like the faces of lions, and they were as swift as the roes upon the mountains;12:9 Ezer the chief, Obadiah the second, Eliab the third,12:10 Mishmannah the fourth, Jeremiah the fifth,12:11 Attai the sixth, Eliel the seventh,12:12 Johanan the eighth, Elzabad the ninth,12:13 Jeremiah the tenth, Machbannai the eleventh.12:14 These of the sons of Gad were captains of the host: he that was least was equal to a hundred, and the greatest to a thousand.12:15 These are they that went over the Jordan in the first month, when it had overflowed all its banks; and they put to flight all them of the valleys, both toward the east, and toward the west.12:16 And there came of the children of Benjamin and Judah to the stronghold to David.12:17 And David went out to meet them, and answered and said to them, If ye be come peaceably to me to help me, my heart shall be knit to you; but if ye be come to betray me to my adversaries, seeing there is no wrong in my hands, the God of our fathers look upon it, and rebuke it.12:18 Then the Spirit came upon Amasai, who was chief of the thirty, and he said, Yours are we, David, and on your side, you son of Jesse: peace, peace be to you, and peace be to your helpers; for your God helps you.  Then David received them, and made them captains of the band.12:19 Of Manasseh also there fell away some to David, when he came with the Philistines against Saul to battle: but they helped them not; for the lords of the Philistines upon advisement sent him away, saying, He will fall away to his master Saul to the jeopardy of our heads.12:20 As he went to Ziklag, there fell to him of Manasseh, adnah, and Jozabad, and Jediael, and Michael, and Jozabad, and Elihu, and Zillethai, captains of thousands that were of Manasseh.12:21 And they helped David against the band of rovers: for they were all mighty men of valor, and were captains in the host.12:22 For from day to day men came to David to help him, until there was a great host, like the host of God.12:23 And these are the numbers of the heads of them that were armed for war, who came to David to Hebron, to turn the kingdom of Saul to him, according to the word of Yahweh.12:24 The children of Judah that bore shield and spear were six thousand and eight hundred, armed for war.12:25 Of the children of Simeon, mighty men of valor for the war, seven thousand and one hundred.12:26 Of the children of Levi four thousand and six hundred.12:27 And Jehoiada was the leader of the house of Aaron; and with him were three thousand and seven hundred,12:28 and Zadok, a young man mighty of valor, and of his father's house twenty and two captains.12:29 And of the children of Benjamin, the brethren of Saul, three thousand: for hitherto the greatest part of them had kept their allegiance to the house of Saul.12:30 And of the children of Ephraim twenty thousand and eight hundred, mighty men of valor, famous men in their fathers' houses.12:31 And of the half-tribe of Manasseh eighteen thousand, who were mentioned by name, to come and make David king.12:32 And of the children of Issachar, men that had understanding of the times, to know what Israel ought to do, the heads of them were two hundred; and all their brethren were at their commandment.12:33 Of Zebulun, such as were able to go out in the host, that could set the battle in array, with all manner of instruments of war, fifty thousand, and that could order the battle array, and were not of double heart.12:34 And of Naphtali a thousand captains, and with them with shield and spear thirty and seven thousand.12:35 And of the Danites that could set the battle in array, twenty and eight thousand and six hundred.12:36 And of Asher, such as were able to go out in the host, that could set the battle in array, forty thousand.12:37 And on the other side of the Jordan, of the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and of the half-tribe of Manasseh, with all manner of instruments of war for the battle, a hundred and twenty thousand.12:38 All these being men of war, that could order the battle array, came with a perfect heart to Hebron, to make David king over all Israel: and all the rest also of Israel were of one heart to make David king.12:39 And they were there with David three days, eating and drinking; for their brethren had made preparation for them.12:40 Moreover they that were near to them, even as far as Issachar and Zebulun and Naphtali, brought bread on asses, and on camels, and on mules, and on oxen, victuals of meal, cakes of figs, and clusters of raisins, and wine, and oil, and oxen, and sheep in abundance: for there was joy in Israel.13:1 And David consulted with the captains of thousands and of hundreds, even with every leader.13:2 And David said to all the assembly of Israel, If it seem good to you, and if it be of Yahweh our God, let us send abroad every where to our brethren that are left in all the land of Israel, with whom the priests and Levites are in their cities that have suburbs, that they may gather themselves to us;13:3 and let us bring again the ark of our God to us: for we sought not to it in the days of Saul.13:4 And all the assembly said that they would do so; for the thing was right in the eyes of all the people.13:5 So David assembled all Israel together, from the Shihor the brook of Egypt even to the entrance of Hamath, to bring the ark of God from Kiriath-jearim.13:6 And David went up, and all Israel, to Baalah, that is, to Kiriath-jearim, which belonged to Judah, to bring up from there the ark of God Yahweh that sitts above the cherubim, that is called by the Name.13:7 And they carried the ark of God upon a new cart, and brought it out of the house of Abinadab: and Uzza and Ahio drove the cart.13:8 And David and all Israel played before God with all their might, even with songs, and with harps, and with psalteries, and with timbrels, and with cymbals, and with trumpets.13:9 And when they came to the threshing-floor of Chidon, Uzza put forth his hand to hold the ark; for the oxen stumbled.13:10 And the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Uzza, and he smote him, because he put forth his hand to the ark; and there he died before God.13:11 And David was displeased, because Yahweh had broken forth upon Uzza; and he called that place Perez-uzza, to this day.13:12 And David was afraid of God that day, saying, How shall I bring the ark of God home to me?13:13 So David removed not the ark to him into the city of David, but carried it aside into the house of Obed-edom the Gittite.13:14 And the ark of God remained with the family of Obed-edom in his house three months: and Yahweh blessed the house of Obed-edom, and all that he had.14:1 And Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and cedar-trees, and masons, and carpenters, to build him a house.14:2 And David perceived that Yahweh had established him king over Israel; for his kingdom was exalted on high, for his people Israel's sake.14:3 And David took more wives at Jerusalem; and David begat more sons and daughters.14:4 And these are the names of the children whom he had in Jerusalem: Shammua, and Shobab, Nathan, and Solomon,14:5 and Ibhar, and Elishua, and Elpelet,14:6 and Nogah, and Nepheg, and Japhia,14:7 and Elishama, and Beeliada, and Eliphelet.14:8 And when the Philistines heard that David was anointed king over all Israel, all the Philistines went up to seek David: and David heard of it, and went out against them.14:9 Now the Philistines had come and made a raid in the valley of Rephaim.14:10 And David inquired of God, saying, Shall I go up against the Philistines?  and will you deliver them into my hand?  And Yahweh said to him, Go up; for I will deliver them into your hand.14:11 So they came up to Baal-perazim, and David smote them there; and David said, God has broken my enemies by my hand, like the breach of waters.  Therefore they called the name of that place Baal-perazim.14:12 And they left their gods there; and David gave commandment, and they were burned with fire.14:13 And the Philistines yet again made a raid in the valley.14:14 And David inquired again of God; and God said to him, You shall not go up after them: turn away from them, and come upon them over against the mulberry-trees.14:15 And it shall be, when you hear the sound of marching in the tops of the mulberry-trees, that then you shall go out to battle; for God is gone out before you to smite the host of the Philistines.14:16 And David did as God commanded him: and they smote the host of the Philistines from Gibeon even to Gezer.14:17 And the fame of David went out into all lands; and Yahweh brought the fear of him upon all nations.15:1 And David made him houses in the city of David; and he prepared a place for the ark of God, and pitched for it a tent.15:2 Then David said, None ought to carry the ark of God but the Levites: for them has Yahweh chosen to carry the ark of God, and to minister to him for ever.15:3 And David assembled all Israel at Jerusalem, to bring up the ark of Yahweh to its place, which he had prepared for it.15:4 And David gathered together the sons of Aaron, and the Levites:15:5 of the sons of Kohath, Uriel the chief, and his brethren a hundred and twenty;15:6 of the sons of Merari, asaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred and twenty;15:7 of the sons of Gershom, Joel the chief, and his brethren a hundred and thirty;15:8 of the sons of Elizaphan, Shemaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred;15:9 of the sons of Hebron, Eliel the chief, and his brethren 80;15:10 of the sons of Uzziel, amminadab the chief, and his brethren 112.15:11 And David called for Zadok and Abiathar the priests, and for the Levites, for Uriel, asaiah, and Joel, Shemaiah, and Eliel, and Amminadab,15:12 and said to them, You are the heads of the fathers' houses of the Levites: sanctify yourselves, both ye and your brethren, that ye may bring up the ark of Yahweh, the God of Israel, to the place that I have prepared for it.15:13 For because ye bore it not at the first, Yahweh our God made a breach upon us, for that we sought him not according to the ordinance.15:14 So the priests and the Levites sanctified themselves to bring up the ark of Yahweh, the God of Israel.15:15 And the children of the Levites bore the ark of God upon their shoulders with the staves upon it, as Moses commanded according to the word of Yahweh.15:16 And David spoke to the chief of the Levites to appoint their brethren the singers, with instruments of music, psalteries and harps and cymbals, sounding aloud and lifting up the voice with joy.15:17 So the Levites appointed Heman the son of Joel; and of his brethren, asaph the son of Berechiah; and of the sons of Merari their brethren, Ethan the son of Kushaiah;15:18 and with them their brethren of the second degree, Zechariah, Ben, and Jaaziel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehiel, and Unni, Eliab, and Benaiah, and Maaseiah, and Mattithiah, and Eliphelehu, and Mikneiah, and Obed-edom, and Jeiel, the doorkeepers.15:19 So the singers, Heman, asaph, and Ethan, were appointed with cymbals of brass to sound aloud;15:20 and Zechariah, and Aziel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehiel, and Unni, and Eliab, and Maaseiah, and Benaiah, with psalteries set to Alamoth;15:21 and Mattithiah, and Eliphelehu, and Mikneiah, and Obed-edom, and Jeiel, and Azaziah, with harps set to the Sheminith, to lead.15:22 And Chenaniah, chief of the Levites, was over the song: he instructed about the song, because he was skilful.15:23 And Berechiah and Elkanah were doorkeepers for the ark.15:24 And Shebaniah, and Joshaphat, and Nethanel, and Amasai, and Zechariah, and Benaiah, and Eliezer, the priests, did blow the trumpets before the ark of God: and Obed-edom and Jehiah were doorkeepers for the ark.15:25 So David, and the elders of Israel, and the captains over thousands, went to bring up the ark of the covenant of Yahweh out of the house of Obed-edom with joy.15:26 And it came to pass, when God helped the Levites that bore the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, that they sacrificed seven bullocks and seven rams.15:27 And David was clothed with a robe of fine linen, and all the Levites that bore the ark, and the singers, and Chenaniah the master of the song with the singers: and David had upon him an ephod of linen.15:28 Thus all Israel brought up the ark of the covenant of Yahweh with shouting, and with sound of the cornet, and with trumpets, and with cymbals, sounding aloud with psalteries and harps.15:29 And it came to pass, as the ark of the covenant of Yahweh came to the city of David, that Michal the daughter of Saul looked out at the window, and saw king David dancing and playing; and she despised him in her heart.16:1 And they brought in the ark of God, and set it in the midst of the tent that David had pitched for it: and they offered burnt offerings and peace offerings before God.16:2 And when David had made an end of offering the burnt offering and the peace offerings, he blessed the people in the name of Yahweh.16:3 And he dealt to every one of Israel, both man and woman, to every one a loaf of bread, and a portion of flesh, and a cake of raisins.16:4 And he appointed certain of the Levites to minister before the ark of Yahweh, and to celebrate and to thank and praise Yahweh, the God of Israel:16:5 Asaph the chief, and second to him Zechariah, Jeiel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehiel, and Mattithiah, and Eliab, and Benaiah, and Obed-edom, and Jeiel, with psalteries and with harps; and Asaph with cymbals, sounding aloud;16:6 and Benaiah and Jahaziel the priests with trumpets continually, before the ark of the covenant of God.16:7 Then on that day did David first ordain to give thanks to Yahweh, by the hand of Asaph and his brethren.16:8 O give thanks to Yahweh, call upon his name; Make known his doings among the peoples.16:9 Sing to him, sing praises to him; Talk ye of all his marvellous works.16:10 Glory ye in his holy name; Let the heart of them rejoice that seek Yahweh.16:11 Seek ye Yahweh and his strength; Seek his face evermore.16:12 Remember his marvellous works that he has done, His wonders, and the judgments of his mouth,16:13 O ye seed of Israel his servant, You children of Jacob, his chosen ones.16:14 He is Yahweh our God; His judgments are in all the earth.16:15 Remember his covenant for ever, The word which he commanded to a thousand generations,16:16 The covenant which he made with Abraham, and his oath to Isaac,16:17 And confirmed the same to Jacob for a statute, To Israel for an everlasting covenant,16:18 Saying, To you will I give the land of Canaan, The lot of your inheritance;16:19 When ye were but a few men in number, Yes, very few, and sojourners in it;16:20 And they went about from nation to nation, and from one kingdom to another people.16:21 He allowed no man to do them wrong; Yes, he reproved kings for their sakes,16:22 Saying, Touch not my anointed ones, and do my prophets no harm.16:23 Sing to Yahweh, all the earth; Show forth his salvation from day to day.16:24 Declare his glory among the nations, His marvellous works among all the peoples.16:25 For great is Yahweh, and greatly to be praised: He also is to be feared above all gods.16:26 For all the gods of the peoples are idols: But Yahweh made the heavens.16:27 Honor and majesty are before him: Strength and gladness are in his place.16:28 Ascribe to Yahweh, ye kindreds of the peoples, ascribe to Yahweh glory and strength;16:29 Ascribe to Yahweh the glory due to his name: Bring an offering, and come before him: Worship Yahweh in holy array.16:30 Tremble before him, all the earth: The world also is established that it cannot be moved.16:31 Let the heavens be glad, and let the earth rejoice; And let them say among the nations, Yahweh reigns.16:32 Let the sea roar, and the fulness thereof; Let the field exult, and all that is therein;16:33 Then shall the trees of the wood sing for joy before Yahweh; For he comes to judge the earth.16:34 O give thanks to Yahweh; for he is good; For his lovingkindness endures for ever.16:35 And say ye, Save us, O God of our salvation, and gather us together and deliver us from the nations, To give thanks to your holy name, and to triumph in your praise.16:36 Blessed be Yahweh, the God of Israel, From everlasting even to everlasting.  And all the people said, amen, and praised Yahweh.16:37 So he left there, before the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, asaph and his brethren, to minister before the ark continually, as every day's work required;16:38 and Obed-edom with their brethren, 68; Obed-edom also the son of Jeduthun and Hosah to be doorkeepers;16:39 and Zadok the priest, and his brethren the priests, before the tabernacle of Yahweh in the high place that was at Gibeon,16:40 to offer burnt offerings to Yahweh upon the altar of burnt offering continually morning and evening, even according to all that is written in the law of Yahweh, which he commanded to Israel;16:41 and with them Heman and Jeduthun, and the rest that were chosen, who were mentioned by name, to give thanks to Yahweh, because his lovingkindness endures for ever;16:42 and with them Heman and Jeduthun with trumpets and cymbals for those that should sound aloud, and with instruments for the songs of God; and the sons of Jeduthun to be at the gate.16:43 And all the people departed every man to his house: and David returned to bless his house.17:1 And it came to pass, when David dwelt in his house, that David said to Nathan the prophet, Lo, I dwell in a house of cedar, but the ark of the covenant of Yahweh dwells under curtains.17:2 And Nathan said to David, Do all that is in your heart; for God is with you.17:3 And it came to pass the same night, that the word of God came to Nathan, saying,17:4 Go and tell David my servant, Thus says Yahweh, You shall not build me a house to dwell in:17:5 for I have not dwelt in a house since the day that I brought up Israel, to this day, but have gone from tent to tent, and from one tabernacle to another.17:6 In all places in which I have walked with all Israel, spoke I a word with any of the judges of Israel, whom I commanded to be shepherd of my people, saying, Why have ye not built me a house of cedar?17:7 Now therefore thus shall you say to my servant David, Thus says Yahweh of hosts, I took you from the pasture, from following the sheep, that you should be prince over my people Israel:17:8 and I have been with you wherever you have gone, and have cut off all your enemies from before you; and I will make you a name, like to the name of the great ones that are in the earth.17:9 And I will appoint a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, that they may dwell in their own place, and be moved no more; neither shall the children of wickedness waste them any more, as at the first,17:10 and as from the day that I commanded judges to be over my people Israel; and I will subdue all your enemies.  Moreover I tell you that Yahweh will build you a house.17:11 And it shall come to pass, when your days are fulfilled that you must go to be with your fathers, that I will set up your seed after you, who shall be of your sons; and I will establish his kingdom.17:12 He shall build me a house, and I will establish his throne for ever.17:13 I will be his father, and he shall be my son: and I will not take my lovingkindness away from him, as I took it from him that was before you;17:14 but I will settle him in my house and in my kingdom for ever; and his throne shall be established for ever.17:15 According to all these words, and according to all this vision, so did Nathan speak to David.17:16 Then David the king went in, and sat before Yahweh; and he said, Who am I, O Yahweh God, and what is my house, that you have brought me thus far?17:17 And this was a small thing in your eyes, O God; but you have spoken of your servant's house for a great while to come, and have regarded me according to the estate of a man of high degree, O Yahweh God.17:18 What can David say yet more to you concerning the honor which is done to your servant?  for you know your servant.17:19 O Yahweh, for your servant's sake, and according to your own heart, have you wrought all this greatness, to make known all these great things.17:20 O Yahweh, there is none like you, neither is there any God besides you, according to all that we have heard with our ears.17:21 And what one nation in the earth is like your people Israel, whom God went to redeem to himself for a people, to make you a name by great and terrible things, in driving out nations from before your people, whom you redeem out of Egypt?17:22 For your people Israel did you make your own people for ever; and you, Yahweh, became their God.17:23 And now, O Yahweh, let the word that you have spoken concerning your servant, and concerning his house, be established for ever, and do as you have spoken.17:24 And let your name be established and magnified for ever, saying, Yahweh of hosts is the God of Israel, even a God to Israel: and the house of David your servant is established before you.17:25 For you, O my God, have revealed to your servant that you will build him a house: therefore has your servant found in his heart to pray before you.17:26 And now, O Yahweh, you are God, and have promised this good thing to your servant:17:27 and now it has pleased you to bless the house of your servant, that it may continue for ever before you: for you, O Yahweh, have blessed, and it is blessed for ever.18:1 And after this it came to pass, that David smote the Philistines, and subdued them, and took Gath and its towns out of the hand of the Philistines.18:2 And he smote Moab; and the Moabites became servants to David, and brought tribute.18:3 And David smote Hadarezer king of Zobah to Hamath, as he went to establish his dominion by the river Euphrates.18:4 And David took from him a thousand chariots, and seven thousand horsemen, and twenty thousand footmen; and David hocked all the chariot horses, but reserved of them for a hundred chariots.18:5 And when the Syrians of Damascus came to succor Hadarezer king of Zobah, David smote of the Syrians two and twenty thousand men.18:6 Then David put garrisons in Syria of Damascus; and the Syrians became servants to David, and brought tribute.  And Yahweh gave victory to David wherever he went.18:7 And David took the shields of gold that were on the servants of Hadarezer, and brought them to Jerusalem.18:8 And from Tibhath and from Cun, cities of Hadarezer, David took very much brass, with which Solomon made the brazen sea, and the pillars, and the vessels of brass.18:9 And when Tou king of Hamath heard that David had smitten all the host of Hadarezer king of Zobah,18:10 he sent Hadoram his son to king David, to salute him, and to bless him, because he had fought against Hadarezer and smitten him; (for Hadarezer had wars with Tou;) and he had with him all manner of vessels of gold and silver and brass.18:11 These also did king David dedicate to Yahweh, with the silver and the gold that he carried away from all the nations; from Edom, and from Moab, and from the children of Ammon, and from the Philistines, and from Amalek.18:12 Moreover Abishai the son of Zeruiah smote of the Edomites in the Valley of Salt eighteen thousand.18:13 And he put garrisons in Edom; and all the Edomites became servants to David.  And Yahweh gave victory to David wherever he went.18:14 And David reigned over all Israel; and he executed justice and righteousness to all his people.18:15 And Joab the son of Zeruiah was over the host; and Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud was recorder;18:16 and Zadok the son of Ahitub, and Abimelech the son of Abiathar, were priests; and Shavsha was scribe;18:17 and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over the Cherethites and the Pelethites; and the sons of David were chief about the king.19:1 And it came to pass after this, that Nahash the king of the children of Ammon died, and his son reigned in his stead.19:2 And David said, I will show kindness to Hanun the son of Nahash, because his father showed kindness to me.  So David sent messengers to comfort him concerning his father.  And David's servants came into the land of the children of Ammon to Hanun, to comfort him.19:3 But the princes of the children of Ammon said to Hanun, Think you that David does honor your father, in that he has sent comforters to you?  are not his servants come to you to search, and to overthrow, and to spy out the land?19:4 So Hanun took David's servants, and shaved them, and cut off their garments in the middle, even to their buttocks, and sent them away.19:5 Then there went certain persons, and told David how the men were served.  And he sent to meet them; for the men were greatly ashamed.  And the king said, Tarry at Jericho until your beards be grown, and then return.19:6 And when the children of Ammon saw that they had made themselves odious to David, Hanun and the children of Ammon sent a thousand talents of silver to hire them chariots and horsemen out of Mesopotamia, and out of Arammaacah, and out of Zobah.19:7 So they hired them thirty and two thousand chariots, and the king of Maacah and his people, who came and encamped before Medeba.  And the children of Ammon gathered themselves together from their cities, and came to battle.19:8 And when David heard of it, he sent Joab, and all the host of the mighty men.19:9 And the children of Ammon came out, and put the battle in array at the gate of the city: and the kings that were come were by themselves in the field.19:10 Now when Joab saw that the battle was set against him before and behind, he chose of all the choice men of Israel, and put them in array against the Syrians.19:11 And the rest of the people he committed into the hand of Abishai his brother; and they put themselves in array against the children of Ammon.19:12 And he said, If the Syrians be too strong for me, then you shall help me; but if the children of Ammon be too strong for you, then I will help you.19:13 Be of good courage, and let us play the man for our people, and for the cities of our God: and Yahweh do that which seems him good.19:14 So Joab and the people that were with him drew near before the Syrians to the battle; and they fled before him.19:15 And when the children of Ammon saw that the Syrians were fled, they likewise fled before Abishai his brother, and entered into the city.  Then Joab came to Jerusalem.19:16 And when the Syrians saw that they were put to the worse before Israel, they sent messengers, and drew forth the Syrians that were beyond the River, with Shophach the captain of the host of Hadarezer at their head.19:17 And it was told David; and he gathered all Israel together, and passed over the Jordan, and came upon them, and set the battle in array against them.  So when David had put the battle in array against the Syrians, they fought with him.19:18 And the Syrians fled before Israel; and David slew of the Syrians the men of seven thousand chariots, and forty thousand footmen, and killed Shophach the captain of the host.19:19 And when the servants of Hadarezer saw that they were put to the worse before Israel, they made peace with David, and served him: neither would the Syrians help the children of Ammon any more.20:1 And it came to pass, at the time of the return of the year, at the time when kings go out to battle, that Joab led forth the army, and wasted the country of the children of Ammon, and came and besieged Rabbah.  But David tarried at Jerusalem.  And Joab smote Rabbah, and overthrew it.20:2 And David took the crown of their king from off his head, and found it to weigh a talent of gold, and there were precious stones in it; and it was set upon David's head: and he brought forth the spoil of the city, exceedingly much.20:3 And he brought forth the people that were therein, and cut them with saws, and with harrows of iron, and with axes.  And thus did David to all the cities of the children of Ammon.  And David and all the people returned to Jerusalem.20:4 And it came to pass after this, that there arose war at Gezer with the Philistines: then Sibbecai the Hushathite slew Sippai, of the sons of the giant; and they were subdued.20:5 And there was again war with the Philistines; and Elhanan the son of Jair slew Lahmi the brother of Goliath the Gittite, the staff of whose spear was like a weaver's beam.20:6 And there was again war at Gath, where was a man of great stature, whose fingers and toes were four and twenty, six on each hand, and six on each foot; and he also was born to the giant.20:7 And when he defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimea David's brother slew him.20:8 These were born to the giant in Gath; and they fell by the hand of David, and by the hand of his servants.21:1 And Satan stood up against Israel, and moved David to number Israel.21:2 And David said to Joab and to the princes of the people, Go, number Israel from Beer-sheba even to Dan; and bring me word, that I may know the sum of them.21:3 And Joab said, Yahweh make his people a hundred times as many as they are: but, my lord the king, are they not all my lord's servants?  why does my lord require this thing?  why will he be a cause of guilt to Israel?21:4 Nevertheless the king's word prevailed against Joab.  Wherefore Joab departed, and went throughout all Israel, and came to Jerusalem.21:5 And Joab gave up the sum of the numbering of the people to David.  And all they of Israel were 1,100,000 men that drew sword: and Judah was 470,000 men that drew sword.21:6 But Levi and Benjamin counted he not among them; for the king's command was abominable to Joab.21:7 And God was displeased with this thing; therefore he attacked Israel.21:8 And David said to God, I have sinned greatly, in that I have done this thing: but now, put away, I beseech you, the iniquity of your servant; for I have acted very foolishly.21:9 And Yahweh spoke to Gad, David's seer, saying,21:10 Go and speak to David, saying, Thus says Yahweh, I offer you three things: choose one of them, that I may do it to you.21:11 So Gad came to David, and said to him, Thus says Yahweh, Take which you will:21:12 either three years of famine; or three months to be consumed before your foes, while the sword of your enemies overtakes you; or else three days the sword of Yahweh, even pestilence in the land, and the angel of Yahweh destroying throughout all the borders of Israel.  Now therefore consider what answer I shall return to him who sent me.21:13 And David said to Gad, I am in a great strait: let me fall, I pray, into the hand of Yahweh; for very great are his mercies: and let me not fall into the hand of man.21:14 So Yahweh sent a pestilence upon Israel; and there fell of Israel seventy thousand men.21:15 And God sent an angel to Jerusalem to destroy it: and as he was about to destroy, Yahweh beheld, and he repented him of the evil, and said to the destroying angel, It is enough; now stay your hand.  And the angel of Yahweh was standing by the threshing-floor of Ornan the Jebusite.21:16 And David lifted up his eyes, and saw the angel of Yahweh standing between earth and heaven, having a drawn sword in his hand stretched out over Jerusalem.  Then David and the elders, clothed in sackcloth, fell upon their faces.21:17 And David said to God, Is it not I that commanded the people to be numbered?  even I it is that have sinned and done very wickedly; but these sheep, what have they done?  let your hand, I pray you, O Yahweh my God, be against me, and against my father's house; but not against your people, that they should be plagued.21:18 Then the angel of Yahweh commanded Gad to say to David, that David should go up, and rear an altar to Yahweh in the threshing-floor of Ornan the Jebusite.21:19 And David went up at the saying of Gad, which he spoke in the name of Yahweh.21:20 And Ornan turned back, and saw the angel; and his four sons that were with him hid themselves.  Now Ornan was threshing wheat.21:21 And as David came to Ornan, Ornan looked and saw David, and went out of the threshing-floor, and bowed himself to David with his face to the ground.21:22 Then David said to Ornan, Give me the place of this threshing-floor, that I may build upon it an altar to Yahweh: for the full price shall you give it me, that the plague may be stayed from the people.21:23 And Ornan said to David, Take it to you, and let my lord the king do that which is good in his eyes: lo, I give you the oxen for burnt offerings, and the threshing instruments for wood, and the wheat for the meal offering; I give it all.21:24 And king David said to Ornan, Nay; but I will verily buy it for the full price: for I will not take that which is yours for Yahweh, nor offer a burnt offering without cost.21:25 So David gave to Ornan for the place six hundred shekels of gold by weight.21:26 And David built there an altar to Yahweh, and offered burnt offerings and peace offerings, and called upon Yahweh; and he answered him from heaven by fire upon the altar of burnt offering.21:27 And Yahweh commanded the angel; and he put up his sword again into the sheath thereof.21:28 At that time, when David saw that Yahweh had answered him in the threshing-floor of Ornan the Jebusite, then he sacrificed there.21:29 For the tabernacle of Yahweh, which Moses made in the wilderness, and the altar of burnt offering, were at that time in the high place at Gibeon.21:30 But David could not go before it to inquire of God; for he was afraid because of the sword of the angel of Yahweh.22:1 Then David said, This is the house of Yahweh God, and this is the altar of burnt offering for Israel.22:2 And David commanded to gather together the sojourners that were in the land of Israel; and he set masons to hew wrought stones to build the house of God.22:3 And David prepared iron in abundance for the nails for the doors of the gates, and for the couplings; and brass in abundance without weight;22:4 and cedar-trees without number: for the Sidonians and they of Tyre brought cedar-trees in abundance to David.22:5 And David said, Solomon my son is young and tender, and the house that is to be built for Yahweh must be exceedingly magnificent, of fame and of glory throughout all countries: I will therefore make preparation for it.  So David prepared abundantly before his death.22:6 Then he called for Solomon his son, and charged him to build a house for Yahweh, the God of Israel.22:7 And David said to Solomon his son, as for me, it was in my heart to build a house to the name of Yahweh my God.22:8 But the word of Yahweh came to me, saying, You have shed blood abundantly, and have made great wars: you shall not build a house to my name, because you have shed much blood upon the earth in my sight.22:9 Behold, a son shall be born to you, who shall be a man of rest; and I will give him rest from all his enemies round about; for his name shall be Solomon, and I will give peace and quietness to Israel in his days:22:10 he shall build a house for my name; and he shall be my son, and I will be his father; and I will establish the throne of his kingdom over Israel for ever.22:11 Now, my son, Yahweh be with you; and prosper you, and build the house of Yahweh your God, as he has spoken concerning you.22:12 Only Yahweh give you discretion and understanding, and give you charge concerning Israel; that so you may keep the law of Yahweh your God.22:13 Then shall you prosper, if you observe to do the statutes and the ordinances which Yahweh charged Moses with concerning Israel: be strong, and of good courage; fear not, neither be dismayed.22:14 Now, behold, in my affliction I have prepared for the house of Yahweh a hundred thousand talents of gold, and a thousand thousand talents of silver, and of brass and iron without weight; for it is in abundance: timber also and stone have I prepared; and you may add thereto.22:15 Moreover there are workmen with you in abundance, hewers and workers of stone and timber, and all men that are skilful in every manner of work:22:16 of the gold, the silver, and the brass, and the iron, there is no number.  Arise and be doing, and Yahweh be with you.22:17 David also commanded all the princes of Israel to help Solomon his son, saying,22:18 Is not Yahweh your God with you?  and has he not given you rest on every side?  for he has delivered the inhabitants of the land into my hand; and the land is subdued before Yahweh, and before his people.22:19 Now set your heart and your soul to seek after Yahweh your God; arise therefore, and build ye the sanctuary of Yahweh God, to bring the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, and the holy vessels of God, into the house that is to be built to the name of Yahweh.23:1 Now David was old and full of days; and he made Solomon his son king over Israel.23:2 And he gathered together all the princes of Israel, with the priests and the Levites.23:3 And the Levites were numbered from thirty years old and upward: and their number by their polls, man by man, was thirty and eight thousand.23:4 Of these, 24,000 were to oversee the work of the house of Yahweh; and six thousand were officers and judges;23:5 and four thousand were doorkeepers; and four thousand praised Yahweh with the instruments which I have made, said David, for the purpose of praise.23:6 And David divided them into courses according to the sons of Levi: Gershon, Kohath, and Merari.23:7 Of the Gershonites: Ladan and Shimei.23:8 The sons of Ladan: Jehiel the chief, and Zetham, and Joel, three.23:9 The sons of Shimei: Shelomoth, and Haziel, and Haran, three.  These were the heads of the fathers' houses of Ladan.23:10 And the sons of Shimei: Jahath, Zina, and Jeush, and Beriah.  These four were the sons of Shimei.23:11 And Jahath was the chief, and Zizah the second: but Jeush and Beriah had not many sons; therefore they became a fathers' house in one reckoning.23:12 The sons of Kohath: Amram, Izhar, Hebron, and Uzziel, four.23:13 The sons of Amram: Aaron and Moses; and Aaron was separated, that he should sanctify the most holy things, he and his sons, for ever, to burn incense before Yahweh, to minister to him, and to bless in his name, for ever.23:14 But as for Moses the man of God, his sons were named among the tribe of Levi.23:15 The sons of Moses: Gershom and Eliezer.23:16 The sons of Gershom: Shebuel the chief.23:17 And the sons of Eliezer were: Rehabiah the chief; and Eliezer had no other sons; but the sons of Rehabiah were very many.23:18 The sons of Izhar: Shelomith the chief.23:19 The sons of Hebron: Jeriah the chief, amariah the second, Jahaziel the third, and Jekameam the fourth.23:20 The sons of Uzziel: Micah the chief, and Isshiah the second.23:21 The sons of Merari: Mahli and Mushi.  The sons of Mahli: Eleazar and Kish.23:22 And Eleazar died, and had no sons, but daughters only: and their brethren the sons of Kish took them to wife.23:23 The sons of Mushi: Mahli, and Eder, and Jeremoth, three.23:24 These were the sons of Levi after their fathers' houses, even the heads of the fathers' houses of those of them that were counted, in the number of names by their polls, who did the work for the service of the house of Yahweh, from twenty years old and upward.23:25 For David said, Yahweh, the God of Israel, has given rest to his people; and he dwells in Jerusalem for ever:23:26 and also the Levites shall no more have need to carry the tabernacle and all the vessels of it for the service thereof.23:27 For by the last words of David the sons of Levi were numbered, from twenty years old and upward.23:28 For their office was to wait on the sons of Aaron for the service of the house of Yahweh, in the courts, and in the chambers, and in the purifying of all holy things, even the work of the service of the house of God;23:29 for the showbread also, and for the fine flour for a meal offering, whether of unleavened wafers, or of that which is baked in the pan, or of that which is soaked, and for all manner of measure and size;23:30 and to stand every morning to thank and praise Yahweh, and likewise at even;23:31 and to offer all burnt offerings to Yahweh, on the sabbaths, on the new moons, and on the set feasts, in number according to the ordinance concerning them, continually before Yahweh;23:32 and that they should keep the charge of the tent of meeting, and the charge of the holy place, and the charge of the sons of Aaron their brethren, for the service of the house of Yahweh.24:1 And the courses of the sons of Aaron were these.  The sons of Aaron: Nadab and Abihu, Eleazar and Ithamar.24:2 But Nadab and Abihu died before their father, and had no children: therefore Eleazar and Ithamar executed the priest's office.24:3 And David with Zadok of the sons of Eleazar, and Ahimelech of the sons of Ithamar, divided them according to their ordering in their service.24:4 And there were more chief men found of the sons of Eleazar than of the sons of Ithamar; and thus were they divided: of the sons of Eleazar there were sixteen, heads of fathers' houses; and of the sons of Ithamar, according to their fathers' houses, eight.24:5 Thus were they divided by lot, one sort with another; for there were princes of the sanctuary, and princes of God, both of the sons of Eleazar, and of the sons of Ithamar.24:6 And Shemaiah the son of Nethanel the scribe, who was of the Levites, wrote them in the presence of the king, and the princes, and Zadok the priest, and Ahimelech the son of Abiathar, and the heads of the fathers' houses of the priests and of the Levites; one fathers' house being taken for Eleazar, and one taken for Ithamar.24:7 Now the first lot came forth to Jehoiarib, the second to Jedaiah,24:8 the third to Harim, the fourth to Seorim,24:9 the fifth to Malchijah, the sixth to Mijamin,24:10 the seventh to Hakkoz, the eighth to Abijah,24:11 the ninth to Jeshua, the tenth to Shecaniah,24:12 the eleventh to Eliashib, the twelfth to Jakim,24:13 the thirteenth to Huppah, the fourteenth to Jeshebeab,24:14 the fifteenth to Bilgah, the sixteenth to Immer,24:15 the seventeenth to Hezir, the eighteenth to Happizzez,24:16 the nineteenth to Pethahiah, the twentieth to Jehezkel,24:17 the one and twentieth to Jachin, the two and twentieth to Gamul,24:18 the three and twentieth to Delaiah, the four and twentieth to Maaziah.24:19 This was the ordering of them in their service, to come into the house of Yahweh according to the ordinance given to them by Aaron their father, as Yahweh, the God of Israel, had commanded him.24:20 And of the rest of the sons of Levi: of the sons of Amram, Shubael; of the sons of Shubael, Jehdeiah.24:21 Of Rehabiah: of the sons of Rehabiah, Isshiah the chief.24:22 Of the Izharites, Shelomoth; of the sons of Shelomoth, Jahath.24:23 And the sons of Hebron: Jeriah the chief, amariah the second, Jahaziel the third, Jekameam the fourth.24:24 The sons of Uzziel, Micah; of the sons of Micah, Shamir.24:25 The brother of Micah, Isshiah; of the sons of Isshiah, Zechariah.24:26 The sons of Merari: Mahli and Mushi; the sons of Jaaziah: Beno.24:27 The sons of Merari: of Jaaziah, Beno, and Shoham, and Zaccur, and Ibri.24:28 Of Mahli: Eleazar, who had no sons.24:29 Of Kish; the sons of Kish: Jerahmeel.24:30 And the sons of Mushi: Mahli, and Eder, and Jerimoth.  These were the sons of the Levites after their fathers' houses.24:31 These likewise cast lots even as their brethren the sons of Aaron in the presence of David the king, and Zadok, and Ahimelech, and the heads of the fathers' houses of the priests and of the Levites; the fathers' houses of the chief even as those of his younger brother.25:1 Moreover David and the captains of the host set apart for the service certain of the sons of Asaph, and of Heman, and of Jeduthun, who should prophesy with harps, with psalteries, and with cymbals: and the number of them that did the work according to their service was:25:2 of the sons of Asaph: Zaccur, and Joseph, and Nethaniah, and Asharelah, the sons of Asaph, under the hand of Asaph, who prophesied after the order of the king.25:3 Of Jeduthun; the sons of Jeduthun: Gedaliah, and Zeri, and Jeshaiah, Hashabiah, and Mattithiah, six, under the hands of their father Jeduthun with the harp, who prophesied in giving thanks and praising Yahweh.25:4 Of Heman; the sons of Heman: Bukkiah, Mattaniah, Uzziel, Shebuel, and Jerimoth, Hananiah, Hanani, Eliathah, Giddalti, and Romamti-ezer, Joshbekashah, Mallothi, Hothir, Mahazioth.25:5 All these were the sons of Heman the king's seer in the words of God, to lift up the horn.  And God gave to Heman fourteen sons and three daughters.25:6 All these were under the hands of their father for song in the house of Yahweh, with cymbals, psalteries, and harps, for the service of the house of God; Asaph, Jeduthun, and Heman being under the order of the king.25:7 And the number of them, with their brethren that were instructed in singing to Yahweh, even all that were skilful, was two hundred eighty-eight.25:8 And they cast lots for their offices, all alike, as well the small as the great, the teacher as the scholar.25:9 Now the first lot came forth for Asaph to Joseph: the second to Gedaliah; he and his brethren and sons were twelve:25:10 the third to Zaccur, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:11 the fourth to Izri, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:12 the fifth to Nethaniah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:13 the sixth to Bukkiah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:14 the seventh to Jesharelah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:15 the eighth to Jeshaiah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:16 the ninth to Mattaniah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:17 the tenth to Shimei, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:18 the eleventh to Azarel, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:19 the twelfth to Hashabiah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:20 for the thirteenth, Shubael, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:21 for the fourteenth, Mattithiah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:22 for the fifteenth to Jeremoth, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:23 for the sixteenth to Hananiah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:24 for the seventeenth to Joshbekashah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:25 for the eighteenth to Hanani, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:26 for the nineteenth to Mallothi, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:27 for the twentieth to Eliathah, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:28 for the one and twentieth to Hothir, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:29 for the two and twentieth to Giddalti, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:30 for the three and twentieth to Mahazioth, his sons and his brethren, twelve:25:31 for the four and twentieth to Romamtiezer, his sons and his brethren, twelve.26:1 For the courses of the doorkeepers: of the Korahites, Meshelemiah the son of Kore, of the sons of Asaph.26:2 And Meshelemiah had sons: Zechariah the first-born, Jediael the second, Zebadiah the third, Jathniel the fourth,26:3 Elam the fifth, Jehohanan the sixth, Eliehoenai the seventh.26:4 And Obed-edom had sons: Shemaiah the first-born, Jehozabad the second, Joah the third, and Sacar the fourth, and Nethanel the fifth,26:5 Ammiel the sixth, Issachar the seventh, Peullethai the eighth; for God blessed him.26:6 Also to Shemaiah his son were sons born, that ruled over the house of their father; for they were mighty men of valor.26:7 The sons of Shemaiah: Othni, and Rephael, and Obed, Elzabad, whose brethren were valiant men, Elihu, and Semachiah.26:8 All these were of the sons of Obed-edom: they and their sons and their brethren, able men in strength for the service; 62 of Obed-edom.26:9 And Meshelemiah had sons and brethren, valiant men, eighteen.26:10 Also Hosah, of the children of Merari, had sons: Shimri the chief, (for though he was not the first-born, yet his father made him chief),26:11 Hilkiah the second, Tebaliah the third, Zechariah the fourth: all the sons and brethren of Hosah were thirteen.26:12 Of these were the courses of the doorkeepers, even of the chief men, having offices like their brethren, to minister in the house of Yahweh.26:13 And they cast lots, as well the small as the great, according to their fathers' houses, for every gate.26:14 And the lot eastward fell to Shelemiah.  Then for Zechariah his son, a discreet counsellor, they cast lots; and his lot came out northward.26:15 To Obed-edom southward; and to his sons the store-house.26:16 To Shuppim and Hosah westward, by the gate of Shallecheth, at the causeway that goes up, watch against watch.26:17 Eastward were six Levites, northward four a day, southward four a day, and for the store-house two and two.26:18 For Parbar westward, four at the causeway, and two at Parbar.26:19 These were the courses of the doorkeepers; of the sons of the Korahites, and of the sons of Merari.26:20 And of the Levites, ahijah was over the treasures of the house of God, and over the treasures of the dedicated things.26:21 The sons of Ladan, the sons of the Gershonites belonging to Ladan, the heads of the fathers' houses belonging to Ladan the Gershonite: Jehieli.26:22 The sons of Jehieli: Zetham, and Joel his brother, over the treasures of the house of Yahweh.26:23 Of the Amramites, of the Izharites, of the Hebronites, of the Uzzielites:26:24 and Shebuel the son of Gershom, the son of Moses, was ruler over the treasures.26:25 And his brethren: of Eliezer came Rehabiah his son, and Jeshaiah his son, and Joram his son, and Zichri his son, and Shelomoth his son.26:26 This Shelomoth and his brethren were over all the treasures of the dedicated things, which David the king, and the heads of the fathers' houses, the captains over thousands and hundreds, and the captains of the host, had dedicated.26:27 Out of the spoil won in battles did they dedicate to repair the house of Yahweh.26:28 And all that Samuel the seer, and Saul the son of Kish, and Abner the son of Ner, and Joab the son of Zeruiah, had dedicated, whosoever had dedicated anything, it was under the hand of Shelomoth, and of his brethren.26:29 Of the Izharites, Chenaniah and his sons were for the outward business over Israel, for officers and judges.26:30 Of the Hebronites, Hashabiah and his brethren, men of valor, a thousand and seven hundred, had the oversight of Israel beyond the Jordan westward, for all the business of Yahweh, and for the service of the king.26:31 Of the Hebronites was Jerijah the chief, even of the Hebronites, according to their generations by fathers' houses.  In the fortieth year of the reign of David they were sought for, and there were found among them mighty men of valor at Jazer of Gilead.26:32 And his brethren, men of valor, were two thousand and seven hundred, heads of fathers' houses, whom king David made overseers over the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half-tribe of the Manassites, for every matter pertaining to God, and for the affairs of the king.Chapter 2727:1 Now this is the list of the children of Israel, that is, the heads of fathers' houses and the captains of thousands and of hundreds, and their officers that served the king in any matter concerning the rotation of divisions which came in and went out month by month throughout all the months of the year- every division numbering 24,000.27:2 Over the first division for the first month was Jashobeam the son of Zabdiel: and in his course were 24,000.27:3 He was of the children of Perez, the chief of all the captains of the host for the first month.27:4 And over the division of the second month was Dodai the Ahohite, and his course; and Mikloth the ruler: and in his course were 24,000.27:5 The third captain of the host for the third month was Benaiah, the son of Jehoiada the priest, chief: and in his division were 24,000.27:6 This is the same Benaiah who was the mighty man of the thirty, and over the thirty: and of his course was Ammizabad his son.27:7 The fourth captain for the fourth month was Asahel the brother of Joab, and Zebadiah his son after him: and in his division were 24,000.27:8 The fifth captain for this fifth month was Shamhuth the Izrahite: and in his course were 24,000.27:9 The sixth captain for the sixth month was Ira the son of Ikkesh the Tekoite: and in his course were 24,000.27:10 The seventh captain for the seventh month was Helez the Pelonite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were 24,000.27:11 The eighth captain for the eighth month was Sibbecai the Hushathite, of the Zerahites: and in his course were 24,000.27:12 The ninth captain for the ninth month was Abiezer the Anathothite, of the Benjamites: and in his course were 24,000.27:13 The tenth captain for the tenth month was Maharai the Netophathite, of the Zerahites: and in his course were 24,000.27:14 The eleventh captain for the eleventh month was Benaiah the Pirathonite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were 24,000.27:15 The twelfth captain for the twelfth month was Heldai the Netophathite, of Othniel: and in his course were 24,000.27:16 Furthermore over the tribes of Israel: of the Reubenites was Eliezer the son of Zichri the ruler: of the Simeonites, Shephatiah the son of Maacah:27:17 of Levi, Hashabiah the son of Kemuel: of Aaron, Zadok:27:18 of Judah, Elihu, one of the brethren of David: of Issachar, Omri the son of Michael:27:19 of Zebulun, Ishmaiah the son of Obadiah: of Naphtali, Jeremoth the son of Azriel:27:20 of the children of Ephraim, Hoshea the son of Azaziah: of the half-tribe of Manasseh, Joel the son of Pedaiah:27:21 of the half -tribe of Manasseh in Gilead, Iddo the son of Zechariah: of Benjamin, Jaasiel the son of Abner:27:22 of Dan, azarel the son of Jeroham.  These were the captains of the tribes of Israel.27:23 But David took not the number of them from twenty years old and under, because Yahweh had said he would increase Israel like to the stars of heaven.27:24 Joab the son of Zeruiah began to number, but finished not; and there came wrath for this upon Israel; neither was the number put into the account in the chronicles of king David.27:25 And over the king's treasures was Azmaveth the son of Adiel: and over the treasures in the fields, in the cities, and in the villages, and in the castles, was Jonathan the son of Uzziah:27:26 And over them that did the work of the field for tillage of the ground was Ezri the son of Chelub:27:27 and over the vineyards was Shimei the Ramathite: and over the increase of the vineyards for the wine-cellars was Zabdi the Shiphmite:27:28 and over the olive-trees and the sycomore-trees that were in the lowland was Baal-hanan the Gederite: and over the cellars of oil was Joash:27:29 and over the herds that fed in Sharon was Shitrai the Sharonite: and over the herds that were in the valleys was Shaphat the son of Adlai:27:30 and over the camels was Obil the Ishmaelite: and over the asses was Jehdeiah the Meronothite: and over the flocks was Jaziz the Hagrite.27:31 All these were the rulers of the substance which was king David's.27:32 Also Jonathan, David's uncle, was a counsellor, a man of understanding, and a scribe: and Jehiel the son of Hachmoni was with the king's sons:27:33 And Ahithophel was the king's counsellor: and Hushai the Archite was the king's friend:27:34 and after Ahithophel was Jehoiada the son of Benaiah, and Abiathar: and the captain of the king's host was Joab.28:1 And David assembled all the princes of Israel, the princes of the tribes, and the captains of the companies that served the king by course, and the captains of thousands, and the captains of hundreds, and the rulers over all the substance and possessions of the king and of his sons, with the officers, and the mighty men, even all the mighty men of valor, to Jerusalem.28:2 Then David the king stood up upon his feet, and said, Hear me, my brethren, and my people: as for me, it was in my heart to build a house of rest for the ark of the covenant of Yahweh, and for the footstool of our God; and I had made ready for the building.28:3 But God said to me, You shall not build a house for my name, because you are a man of war, and have shed blood.28:4 Nevertheless, Yahweh, the God of Israel, chose me out of all the house of my father to be king over Israel for ever: for he has chosen Judah to be prince; and in the house of Judah, the house of my father; and among the sons of my father he took pleasure in me to make me king over all Israel;28:5 And of all my sons (for Yahweh has given me many sons), he has chosen Solomon my son to sit upon the throne of the kingdom of Yahweh over Israel.28:6 And he said to me, Solomon your son, he shall build my house and my courts; for I have chosen him to be my son, and I will be his father.28:7 And I will establish his kingdom for ever, if he be constant to do my commandments and my ordinances, as at this day.28:8 Now therefore, in the sight of all Israel, the assembly of Yahweh, and in the audience of our God, observe and seek out all the commandments of Yahweh your God; that ye may possess this good land, and leave it for an inheritance to your children after you for ever.28:9 And you, Solomon my son, know you the God of your father, and serve him with a perfect heart and with a willing mind; for Yahweh searches all hearts, and understands all the imaginations of the thoughts: if you seek him, he will be found of you; but if you forsake him, he will cast you off for ever.28:10 Take heed now; for Yahweh has chosen you to build a house for the sanctuary: be strong, and do it.28:11 Then David gave to Solomon his son the pattern of the porch of the temple, and of the houses thereof, and of the treasuries thereof, and of the upper rooms thereof, and of the inner chambers thereof, and of the place of the mercy-seat;28:12 and the pattern of all that he had by the Spirit, for the courts of the house of Yahweh, and for all the chambers round about, for the treasuries of the house of God, and for the treasuries of the dedicated things;28:13 also for the courses of the priests and the Levites, and for all the work of the service of the house of Yahweh, and for all the vessels of service in the house of Yahweh;28:14 of gold by weight for the vessels of gold, for all vessels of every kind of service; of silver for all the vessels of silver by weight, for all vessels of every kind of service;28:15 by weight also for the candlesticks of gold, and for the lamps thereof, of gold, by weight for every candlestick and for the lamps thereof; and for the candlesticks of silver, silver by weight for every candlestick and for the lamps thereof, according to the use of every candlestick;28:16 and the gold by weight for the tables of showbread, for every table; and silver for the tables of silver;28:17 and the flesh-hooks, and the basins, and the cups, of pure gold; and for the golden bowls by weight for every bowl; and for the silver bowls by weight for every bowl;28:18 and for the altar of incense refined gold by weight; and gold for the pattern of the chariot, even the cherubim, that spread out their wings, and covered the ark of the covenant of Yahweh.28:19 All this, said David, have I been made to understand in writing from the hand of Yahweh, even all the works of this pattern.28:20 And David said to Solomon his son, Be strong and of good courage, and do it: fear not, nor be dismayed; for Yahweh God, even my God, is with you; he will not fail you, nor forsake you, until all the work for the service of the house of Yahweh be finished.28:21 And, behold, there are the courses of the priests and the Levites, for all the service of the house of God: and there shall be with you in all manner of work every willing man that has skill, for any manner of service: also the captains and all the people will be wholly at your commandment.29:1 And David the king said to all the assembly, Solomon my son, whom alone God has chosen, is yet young and tender, and the work is great; for the palace is not for man, but for Yahweh God.29:2 Now I have prepared with all my might for the house of my God the gold for the things of gold, and the silver for the things of silver, and the brass for the things of brass, the iron for the things of iron, and wood for the things of wood; onyx stones, and stones to be set, stones for inlaid work, and of divers colors, and all manner of precious stones, and marble stones in abundance.29:3 Moreover also, because I have set my affection on the house of my God, seeing that I have a treasure of my own of gold and silver, I give it to the house of my God, over and above all that I have prepared for the holy house,29:4 even three thousand talents of gold, of the gold of Ophir, and seven thousand talents of refined silver, with which to overlay the walls of the houses;29:5 of gold for the things of gold, and of silver for the things of silver, and for all manner of work to be made by the hands of artificers.  Who then offers willingly to consecrate himself this day to Yahweh?29:6 Then the princes of the fathers' houses, and the princes of the tribes of Israel, and the captains of thousands and of hundreds, with the rulers over the king's work, offered willingly;29:7 and they gave for the service of the house of God of gold five thousand talents and ten thousand darics, and of silver ten thousand talents, and of brass eighteen thousand talents, and of iron a hundred thousand talents.29:8 And they with whom precious stones were found gave them to the treasure of the house of Yahweh, under the hand of Jehiel the Gershonite.29:9 Then the people rejoiced, for that they offered willingly, because with a perfect heart they offered willingly to Yahweh: and David the king also rejoiced with great joy.29:10 Wherefore David blessed Yahweh before all the assembly; and David said, Blessed be you, O Yahweh, the God of Israel our father, for ever and ever.29:11 Yours, O Yahweh, is the greatness, and the power, and the glory, and the victory, and the majesty: for all that is in the heavens and in the earth is yours; yours is the kingdom, O Yahweh, and you are exalted as head above all.29:12 Both riches and honor come of you, and you rule over all; and in your hand is power and might; and in your hand it is to make great, and to give strength to all.29:13 Now therefore, our God, we thank you, and praise your glorious name.29:14 But who am I, and what is my people, that we should be able to offer so willingly after this sort?  for all things come of you, and of your own have we given you.29:15 For we are strangers before you, and sojourners, as all our fathers were: our days on the earth are as a shadow, and there is no abiding.29:16 O Yahweh our God, all this store that we have prepared to build you a house for your holy name comes of your hand, and is all your own.29:17 I know also, my God, that you try the heart, and have pleasure in uprightness.  As for me, in the uprightness of my heart I have willingly offered all these things: and now have I seen with joy your people, that are present here, offer willingly to you.29:18 O Yahweh, the God of Abraham, of Isaac, and of Israel, our fathers, keep this for ever in the imagination of the thoughts of the heart of your people, and prepare their heart to you;29:19 and give to Solomon my son a perfect heart, to keep your commandments, your testimonies, and your statutes, and to do all these things, and to build the palace, for which I have made provision.29:20 And David said to all the assembly, Now bless Yahweh your God.  And all the assembly blessed Yahweh, the God of their fathers, and bowed down their heads, and worshipped Yahweh, and the king.29:21 And they sacrificed sacrifices to Yahweh, and offered burnt offerings to Yahweh, on the morrow after that day, even a thousand bullocks, a thousand rams, and a thousand lambs, with their drink offerings, and sacrifices in abundance for all Israel,29:22 and did eat and drink before Yahweh on that day with great gladness.  And they made Solomon the son of David king the second time, and anointed him to Yahweh to be prince, and Zadok to be priest.29:23 Then Solomon sat on the throne of Yahweh as king instead of David his father, and prospered; and all Israel obeyed him.29:24 And all the princes, and the mighty men, and all the sons likewise of king David, submitted themselves to Solomon the king.29:25 And Yahweh magnified Solomon exceedingly in the sight of all Israel, and bestowed upon him such royal majesty as had not been on any king before him in Israel.29:26 Now David the son of Jesse reigned over all Israel.29:27 And the time that he reigned over Israel was forty years; seven years reigned he in Hebron, and thirty and three years reigned he in Jerusalem.29:28 And he died in a good old age, full of days, riches, and honor: and Solomon his son reigned in his stead.29:29 Now the acts of David the king, first and last, behold, they are written in the history of Samuel the seer, and in the history of Nathan the prophet, and in the history of Gad the seer,29:30 with all his reign and his might, and the times that went over him, and over Israel, and over all the kingdoms of the countries.End of 1 Chronicles2 Chronicles1:1 And Solomon the son of David was strengthened in his kingdom, and Yahweh his God was with him, and magnified him exceedingly.1:2 And Solomon spoke to all Israel, to the captains of thousands and of hundreds, and to the judges, and to every prince in all Israel, the heads of the fathers' houses.1:3 So Solomon, and all the assembly with him, went to the high place that was at Gibeon; for there was the tent of meeting of God, which Moses the servant of Yahweh had made in the wilderness.1:4 But the ark of God had David brought up from Kiriath-jearim to the place that David had prepared for it; for he had pitched a tent for it at Jerusalem.1:5 Moreover the brazen altar, that Bezalel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, had made, was there before the tabernacle of Yahweh: and Solomon and the assembly sought to it.1:6 And Solomon went up there to the brazen altar before Yahweh, which was at the tent of meeting, and offered a thousand burnt offerings upon it.1:7 In that night did God appear to Solomon, and said to him, ask what I shall give you.1:8 And Solomon said to God, You have shown great lovingkindness to David my father, and have made me king in his stead.1:9 Now, O Yahweh God, let your promise to David my father be established; for you have made me king over a people like the dust of the earth in multitude.1:10 Give me now wisdom and knowledge, that I may go out and come in before this people; for who can judge this your people, that is so great?1:11 And God said to Solomon, Because this was in your heart, and you have not asked riches, wealth, or honor, nor the life of them that hate you, neither yet have asked long life; but have asked wisdom and knowledge for yourself, that you may judge my people, over whom I have made you king:1:12 wisdom and knowledge is granted to you; and I will give you riches, and wealth, and honor, such as none of the kings have had that have been before you; neither shall there any after you have the like.1:13 So Solomon came from the high place that was at Gibeon, from before the tent of meeting, to Jerusalem; and he reigned over Israel.1:14 And Solomon gathered chariots and horsemen: and he had a thousand and four hundred chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen, that he placed in the chariot cities, and with the king at Jerusalem.1:15 And the king made silver and gold to be in Jerusalem as stones, and cedars made he to be as the sycomore-trees that are in the lowland, for abundance.1:16 And the horses which Solomon had were brought out of Egypt; the king's merchants received them in droves, each drove at a price.1:17 And they fetched up and brought out of Egypt a chariot for six hundred shekels of silver, and a horse for a hundred and fifty: and so for all the kings of the Hittites, and the kings of Syria, did they bring them out by their means.2:1 Now Solomon purposed to build a house for the name of Yahweh, and a house for his kingdom.2:2 And Solomon counted out 70,000 men to bear burdens, and 80,000 men that were hewers in the mountains, and 3,600 to oversee them.2:3 And Solomon sent to Huram the king of Tyre, saying, as you did deal with David my father, and did send him cedars to build him a house to dwell therein, even so deal with me.2:4 Behold, I am about to build a house for the name of Yahweh my God, to dedicate it to him, and to burn before him incense of sweet spices, and for the continual showbread, and for the burnt offerings morning and evening, on the sabbaths, and on the new moons, and on the set feasts of Yahweh our God.  This is an ordinance for ever to Israel.2:5 And the house which I build is great; for great is our God above all gods.2:6 But who is able to build him a house, seeing heaven and the heaven of heavens cannot contain him?  who am I then, that I should build him a house, save only to burn incense before him?2:7 Now therefore send me a man skilful to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass, and in iron, and in purple, and crimson, and blue, and that knows how to grave all manner of gravings, to be with the skilful men that are with me in Judah and in Jerusalem, whom David my father did provide.2:8 Send me also cedar-trees, fir-trees, and algum-trees, out of Lebanon; for I know that your servants know how to cut timber in Lebanon: and, behold, my servants shall be with your servants,2:9 even to prepare me timber in abundance; for the house which I am about to build shall be great and wonderful.2:10 And, behold, I will give to your servants, the hewers that cut timber, twenty thousand measures of beaten wheat, and twenty thousand measures of barley, and twenty thousand baths of wine, and twenty thousand baths of oil.2:11 Then Huram the king of Tyre answered in writing, which he sent to Solomon, Because Yahweh loves his people, he has made you king over them.2:12 Huram said moreover, Blessed be Yahweh, the God of Israel, that made heaven and earth, who has given to David the king a wise son, endued with discretion and understanding, that should build a house for Yahweh, and a house for his kingdom.2:13 And now I have sent a skilful man, endued with understanding, of Huram my father's,2:14 the son of a woman of the daughters of Dan; and his father was a man of Tyre, skilful to work in gold, and in silver, in brass, in iron, in stone, and in timber, in purple, in blue, and in fine linen, and in crimson, also to grave any manner of graving, and to devise any device; that there may be a place appointed to him with your skilful men, and with the skilful men of my lord David your father.2:15 Now therefore the wheat and the barley, the oil and the wine, which my lord has spoken of, let him send to his servants:2:16 and we will cut wood out of Lebanon, as much as you shall need; and we will bring it to you in floats by sea to Joppa; and you shall carry it up to Jerusalem.2:17 And Solomon numbered all the sojourners that were in the land of Israel, after the numbering with which David his father had numbered them; and they were found a hundred and fifty thousand and three thousand and six hundred.2:18 And he set 70,000 of them to bear burdens, and 80,000 that were hewers in the mountains, and 3,600 overseers to set the people at work.3:1 Then Solomon began to build the house of Yahweh at Jerusalem on mount Moriah, where Yahweh appeared to David his father, which he made ready in the place that David had appointed, in the threshing-floor of Ornan the Jebusite.3:2 And he began to build in the second day of the second month, in the fourth year of his reign.3:3 Now these are the foundations which Solomon laid for the building of the house of God.  The length by cubits after the first measure was 60 cubits, and the breadth twenty cubits.3:4 And the porch that was before the house, the length of it, according to the breadth of the house, was twenty cubits, and the height a hundred and twenty; and he overlaid it within with pure gold.3:5 And the greater house he ceiled with fir-wood, which he overlaid with fine gold, and wrought upon it palm-trees and chains.3:6 And he garnished the house with precious stones for beauty: and the gold was gold of Parvaim.3:7 He overlaid also the house, the beams, the thresholds, and the walls of it, and the doors of it, with gold; and engraved cherubim on the walls.3:8 And he made the most holy house: the length thereof, according to the breadth of the house, was twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof twenty cubits; and he overlaid it with fine gold, amounting to six hundred talents.3:9 And the weight of the nails was fifty shekels of gold.  And he overlaid the upper chambers with gold.3:10 And in the most holy house he made two cherubim of image work; and they overlaid them with gold.3:11 And the wings of the cherubim were twenty cubits long: the wing of the one cherub was five cubits, reaching to the wall of the house; and the other wing was likewise five cubits, reaching to the wing of the other cherub.3:12 And the wing of the other cherub was five cubits, reaching to the wall of the house; and the other wing was five cubits also, joining to the wing of the other cherub.3:13 The wings of these cherubim spread themselves forth twenty cubits: and they stood on their feet, and their faces were toward the house.3:14 And he made the veil of blue, and purple, and crimson, and fine linen, and wrought cherubim upon it.3:15 Also he made before the house two pillars of thirty and five cubits high, and the capital that was on the top of each of them was five cubits.3:16 And he made chains in the oracle, and put them on the tops of the pillars; and he made a hundred pomegranates, and put them on the chains.3:17 And he set up the pillars before the temple, one on the right hand, and the other on the left; and called the name of that on the right hand Jachin, and the name of that on the left Boaz.4:1 Moreover he made an altar of brass, twenty cubits the length thereof, and twenty cubits the breadth thereof, and ten cubits the height thereof.4:2 Also he made the molten sea of ten cubits from brim to brim, round in compass; and the height thereof was five cubits; and a line of thirty cubits circumferred it.4:3 And under it was the likeness of oxen, which did compass it round about, for ten cubits, compassing the sea round about.  The oxen were in two rows, cast when it was cast.4:4 It stood upon twelve oxen, three looking toward the north, and three looking toward the west, and three looking toward the south, and three looking toward the east: and the sea was set upon them above, and all their hinder parts were inward.4:5 And it was a handbreadth thick; and the brim thereof was wrought like the brim of a cup, like the flower of a lily: it received and held three thousand baths.4:6 He made also ten lavers, and put five on the right hand, and five on the left, to wash in them; such things as belonged to the burnt offering they washed in them; but the sea was for the priests to wash in.4:7 And he made the ten candlesticks of gold according to the ordinance concerning them; and he set them in the temple, five on the right hand, and five on the left.4:8 He made also ten tables, and placed them in the temple, five on the right side, and five on the left.  And he made a hundred basins of gold.4:9 Furthermore he made the court of the priests, and the great court, and doors for the court, and overlaid the doors of them with brass.4:10 And he set the sea on the right side of the house eastward, toward the south.4:11 And Huram made the pots, and the shovels, and the basins.  So Huram made an end of doing the work that he wrought for king Solomon in the house of God:4:12 the two pillars, and the bowls, and the two capitals which were on the top of the pillars, and the two networks to cover the two bowls of the capitals that were on the top of the pillars,4:13 and the four hundred pomegranates for the two networks; two rows of pomegranates for each network, to cover the two bowls of the capitals that were upon the pillars.4:14 He made also the bases, and the lavers made he upon the bases;4:15 one sea, and the twelve oxen under it.4:16 The pots also, and the shovels, and the flesh-hooks, and all the vessels thereof, did Huram his father make for king Solomon for the house of Yahweh of bright brass.4:17 In the plain of the Jordan did the king cast them, in the clay ground between Succoth and Zeredah.4:18 Thus Solomon made all these vessels in great abundance: for the weight of the brass could not be found out.4:19 And Solomon made all the vessels that were in the house of God, the golden altar also, and the tables whereon was the showbread;4:20 and the candlesticks with their lamps, to burn according to the ordinance before the oracle, of pure gold;4:21 and the flowers, and the lamps, and the tongs, of gold, and that perfect gold;4:22 and the snuffers, and the basins, and the spoons, and the firepans, of pure gold: and as for the entry of the house, the inner doors of it for the most holy place, and the doors of the nave of the temple, were of gold.5:1 Thus all the work that Solomon wrought for the house of Yahweh was finished.  And Solomon brought in the things that David his father had dedicated, even the silver, and the gold, and all the vessels, and put them in the treasuries of the house of God.5:2 Then Solomon assembled the elders of Israel, and all the heads of the tribes, the princes of the fathers' houses of the children of Israel, to Jerusalem, to bring up the ark of the covenant of Yahweh out of the city of David, which is Zion.5:3 nd all the men of Israel assembled themselves to the king at the feast, which was in the seventh month.5:4 And all the elders of Israel came: and the Levites took up the ark;5:5 and they brought up the ark, and the tent of meeting, and all the holy vessels that were in the Tent; these did the priests the Levites bring up.5:6 And king Solomon and all the congregation of Israel, that were assembled to him, were before the ark, sacrificing sheep and oxen, that could not be counted nor numbered for multitude.5:7 And the priests brought in the ark of the covenant of Yahweh to its place, into the oracle of the house, to the most holy place, even under the wings of the cherubim.5:8 For the cherubim spread forth their wings over the place of the ark, and the cherubim covered the ark and the staves thereof above.5:9 And the staves were so long that the ends of the staves were seen from the ark before the oracle; but they were not seen without: and there it is to this day.5:10 There was nothing in the ark save the two tables which Moses put there at Horeb, when Yahweh made a covenant with the children of Israel, when they came out of Egypt.5:11 And it came to pass, when the priests were come out of the holy place, (for all the priests that were present had sanctified themselves, and did not keep their courses;5:12 also the Levites who were the singers, all of them, even Asaph, Heman, Jeduthun, and their sons and their brethren, arrayed in fine linen, with cymbals and psalteries and harps, stood at the east end of the altar, and with them a hundred and twenty priests sounding with trumpets;)5:13 it came to pass, when the trumpeters and singers were as one, to make one sound to be heard in praising and thanking Yahweh; and when they lifted up their voice with the trumpets and cymbals and instruments of music, and praised Yahweh, saying, For he is good; for his lovingkindness endures for ever; that then the house was filled with a cloud, even the house of Yahweh,5:14 so that the priests could not stand to minister by reason of the cloud: for the glory of Yahweh filled the house of God.6:1 Then spoke Solomon, Yahweh has said that he would dwell in the thick darkness.6:2 But I have built you a house of habitation, and a place for you to dwell in for ever.6:3 And the king turned his face, and blessed all the assembly of Israel: and all the assembly of Israel stood.6:4 And he said, Blessed be Yahweh, the God of Israel, who spoke with his mouth to David my father, and has with his hands fulfilled it, saying,6:5 Since the day that I brought forth my people out of the land of Egypt, I chose no city out of all the tribes of Israel to build a house in, that my name might be there; neither chose I any man to be prince over my people Israel:6:6 but I have chosen Jerusalem, that my name might be there; and have chosen David to be over my people Israel.6:7 Now it was in the heart of David my father to build a house for the name of Yahweh, the God of Israel.6:8 But Yahweh said to David my father, Whereas it was in your heart to build a house for my name, you did well that it was in your heart:6:9 nevertheless you shall not build the house; but your son that shall come forth out of your loins, he shall build the house for my name.6:10 And Yahweh has performed his word that he spoke; for I am risen up in the room of David my father, and sit on the throne of Israel, as Yahweh promised, and have built the house for the name of Yahweh, the God of Israel.6:11 And there have I set the ark, in which is the covenant of Yahweh, which he made with the children of Israel.6:12 And he stood before the altar of Yahweh in the presence of all the assembly of Israel, and spread forth his hands6:13 (for Solomon had made a brazen scaffold, five cubits long, and five cubits broad, and three cubits high, and had set it in the midst of the court; and upon it he stood, and kneeled down upon his knees before all the assembly of Israel, and spread forth his hands toward heaven;)6:14 and he said, O Yahweh, the God of Israel, there is no God like you, in heaven, or on earth; who keepest covenant and lovingkindness with your servants, that walk before you with all their heart;6:15 who have kept with your servant David my father that which you did promise him: yes, you spoke with your mouth, and have fulfilled it with your hand, as it is this day.6:16 Now therefore, O Yahweh, the God of Israel, keep with your servant David my father that which you have promised him, saying, There shall not fail you a man in my sight to sit on the throne of Israel, if only your children take heed to their way, to walk in my law as you have walked before me.6:17 Now therefore, O Yahweh, the God of Israel, let your word be verified, which you spoke to your servant David.6:18 But will God in very deed dwell with men on the earth?  behold, heaven and the heaven of heavens cannot contain you; how much less this house which I have built!6:19 Yet have you respect to the prayer of your servant, and to his supplication, O Yahweh my God, to hearken to the cry and to the prayer which your servant prays before you;6:20 that your eyes may be open toward this house day and night, even toward the place whereof you have said that you would put your name there; to hearken to the prayer which your servant shall pray toward this place.6:21 And hearken you to the supplications of your servant, and of your people Israel, when they shall pray toward this place: yes, hear you from your dwelling-place, even from heaven; and when you hear forgive.6:22 If a man sin against his neighbor, and an oath be laid upon him to cause him to swear, and he come and swear before your altar in this house;6:23 then hear you from heaven, and do, and judge your servants, requiting the wicked, to bring his way upon his own head; and justifying the righteous, to give him according to his righteousness.6:24 And if your people Israel be smitten down before the enemy, because they have sinned against you, and shall turn again and confess your name, and pray and make supplication before you in this house;6:25 then hear you from heaven, and forgive the sin of your people Israel, and bring them again to the land which you gave to them and to their fathers.6:26 When the heavens are shut up, and there is no rain, because they have sinned against you; if they pray toward this place, and confess your name, and turn from their sin, when you afflict them:6:27 then hear you in heaven, and forgive the sin of your servants, and of your people Israel, when you teach them the good way in which they should walk; and send rain upon your land, which you have given to your people for an inheritance.6:28 If there be in the land famine, if there be pestilence, if there be blasting or mildew, locust or caterpillar; if their enemies besiege them in the land of their cities; whatsoever plague or whatsoever sickness there be;6:29 what prayer and supplication soever be made by any man, or by all your people Israel, who shall know every man his own plague and his own sorrow, and shall spread forth his hands toward this house:6:30 then hear you from heaven your dwelling-place and forgive, and render to every man according to all his ways, whose heart you know; (for you, even you only, know the hearts of the children of men;)6:31 that they may fear you, to walk in your ways, so long as they live in the land which you gave to our fathers.6:32 Moreover concerning the foreigner, that is not of your people Israel, when he shall come from a far country for your great name's sake, and your mighty hand, and your outstretched arm; when they shall come and pray toward this house:6:33 then hear you from heaven, even from your dwelling-place, and do according to all that the foreigner calls to you for; that all the peoples of the earth may know your name, and fear you, as does your people Israel, and that they may know that this house which I have built is called by your name.6:34 If your people go out to battle against their enemies, by whatsoever way you shall send them, and they pray to you toward this city which you have chosen, and the house which I have built for your name;6:35 then hear you from heaven their prayer and their supplication, and maintain their cause.6:36 If they sin against you (for there is no man that sinns not), and you be angry with them, and deliver them to the enemy, so that they carry them away captive to a land far off or near;6:37 yet if they shall bethink themselves in the land whither they are carried captive, and turn again, and make supplication to you in the land of their captivity, saying, We have sinned, we have done perversely, and have dealt wickedly;6:38 if they return to you with all their heart and with all their soul in the land of their captivity, whither they have carried them captive, and pray toward their land, which you gave to their fathers, and the city which you have chosen, and toward the house which I have built for your name:6:39 then hear you from heaven, even from your dwelling-place, their prayer and their supplications, and maintain their cause, and forgive your people who have sinned against you.6:40 Now, O my God, let, I beseech you, your eyes be open, and let your ears be attent, to the prayer that is made in this place.6:41 Now therefore arise, O Yahweh God, into your resting-place, you, and the ark of your strength: let your priests, O Yahweh God, be clothed with salvation, and let your saints rejoice in goodness.6:42 O Yahweh God, turn not away the face of your anointed: remember your lovingkindnesses to David your servant.7:1 Now when Solomon had made an end of praying, the fire came down from heaven, and consumed the burnt offering and the sacrifices; and the glory of Yahweh filled the house.7:2 And the priests could not enter into the house of Yahweh, because the glory of Yahweh filled Yahweh's house.7:3 And all the children of Israel looked on, when the fire came down, and the glory of Yahweh was upon the house; and they bowed themselves with their faces to the ground upon the pavement, and worshipped, and gave thanks to Yahweh, saying, For he is good; for his lovingkindness endures for ever.7:4 Then the king and all the people offered sacrifice before Yahweh.7:5 And king Solomon offered a sacrifice of twenty and two thousand oxen, and a hundred and twenty thousand sheep.  So the king and all the people dedicated the house of God.7:6 And the priests stood, according to their offices; the Levites also with instruments of music of Yahweh, which David the king had made to give thanks to Yahweh, (for his lovingkindness endures for ever,) when David praised by their ministry: and the priests sounded trumpets before them; and all Israel stood.7:7 Moreover Solomon hallowed the middle of the court that was before the house of Yahweh; for there he offered the burnt offerings, and the fat of the peace offerings, because the brazen altar which Solomon had made was not able to receive the burnt offering, and the meal offering, and the fat.7:8 So Solomon held the feast at that time seven days, and all Israel with him, a very great assembly, from the entrance of Hamath to the brook of Egypt.7:9 And on the eighth day they held a solemn assembly: for they kept the dedication of the altar seven days, and the feast seven days.7:10 And on the three and twentieth day of the seventh month he sent the people away to their tents, joyful and glad of heart for the goodness that Yahweh had shown to David, and to Solomon, and to Israel his people.7:11 Thus Solomon finished the house of Yahweh, and the king's house: and all that came into Solomon's heart to make in the house of Yahweh, and in his own house, he prosperously effected.7:12 And Yahweh appeared to Solomon by night, and said to him, I have heard your prayer, and have chosen this place to myself for a house of sacrifice.7:13 If I shut up the heavens so that there is no rain, or if I command the locust to devour the land, or if I send pestilence among my people;7:14 if my people, who are called by my name, shall humble themselves, and pray, and seek my face, and turn from their wicked ways; then will I hear from heaven, and will forgive their sin, and will heal their land.7:15 Now my eyes shall be open, and my ears attent, to the prayer that is made in this place.7:16 For now have I chosen and hallowed this house, that my name may be there for ever; and my eyes and my heart shall be there perpetually.7:17 And as for you, if you will walk before me as David your father walked, and do according to all that I have commanded you, and will keep my statutes and my ordinances;7:18 then I will establish the throne of your kingdom, according as I covenanted with David your father, saying, There shall not fail you a man to be ruler in Israel.7:19 But if ye turn away, and forsake my statutes and my commandments which I have set before you, and shall go and serve other gods, and worship them;7:20 then will I pluck them up by the roots out of my land which I have given them; and this house, which I have hallowed for my name, will I cast out of my sight, and I will make it a proverb and a byword among all peoples.7:21 And this house, which is so high, every one that passes by it shall be astonished, and shall say, Why has Yahweh done thus to this land, and to this house?7:22 And they shall answer, Because they forsook Yahweh, the God of their fathers, who brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, and laid hold on other gods, and worshipped them, and served them: therefore has he brought all this evil upon them.8:1 And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, during which Solomon had built the house of Yahweh, and his own house,8:2 that the cities which Huram had given to Solomon, Solomon built them, and caused the children of Israel to dwell there.8:3 And Solomon went to Hamath-zobah, and prevailed against it.8:4 And he built Tadmor in the wilderness, and all the store-cities, which he built in Hamath.8:5 Also he built Beth-horon the upper, and Beth-horon the nether, fortified cities, with walls, gates, and bars;8:6 and Baalath, and all the store-cities that Solomon had, and all the cities for his chariots, and the cities for his horsemen, and all that Solomon desired to build for his pleasure in Jerusalem, and in Lebanon, and in all the land of his dominion.8:7 As for all the people that were left of the Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, that were not of Israel;8:8 of their children that were left after them in the land, whom the children of Israel consumed not, of them did Solomon raise a levy of bondservants to this day.8:9 But of the children of Israel did Solomon make no servants for his work; but they were men of war, and chief of his captains, and rulers of his chariots and of his horsemen.8:10 And these were the chief officers of king Solomon, even two hundred and fifty, that bore rule over the people.8:11 And Solomon brought up the daughter of Pharaoh out of the city of David to the house that he had built for her; for he said, My wife shall not dwell in the house of David king of Israel, because the places are holy, whereto the ark of Yahweh has come.8:12 Then Solomon offered burnt offerings to Yahweh on the altar of Yahweh, which he had built before the porch,8:13 even as the duty of every day required, offering according to the commandment of Moses, on the sabbaths, and on the new moons, and on the set feasts, three times in the year, even in the feast of unleavened bread, and in the feast of weeks, and in the feast of tabernacles.8:14 And he appointed, according to the ordinance of David his father, the courses of the priests to their service, and the Levites to their offices, to praise, and to minister before the priests, as the duty of every day required; the doorkeepers also by their courses at every gate: for so had David the man of God commanded.8:15 And they departed not from the commandment of the king to the priests and Levites concerning any matter, or concerning the treasures.8:16 Now all the work of Solomon was prepared to the day of the foundation of the house of Yahweh, and until it was finished.  So the house of Yahweh was completed.8:17 Then went Solomon to Ezion-geber, and to Eloth, on the seashore in the land of Edom.8:18 And Huram sent him by the hands of his servants ships, and servants that had knowledge of the sea; and they came with the servants of Solomon to Ophir, and fetched from there four hundred and fifty talents of gold, and brought them to king Solomon.9:1 And when the queen of Sheba heard of the fame of Solomon, she came to prove Solomon with hard questions at Jerusalem, with a very great train, and camels that bore spices, and gold in abundance, and precious stones: and when she was come to Solomon, she communed with him of all that was in her heart.9:2 And Solomon told her all her questions; and there was not anything hid from Solomon which he told her not.9:3 And when the queen of Sheba had seen the wisdom of Solomon, and the house that he had built,9:4 and the food of his table, and the sitting of his servants, and the attendance of his ministers, and their apparel, his cupbearers also, and their apparel, and his ascent by which he went up to the house of Yahweh; there was no more spirit in her.9:5 And she said to the king, It was a true report that I heard in my own land of your acts, and of your wisdom.9:6 But I believed not their words, until I came, and my eyes had seen it; and, behold, the half of the greatness of your wisdom was not told me: you exceed the fame that I heard.9:7 Happy are your men, and happy are these your servants, that stand continually before you, and hear your wisdom.9:8 Blessed be Yahweh your God, who delighted in you, to set you on his throne, to be king for Yahweh your God: because your God loved Israel, to establish them for ever, therefore made he you king over them, to do justice and righteousness.9:9 And she gave the king a hundred and twenty talents of gold, and spices in great abundance, and precious stones: neither was there any such spice as the queen of Sheba gave to king Solomon.9:10 And the servants also of Huram, and the servants of Solomon, that brought gold from Ophir, brought algum-trees and precious stones.9:11 And the king made of the algum-trees terraces for the house of Yahweh, and for the king's house, and harps and psalteries for the singers: and there were none such seen before in the land of Judah.9:12 And king Solomon gave to the queen of Sheba all her desire, whatsoever she asked, besides that which she had brought to the king.  So she turned, and went to her own land, she and her servants.9:13 Now the weight of gold that came to Solomon in one year was 666 talents of gold,9:14 besides that which the traders and merchants brought: and all the kings of Arabia and the governors of the country brought gold and silver to Solomon.9:15 And king Solomon made 200 bucklers of beaten gold; 600 shekels of beaten gold went to one buckler.9:16 And he made three hundred shields of beaten gold; three hundred shekels of gold went to one shield: and the king put them in the house of the forest of Lebanon.9:17 Moreover the king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it with pure gold.9:18 nd there were six steps to the throne, with a footstool of gold, which were fastened to the throne, and stays on either side by the place of the seat, and two lions standing beside the stays.9:19 And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other upon the six steps: there was not the like made in any kingdom.9:20 And all king Solomon's drinking vessels were of gold, and all the vessels of the house of the forest of Lebanon were of pure gold: silver was nothing accounted of in the days of Solomon.9:21 For the king had ships that went to Tarshish with the servants of Huram; once every three years came the ships of Tarshish, bringing gold, and silver, ivory, and apes, and peacocks.9:22 So king Solomon exceeded all the kings of the earth in riches and wisdom.9:23 And all the kings of the earth sought the presence of Solomon, to hear his wisdom, which God had put in his heart.9:24 And they brought every man his tribute, vessels of silver, and vessels of gold, and raiment, armor, and spices, horses, and mules, a rate year by year.9:25 And Solomon had four thousand stalls for horses and chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen, that he bestowed in the chariot cities, and with the king at Jerusalem.9:26 And he ruled over all the kings from the River even to the land of the Philistines, and to the border of Egypt.9:27 And the king made silver to be in Jerusalem as stones, and cedars made he to be as the sycomore-trees that are in the lowland, for abundance.9:28 And they brought horses for Solomon out of Egypt, and out of all lands.9:29 Now the rest of the acts of Solomon, first and last, are they not written in the history of Nathan the prophet, and in the prophecy of Ahijah the Shilonite, and in the visions of Iddo the seer concerning Jeroboam the son of Nebat?9:30 And Solomon reigned in Jerusalem over all Israel forty years.9:31 And Solomon slept with his fathers, and he was buried in the city of David his father: and Rehoboam his son reigned in his stead.10:1 And Rehoboam went to Shechem; for all Israel were come to Shechem to make him king.10:2 And it came to pass, when Jeroboam the son of Nebat heard of it, (for he was in Egypt, whither he had fled from the presence of king Solomon,) that Jeroboam returned out of Egypt.10:3 And they sent and called him; and Jeroboam and all Israel came, and they spoke to Rehoboam, saying,10:4 Your father made our yoke grievous: now therefore make you the grievous service of your father, and his heavy yoke which he put upon us, lighter, and we will serve you.10:5 And he said to them, Come again to me after three days.  And the people departed.10:6 And king Rehoboam took counsel with the old men, that had stood before Solomon his father while he yet lived, saying, What counsel give ye me to return answer to this people?10:7 And they spoke to him, saying, If you be kind to this people, and please them, and speak good words to them, then they will be your servants for ever.10:8 But he forsook the counsel of the old men which they had given him, and took counsel with the young men that were grown up with him, that stood before him.10:9 And he said to them, What counsel give ye, that we may return answer to this people, who have spoken to me, saying, Make the yoke that your father did put upon us lighter?10:10 And the young men that were grown up with him spoke to him, saying, Thus shall you say to the people that spoke to you, saying, Your father made our yoke heavy, but make you it lighter to us; thus shall you say to them, My little finger is thicker than my father's loins.10:11 And now whereas my father did lade you with a heavy yoke, I will add to your yoke: my father chastised you with whips, but I will chastise you with scorpions.10:12 So Jeroboam and all the people came to Rehoboam the third day, as the king commanded, saying, Come to me again the third day.10:13 And the king answered them roughly; and king Rehoboam forsook the counsel of the old men,10:14 and spoke to them after the counsel of the young men, saying, My father made your yoke heavy, but I will add thereto: my father chastised you with whips, but I will chastise you with scorpions.10:15 So the king hearkened not to the people; for it was brought about of God, that Yahweh might establish his word, which he spoke by Ahijah the Shilonite to Jeroboam the son of Nebat.10:16 And when all Israel saw that the king hearkened not to them, the people answered the king, saying, What portion have we in David?  neither have we inheritance in the son of Jesse: every man to your tents, O Israel: now see to your own house, David.  So all Israel departed to their tents.10:17 But as for the children of Israel that dwelt in the cities of Judah, Rehoboam reigned over them.10:18 Then king Rehoboam sent Hadoram, who was over the men subject to taskwork; and the children of Israel stoned him to death with stones.  And king Rehoboam made speed to get him up to his chariot, to flee to Jerusalem.10:19 So Israel rebelled against the house of David to this day.11:1 And when Rehoboam was come to Jerusalem, he assembled the house of Judah and Benjamin, a 180,000 chosen men, that were warriors, to fight against Israel, to bring the kingdom again to Rehoboam.11:2 But the word of Yahweh came to Shemaiah the man of God, saying,11:3 Speak to Rehoboam the son of Solomon, king of Judah, and to all Israel in Judah and Benjamin, saying,11:4 Thus says Yahweh, You shall not go up, nor fight against your brethren: return every man to his house; for this thing is of me.  So they hearkened to the words of Yahweh, and returned from going against Jeroboam.11:5 And Rehoboam dwelt in Jerusalem, and built cities for defence in Judah.11:6 He built Beth-lehem, and Etam, and Tekoa,11:7 And Beth-zur, and Soco, and Adullam,11:8 and Gath, and Mareshah, and Ziph,11:9 and Adoraim, and Lachish, and Azekah,11:10 and Zorah, and Aijalon, and Hebron, which are in Judah and in Benjamin, fortified cities.11:11 And he fortified the strongholds, and put captains in them, and stores of victuals, and oil and wine.11:12 And in every city he put shields and spears, and made them exceedingly strong.  And Judah and Benjamin belonged to him.11:13 And the priests and the Levites that were in all Israel resorted to him out of all their border.11:14 For the Levites left their suburbs and their possession, and came to Judah and Jerusalem: for Jeroboam and his sons cast them off, that they should not execute the priest's office to Yahweh;11:15 and he appointed him priests for the high places, and for the he-goats, and for the calves which he had made.11:16 And after them, out of all the tribes of Israel, such as set their hearts to seek Yahweh, the God of Israel, came to Jerusalem to sacrifice to Yahweh, the God of their fathers.11:17 So they strengthened the kingdom of Judah, and made Rehoboam the son of Solomon strong, three years; for they walked three years in the way of David and Solomon.11:18 And Rehoboam took him a wife, Mahalath the daughter of Jerimoth the son of David, and of Abihail the daughter of Eliab the son of Jesse;11:19 and she bore him sons: Jeush, and Shemariah, and Zaham.11:20 And after her he took Maacah the daughter of Absalom; and she bore him Abijah, and Attai, and Ziza, and Shelomith.11:21 And Rehoboam loved Maacah the daughter of Absalom above all his wives and his concubines: (for he took 18 wives, and 60 concubines, and begat 28 sons and 60 daughters.)11:22 And Rehoboam appointed Abijah the son of Maacah to be chief, even the prince among his brethren; for he was minded to make him king.11:23 And he dealt wisely, and dispersed of all his sons throughout all the lands of Judah and Benjamin, to every fortified city: and he gave them victuals in abundance.  And he sought for them many wives.12:1 And it came to pass, when the kingdom of Rehoboam was established, and he was strong, that he forsook the law of Yahweh, and all Israel with him.12:2 And it came to pass in the fifth year of king Rehoboam, that Shishak king of Egypt came up against Jerusalem, because they had trespassed against Yahweh,12:3 with 1,200 chariots, and 60,000 horsemen.  And the people were without number that came with him out of Egypt: the Lubim, the Sukkiim, and the Ethiopians.12:4 And he took the fortified cities which pertained to Judah, and came to Jerusalem.12:5 Now Shemaiah the prophet came to Rehoboam, and to the princes of Judah, that were gathered together to Jerusalem because of Shishak, and said to them, Thus says Yahweh, You have forsaken me, therefore have I also left you in the hand of Shishak.12:6 Then the princes of Israel and the king humbled themselves; and they said, Yahweh is righteous.12:7 And when Yahweh saw that they humbled themselves, the word of Yahweh came to Shemaiah, saying, They have humbled themselves: I will not destroy them; but I will grant them some deliverance, and my wrath shall not be poured out upon Jerusalem by the hand of Shishak.12:8 Nevertheless they shall be his servants, that they may know my service, and the service of the kingdoms of the countries.12:9 So Shishak king of Egypt came up against Jerusalem, and took away the treasures of the house of Yahweh, and the treasures of the king's house: he took all away: he took away also the shields of gold which Solomon had made.12:10 And king Rehoboam made in their stead shields of brass, and committed them to the hands of the captains of the guard, that kept the door of the king's house.12:11 And it was so, that, as oft as the king entered into the house of Yahweh, the guard came and bore them, and brought them back into the guard-chamber.12:12 And when he humbled himself, the wrath of Yahweh turned from him, so as not to destroy him altogether: and moreover in Judah there were good things found.12:13 So king Rehoboam strengthened himself in Jerusalem, and reigned: for Rehoboam was forty and one years old when he began to reign, and he reigned seventeen years in Jerusalem, the city which Yahweh had chosen out of all the tribes of Israel, to put his name there: and his mother's name was Naamah the Ammonitess.12:14 And he did that which was evil, because he set not his heart to seek Yahweh.12:15 Now the acts of Rehoboam, first and last, are they not written in the histories of Shemaiah the prophet and of Iddo the seer, after the manner of genealogies?  And there were wars between Rehoboam and Jeroboam continually.12:16 And Rehoboam slept with his fathers, and was buried in the city of David: and Abijah his son reigned in his stead.13:1 In the eighteenth year of king Jeroboam began Abijah to reign over Judah.13:2 Three years reigned he in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Micaiah the daughter of Uriel of Gibeah.  And there was war between Abijah and Jeroboam.13:3 And Abijah joined battle with an army of valiant men of war, even four hundred thousand chosen men: and Jeroboam set the battle in array against him with eight hundred thousand chosen men, who were mighty men of valor.13:4 And Abijah stood up upon mount Zemaraim, which is in the hill-country of Ephraim, and said, Hear me, O Jeroboam and all Israel:13:5 Ought ye not to know that Yahweh, the God of Israel, gave the kingdom over Israel to David for ever, even to him and to his sons by a covenant of salt?13:6 Yet Jeroboam the son of Nebat, the servant of Solomon the son of David, rose up, and rebelled against his lord.13:7 And there were gathered to him worthless men, base fellows, that strengthened themselves against Rehoboam the son of Solomon, when Rehoboam was young and soft-hearted, and could not withstand them.13:8 And now ye think to withstand the kingdom of Yahweh in the hand of the sons of David; and ye are a great multitude, and there are with you the golden calves which Jeroboam made you for gods.13:9 Have ye not driven out the priests of Yahweh, the sons of Aaron, and the Levites, and made you priests after the manner of the peoples of other lands?  so that whosoever comes to consecrate himself with a young bullock and seven rams, the same may be a priest of them that are no gods.13:10 But as for us, Yahweh is our God, and we have not forsaken him; and we have priests ministering to Yahweh, the sons of Aaron, and the Levites in their work:13:11 and they burn to Yahweh every morning and every evening burnt offerings and sweet incense: the showbread also set they in order upon the pure table; and the candlestick of gold with the lamps thereof, to burn every evening: for we keep the charge of Yahweh our God; but ye have forsaken him.13:12 And, behold, God is with us at our head, and his priests with the trumpets of alarm to sound an alarm against you.  O children of Israel, fight ye not against Yahweh, the God of your fathers; for ye shall not prosper.13:13 But Jeroboam caused an ambushment to come about behind them: so they were before Judah, and the ambushment was behind them.13:14 And when Judah looked back, behold, the battle was before and behind them; and they cried to Yahweh, and the priests sounded with the trumpets.13:15 Then the men of Judah gave a shout: and as the men of Judah shouted, it came to pass, that God smote Jeroboam and all Israel before Abijah and Judah.13:16 And the children of Israel fled before Judah; and God delivered them into their hand.13:17 And Abijah and his people slew them with a great slaughter: so there fell down slain of Israel five hundred thousand chosen men.13:18 Thus the children of Israel were brought under at that time, and the children of Judah prevailed, because they relied upon Yahweh, the God of their fathers.13:19 And Abijah pursued after Jeroboam, and took cities from him, Beth-el with the towns thereof, and Jeshanah with the towns thereof, and Ephron with the towns thereof.13:20 Neither did Jeroboam recover strength again in the days of Abijah: and Yahweh smote him, and he died.13:21 But Abijah became mighty, and took to himself fourteen wives, and begat twenty and two sons, and sixteen daughters.13:22 And the rest of the acts of Abijah, and his ways, and his sayings, are written in the commentary of the prophet Iddo.14:1 So Abijah slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the city of David; and Asa his son reigned in his stead.  In his days the land was quiet ten years.14:2 And Asa did that which was good and right in the eyes of Yahweh his God:14:3 for he took away the foreign altars, and the high places, and broke down the pillars, and hewed down the Asherim,14:4 and commanded Judah to seek Yahweh, the God of their fathers, and to do the law and the commandment.14:5 Also he took away out of all the cities of Judah the high places and the sun-images: and the kingdom was quiet before him.14:6 And he built fortified cities in Judah; for the land was quiet, and he had no war in those years, because Yahweh had given him rest.14:7 For he said to Judah, Let us build these cities, and make about them walls, and towers, gates, and bars; the land is yet before us, because we have sought Yahweh our God; we have sought him, and he has given us rest on every side.  So they built and prospered.14:8 And Asa had an army that bore bucklers and spears, out of Judah 300,000; and out of Benjamin, that bore shields and drew bows, 280,000: all these were mighty men of valor.14:9 And there came out against them Zerah the Ethiopian with an army of one million, and 300 chariots; and he came to Mareshah.14:10 Then Asa went out to meet him, and they set the battle in array in the valley of Zephathah at Mareshah.14:11 And Asa cried to Yahweh his God, and said, Yahweh, there is none besides you to help, between the mighty and him that has no strength.  Help us, O Yahweh our God; for we rely on you, and in your name we are here against this multitude.  O Yahweh, you are our God; let not man prevail against you.14:12 So Yahweh struck the Ethiopians before Asa, and before Judah; and the Ethiopians fled.14:13 And Asa and the people that were with him pursued them to Gerar.  And so many of the Ethiopians fell there that they could not recover themselves; for they were destroyed before Yahweh, and before his host.  And they carried away very much booty.14:14 And they attacked all the cities round about Gerar; for the fear of Yahweh came upon them: and they despoiled all the cities; for there was much spoil in them.14:15 They attacked also the tents of cattle, and carried away sheep in abundance, and camels, and returned to Jerusalem.15:1 And the Spirit of God came upon Azariah the son of Oded:15:2 and he went out to meet Asa, and said to him, Hear me, Asa, and all Judah and Benjamin, Yahweh is with you, while you are with him.  And if you seek him, he will be found by you; but if you forsake him, he will forsake you.15:3 Now for a long season Israel was without the true God, and without a teaching priest, and without law:15:4 But when in their distress they turned to Yahweh, the God of Israel, and sought him, he was found by them.15:5 And in those times there was no peace for him that went out, nor for him that came in; but great vexations were upon all the inhabitants of the lands.15:6 And they were broken in pieces, nation against nation, and city against city; for God did vex them with all adversity.15:7 But be ye strong, and let not your hands be slack; for your work shall be rewarded.15:8 And when Asa heard these words, and the prophecy of Oded the prophet, he took courage, and put away the abominations out of all the land of Judah and Benjamin, and out of the cities which he had taken from the hill-country of Ephraim; and he renewed the altar of Yahweh, that was before the porch of Yahweh.15:9 And he gathered all Judah and Benjamin, and them that sojourned with them out of Ephraim and Manasseh, and out of Simeon: for they fell to him out of Israel in abundance, when they saw that Yahweh his God was with him.15:10 So they gathered themselves together at Jerusalem in the third month, in the fifteenth year of the reign of Asa.15:11 And they sacrificed to Yahweh in that day, of the spoil which they had brought, seven hundred oxen and seven thousand sheep.15:12 And they entered into the covenant to seek Yahweh, the God of their fathers, with all their heart and with all their soul;15:13 and that whosoever would not seek Yahweh, the God of Israel, should be put to death, whether small or great, whether man or woman.15:14 And they swore to Yahweh with a loud voice, and with shouting, and with trumpets, and with cornets.15:15 And all Judah rejoiced at the oath; for they had sworn with all their heart, and sought him with their whole desire; and he was found of them: and Yahweh gave them rest round about.15:16 And also Maacah, the mother of Asa the king, he removed from being queen, because she had made an abominable image for an Asherah; and Asa cut down her image, and made dust of it, and burnt it at the brook Kidron.15:17 But the high places were not taken away out of Israel: nevertheless the heart of Asa was perfect all his days.15:18 And he brought into the house of God the things that his father had dedicated, and that he himself had dedicated, silver, and gold, and vessels.15:19 And there was no more war to the five and thirtieth year of the reign of Asa.16:1 In the six and thirtieth year of the reign of Asa, Baasha king of Israel went up against Judah, and built Ramah, that he might not allow any one to go out or come in to Asa king of Judah.16:2 Then Asa brought out silver and gold out of the treasures of the house of Yahweh and of the king's house, and sent to Ben-hadad king of Syria, that dwelt at Damascus, saying,16:3 There is a league between me and you, as there was between my father and your father: behold, I have sent you silver and gold; go, break your league with Baasha king of Israel, that he may depart from me.16:4 And Ben-hadad hearkened to king Asa, and sent the captains of his armies against the cities of Israel; and they smote Ijon, and Dan, and Abel-maim, and all the store-cities of Naphtali.16:5 And it came to pass, when Baasha heard thereof, that he left off building Ramah, and let his work cease.16:6 Then Asa the king took all Judah; and they carried away the stones of Ramah, and the timber thereof, with which Baasha had built; and he used them to build Geba and Mizpah.16:7 And at that time Hanani the seer came to Asa king of Judah, and said to him, Because you have relied on the king of Syria, and have not relied on Yahweh your God, therefore is the host of the king of Syria escaped out of your hand.16:8 Were not the Ethiopians and the Lubim a huge host, with chariots and horsemen exceedingly many?  yet, because you did rely on Yahweh, he delivered them into your hand.16:9 For the eyes of Yahweh run to and fro throughout the whole earth, to show himself strong in the behalf of them whose heart is perfect toward him.  Herein you have done foolishly; for from from now on you shall have wars.16:10 Then Asa was angry with the seer, and put him in the prison-house; for he was in a rage with him because of this thing.  And Asa oppressed some of the people at the same time.16:11 And, behold, the acts of Asa, first and last, lo, they are written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel.16:12 And in the thirty and ninth year of his reign Asa was diseased in his feet; his disease was exceedingly great: yet in his disease he sought not to Yahweh, but to the physicians.16:13 And Asa slept with his fathers, and died in the one and fortieth year of his reign.16:14 And they buried him in his own sepulchres, which he had hewn out for himself in the city of David, and laid him in the bed which was filled with sweet odors and divers kinds of spices prepared by the perfumers' are: and they made a very great burning for him.17:1 And Jehoshaphat his son reigned in his stead, and strengthened himself against Israel.17:2 And he placed forces in all the fortified cities of Judah, and set garrisons in the land of Judah, and in the cities of Ephraim, which Asa his father had taken.17:3 And Yahweh was with Jehoshaphat, because he walked in the first ways of his father David, and sought not to the Baalim,17:4 but sought to the God of his father, and walked in his commandments, and not after the doings of Israel.17:5 Therefore Yahweh established the kingdom in his hand; and all Judah brought to Jehoshaphat tribute; and he had riches and honor in abundance.17:6 And his heart was lifted up in the ways of Yahweh: and furthermore he took away the high places and the Asherim out of Judah.17:7 Also in the third year of his reign he sent his princes, even Ben-hail, and Obadiah, and Zechariah, and Nethanel, and Micaiah, to teach in the cities of Judah;17:8 and with them the Levites, even Shemaiah, and Nethaniah, and Zebadiah, and Asahel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehonathan, and Adonijah, and Tobijah, and Tob-adonijah, the Levites; and with them Elishama and Jehoram, the priests.17:9 And they taught in Judah, having the book of the law of Yahweh with them; and they went about throughout all the cities of Judah, and taught among the people.17:10 And the fear of Yahweh fell upon all the kingdoms of the lands that were round about Judah, so that they made no war against Jehoshaphat.17:11 And some of the Philistines brought Jehoshaphat presents, and silver for tribute; the Arabians also brought him flocks, seven thousand and seven hundred rams, and seven thousand and seven hundred he-goats.17:12 And Jehoshaphat became great exceedingly; and he built in Judah castles and cities of store.17:13 And he had many works in the cities of Judah; and men of war, mighty men of valor, in Jerusalem.17:14 And this was the numbering of them according to their fathers' houses: Of Judah, the captains of thousands: Adnah the captain, and with him mighty men of valor 300,000;17:15 and next to him Jehohanan the captain, and with him 280,000;17:16 and next to him Amasiah the son of Zichri, who willingly offered himself to Yahweh; and with him 200,000 mighty men of valor.17:17 And of Benjamin: Eliada a mighty man of valor, and with him 200,000 armed with bow and shield;17:18 and next to him Jehozabad and with him a 180,000 ready prepared for war.17:19 These were they that waited on the king, besides those whom the king put in the fortified cities throughout all Judah.18:1 Now Jehoshaphat had riches and honor in abundance; and he joined affinity with Ahab.18:2 And after certain years he went down to Ahab to Samaria.  And Ahab killed sheep and oxen for him in abundance, and for the people that were with him, and moved him to go up with him to Ramoth-gilead.18:3 And Ahab king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat king of Judah, Will you go with me to Ramoth-gilead?  And he answered him, I am as you are, and my people as your people; and we will be with you in the war.18:4 And Jehoshaphat said to the king of Israel, Inquire first, I pray you, for the word of Yahweh.18:5 Then the king of Israel gathered the prophets together, 400 men, and said to them, Shall we go to Ramoth-gilead to battle, or shall I forbear?  And they said, Go up; for God will deliver it into the hand of the king.18:6 But Jehoshaphat said, Is there not here a prophet of Yahweh besides, that we may inquire of him?18:7 And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, There is yet one man by whom we may inquire of Yahweh: but I hate him; for he never prophesies good concerning me, but always evil: the same is Micaiah the son of Imla.  And Jehoshaphat said, Let not the king say so.18:8 Then the king of Israel called an officer, and said, Fetch quickly Micaiah the son of Imla.18:9 Now the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah sat each on his throne, arrayed in their robes, and they were sitting in an open place at the entrance of the gate of Samaria; and all the prophets were prophesying before them.18:10 And Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah made him horns of iron, and said, Thus says Yahweh, With these shall you push the Syrians, until they are consumed.18:11 And all the prophets prophesied so, saying, Go up to Ramoth-gilead, and prosper; for Yahweh will deliver it into the hand of the king.18:12 And the messenger that went to call Micaiah spoke to him, saying, Behold, the words of the prophets declare good to the king with one mouth: let your word therefore, I pray you, be like one of theirs, and speak good.18:13 And Micaiah said, as Yahweh lives, what my God says, that will I speak.18:14 And when he had come to the king, the king said to him, Micaiah, shall we go to Ramoth-gilead to battle, or shall I forbear?  And he said, Go ye up, and prosper; and they shall be delivered into your hand.18:15 And the king said to him, How many times shall I adjure you that you speak to me nothing but the truth in the name of Yahweh?18:16 And he said, I saw all Israel scattered upon the mountains, as sheep that have no shepherd: and Yahweh said, These have no master; let them return every man to his house in peace.18:17 And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell you that he would not prophesy good concerning me, but evil?18:18 And Micaiah said, Therefore hear ye the word of Yahweh: I saw Yahweh sitting upon his throne, and all the host of heaven standing on his right hand and on his left.18:19 And Yahweh said, Who shall entice Ahab king of Israel, that he may go up and fall at Ramoth-gilead?  And one spoke saying after this manner, and another saying after that manner.18:20 And there came forth a spirit, and stood before Yahweh, and said, I will entice him.  And Yahweh said to him, With what?18:21 And he said, I will go forth, and will be a lying spirit in the mouth of all his prophets.  And he said, You shall entice him, and shall prevail also: go forth, and do so.18:22 Now therefore, behold, Yahweh has put a lying spirit in the mouth of these your prophets; and Yahweh has spoken evil concerning you.18:23 Then Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah came near, and struck Micaiah upon the cheek, and said, Which way went the Spirit of Yahweh from me to speak to you?18:24 And Micaiah said, Behold, you shall see on that day, when you shall go into an inner chamber to hide yourself.18:25 And the king of Israel said, Take ye Micaiah, and carry him back to Amon the governor of the city, and to Joash the king's son;18:26 and say, Thus says the king, Put this fellow in the prison, and feed him with bread of affliction and with water of affliction, until I return in peace.18:27 And Micaiah said, If you return at all in peace, Yahweh has not spoken by me.  And he said, Hear, ye peoples, all of you.18:28 So the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah went up to Ramoth-gilead.18:29 And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, I will disguise myself, and go into the battle; but you put on your robes.  So the king of Israel disguised himself; and they went into the battle.18:30 Now the king of Syria had commanded the captains of his chariots, saying, Fight neither with the small nor great, but only with the king of Israel.18:31 And it came to pass, when the captains of the chariots saw Jehoshaphat, that they said, It is the king of Israel.  Therefore they turned around to fight against him: but Jehoshaphat cried out, and Yahweh helped him; and God caused them to depart from him.18:32 And it came to pass, when the captains of the chariots saw that it was not the king of Israel, that they turned back from pursuing him.18:33 And one man drew his bow at random, and struck the king of Israel between the joints of the armor: therefore he said to the driver of the chariot, Turn your hand, and carry me out of the host; for I am severely wounded.18:34 And the battle increased that day: nevertheless the king of Israel stayed himself up in his chariot against the Syrians until evening; and about the time of the going down of the sun he died.19:1 And Jehoshaphat the king of Judah returned to his house in peace to Jerusalem.19:2 And Jehu the son of Hanani the seer went out to meet him, and said to king Jehoshaphat, Should you help the wicked, and love those who hate Yahweh?  Because of this thing, wrath is upon you from before Yahweh.19:3 Nevertheless there are good things found in you, in that you have put away the Asheroth out of the land, and have set your heart to seek God.19:4 And Jehoshaphat dwelt at Jerusalem: and he went out again among the people from Beer-sheba to the hill-country of Ephraim, and brought them back to Yahweh, the God of their fathers.19:5 And he set judges in the land throughout all the fortified cities of Judah, city by city,19:6 and said to the judges, Consider what ye do: for ye judge not for man, but for Yahweh; and he is with you in the judgment.19:7 Now therefore let the fear of Yahweh be upon you; take heed and do it: for there is no iniquity with Yahweh our God, nor respect of persons, nor taking of bribes.19:8 Moreover in Jerusalem Jehoshaphat set up some of the Levites and the priests, and of the heads of the fathers' houses of Israel, for the judgment of Yahweh, and for controversies.  And they returned to Jerusalem.19:9 And he charged them, saying, Thus shall ye do in the fear of Yahweh, faithfully, and with a perfect heart.19:10 And whenever any controversy shall come to you from your brethren that dwell in their cities, between blood and blood, between law and commandment, statutes and ordinances, ye shall warn them, that they not be guilty towards Yahweh, and so wrath come upon you and upon your brethren.  This do, and ye shall not be guilty.19:11 And, behold, Amariah the chief priest is over you in all matters of Yahweh; and Zebadiah the son of Ishmael, the ruler of the house of Judah, in all the king's matters: also the Levites shall be officers before you.  Deal courageously, and Yahweh be with the good.20:1 And it came to pass after this, that the children of Moab, and the children of Ammon, and with them some of the Ammonites, came against Jehoshaphat to battle.20:2 Then there came some that told Jehoshaphat, A great multitude is coming against you from beyond the sea from Syria; and, behold, they are in Hazazon-tamar (the same is En-gedi).20:3 And Jehoshaphat was afraid, and set himself to seek to Yahweh; and he proclaimed a fast throughout all Judah.20:4 And Judah gathered themselves together, to seek help from Yahweh: even out of all the cities of Judah they came to seek Yahweh.20:5 And Jehoshaphat stood in the assembly of Judah and Jerusalem, in the house of Yahweh, before the new court;20:6 and he said, O Yahweh, the God of our fathers, are you not God in heaven?  and are you not ruler over all the kingdoms of the nations?   And in your hand is power and might, so that none is able to withstand you.20:7 Did not you, O our God, drive out the inhabitants of this land before your people Israel, and give it to the seed of Abraham your friend for ever?20:8 And they dwelt in it, and have built you a sanctuary in it for your name, saying,20:9 If evil comes upon us, the sword, judgment, or pestilence, or famine, we will stand before this house, and before you, (for your name is in this house,) and cry to you in our affliction, and you will hear and save.20:10 And now, behold, the children of Ammon and Moab and mount Seir, whom you would not let Israel invade when they came out of the land of Egypt, and they turned aside from them, and destroyed them not;20:11 behold, how they repay us, to come to cast us out of your possession, which you have given us to inherit.20:12 O our God, will you not judge them?  for we have no might against this great company that comes against us; neither do we know what to do: but our eyes are upon you.20:13 And all Judah stood before Yahweh, with their little ones, their wives, and their children.20:14 Then in the midst of the assembly the Spirit of Yahweh came upon Jahaziel son of Zechariah, the son of Benaiah, the son of Jeiel, the son of Mattaniah, the Levite, of the sons of Asaph;20:15 and he said, Hearken ye, all Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem, and you king Jehoshaphat: Thus says Yahweh to you, Fear ye not, neither be dismayed by reason of this great multitude; for the battle is not yours, but God's.20:16 Tomorrow go ye down against them.  Behold, they come up by the ascent of Ziz; and ye shall find them at the end of the valley, before the wilderness of Jeruel.20:17 You shall not need to fight in this battle.  Set yourselves, stand ye still, and see the salvation of Yahweh with you, O Judah and Jerusalem.  Fear not, neither be dismayed: tomorrow go out against them: for Yahweh is with you.20:18 And Jehoshaphat bowed his head with his face to the ground; and all Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem fell down before Yahweh, worshipping Yahweh.20:19 And the Levites, of the children of the Kohathites and of the children of the Korahites, stood up to praise Yahweh, the God of Israel, with an exceedingly loud voice.20:20 And they rose early in the morning, and went forth into the wilderness of Tekoa.  And as they went forth, Jehoshaphat stood and said, Hear me, O Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem: believe in Yahweh your God, thus shall ye be established; believe his prophets, thus shall ye prosper.20:21 And when he had taken counsel with the people, he appointed them that should sing to Yahweh and give praise in holy array, as they went out before the army, and should say, Give thanks to Yahweh; for his lovingkindness endures for ever.20:22 And when they began to sing and to praise, Yahweh set liers-in-wait against the children of Ammon, Moab, and mount Seir, that had come against Judah; and they were smitten.20:23 For the children of Ammon and Moab stood up against the inhabitants of mount Seir, to utterly slay and destroy them: and when they had made an end of the inhabitants of Seir, every one helped to destroy another.20:24 And when Judah came to the watch-tower of the wilderness, they looked upon the multitude; and, behold, they were dead bodies fallen to the earth, and there was no one that escaped.20:25 And when Jehoshaphat and his people came to take the spoil of them, they found among them in abundance both riches and dead bodies, and precious jewels, which they stripped off for themselves, more than they could carry away: and they were three days in taking the spoil, it was so much.20:26 And on the fourth day they assembled themselves in the valley of Beracah; for there they blessed Yahweh: therefore the name of that place was called The valley of Beracah to this day.20:27 Then they returned, every man of Judah and Jerusalem, and Jehoshaphat in the forefront of them, to go again to Jerusalem with joy; for Yahweh had made them to rejoice over their enemies.20:28 And they came to Jerusalem with psalteries and harps and trumpets to the house of Yahweh.20:29 And the fear of God was upon all the kingdoms of the countries, when they heard that Yahweh fought against the enemies of Israel.20:30 So the realm of Jehoshaphat was quiet; for his God gave him rest round about.20:31 And Jehoshaphat reigned over Judah: he was 35 years old when he began to reign; and he reigned 25 years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Azubah the daughter of Shilhi.20:32 And he walked in the way of Asa his father, and turned not aside from it, doing that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh.20:33 However, the high places were not taken away; neither as yet had the people set their hearts to the God of their fathers.20:34 Now the rest of the acts of Jehoshaphat, first and last, behold, they are written in the history of Jehu the son of Hanani, which is inserted in the book of the kings of Israel.20:35 And after this Jehoshaphat king of Judah joined himself with Ahaziah king of Israel; the same did very wickedly:20:36 and he joined himself with him to make ships to go to Tarshish; and they made the ships in Ezion-geber.20:37 Then Eliezer the son of Dodavahu of Mareshah prophesied against Jehoshaphat, saying, Because you have joined yourself with Ahaziah, Yahweh has destroyed your works.  And the ships were broken, so that they were not able to go to Tarshish.21:1 And Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David: and Jehoram his son reigned in his stead.21:2 And he had brethren, the sons of Jehoshaphat: Azariah, and Jehiel, and Zechariah, and Azariah, and Michael, and Shephatiah; all these were the sons of Jehoshaphat king of Israel.21:3 And their father gave them great gifts, of silver, and of gold, and of precious things, with fortified cities in Judah: but the kingdom gave he to Jehoram, because he was the first-born.21:4 Now when Jehoram was risen up over the kingdom of his father, and had strengthened himself, he slew all his brethren with the sword, and divers also of the princes of Israel.21:5 Jehoram was thirty and two years old when he began to reign; and he reigned eight years in Jerusalem.21:6 And he walked in the way of the kings of Israel, as did the house of Ahab; for he had the daughter of Ahab to wife: and he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh.21:7 Nevertheless Yahweh would not destroy the house of David, because of the covenant that he had made with David, and as he promised to give a lamp to him and to his children alway.21:8 In his days Edom revolted from under the hand of Judah, and made a king over themselves.21:9 Then Jehoram passed over with his captains, and all his chariots with him: and he rose up by night, and smote the Edomites that surrounded him, and the captains of the chariots.21:10 So Edom revolted from under the hand of Judah to this day: then did Libnah revolt at the same time from under his hand, because he had forsaken Yahweh, the God of his fathers.21:11 Moreover he made high places in the mountains of Judah, and made the inhabitants of Jerusalem to play the harlot, and led Judah astray.21:12 And there came a writing to him from Elijah the prophet, saying, Thus says Yahweh, the God of David your father, Because you have not walked in the ways of Jehoshaphat your father, nor in the ways of Asa king of Judah,21:13 but have walked in the way of the kings of Israel, and have made Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem to play the harlot, like as the house of Ahab did, and also have slain your brethren of your father's house, who were better than yourself:21:14 behold, Yahweh will smite with a great plague your people, and your children, and your wives, and all your substance;21:15 and you shall have great sickness by disease of your bowels, until your bowels fall out by reason of the sickness, day by day.21:16 And Yahweh stirred up against Jehoram the spirit of the Philistines, and of the Arabians that are beside the Ethiopians:21:17 and they came up against Judah, and broke into it, and carried away all the substance that was found in the king's house, and his sons also, and his wives; so that there was never a son left him, save Jehoahaz, the youngest of his sons.21:18 And after all this Yahweh smote him in his bowels with an incurable disease.21:19 And it came to pass, in process of time, at the end of two years, that his bowels fell out by reason of his sickness, and he died of sore diseases.  And his people made no burning for him, like the burning of his fathers.21:20 Thirty and two years old was he when he began to reign, and he reigned in Jerusalem eight years: and he departed without being desired; and they buried him in the city of David, but not in the sepulchres of the kings.22:1 And the inhabitants of Jerusalem made Ahaziah his youngest son king in his stead; for the band of men that came with the Arabians to the camp had slain all the eldest.  So Ahaziah the son of Jehoram king of Judah reigned.22:2 Twenty-two years old  was Ahaziah when he began to reign; and he reigned one year in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Athaliah the daughter of Omri.22:3 He also walked in the ways of the house of Ahab; for his mother was his counsellor to do wickedly.22:4 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, as did the house of Ahab; for they were his counsellors after the death of his father, to his destruction.22:5 He walked also after their counsel, and went with Jehoram the son of Ahab king of Israel to war against Hazael king of Syria at Ramoth-gilead: and the Syrians wounded Joram.22:6 And he returned to be healed in Jezreel of the wounds which they had given him at Ramah, when he fought against Hazael king of Syria.  And Azariah the son of Jehoram king of Judah went down to see Jehoram the son of Ahab in Jezreel, because he was sick.22:7 Now the destruction of Ahaziah was of God, in that he went to Joram: for when he was come, he went out with Jehoram against Jehu the son of Nimshi, whom Yahweh had anointed to cut off the house of Ahab.22:8 And it came to pass, when Jehu was executing judgment upon the house of Ahab, that he found the princes of Judah, and the sons of the brethren of Ahaziah, ministering to Ahaziah, and slew them.22:9 And he sought Ahaziah, and they caught him (now he was hiding in Samaria), and they brought him to Jehu, and slew him; and they buried him, for they said, He is the son of Jehoshaphat, who sought Yahweh with all his heart.  And the house of Ahaziah had no power to hold the kingdom.22:10 Now when Athaliah the mother of Ahaziah saw that her son was dead, she arose and destroyed all the seed royal of the house of Judah.22:11 But Jehoshabeath, the daughter of the king, took Joash the son of Ahaziah, and stole him away from among the king's sons that were slain, and put him and his nurse in the bedchamber.  So Jehoshabeath, the daughter of king Jehoram, the wife of Jehoiada the priest (for she was the sister of Ahaziah), hid him from Athaliah, so that she slew him not.22:12 And he was with them hid in the house of God six years: and Athaliah reigned over the land.23:1 And in the seventh year Jehoiada strengthened himself, and took the captains of hundreds, azariah the son of Jeroham, and Ishmael the son of Jehohanan, and Azariah the son of Obed, and Maaseiah the son of Adaiah, and Elishaphat the son of Zichri, into covenant with him.23:2 And they went about in Judah, and gathered the Levites out of all the cities of Judah, and the heads of fathers' houses of Israel, and they came to Jerusalem.23:3 And all the assembly made a covenant with the king in the house of God.  And he said to them, Behold, the king's son shall reign, as Yahweh has spoken concerning the sons of David.23:4 This is the thing that ye shall do: a third part of you, that come in on the sabbath, of the priests and of the Levites, shall be porters of the thresholds;23:5 and a third part shall be at the king's house; and a third part at the gate of the foundation: and all the people shall be in the courts of the house of Yahweh.23:6 But let none come into the house of Yahweh, save the priests, and they that minister of the Levites; they shall come in, for they are holy: but all the people shall keep the charge of Yahweh.23:7 And the Levites shall compass the king round about, every man with his weapons in his hand; and whosoever comes into the house, let him be slain: and be ye with the king when he comes in, and when he goes out.23:8 So the Levites and all Judah did according to all that Jehoiada the priest commanded: and they took every man his men, those that were to come in on the sabbath; with those that were to go out on the sabbath; for Jehoiada the priest dismissed not the courses.23:9 And Jehoiada the priest delivered to the captains of hundreds the spears, and bucklers, and shields, that had been king David's, which were in the house of God.23:10 And he set all the people, every man with his weapon in his hand, from the right side of the house to the left side of the house, along by the altar and the house, by the king round about.23:11 Then they brought out the king's son, and put the crown upon him, and gave him the testimony, and made him king: and Jehoiada and his sons anointed him; and they said, Long live the king.23:12 And when Athaliah heard the noise of the people running and praising the king, she came to the people into the house of Yahweh:23:13 and she looked, and, behold, the king stood by his pillar at the entrance, and the captains and the trumpets by the king; and all the people of the land rejoiced, and blew trumpets; the singers also played on instruments of music, and led the singing of praise.  Then Athaliah rent her clothes, and said, Treason! treason!23:14 And Jehoiada the priest brought out the captains of hundreds that were set over the host, and said to them, Have her forth between the ranks; and whoso follows her, let him be slain with the sword: for the priest said, Slay her not in the house of Yahweh.23:15 So they made way for her; and she went to the entrance of the horse gate to the king's house: and they slew her there.23:16 And Jehoiada made a covenant between himself, and all the people, and the king, that they should be Yahweh's people.23:17 And all the people went to the house of Baal, and broke it down, and broke his altars and his images in pieces, and slew Mattan the priest of Baal before the altars.23:18 And Jehoiada appointed the officers of the house of Yahweh under the hand of the priests the Levites, whom David had distributed in the house of Yahweh, to offer the burnt offerings of Yahweh, as it is written in the law of Moses, with rejoicing and with singing, according to the order of David.23:19 And he set the porters at the gates of the house of Yahweh, that none that was unclean in anything should enter in.23:20 And he took the captains of hundreds, and the nobles, and the governors of the people, and all the people of the land, and brought down the king from the house of Yahweh: and they came through the upper gate to the king's house, and set the king upon the throne of the kingdom.23:21 So all the people of the land rejoiced, and the city was quiet.  And Athaliah they had slain with the sword.24:1 Joash was seven years old when he began to reign; and he reigned forty years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Zibiah, of Beer-sheba.24:2 And Joash did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh all the days of Jehoiada the priest.24:3 And Jehoiada took for him two wives; and he begat sons and daughters.24:4 And it came to pass after this, that Joash was minded to restore the house of Yahweh.24:5 And he gathered together the priests and the Levites, and said to them, Go out to the cities of Judah, and gather of all Israel money to repair the house of your God from year to year; and see that ye hasten the matter.  However, the Levites hastened it not.24:6 And the king called for Jehoiada the chief, and said to him, Why have you not required of the Levites to bring in out of Judah and out of Jerusalem the tax of Moses the servant of Yahweh, and of the assembly of Israel, for the tent of the testimony?24:7 For the sons of Athaliah, that wicked woman, had broken up the house of God; and also all the dedicated things of the house of Yahweh did they bestow upon the Baalim.24:8 So the king commanded, and they made a chest, and set it without at the gate of the house of Yahweh.24:9 And they made a proclamation through Judah and Jerusalem, to bring in for Yahweh the tax that Moses the servant of God laid upon Israel in the wilderness.24:10 And all the princes and all the people rejoiced, and brought in, and cast into the chest, until they had made an end.24:11 And it was so, that, at what time the chest was brought to the king's officers by the hand of the Levites, and when they saw that there was much money, the king's scribe and the chief priest's officer came and emptied the chest, and took it, and carried it to its place again.  Thus they did day by day, and gathered money in abundance.24:12 And the king and Jehoiada gave it to such as did the work of the service of the house of Yahweh; and they hired masons and carpenters to restore the house of Yahweh, and also such as wrought iron and brass to repair the house of Yahweh.24:13 So the workmen wrought, and the work of repairing went forward in their hands, and they set up the house of God in its state, and strengthened it.24:14 And when they had made an end, they brought the rest of the money before the king and Jehoiada, whereof were made vessels for the house of Yahweh, even vessels with which to minister and to offer, and spoons, and vessels of gold and silver.  And they offered burnt offerings in the house of Yahweh continually all the days of Jehoiada.24:15 But Jehoiada grew old and was full of days, and he died; a hundred and thirty years old was he when he died.24:16 And they buried him in the city of David among the kings, because he had done good in Israel, and toward God and his house.24:17 Now after the death of Jehoiada came the princes of Judah, and made obeisance to the king.  Then the king hearkened to them.24:18 And they forsook the house of Yahweh, the God of their fathers, and served the Asherim and the idols: and wrath came upon Judah and Jerusalem for this their guiltiness.24:19 Yet he sent prophets to them, to bring them again to Yahweh; and they testified against them: but they would not give ear.24:20 And the Spirit of God came upon Zechariah the son of Jehoiada the priest; and he stood above the people, and said to them, Thus says God, Why transgress ye the commandments of Yahweh, so that ye cannot prosper?  because ye have forsaken Yahweh, he has also forsaken you.24:21 And they conspired against him, and stoned him with stones at the commandment of the king in the court of the house of Yahweh.24:22 Thus Joash the king remembered not the kindness which Jehoiada his father had done to him, but slew his son.  And when he died, he said, Yahweh look upon it, and require it.24:23 And it came to pass at the end of the year, that the army of the Syrians came up against him: and they came to Judah and Jerusalem, and destroyed all the princes of the people from among the people, and sent all the spoil of them to the king of Damascus.24:24 For the army of the Syrians came with a small company of men; and Yahweh delivered a very great host into their hand, because they had forsaken Yahweh, the God of their fathers.  So they executed judgment upon Joash.24:25 And when they were departed for him (for they left him very sick), his own servants conspired against him for the blood of the sons of Jehoiada the priest, and slew him on his bed, and he died; and they buried him in the city of David, but they buried him not in the sepulchres of the kings.24:26 And these are they that conspired against him: Zabad the son of Shimeath the Ammonitess, and Jehozabad the son of Shimrith the Moabitess.24:27 Now concerning his sons, and the greatness of the burdens laid upon him, and the rebuilding of the house of God, behold, they are written in the commentary of the book of the kings.  And Amaziah his son reigned in his stead.25:1 Amaziah was twenty and five years old when he began to reign; and he reigned twenty and nine years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Jehoaddan, of Jerusalem.25:2 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, but not with a perfect heart.25:3 Now it came to pass, when the kingdom was established to him, that he slew his servants that had killed the king his father.25:4 But he put not their children to death, but did according to that which is written in the law in the book of Moses, as Yahweh commanded, saying, The fathers shall not die for the children, neither shall the children die for the fathers; but every man shall die for his own sin.25:5 Moreover Amaziah gathered Judah together, and ordered them according to their fathers' houses, under captains of thousands and captains of hundreds, even all Judah and Benjamin: and he numbered them from twenty years old and upward, and found them three hundred thousand chosen men, able to go forth to war, that could handle spear and shield.25:6 He hired also a hundred thousand mighty men of valor out of Israel for a hundred talents of silver.25:7 But there came a man of God to him, saying, O king, let not the army of Israel go with you; for Yahweh is not with Israel, specifically, with all the children of Ephraim.25:8 But if you will go, do valiantly, be strong for the battle: God will cast you down before the enemy; for God has power to help, and to cast down.25:9 And Amaziah said to the man of God, But what shall we do for the hundred talents which I have given to the army of Israel?  And the man of God answered, Yahweh is able to give you much more than this.25:10 Then Amaziah separated them, that is, the army that had come to him out of Ephraim, to go home again: therefore their anger was greatly kindled against Judah, and they returned home in fierce anger.25:11 And Amaziah took courage, and led forth his people, and went to the Valley of Salt, and smote of the children of Seir ten thousand.25:12 And other ten thousand did the children of Judah carry away alive, and brought them to the top of the rock, and cast them down from the top of the rock, so that they all were broken in pieces.25:13 But the men of the army whom Amaziah sent back, that they should not go with him to battle, fell upon the cities of Judah, from Samaria even to Beth-horon, and smote of them three thousand, and took much spoil.25:14 Now it came to pass, after that Amaziah was come from the slaughter of the Edomites, that he brought the gods of the children of Seir, and set them up to be his gods, and bowed down himself before them, and burned incense to them.25:15 Wherefore the anger of Yahweh was kindled against Amaziah, and he sent to him a prophet, who said to him, Why have you sought after the gods of the people, which have not delivered their own people out of your hand?25:16 And it came to pass, as he talked with him, that the king said to him, Have we made you of the king's counsel?  forbear; why should you be smitten?  Then the prophet forbare, and said, I know that God has determined to destroy you, because you have done this, and have not hearkened to my counsel.25:17 Then Amaziah king of Judah took advice, and sent to Joash, the son of Jehoahaz the son of Jehu, king of Israel, saying, Come, let us look one another in the face.25:18 And Joash king of Israel sent to Amaziah king of Judah, saying, The thistle that was in Lebanon sent to the cedar that was in Lebanon, saying, Give your daughter to my son to wife: and there passed by a wild beast that was in Lebanon, and trod down the thistle.25:19 You say, Lo, you have smitten Edom; and your heart lifts you up to boast: abide now at home; why should you meddle to your hurt, that you should fall, even you, and Judah with you?25:20 But Amaziah would not hear; for it was of God, that he might deliver them into the hand of their enemies, because they had sought after the gods of Edom.25:21 So Joash king of Israel went up; and he and Amaziah king of Judah looked one another in the face at Beth-shemesh, which belongs to Judah.25:22 And Judah was put to the worse before Israel; and they fled every man to his tent.25:23 And Joash king of Israel took Amaziah king of Judah, the son of Joash the son of Jehoahaz, at Beth-shemesh, and brought him to Jerusalem, and broke down the wall of Jerusalem from the gate of Ephraim to the corner gate, four hundred cubits.25:24 And he took all the gold and silver, and all the vessels that were found in the house of God with Obed-edom, and the treasures of the king's house, the hostages also, and returned to Samaria.25:25 And Amaziah the son of Joash king of Judah lived after the death of Joash son of Jehoahaz king of Israel fifteen years.25:26 Now the rest of the acts of Amaziah, first and last, behold, are they not written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel?25:27 Now from the time that Amaziah did turn away from following Yahweh they made a conspiracy against him in Jerusalem; and he fled to Lachish: but they sent after him to Lachish, and slew him there.25:28 And they brought him upon horses, and buried him with his fathers in the city of Judah.26:1 And all the people of Judah took Uzziah, who was sixteen years old, and made him king in the room of his father Amaziah.26:2 He built Eloth, and restored it to Judah, after that the king slept with his fathers.26:3 Sixteen years old was Uzziah when he began to reign; and he reigned 52 years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Jechiliah, of Jerusalem.26:4 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, according to all that his father Amaziah had done.26:5 And he set himself to seek God in the days of Zechariah, who had understanding in the vision of God: and as long as he sought Yahweh, God caused him to prosper.26:6 And he went forth and warred against the Philistines, and broke down the wall of Gath, and the wall of Jabneh, and the wall of Ashdod; and he built cities in the country of Ashdod, and among the Philistines.26:7 And God helped him against the Philistines, and against the Arabians that dwelt in Gur-baal, and the Meunim.26:8 And the Ammonites gave tribute to Uzziah: and his name spread abroad even to the entrance of Egypt; for he became exceedingly strong.26:9 Moreover Uzziah built towers in Jerusalem at the corner gate, and at the valley gate, and at the turning of the wall, and fortified them.26:10 And he built towers in the wilderness, and hewed out many cisterns, for he had much cattle; in the lowland also, and in the plain: and he had husbandmen and vinedressers in the mountains and in the fruitful fields; for he loved husbandry.26:11 Moreover Uzziah had an army of fighting men, that went out to war by bands, according to the number of their reckoning made by Jeiel the scribe and Maaseiah the officer, under the hand of Hananiah, one of the king's captains.26:12 The whole number of the heads of fathers' houses, even the mighty men of valor, was two thousand and six hundred.26:13 And under their hand was an army, three hundred thousand and seven thousand and five hundred, that made war with mighty power, to help the king against the enemy.26:14 And Uzziah prepared for them, even for all the host, shields, and spears, and helmets, and coats of mail, and bows, and stones for slinging.26:15 And he made in Jerusalem engines, invented by skilful men, to be on the towers and upon the battlements, with which to shoot arrows and great stones.  And his name spread far abroad; for he was marvellously helped, till he was strong.26:16 But when he was strong, his heart was lifted up, so that he did corruptly, and he trespassed against Yahweh his God; for he went into the temple of Yahweh to burn incense upon the altar of incense.26:17 And Azariah the priest went in after him, and with him eighty priests of Yahweh, that were valiant men:26:18 and they withstood Uzziah the king, and said to him, It pertains not to you, Uzziah, to burn incense to Yahweh, but to the priests the sons of Aaron, that are consecrated to burn incense: go out of the sanctuary; for you have trespassed; neither shall it be for your honor from Yahweh God.26:19 Then Uzziah was angry; and he had a censer in his hand to burn incense; and while he was angry with the priests, the leprosy broke forth in his forehead before the priests in the house of Yahweh, beside the altar of incense.26:20 And Azariah the chief priest, and all the priests, looked upon him, and, behold, he was leprous on his forehead, and they thrust him out quickly from there; indeed, he himself hasted also to go out, because Yahweh had smitten him.26:21 And Uzziah the king was a leper to the day of his death, and dwelt in a separate house, being a leper; for he was cut off from the house of Yahweh: and Jotham his son was over the king's house, judging the people of the land.26:22 Now the rest of the acts of Uzziah, first and last, did Isaiah the prophet, the son of Amoz, write.26:23 So Uzziah slept with his fathers; and they buried him with his fathers in the field of burial which belonged to the kings; for they said, He is a leper: and Jotham his son reigned in his stead.27:1 Jotham was twenty and five years old when he began to reign; and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Jerushah the daughter of Zadok.27:2 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, according to all that his father Uzziah had done: however, he entered not into the temple of Yahweh.  And the people did yet corruptly.27:3 He built the upper gate of the house of Yahweh, and on the wall of Ophel he built much.27:4 Moreover he built cities in the hill-country of Judah, and in the forests he built castles and towers.27:5 He fought also with the king of the children of Ammon, and prevailed against them.  And the children of Ammon gave him the same year a hundred talents of silver, and ten thousand measures of wheat, and ten thousand of barley.  So much did the children of Ammon render to him, in the second year also, and in the third.27:6 So Jotham became mighty, because he ordered his ways before Yahweh his God.27:7 Now the rest of the acts of Jotham, and all his wars, and his ways, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah.27:8 He was five and twenty years old when he began to reign, and reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem.27:9 And Jotham slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the city of David: and Ahaz his son reigned in his stead.28:1 Ahaz was twenty years old when he began to reign; and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem: and he did not that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, like David his father;28:2 but he walked in the ways of the kings of Israel, and made also molten images for the Baalim.28:3 Moreover he burnt incense in the valley of the son of Hinnom, and burnt his children in the fire, according to the abominations of the nations whom Yahweh cast out before the children of Israel.28:4 And he sacrificed and burnt incense in the high places, and on the hills, and under every green tree.28:5 Wherefore Yahweh his God delivered him into the hand of the king of Syria; and they smote him, and carried away of his a great multitude of captives, and brought them to Damascus.  And he was also delivered into the hand of the king of Israel, who smote him with a great slaughter.28:6 For Pekah the son of Remaliah slew in Judah a hundred and twenty thousand in one day, all of them valiant men; because they had forsaken Yahweh, the God of their fathers.28:7 And Zichri, a mighty man of Ephraim, slew Maaseiah the king's son, and Azrikam the ruler of the house, and Elkanah that was next to the king.28:8 And the children of Israel carried away captive of their brethren two hundred thousand, women, sons, and daughters, and took also away much spoil from them, and brought the spoil to Samaria.28:9 But a prophet of Yahweh was there, whose name was Oded: and he went out to meet the host that came to Samaria, and said to them, Behold, because Yahweh, the God of your fathers, was angry with Judah, he has delivered them into your hand, and ye have slain them in a rage which has reached up to heaven.28:10 And now ye purpose to keep under the children of Judah and Jerusalem for bondmen and bondwomen to you: but are there not even with you trespasses of your own against Yahweh your God?28:11 Now hear me therefore, and send back the captives, that ye have taken captive of your brethren; for the fierce wrath of Yahweh is upon you.28:12 Then certain of the heads of the children of Ephraim, azariah the son of Johanan, Berechiah the son of Meshillemoth, and Jehizkiah the son of Shallum, and Amasa the son of Hadlai, stood up against them that came from the war,28:13 and said to them, You shall not bring in the captives here: for ye purpose that which will bring upon us a trespass against Yahweh, to add to our sins and to our trespass; for our trespass is great, and there is fierce wrath against Israel.28:14 So the armed men left the captives and the spoil before the princes and all the assembly.28:15 And the men that have been mentioned by name rose up, and took the captives, and with the spoil clothed all that were naked among them, and arrayed them, and shod them, and gave them to eat and to drink, and anointed them, and carried all the feeble of them upon asses, and brought them to Jericho, the city of palm-trees, to their brethren: then they returned to Samaria.28:16 At that time did king Ahaz send to the kings of Assyria to help him.28:17 For again the Edomites had come and smitten Judah, and carried away captives.28:18 The Philistines also had invaded the cities of the lowland, and of the South of Judah, and had taken Beth-shemesh, and Aijalon, and Gederoth, and Soco with the towns thereof, and Timnah with the towns thereof, Gimzo also and the towns thereof: and they dwelt there.28:19 For Yahweh brought Judah low because of Ahaz king of Israel; for he had dealt wantonly in Judah, and trespassed sore against Yahweh.28:20 And Tilgath-pilneser king of Assyria came to him, and distressed him, but strengthened him not.28:21 For Ahaz took away a portion out of the house of Yahweh, and out of the house of the king and of the princes, and gave it to the king of Assyria: but it helped him not.28:22 And in the time of his distress did he trespass yet more against Yahweh, this same king Ahaz.28:23 For he sacrificed to the gods of Damascus, which smote him; and he said, Because the gods of the kings of Syria helped them, therefore will I sacrifice to them, that they may help me.  But they were the ruin of him, and of all Israel.28:24 And Ahaz gathered together the vessels of the house of God, and cut in pieces the vessels of the house of God, and shut up the doors of the house of Yahweh; and he made him altars in every corner of Jerusalem.28:25 And in every city of Judah he made high places to burn incense to other gods, and provoked to anger Yahweh, the God of his fathers.28:26 Now the rest of his acts, and all his ways, first and last, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel.28:27 And Ahaz slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the city, even in Jerusalem; for they brought him not into the sepulchres of the kings of Israel: and Hezekiah his son reigned in his stead.29:1 Hezekiah began to reign when he was five and twenty years old; and he reigned nine and twenty years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Abijah, the daughter of Zechariah.29:2 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, according to all that David his father had done.29:3 He in the first year of his reign, in the first month, opened the doors of the house of Yahweh, and repaired them.29:4 And he brought in the priests and the Levites, and gathered them together into the broad place on the east,29:5 and said to them, Hear me, ye Levites; now sanctify yourselves, and sanctify the house of Yahweh, the God of your fathers, and carry forth the filthiness out of the holy place.29:6 For our fathers have trespassed, and done that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh our God, and have forsaken him, and have turned away their faces from the habitation of Yahweh, and turned their backs.29:7 Also they have shut up the doors of the porch, and put out the lamps, and have not burned incense nor offered burnt offerings in the holy place to the God of Israel.29:8 Wherefore the wrath of Yahweh was upon Judah and Jerusalem, and he has delivered them to be tossed to and fro, to be an astonishment, and a hissing, as ye see with your eyes.29:9 For, lo, our fathers have fallen by the sword, and our sons and our daughters and our wives are in captivity for this.29:10 Now it is in my heart to make a covenant with Yahweh, the God of Israel, that his fierce anger may turn away from us.29:11 My sons, be not now negligent; for Yahweh has chosen you to stand before him, to minister to him, and that ye should be his ministers, and burn incense.29:12 Then the Levites arose, Mahath, the son of Amasai, and Joel the son of Azariah, of the sons of the Kohathites; and of the sons of Merari, Kish the son of Abdi, and Azariah the son of Jehallelel; and of the Gershonites, Joah the son of Zimmah, and Eden the son of Joah;29:13 and of the sons of Elizaphan, Shimri and Jeuel; and of the sons of Asaph, Zechariah and Mattaniah;29:14 and of the sons of Heman, Jehuel and Shimei; and of the sons of Jeduthun, Shemaiah and Uzziel.29:15 And they gathered their brethren, and sanctified themselves, and went in, according to the commandment of the king by the words of Yahweh, to cleanse the house of Yahweh.29:16 And the priests went in to the inner part of the house of Yahweh, to cleanse it, and brought out all the uncleanness that they found in the temple of Yahweh into the court of the house of Yahweh.  And the Levites took it, to carry it out abroad to the brook Kidron.29:17 Now they began on the first day of the first month to sanctify, and on the eighth day of the month came they to the porch of Yahweh; and they sanctified the house of Yahweh in eight days: and on the sixteenth day of the first month they made an end.29:18 Then they went in to Hezekiah the king within the palace, and said, We have cleansed all the house of Yahweh, and the altar of burnt offering, with all the vessels thereof, and the table of showbread, with all the vessels thereof.29:19 Moreover all the vessels, which king Ahaz in his reign did cast away when he trespassed, have we prepared and sanctified; and, behold, they are before the altar of Yahweh.29:20 Then Hezekiah the king arose early, and gathered the princes of the city, and went up to the house of Yahweh.29:21 And they brought seven bullocks, and seven rams, and seven lambs, and seven he-goats, for a sin offering for the kingdom and for the sanctuary and for Judah.  And he commanded the priests the sons of Aaron to offer them on the altar of Yahweh.29:22 So they killed the bullocks, and the priests received the blood, and sprinkled it on the altar: and they killed the rams, and sprinkled the blood upon the altar: they killed also the lambs, and sprinkled the blood upon the altar.29:23 And they brought near the he-goats for the sin offering before the king and the assembly; and they laid their hands upon them:29:24 and the priests killed them, and they made a sin offering with their blood upon the altar, to make atonement for all Israel; for the king commanded that the burnt offering and the sin offering should be made for all Israel.29:25 And he set the Levites in the house of Yahweh with cymbals, with psalteries, and with harps, according to the commandment of David, and of Gad the king's seer, and Nathan the prophet; for the commandment was of Yahweh by his prophets.29:26 And the Levites stood with the instruments of David, and the priests with the trumpets.29:27 And Hezekiah commanded to offer the burnt offering upon the altar.  And when the burnt offering began, the song of Yahweh began also, and the trumpets, together with the instruments of David king of Israel.29:28 And all the assembly worshipped, and the singers sang, and the trumpeters sounded; all this continued until the burnt offering was finished.29:29 And when they had made an end of offering, the king and all that were present with him bowed themselves and worshipped.29:30 Moreover Hezekiah the king and the princes commanded the Levites to sing praises to Yahweh with the words of David, and of Asaph the seer.  And they sang praises with gladness, and they bowed their heads and worshipped.29:31 Then Hezekiah answered and said, Now ye have consecrated yourselves to Yahweh; come near and bring sacrifices and thank-offerings into the house of Yahweh.  And the assembly brought in sacrifices and thank-offerings; and as many as were of a willing heart brought burnt offerings.29:32 And the number of the burnt offerings which the assembly brought was seventy bullocks, a hundred rams, and two hundred lambs: all these were for a burnt offering to Yahweh.29:33 And the consecrated things were six hundred oxen and three thousand sheep.29:34 But the priests were too few, so that they could not flay all the burnt offerings: therefore their brethren the Levites did help them, till the work was ended, and until the priests had sanctified themselves; for the Levites were more upright in heart to sanctify themselves than the priests.29:35 And also the burnt offerings were in abundance, with the fat of the peace offerings, and with the drink offerings for every burnt offering.  So the service of the house of Yahweh was set in order.29:36 And Hezekiah rejoiced, and all the people, because of that which God had prepared for the people: for the thing was done suddenly.30:1 And Hezekiah sent to all Israel and Judah, and wrote letters also to Ephraim and Manasseh, that they should come to the house of Yahweh at Jerusalem, to keep the passover to Yahweh, the God of Israel.30:2 For the king had taken counsel, and his princes, and all the assembly in Jerusalem, to keep the passover in the second month.30:3 For they could not keep it at that time, because the priests had not sanctified themselves in sufficient number, neither had the people gathered themselves together to Jerusalem.30:4 And the thing was right in the eyes of the king and of all the assembly.30:5 So they established a decree to make proclamation throughout all Israel, from Beer-sheba even to Dan, that they should come to keep the passover to Yahweh, the God of Israel, at Jerusalem: for they had not kept it in great numbers in such sort as it is written.30:6 So the posts went with the letters from the king and his princes throughout all Israel and Judah, and according to the commandment of the king, saying, You children of Israel, turn again to Yahweh, the God of Abraham, Isaac, and Israel, that he may return to the remnant that are escaped of you out of the hand of the kings of Assyria.30:7 And be not ye like your fathers, and like your brethren, who trespassed against Yahweh, the God of their fathers, so that he gave them up to desolation, as ye see.30:8 Now be ye not stiffnecked, as your fathers were; but yield yourselves to Yahweh, and enter into his sanctuary, which he has sanctified for ever, and serve Yahweh your God, that his fierce anger may turn away from you.30:9 For if ye turn again to Yahweh, your brethren and your children shall find compassion before them that led them captive, and shall come again into this land: for Yahweh your God is gracious and merciful, and will not turn away his face from you, if ye return to him.30:10 So the posts passed from city to city through the country of Ephraim and Manasseh, even to Zebulun: but they laughed them to scorn, and mocked them.30:11 Nevertheless certain men of Asher and Manasseh and of Zebulun humbled themselves, and came to Jerusalem.30:12 Also upon Judah came the hand of God to give them one heart, to do the commandment of the king and of the princes by the word of Yahweh.30:13 And there assembled at Jerusalem much people to keep the feast of unleavened bread in the second month, a very great assembly.30:14 And they arose and took away the altars that were in Jerusalem, and all the altars for incense took they away, and cast them into the brook Kidron.30:15 Then they killed the passover on the fourteenth day of the second month: and the priests and the Levites were ashamed, and sanctified themselves, and brought burnt offerings into the house of Yahweh.30:16 And they stood in their place after their order, according to the law of Moses the man of God: the priests sprinkled the blood which they received of the hand of the Levites.30:17 For there were many in the assembly that had not sanctified themselves: therefore the Levites had the charge of killing the passovers for every one that was not clean, to sanctify them to Yahweh.30:18 For a multitude of the people, even many of Ephraim and Manasseh, Issachar and Zebulun, had not cleansed themselves, yet did they eat the passover otherwise than it is written.  For Hezekiah had prayed for them, saying, The good Yahweh pardon every one30:19 that sets his heart to seek God, Yahweh, the God of his fathers, though he be not cleansed according to the purification of the sanctuary.30:20 And Yahweh hearkened to Hezekiah, and healed the people.30:21 And the children of Israel that were present at Jerusalem kept the feast of unleavened bread seven days with great gladness; and the Levites and the priests praised Yahweh day by day, singing with loud instruments to Yahweh.30:22 And Hezekiah spoke comfortably to all the Levites that had good understanding in the service of Yahweh.  So they did eat throughout the feast for the seven days, offering sacrifices of peace offerings, and making confession to Yahweh, the God of their fathers.30:23 And the whole assembly took counsel to keep other seven days; and they kept other seven days with gladness.30:24 For Hezekiah king of Judah did give to the assembly for offerings a thousand bullocks and seven thousand sheep; and the princes gave to the assembly a thousand bullocks and ten thousand sheep: and a great number of priests sanctified themselves.30:25 And all the assembly of Judah, with the priests and the Levites, and all the assembly that came out of Israel, and the sojourners that came out of the land of Israel, and that dwelt in Judah, rejoiced.30:26 So there was great joy in Jerusalem; for since the time of Solomon the son of David king of Israel there was not the like in Jerusalem.30:27 Then the priests the Levites arose and blessed the people: and their voice was heard, and their prayer came up to his holy habitation, even to heaven.31:1 Now when all this was finished, all Israel that were present went out to the cities of Judah, and broke in pieces the pillars, and hewed down the Asherim, and broke down the high places and the altars out of all Judah and Benjamin, in Ephraim also and Manasseh, until they had destroyed them all.  Then all the children of Israel returned, every man to his possession, into their own cities.31:2 And Hezekiah appointed the courses of the priests and the Levites after their courses, every man according to his service, both the priests and the Levites, for burnt offerings and for peace offerings, to minister, and to give thanks, and to praise in the gates of the camp of Yahweh.31:3 He appointed also the king's portion of his substance for the burnt offerings, that is, for the morning and evening burnt offerings, and the burnt offerings for the sabbaths, and for the new moons, and for the set feasts, as it is written in the law of Yahweh.31:4 Moreover he commanded the people that dwelt in Jerusalem to give the portion of the priests and the Levites, that they might give themselves to the law of Yahweh.31:5 And as soon as the commandment came abroad, the children of Israel gave in abundance the first-fruits of grain, new wine, and oil, and honey, and of all the increase of the field; and the tithe of all things brought they in abundantly.31:6 And the children of Israel and Judah, that dwelt in the cities of Judah, they also brought in the tithe of oxen and sheep, and the tithe of dedicated things which were consecrated to Yahweh their God, and laid them by heaps.31:7 In the third month they began to lay the foundation of the heaps, and finished them in the seventh month.31:8 And when Hezekiah and the princes came and saw the heaps, they blessed Yahweh, and his people Israel.31:9 Then Hezekiah questioned the priests and the Levites concerning the heaps.31:10 And Azariah the chief priest, of the house of Zadok, answered him and said, Since the people began to bring the oblations into the house of Yahweh, we have eaten and had enough, and have left plenty: for Yahweh has blessed his people; and that which is left is this great store.31:11 Then Hezekiah commanded to prepare chambers in the house of Yahweh; and they prepared them.31:12 And they brought in the oblations and the tithes and the dedicated things faithfully: and over them Conaniah the Levite was ruler, and Shimei his brother was second.31:13 And Jehiel, and Azaziah, and Nahath, and Asahel, and Jerimoth, and Jozabad, and Eliel, and Ismachiah, and Mahath, and Benaiah, were overseers under the hand of Conaniah and Shimei his brother, by the appointment of Hezekiah the king, and Azariah the ruler of the house of God.31:14 And Kore the son of Imnah the Levite, the porter at the east gate, was over the freewill-offerings of God, to distribute the oblations of Yahweh, and the most holy things.31:15 And under him were Eden, and Miniamin, and Jeshua, and Shemaiah, amariah, and Shecaniah, in the cities of the priests, in their office of trust, to give to their brethren by courses, as well to the great as to the small:31:16 besides them that were reckoned by genealogy of males, from three years old and upward, even every one that entered into the house of Yahweh, as the duty of every day required, for their service in their offices according to their courses;31:17 and them that were reckoned by genealogy of the priests by their fathers' houses, and the Levites from twenty years old and upward, in their offices by their courses;31:18 and them that were reckoned by genealogy of all their little ones, their wives, and their sons, and their daughters, through all the congregation: for in their office of trust they sanctified themselves in holiness.31:19 Also for the sons of Aaron the priests, that were in the fields of the suburbs of their cities, in every city, there were men that were mentioned by name, to give portions to all the males among the priests, and to all that were reckoned by genealogy among the Levites.31:20 And thus did Hezekiah throughout all Judah; and he wrought that which was good and right and faithful before Yahweh his God.31:21 And in every work that he began in the service of the house of God, and in the law, and in the commandments, to seek his God, he did it with all his heart, and prospered.32:1 After these things, and this faithfulness, Sennacherib king of Assyria came, and entered into Judah, and encamped against the fortified cities, and thought to win them for himself.32:2 And when Hezekiah saw that Sennacherib was come, and that he was purposed to fight against Jerusalem,32:3 he took counsel with his princes and his mighty men to stop the waters of the fountains which were without the city; and they helped him.32:4 So there was gathered much people together, and they stopped all the fountains, and the brook that flowed through the midst of the land, saying, Why should the kings of Assyria come, and find much water?32:5 And he took courage, and built up all the wall that was broken down, and raised it up to the towers, and the other wall without, and strengthened Millo in the city of David, and made weapons and shields in abundance.32:6 And he set captains of war over the people, and gathered them together to him in the broad place at the gate of the city, and spoke comfortably to them, saying,32:7 Be strong and of good courage, be not afraid nor dismayed for the king of Assyria, nor for all the multitude that is with him; for there is a greater with us than with him:32:8 with him is an arm of flesh; but with us is Yahweh our God to help us, and to fight our battles.  And the people rested themselves upon the words of Hezekiah king of Judah.32:9 After this did Sennacherib king of Assyria send his servants to Jerusalem, (now he was before Lachish, and all his power with him,) to Hezekiah king of Judah, and to all Judah that were at Jerusalem, saying,32:10 Thus says Sennacherib king of Assyria, Whereon do ye trust, that ye abide the siege in Jerusalem?32:11 Does not Hezekiah persuade you, to give you over to die by famine and by thirst, saying, Yahweh our God will deliver us out of the hand of the king of Assyria?32:12 Has not the same Hezekiah taken away his high places and his altars, and commanded Judah and Jerusalem, saying, You shall worship before one altar, and upon it shall ye burn incense?32:13 Know ye not what I and my fathers have done to all the peoples of the lands?  Were the gods of the nations of the lands in any wise able to deliver their land out of my hand?32:14 Who was there among all the gods of those nations which my fathers utterly destroyed, that could deliver his people out of my hand, that your God should be able to deliver you out of my hand?32:15 Now therefore let not Hezekiah deceive you, nor persuade you after this manner, neither believe ye him; for no god of any nation or kingdom was able to deliver his people out of my hand, and out of the hand of my fathers: how much less shall your God deliver you out of my hand?32:16 And his servants spoke yet more against Yahweh God, and against his servant Hezekiah.32:17 He wrote also letters, to rail on Yahweh, the God of Israel, and to speak against him, saying, as the gods of the nations of the lands, which have not delivered their people out of my hand, so shall not the God of Hezekiah deliver his people out of my hand.32:18 And they cried with a loud voice in the Jews' language to the people of Jerusalem that were on the wall, to affright them, and to trouble them; that they might take the city.32:19 And they spoke of the God of Jerusalem, as of the gods of the peoples of the earth, which are the work of men's hands.32:20 And Hezekiah the king, and Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz, prayed because of this, and cried to heaven.32:21 And Yahweh sent an angel, who cut off all the mighty men of valor, and the leaders and captains, in the camp of the king of Assyria.  So he returned with shame of face to his own land.  And when he was come into the house of his god, they that came forth from his own bowels slew him there with the sword.32:22 Thus Yahweh saved Hezekiah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem from the hand of Sennacherib the king of Assyria, and from the hand of all others, and guided them on every side.32:23 And many brought gifts to Yahweh to Jerusalem, and precious things to Hezekiah king of Judah; so that he was exalted in the sight of all nations from then onward.32:24 In those days Hezekiah was sick even to death: and he prayed to Yahweh; and he spoke to him, and gave him a sign.32:25 But Hezekiah rendered not again according to the benefit done to him; for his heart was lifted up: therefore there was wrath upon him, and upon Judah and Jerusalem.32:26 Notwithstanding Hezekiah humbled himself for the pride of his heart, both he and the inhabitants of Jerusalem, so that the wrath of Yahweh came not upon them in the days of Hezekiah.32:27 And Hezekiah had exceedingly much riches and honor: and he provided him treasuries for silver, and for gold, and for precious stones, and for spices, and for shields, and for all manner of goodly vessels;32:28 store-houses also for the increase of grain and new wine and oil; and stalls for all manner of beasts, and flocks in folds.32:29 Moreover he provided him cities, and possessions of flocks and herds in abundance; for God had given him very much substance.32:30 This same Hezekiah also stopped the upper spring of the waters of Gihon, and brought them straight down on the west side of the city of David.  And Hezekiah prospered in all his works.32:31 But in the business of the ambassadors of the princes of Babylon, who sent to him to inquire of the wonder that was done in the land, God left him, to try him, that he might know all that was in his heart.32:32 Now the rest of the acts of Hezekiah, and his good deeds, behold, they are written in the vision of Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz, in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel.32:33 And Hezekiah slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the ascent of the sepulchres of the sons of David: and all Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem did him honor at his death.  And Manasseh his son reigned in his stead.33:1 Manasseh was twelve years old when he began to reign; and he reigned fifty and five years in Jerusalem.33:2 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, after the abominations of the nations whom Yahweh cast out before the children of Israel.33:3 For he built again the high places which Hezekiah his father had broken down; and he reared up altars for the Baalim, and made Asheroth, and worshipped all the host of heaven, and served them.33:4 And he built altars in the house of Yahweh, whereof Yahweh said, In Jerusalem shall my name be for ever.33:5 And he built altars for all the host of heaven in the two courts of the house of Yahweh.33:6 He also made his children to pass through the fire in the valley of the son of Hinnom; and he practised augury, and used enchantments, and practised sorcery, and dealt with them that had familiar spirits, and with wizards: he wrought much evil in the sight of Yahweh, to provoke him to anger.33:7 And he set the graven image of the idol, which he had made, in the house of God, of which God said to David and to Solomon his son, In this house, and in Jerusalem, which I have chosen out of all the tribes of Israel, will I put my name for ever:33:8 neither will I any more remove the foot of Israel from off the land which I have appointed for your fathers, if only they will observe to do all that I have commanded them, even all the law and the statutes and the ordinances given by Moses.33:9 And Manasseh seduced Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem, so that they did evil more than did the nations whom Yahweh destroyed before the children of Israel.33:10 And Yahweh spoke to Manasseh, and to his people; but they gave no heed.33:11 Wherefore Yahweh brought upon them the captains of the host of the king of Assyria, who took Manasseh in chains, and bound him with fetters, and carried him to Babylon.33:12 And when he was in distress, he besought Yahweh his God, and humbled himself greatly before the God of his fathers.33:13 And he prayed to him; and he was entreated of him, and heard his supplication, and brought him again to Jerusalem into his kingdom.  Then Manasseh knew that Yahweh he was God.33:14 Now after this he built an outer wall to the city of David, on the west side of Gihon, in the valley, even to the entrance at the fish gate; and he circled Ophel about with it, and raised it up to a very great height: and he put valiant captains in all the fortified cities of Judah.33:15 And he took away the foreign gods, and the idol out of the house of Yahweh, and all the altars that he had built in the mount of the house of Yahweh, and in Jerusalem, and cast them out of the city.33:16 And he built up the altar of Yahweh, and offered upon it sacrifices of peace offerings and of thanksgiving, and commanded Judah to serve Yahweh, the God of Israel.33:17 Nevertheless the people sacrificed still in the high places, but only to Yahweh their God.33:18 Now the rest of the acts of Manasseh, and his prayer to his God, and the words of the seers that spoke to him in the name of Yahweh, the God of Israel, behold, they are written among the acts of the kings of Israel.33:19 His prayer also, and how God was entreated of him, and all his sin and his trespass, and the places in which he built high places, and set up the Asherim and the graven images, before he humbled himself: behold, they are written in the history of Hozai.33:20 So Manasseh slept with his fathers, and they buried him in his own house: and Amon his son reigned in his stead.33:21 Amon was twenty and two years old when he began to reign; and he reigned two years in Jerusalem.33:22 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, as did Manasseh his father; and Amon sacrificed to all the graven images which Manasseh his father had made, and served them.33:23 And he humbled not himself before Yahweh, as Manasseh his father had humbled himself; but this same Amon trespassed more and more.33:24 And his servants conspired against him, and put him to death in his own house.33:25 But the people of the land slew all them that had conspired against king Amon; and the people of the land made Josiah his son king in his stead.34:1 Josiah was eight years old when he began to reign; and he reigned thirty and one years in Jerusalem.34:2 And he did that which was right in the eyes of Yahweh, and walked in the ways of David his father, and turned not aside to the right hand or to the left.34:3 For in the eighth year of his reign, while he was yet young, he began to seek after the God of David his father; and in the twelfth year he began to purge Judah and Jerusalem from the high places, and the Asherim, and the graven images, and the molten images.34:4 And they broke down the altars of the Baalim in his presence; and the sun-images that were on high above them he hewed down; and the Asherim, and the graven images, and the molten images, he broke in pieces, and made dust of them, and strewed it upon the graves of them that had sacrificed to them.34:5 And he burnt the bones of the priests upon their altars, and purged Judah and Jerusalem.34:6 And so did he in the cities of Manasseh and Ephraim and Simeon, even to Naphtali, in their ruins round about.34:7 And he broke down the altars, and beat the Asherim and the graven images into powder, and hewed down all the sun-images throughout all the land of Israel, and returned to Jerusalem.34:8 Now in the eighteenth year of his reign, when he had purged the land and the house, he sent Shaphan the son of Azaliah, and Maaseiah the governor of the city, and Joah the son of Joahaz the recorder, to repair the house of Yahweh his God.34:9 And they came to Hilkiah the high priest, and delivered the money that was brought into the house of God, which the Levites, the keepers of the threshold, had gathered of the hand of Manasseh and Ephraim, and of all the remnant of Israel, and of all Judah and Benjamin, and of the inhabitants of Jerusalem.34:10 And they delivered it into the hand of the workmen that had the oversight of the house of Yahweh; and the workmen that wrought in the house of Yahweh gave it to mend and repair the house;34:11 even to the carpenters and to the builders gave they it, to buy hewn stone, and timber for couplings, and to make beams for the houses which the kings of Judah had destroyed.34:12 And the men did the work faithfully: and the overseers of them were Jahath and Obadiah, the Levites, of the sons of Merari; and Zechariah and Meshullam, of the sons of the Kohathites, to set it forward; and others of the Levites, all that were skilful with instruments of music.34:13 Also they were over the bearers of burdens, and set forward all that did the work in every manner of service: and of the Levites there were scribes, and officers, and porters.34:14 And when they brought out the money that was brought into the house of Yahweh, Hilkiah the priest found the book of the law of Yahweh given by Moses.34:15 And Hilkiah answered and said to Shaphan the scribe, I have found the book of the law in the house of Yahweh.  And Hilkiah delivered the book to Shaphan.34:16 And Shaphan carried the book to the king, and moreover brought back word to the king, saying, all that was committed to your servants, they are doing.34:17 And they have emptied out the money that was found in the house of Yahweh, and have delivered it into the hand of the overseers, and into the hand of the workmen.34:18 And Shaphan the scribe told the king, saying, Hilkiah the priest has delivered me a book.  And Shaphan read therein before the king.34:19 And it came to pass, when the king had heard the words of the law, that he rent his clothes.34:20 And the king commanded Hilkiah, and Ahikam the son of Shaphan, and Abdon the son of Micah, and Shaphan the scribe, and Asaiah the king's servant, saying,34:21 Go ye, inquire of Yahweh for me, and for them that are left in Israel and in Judah, concerning the words of the book that is found; for great is the wrath of Yahweh that is poured out upon us, because our fathers have not kept the word of Yahweh, to do according to all that is written in this book.34:22 So Hilkiah, and they whom the king had commanded, went to Huldah the prophetess, the wife of Shallum the son of Tokhath, the son of Hasrah, keeper of the wardrobe; (now she dwelt in Jerusalem in the second quarter;) and they spoke to her to that effect.34:23 And she said to them, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel: Tell ye the man that sent you to me,34:24 Thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, and upon the inhabitants thereof, even all the curses that are written in the book which they have read before the king of Judah.34:25 Because they have forsaken me, and have burned incense to other gods, that they might provoke me to anger with all the works of their hands; therefore is my wrath poured out upon this place, and it shall not be quenched.34:26 But to the king of Judah, who sent you to inquire of Yahweh, thus shall ye say to him, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel: As touching the words which you have heard,34:27 because your heart was tender, and you did humble yourself before God, when you heard his words against this place, and against the inhabitants thereof, and have humbled yourself before me, and have rent your clothes, and wept before me; I also have heard you, says Yahweh.34:28 Behold, I will gather you to your fathers, and you shall be gathered to your grave in peace, neither shall your eyes see all the evil that I will bring upon this place, and upon the inhabitants thereof.  And they brought back word to the king.34:29 Then the king sent and gathered together all the elders of Judah and Jerusalem.34:30 And the king went up to the house of Yahweh, and all the men of Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and the priests, and the Levites, and all the people, both great and small: and he read in their ears all the words of the book of the covenant that was found in the house of Yahweh.34:31 And the king stood in his place, and made a covenant before Yahweh, to walk after Yahweh, and to keep his commandments, and his testimonies, and his statutes, with all his heart, and with all his soul, to perform the words of the covenant that were written in this book.34:32 And he caused all that were found in Jerusalem and Benjamin to stand to it.  And the inhabitants of Jerusalem did according to the covenant of God, the God of their fathers.34:33 And Josiah took away all the abominations out of all the countries that pertained to the children of Israel, and made all that were found in Israel to serve, even to serve Yahweh their God.  All his days they departed not from following Yahweh, the God of their fathers.35:1 And Josiah kept a passover to Yahweh in Jerusalem: and they killed the passover on the fourteenth day of the first month.35:2 And he set the priests in their offices, and encouraged them to the service of the house of Yahweh.35:3 And he said to the Levites that taught all Israel, that were holy to Yahweh, Put the holy ark in the house which Solomon the son of David king of Israel did build; there shall no more be a burden upon your shoulders: now serve Yahweh your God, and his people Israel.35:4 And prepare yourselves after your fathers' houses by your courses, according to the writing of David king of Israel, and according to the writing of Solomon his son.35:5 And stand in the holy place according to the divisions of the fathers' houses of your brethren the children of the people, and let there be for each a portion of a fathers' house of the Levites.35:6 And kill the passover, and sanctify yourselves, and prepare for your brethren, to do according to the word of Yahweh by Moses.35:7 And Josiah gave to the children of the people, of the flock, lambs and kids, all of them for the passover offerings, to all that were present, to the number of thirty thousand, and three thousand bullocks: these were of the king's substance.35:8 And his princes gave for a freewill-offering to the people, to the priests, and to the Levites.  Hilkiah and Zechariah and Jehiel, the rulers of the house of God, gave to the priests for the passover-offerings two thousand and six hundred small cattle, and three hundred oxen.35:9 Conaniah also, and Shemaiah and Nethanel, his brethren, and Hashabiah and Jeiel and Jozabad, the chiefs of the Levites, gave to the Levites for the passover-offerings five thousand small cattle, and five hundred oxen.35:10 So the service was prepared, and the priests stood in their place, and the Levites by their courses, according to the king's commandment.35:11 And they killed the passover, and the priests sprinkled the blood which they received of their hand, and the Levites flayed them.35:12 And they removed the burnt offerings, that they might give them according to the divisions of the fathers' houses of the children of the people, to offer to Yahweh, as it is written in the book of Moses.  And so did they with the oxen.35:13 And they roasted the passover with fire according to the ordinance: and the holy offerings boiled they in pots, and in caldrons, and in pans, and carried them quickly to all the children of the people.35:14 And afterward they prepared for themselves, and for the priests, because the priests the sons of Aaron were busied in offering the burnt offerings and the fat until night: therefore the Levites prepared for themselves, and for the priests the sons of Aaron.35:15 And the singers the sons of Asaph were in their place, according to the commandment of David, and Asaph, and Heman, and Jeduthun the king's seer; and the porters were at every gate: they needed not to depart from their service; for their brethren the Levites prepared for them.35:16 So all the service of Yahweh was prepared the same day, to keep the passover, and to offer burnt offerings upon the altar of Yahweh, according to the commandment of king Josiah.35:17 And the children of Israel that were present kept the passover at that time, and the feast of unleavened bread seven days.35:18 And there was no passover like to that kept in Israel from the days of Samuel the prophet; neither did any of the kings of Israel keep such a passover as Josiah kept, and the priests, and the Levites, and all Judah and Israel that were present, and the inhabitants of Jerusalem.35:19 In the eighteenth year of the reign of Josiah was this passover kept.35:20 After all this, when Josiah had prepared the temple, Neco king of Egypt went up to fight against Carchemish by the Euphrates: and Josiah went out against him.35:21 But he sent ambassadors to him, saying, What have I to do with you, you king of Judah?  I come not against you this day, but against the house with which I have war; and God has commanded me to make haste: forbear you from meddling with God, who is with me, that he destroy you not.35:22 Nevertheless Josiah would not turn his face from him, but disguised himself, that he might fight with him, and hearkened not to the words of Neco from the mouth of God, and came to fight in the valley of Megiddo.35:23 And the archers shot at king Josiah; and the king said to his servants, Have me away; for I am sore wounded.35:24 So his servants took him out of the chariot, and put him in the second chariot that he had, and brought him to Jerusalem; and he died, and was buried in the sepulchres of his fathers.  And all Judah and Jerusalem mourned for Josiah.35:25 And Jeremiah lamented for Josiah: and all the singing men and singing women spoke of Josiah in their lamentations to this day; and they made them an ordinance in Israel: and, behold, they are written in the lamentations.35:26 Now the rest of the acts of Josiah, and his good deeds, according to that which is written in the law of Yahweh,35:27 and his acts, first and last, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah.36:1 Then the people of the land took Jehoahaz the son of Josiah, and made him king in his father's stead in Jerusalem.36:2 Joahaz was twenty and three years old when he began to reign; and he reigned three months in Jerusalem.36:3 And the king of Egypt deposed him at Jerusalem, and fined the land a hundred talents of silver and a talent of gold.36:4 And the king of Egypt made Eliakim his brother king over Judah and Jerusalem, and changed his name to Jehoiakim.  And Neco took Joahaz his brother, and carried him to Egypt.36:5 Jehoiakim was twenty and five years old when he began to reign; and he reigned eleven years in Jerusalem: and he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh his God.36:6 Against him came up Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon, and bound him in fetters, to carry him to Babylon.36:7 Nebuchadnezzar also carried of the vessels of the house of Yahweh to Babylon, and put them in his temple at Babylon.36:8 Now the rest of the acts of Jehoiakim, and his abominations which he did, and that which was found in him, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah: and Jehoiachin his son reigned in his stead.36:9 Jehoiachin was eight years old when he began to reign; and he reigned three months and ten days in Jerusalem: and he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh.36:10 And at the return of the year king Nebuchadnezzar sent, and brought him to Babylon, with the goodly vessels of the house of Yahweh, and made Zedekiah his brother king over Judah and Jerusalem.36:11 Zedekiah was twenty and one years old when he began to reign; and he reigned eleven years in Jerusalem:36:12 and he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh his God; he humbled not himself before Jeremiah the prophet speaking from the mouth of Yahweh.36:13 And he also rebelled against king Nebuchadnezzar, who had made him swear by God; he stiffened his neck,  and hardened his heart against turning to Yahweh, the God of Israel.36:14 Moreover all the chiefs of the priests, and the people, trespassed very greatly after all the abominations of the nations; and they polluted the house of Yahweh which he had hallowed in Jerusalem.36:15 And Yahweh, the God of their fathers, sent to them by his messengers, rising up early and sending, because he had compassion on his people, and on his dwelling-place:36:16 but they mocked the messengers of God, and despised his words, and scoffed at his prophets, until the wrath of Yahweh arose against his people, till there was no remedy.36:17 Therefore he brought upon them the king of the Chaldeans, who slew their young men with the sword in the house of their sanctuary, and had no compassion upon young man or virgin, old man or gray-headed: he gave them all into his hand.36:18 And all the vessels of the house of God, great and small, and the treasures of the house of Yahweh, and the treasures of the king, and of his princes, all these he brought to Babylon.36:19 And they burnt the house of God, and broke down the wall of Jerusalem, and burnt all the palaces thereof with fire, and destroyed all the goodly vessels thereof.36:20 And them that had escaped from the sword carried he away to Babylon; and they were servants to him and his sons until the reign of the kingdom of Persia:36:21 to fulfil the word of Yahweh by the mouth of Jeremiah, until the land had enjoyed its sabbaths: for as long as it lay desolate it kept sabbath, to fulfil seventy years.36:22 Now in the first year of Cyrus king of Persia, that the word of Yahweh by the mouth of Jeremiah might be accomplished, Yahweh stirred up the spirit of Cyrus king of Persia, so that he made a proclamation throughout all his kingdom, and put it also in writing, saying,36:23 Thus says Cyrus king of Persia, all the kingdoms of the earth has Yahweh, the God of heaven, given me; and he has charged me to build him a house in Jerusalem, which is in Judah.  Whosoever there is among you of all his people, Yahweh his God be with him, and let him go up.End of 2 ChroniclesEzra1:1 Now in the first year of Cyrus king of Persia, that the word of Yahweh by the mouth of Jeremiah might be accomplished, Yahweh stirred up the spirit of Cyrus king of Persia, so that he made a proclamation throughout all his kingdom, and put it also in writing, saying,1:2 Thus says Cyrus king of Persia, all the kingdoms of the earth has Yahweh, the God of heaven, given me; and he has charged me to build him a house in Jerusalem, which is in Judah.1:3 Whosoever there is among you of all his people, his God be with him, and let him go up to Jerusalem, which is in Judah, and build the house of Yahweh, the God of Israel (he is God), which is in Jerusalem.1:4 And whosoever is left, in any place where he sojourns, let the men of his place help him with silver, and with gold, and with goods, and with beasts, besides the freewill-offering for the house of God which is in Jerusalem.1:5 Then rose up the heads of fathers' houses of Judah and Benjamin, and the priests, and the Levites, even all whose spirit God had stirred to go up to build the house of Yahweh which is in Jerusalem.1:6 And all they that were round about them strengthened their hands with vessels of silver, with gold, with goods, and with beasts, and with precious things, besides all that was willingly offered.1:7 Also Cyrus the king brought forth the vessels of the house of Yahweh, which Nebuchadnezzar had brought forth out of Jerusalem, and had put in the house of his gods;1:8 even those did Cyrus king of Persia bring forth by the hand of Mithredath the treasurer, and numbered them to Sheshbazzar, the prince of Judah.1:9 And this is the number of them: thirty platters of gold, a thousand platters of silver, nine and twenty knives,1:10 thirty bowls of gold, silver bowls of a second sort four hundred and ten, and other vessels a thousand.1:11 All the vessels of gold and of silver were five thousand and four hundred.  All these did Sheshbazzar bring up, when they of the captivity were brought up from Babylon to Jerusalem.2:1 Now these are the children of the province, that went up out of the captivity of those that had been carried away, whom Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon had carried away to Babylon, and that returned to Jerusalem and Judah, every one to his city;2:2 who came with Zerubbabel, Jeshua, Nehemiah, Seraiah, Reelaiah, Mordecai, Bilshan, Mispar, Bigvai, Rehum, Baanah.  The number of the men of the people of Israel:2:3 The children of Parosh, 2,172.2:4 The children of Shephatiah, 372.2:5 The children of Arah, 775.2:6 The children of Pahath-moab, of the children of Jeshua and Joab, 2,812.2:7 The children of Elam, 1,254.2:8 The children of Zattu, 945.2:9 The children of Zaccai, 760.2:10 The children of Bani, 642.2:11 The children of Bebai, 623.2:12 The children of Azgad, 1,222.2:13 The children of Adonikam, 666.2:14 The children of Bigvai, 2,056.2:15 The children of Adin, 454.2:16 The children of Ater, of Hezekiah, 98.2:17 The children of Bezai, 323.2:18 The children of Jorah, 112.2:19 The children of Hashum, 223.2:20 The children of Gibbar, 95.2:21 The children of Beth-lehem, 123.2:22 The men of Netophah, 56.2:23 The men of Anathoth, 128.2:24 The children of Azmaveth, 42.2:25 The children of Kiriath-arim, Chephirah, and Beeroth, 743.2:26 The children of Ramah and Geba, 621.2:27 The men of Michmas, 122.2:28 The men of Beth-el and Ai, 223.2:29 The children of Nebo, 52.2:30 The children of Magbish, 156.2:31 The children of the other Elam, 1,254.2:32 The children of Harim, 320.2:33 The children of Lod, Hadid, and Ono, 725.2:34 The children of Jericho, 345.2:35 The children of Senaah, 3,630.2:36 The priests: the children of Jedaiah, of the house of Jeshua, 973.2:37 The children of Immer, 1,052.2:38 The children of Pashhur, 1,247.2:39 The children of Harim, 1,017.2:40 The Levites: the children of Jeshua and Kadmiel, of the children of Hodaviah, 74.2:41 The singers: the children of Asaph, 128.2:42 The children of the porters: the children of Shallum, the children of Ater, the children of Talmon, the children of Akkub, the children of Hatita, the children of Shobai, in all 139.2:43 The Nethinim: the children of Ziha, the children of Hasupha, the children of Tabbaoth,2:44 the children of Keros, the children of Siaha, the children of Padon,2:45 the children of Lebanah, the children of Hagabah, the children of Akkub,2:46 the children of Hagab, the children of Shamlai, the children of Hanan,2:47 the children of Giddel, the children of Gahar, the children of Reaiah,2:48 the children of Rezin, the children of Nekoda, the children of Gazzam,2:49 the children of Uzza, the children of Paseah, the children of Besai,2:50 the children of Asnah, the children of Meunim, the children of Nephisim,2:51 the children of Bakbuk, the children of Hakupha, the children of Harhur,2:52 the children of Bazluth, the children of Mehida, the children of Harsha,2:53 the children of Barkos, the children of Sisera, the children of Temah,2:54 the children of Neziah, the children of Hatipha.2:55 The children of Solomon's servants: the children of Sotai, the children of Hassophereth, the children of Peruda,2:56 the children of Jaalah, the children of Darkon, the children of Giddel,2:57 the children of Shephatiah, the children of Hattil, the children of Pochereth-hazzebaim, the children of Ami.2:58 All the Nethinim, and the children of Solomon's servants, were 392.2:59 And these were they that went up from Tel-melah, Tel-harsha, Cherub, addan, and Immer; but they could not show their fathers' houses, and their seed, whether they were of Israel:2:60 the children of Delaiah, the children of Tobiah, the children of Nekoda, 652.2:61 And of the children of the priests: the children of Habaiah, the children of Hakkoz, the children of Barzillai, who took a wife of the daughters of Barzillai the Gileadite, and was called after their name.2:62 These sought their register among those that were reckoned by genealogy, but they were not found: therefore were they deemed polluted and put from the priesthood.2:63 And the governor said to them, that they should not eat of the most holy things, till there stood up a priest with Urim and with Thummim.2:64 The whole assembly together was 42,360,2:65 besides their men-servants and their maid-servants, of whom there were 7,337: and they had 200 singing men and singing women.2:66 Their horses were 736; their mules, 245;2:67 their camels, 435; their asses, 6,720.2:68 And some of the heads of fathers' houses, when they came to the house of Yahweh which is in Jerusalem, offered willingly for the house of God to set it up in its place:2:69 they gave after their ability into the treasury of the work seventy-one thousand darics of gold, and five thousand pounds of silver, and one hundred priests' garments.2:70 So the priests, and the Levites, and some of the people, and the singers, and the porters, and the Nethinim, dwelt in their cities, and all Israel in their cities.3:1 And when the seventh month was come, and the children of Israel were in the cities, the people gathered themselves together as one man to Jerusalem.3:2 Then stood up Jeshua the son of Jozadak, and his brethren the priests, and Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and his brethren, and built the altar of the God of Israel, to offer burnt offerings upon it, as it is written in the law of Moses the man of God.3:3 And they set the altar upon its base; for fear was upon them because of the peoples of the countries: and they offered burnt offerings on it to Yahweh, even burnt offerings morning and evening.3:4 And they kept the feast of tabernacles, as it is written, and offered the daily burnt offerings by number, according to the ordinance, as the duty of every day required;3:5 and afterward the continual burnt offering, and the offerings of the new moons, and of all the set feasts of Yahweh that were consecrated, and of every one that willingly offered a freewill-offering to Yahweh.3:6 From the first day of the seventh month began they to offer burnt offerings to Yahweh: but the foundation of the temple of Yahweh was not yet laid.3:7 They gave money also to the masons, and to the carpenters; and food, and drink, and oil, to those of Sidon, and to those of Tyre, to bring cedar-trees from Lebanon to the sea, to Joppa, according to the grant that they had from Cyrus king of Persia.3:8 Now in the second year of their coming to the house of God at Jerusalem, in the second month, began Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua the son of Jozadak, and the rest of their brethren the priests and the Levites, and all they that were come out of the captivity to Jerusalem, and appointed the Levites, from twenty years old and upward, to have the oversight of the work of the house of Yahweh.3:9 Then stood Jeshua with his sons and his brethren, Kadmiel and his sons, the sons of Judah, together, to have the oversight of the workmen in the house of God: the sons of Henadad, with their sons and their brethren the Levites.3:10 And when the builders laid the foundation of the temple of Yahweh, they set the priests in their apparel with trumpets, and the Levites the sons of Asaph with cymbals, to praise Yahweh, after the order of David king of Israel.3:11 And they sang one to another in praising and giving thanks to Yahweh, saying, For he is good, for his lovingkindness endures for ever toward Israel.  And all the people shouted with a great shout, when they praised Yahweh, because of the foundation of the house of Yahweh being laid.3:12 But many of the priests and Levites and heads of fathers' houses, the old men that had seen the first house, when the foundation of this house was laid before their eyes, wept with a loud voice; and many shouted aloud for joy:3:13 such that the people could not discern the noise of the shout of joy from the noise of the weeping of the people.  For the people shouted with a loud shout, and the noise was heard afar off.4:1 Now when the adversaries of Judah and Benjamin heard that the children of the captivity were building a temple to Yahweh, the God of Israel;4:2 then they drew near to Zerubbabel, and to the heads of fathers' houses, and said to them, Let us build with you; for we seek your God, as ye do; and we sacrifice to him since the days of Esar-haddon king of Assyria, who brought us up here.4:3 But Zerubbabel, and Jeshua, and the rest of the heads of fathers' houses of Israel, said to them, You have nothing to do with us in building a house to our God; but we ourselves together will build to Yahweh, the God of Israel, as king Cyrus the king of Persia has commanded us.4:4 Then the people of the land weakened the hands of the people of Judah, and troubled them in building,4:5 and hired counsellors against them, to frustrate their purpose, all the days of Cyrus king of Persia, even until the reign of Darius king of Persia.4:6 And in the reign of Ahasuerus, in the beginning of his reign, wrote they an accusation against the inhabitants of Judah and Jerusalem.4:7 And in the days of Artaxerxes wrote Bishlam, Mithredath, Tabeel, and the rest of his companions, to Artaxerxes king of Persia; and the writing of the letter was written in the Syrian character, and set forth in the Syrian tongue.4:8 Rehum the chancellor and Shimshai the scribe wrote a letter against Jerusalem to Artaxerxes the king in this sort:4:9 then wrote Rehum the chancellor, and Shimshai the scribe, and the rest of their companions, the Dinaites, and the Apharsathchites, the Tarpelites, the Apharsites, the Archevites, the Babylonians, the Shushanchites, the Dehaites, the Elamites,4:10 and the rest of the nations whom the great and noble Osnappar brought over, and set in the city of Samaria, and in the rest of the country beyond the River, and so forth.4:11 This is the copy of the letter that they sent to Artaxerxes the king: Your servants the men beyond the River, and so forth.4:12 Be it known to the king, that the Jews that came up from you are come to us to Jerusalem; they are building the rebellious and the bad city, and have finished the walls, and repaired the foundations.4:13 Be it known now to the king, that, if this city be built, and the walls finished, they will not pay tribute, custom, or toll, and in the end it will be hurtful to the kings.4:14 Now because we eat the salt of the palace, and it is not meet for us to see the king's dishonor, therefore have we sent and certified the king;4:15 that search may be made in the book of the records of your fathers: so shall you find in the book of the records, and know that this city is a rebellious city, and hurtful to kings and provinces, and that they have moved sedition within the same of old time; for which cause was this city laid waste.4:16 We certify the king that, if this city be built, and the walls finished, by this means you shall have no portion beyond the River.4:17 Then sent the king an answer to Rehum the chancellor, and to Shimshai the scribe, and to the rest of their companions that dwell in Samaria, and in the rest of the country beyond the River: Peace, and so forth.4:18 The letter which ye sent to us has been plainly read before me.4:19 And I decreed, and search has been made, and it is found that this city of old time has made insurrection against kings, and that rebellion and sedition have been made therein.4:20 There have been mighty kings also over Jerusalem, who have ruled over all the country beyond the River; and tribute, custom, and toll, was paid to them.4:21 Make ye now a decree to cause these men to cease, and that this city be not built, until a decree shall be made by me.4:22 And take heed that you are not slack herein: why should damage grow to the hurt of the kings?4:23 Then when the copy of king Artaxerxes' letter was read before Rehum, and Shimshai the scribe, and their companions, they went in haste to Jerusalem to the Jews, and made them to cease by force and power.4:24 Then ceased the work of the house of God which is at Jerusalem; and it ceased until the second year of the reign of Darius king of Persia.5:1 Now the prophets, Haggai the prophet, and Zechariah the son of Iddo, prophesied to the Jews that were in Judah and Jerusalem; in the name of the God of Israel prophesied they to them.5:2 Then rose up Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua the son of Jozadak, and began to build the house of God which is at Jerusalem; and with them were the prophets of God, helping them.5:3 At the same time came to them Tattenai, the governor beyond the River, and Shethar-bozenai, and their companions, and said thus to them, Who gave you a decree to build this house, and to finish this wall?5:4 Then we told them after this manner, what the names of the men were that were making this building.5:5 But the eye of their God was upon the elders of the Jews, and they did not make them cease, till the matter should come to Darius, and then answer should be returned by letter concerning it.5:6 The copy of the letter that Tattenai, the governor beyond the River, and Shethar-bozenai, and his companions the Apharsachites, who were beyond the River, sent to Darius the king;5:7 they sent a letter to him, in which was written thus: To Darius the king, all peace.5:8 Be it known to the king, that we went into the province of Judah, to the house of the great God, which is built with great stones, and timber is laid in the walls; and this work goes on with diligence and prospers in their hands.5:9 Then asked we those elders, and said to them thus, Who gave you a decree to build this house, and to finish this wall?5:10 We asked them their names also, to certify you, that we might write the names of the men that were at the head of them.5:11 And thus they returned us answer, saying, We are the servants of the God of heaven and earth, and are building the house that was built these many years ago, which a great king of Israel built and finished.5:12 But after that our fathers had provoked the God of heaven to wrath, he gave them into the hand of Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon, the Chaldean, who destroyed this house, and carried the people away into Babylon.5:13 But in the first year of Cyrus king of Babylon, Cyrus the king made a decree to build this house of God.5:14 And the gold and silver vessels also of the house of God, which Nebuchadnezzar took out of the temple that was in Jerusalem, and brought into the temple of Babylon, those did Cyrus the king take out of the temple of Babylon, and they were delivered to one whose name was Sheshbazzar, whom he had made governor;5:15 and he said to him, Take these vessels, go, put them in the temple that is in Jerusalem, and let the house of God be built in its place.5:16 Then came the same Sheshbazzar, and laid the foundations of the house of God which is in Jerusalem: and since that time even until now has it been in building, and yet it is not completed.5:17 Now therefore, if it seem good to the king, let there be search made in the king's treasure-house, which is there at Babylon, whether it be so, that a decree was made of Cyrus the king to build this house of God at Jerusalem; and let the king send his pleasure to us concerning this matter.6:1 Then Darius the king made a decree, and search was made in the house of the archives, where the treasures were laid up in Babylon.6:2 And there was found at Achmetha, in the palace that is in the province of Media, a roll, and therein was thus written for a record:6:3 In the first year of Cyrus the king, Cyrus the king made a decree: Concerning the house of God at Jerusalem, let the house be built, the place where they offer sacrifices, and let the foundations thereof be strongly laid; the height thereof sixty cubits, and the breadth thereof sixty cubits;6:4 with three courses of great stones, and a course of new timber: and let the expenses be given out of the king's house.6:5 And also let the gold and silver vessels of the house of God, which Nebuchadnezzar took forth out of the temple which is at Jerusalem, and brought to Babylon, be restored, and brought again to the temple which is at Jerusalem, every one to its place; and you shall put them in the house of God.6:6 Now therefore, Tattenai, governor beyond the River, Shethar-bozenai, and your companions the Apharsachites, who are beyond the River, be ye far from there:6:7 let the work of this house of God alone; let the governor of the Jews and the elders of the Jews build this house of God in its place.6:8 Moreover I make a decree what ye shall do to these elders of the Jews for the building of this house of God: that of the king's goods, even of the tribute beyond the River, expenses be given with all diligence to these men, that they be not hindered.6:9 And that which they have need of, both young bullocks, and rams, and lambs, for burnt offerings to the God of heaven; also wheat, salt, wine, and oil, according to the word of the priests that are at Jerusalem, let it be given them day by day without fail;6:10 that they may offer sacrifices of sweet savor to the God of heaven, and pray for the life of the king, and of his sons.6:11 Also I have made a decree, that whosoever shall alter this word, let a beam be pulled out from his house, and let him be lifted up and fastened upon it; and let his house be made a dunghill for this:6:12 and the God that has caused his name to dwell there overthrow all kings and peoples that shall put forth their hand to alter the same, to destroy this house of God which is at Jerusalem.  I Darius have made a decree; let it be done with all diligence.6:13 Then Tattenai, the governor beyond the River, Shethar-bozenai, and their companions, because that Darius the king had sent, did accordingly with all diligence.6:14 And the elders of the Jews built and prospered, through the prophesying of Haggai the prophet and Zechariah the son of Iddo.  And they built and finished it, according to the commandment of the God of Israel, and according to the decree of Cyrus, and Darius, and Artaxerxes king of Persia.6:15 And this house was finished on the third day of the month Adar, which was in the sixth year of the reign of Darius the king.6:16 And the children of Israel, the priests, and the Levites, and the rest of the children of the captivity, kept the dedication of this house of God with joy.6:17 And they offered at the dedication of this house of God a hundred bullocks, two hundred rams, four hundred lambs; and for a sin offering for all Israel, twelve he-goats, according to the number of the tribes of Israel.6:18 And they set the priests in their divisions, and the Levites in their courses, for the service of God, which is at Jerusalem; as it is written in the book of Moses.6:19 And the children of the captivity kept the passover upon the fourteenth day of the first month.6:20 For the priests and the Levites had purified themselves together; all of them were pure: and they killed the passover for all the children of the captivity, and for their brethren the priests, and for themselves.6:21 And the children of Israel that were come again out of the captivity, and all such as had separated themselves to them from the filthiness of the nations of the land, to seek Yahweh, the God of Israel, did eat,6:22 and kept the feast of unleavened bread seven days with joy: for Yahweh had made them joyful, and had turned the heart of the king of Assyria to them, to strengthen their hands in the work of the house of God, the God of Israel.7:1 Now after these things, in the reign of Artaxerxes king of Persia, Ezra the son of Seraiah, the son of Azariah, the son of Hilkiah,7:2 the son of Shallum, the son of Zadok, the son of Ahitub,7:3 the son of Amariah, the son of Azariah, the son of Meraioth,7:4 the son of Zerahiah, the son of Uzzi, the son of Bukki,7:5 the son of Abishua, the son of Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the chief priest;7:6 this Ezra went up from Babylon: and he was a ready scribe in the law of Moses, which Yahweh, the God of Israel, had given; and the king granted him all his request, according to the hand of Yahweh his God upon him.7:7 And there went up some of the children of Israel, and of the priests, and the Levites, and the singers, and the porters, and the Nethinim, to Jerusalem, in the seventh year of Artaxerxes the king.7:8 And he came to Jerusalem in the fifth month, which was in the seventh year of the king.7:9 For upon the first day of the first month began he to go up from Babylon; and on the first day of the fifth month came he to Jerusalem, according to the good hand of his God upon him.7:10 For Ezra had set his heart to seek the law of Yahweh, and to do it, and to teach in Israel statutes and ordinances.7:11 Now this is the copy of the letter that the king Artaxerxes gave to Ezra the priest, the scribe, even the scribe of the words of the commandments of Yahweh, and of his statutes to Israel:7:12 Artaxerxes, king of kings, to Ezra the priest, the scribe of the law of the God of heaven, perfect and so forth.7:13 I make a decree, that all they of the people of Israel, and their priests and the Levites, in my realm, that are minded of their own free will to go to Jerusalem, go with you.7:14 Forasmuch as you are sent of the king and his seven counsellors, to inquire concerning Judah and Jerusalem, according to the law of your God which is in your hand,7:15 and to carry the silver and gold, which the king and his counsellors have freely offered to the God of Israel, whose habitation is in Jerusalem,7:16 and all the silver and gold that you shall find in all the province of Babylon, with the freewill-offering of the people, and of the priests, offering willingly for the house of their God which is in Jerusalem;7:17 therefore you shall with all diligence buy with this money bullocks, rams, lambs, with their meal offerings and their drink offerings, and shall offer them upon the altar of the house of your God which is in Jerusalem.7:18 And whatsoever shall seem good to you and to your brethren to do with the rest of the silver and the gold, that do ye after the will of your God.7:19 And the vessels that are given you for the service of the house of your God, deliver you before the God of Jerusalem.7:20 And whatsoever more shall be needful for the house of your God, which you shall have occasion to bestow, bestow it out of the king's treasure-house.7:21 And I, even I Artaxerxes the king, do make a decree to all the treasurers that are beyond the River, that whatsoever Ezra the priest, the scribe of the law of the God of heaven, shall require of you, it be done with all diligence,7:22 to a hundred talents of silver, and to a hundred measures of wheat, and to a hundred baths of wine, and to a hundred baths of oil, and salt without prescribing how much.7:23 Whatsoever is commanded by the God of heaven, let it be done exactly for the house of the God of heaven; for why should there be wrath against the realm of the king and his sons?7:24 Also we certify you, that touching any of the priests and Levites, the singers, porters, Nethinim, or servants of this house of God, it shall not be lawful to impose tribute, custom, or toll, upon them.7:25 And you, Ezra, after the wisdom of your God that is in your hand, appoint magistrates and judges, who may judge all the people that are beyond the River, all such as know the laws of your God; and teach ye him that knows them not.7:26 And whosoever will not do the law of your God, and the law of the king, let judgment be executed upon him with all diligence, whether it be to death, or to banishment, or to confiscation of goods, or to imprisonment.7:27 Blessed be Yahweh, the God of our fathers, who has put such a thing as this in the king's heart, to beautify the house of Yahweh which is in Jerusalem;7:28 and has extended lovingkindness to me before the king, and his counsellors, and before all the king's mighty princes.  And I was strengthened according to the hand of Yahweh my God upon me, and I gathered together out of Israel chief men to go up with me.8:1 Now these are the heads of their fathers' houses, and this is the genealogy of them that went up with me from Babylon, in the reign of Artaxerxes the king:8:2 Of the sons of Phinehas, Gershom.  Of the sons of Ithamar, Daniel.  Of the sons of David, Hattush.8:3 Of the sons of Shecaniah, of the sons of Parosh, Zechariah; and with him were reckoned by genealogy of the males a hundred and fifty.8:4 Of the sons of Pahath-moab, Eliehoenai the son of Zerahiah; and with him two hundred males.8:5 Of the sons of Shecaniah, the son of Jahaziel; and with him three hundred males.8:6 And of the sons of Adin, Ebed the son of Jonathan; and with him fifty males.8:7 And of the sons of Elam, Jeshaiah the son of Athaliah; and with him seventy males.8:8 And of the sons of Shephatiah, Zebadiah the son of Michael; and with him eighty males.8:9 Of the sons of Joab, Obadiah the son of Jehiel; and with him two hundred and eighteen males.8:10 And of the sons of Shelomith, the son of Josiphiah; and with him a hundred and sixty males.8:11 And of the sons of Bebai, Zechariah the son of Bebai; and with him twenty and eight males.8:12 And of the sons of Azgad, Johanan the son of Hakkatan; and with him a hundred and ten males.8:13 And of the sons of Adonikam, that were the last; and these are their names: Eliphelet, Jeuel, and Shemaiah; and with them sixty males.8:14 And of the sons of Bigvai, Uthai and Zabbud; and with them seventy males.8:15 And I gathered them together to the river that runs to Ahava; and there we encamped three days: and I viewed the people, and the priests, and found there none of the sons of Levi.8:16 Then sent I for Eliezer, for Ariel, for Shemaiah, and for Elnathan, and for Jarib, and for Elnathan, and for Nathan, and for Zechariah, and for Meshullam, chief men; also for Joiarib, and for Elnathan, who were teachers.8:17 And I sent them forth to Iddo the chief at the place Casiphia; and I told them what they should say to Iddo, and his brethren the Nethinim, at the place Casiphia, that they should bring to us ministers for the house of our God.8:18 And according to the good hand of our God upon us they brought us a man of discretion, of the sons of Mahli, the son of Levi, the son of Israel; and Sherebiah, with his sons and his brethren, eighteen;8:19 and Hashabiah, and with him Jeshaiah of the sons of Merari, his brethren and their sons, twenty;8:20 and of the Nethinim, whom David and the princes had given for the service of the Levites, two hundred and twenty Nethinim: all of them were mentioned by name.8:21 Then I proclaimed a fast there, at the river Ahava, that we might humble ourselves before our God, to seek of him a straight way for us, and for our little ones, and for all our substance.8:22 For I was ashamed to ask of the king a band of soldiers and horsemen to help us against the enemy in the way, because we had spoken to the king, saying, The hand of our God is upon all them that seek him, for good; but his power and his wrath is against all them that forsake him.8:23 So we fasted and besought our God for this: and he was entreated of us.8:24 Then I set apart twelve of the chiefs of the priests, even Sherebiah, Hashabiah, and ten of their brethren with them,8:25 and weighed to them the silver, and the gold, and the vessels, even the offering for the house of our God, which the king, and his counsellors, and his princes, and all Israel there present, had offered:8:26 I weighed into their hand six hundred and fifty talents of silver, and silver vessels a hundred talents; of gold a hundred talents;8:27 and twenty bowls of gold, of a thousand darics; and two vessels of fine bright brass, precious as gold.8:28 And I said to them, You are holy to Yahweh, and the vessels are holy; and the silver and the gold are a freewill-offering to Yahweh, the God of your fathers.8:29 Watch ye, and keep them, until ye weigh them before the chiefs of the priests and the Levites, and the princes of the fathers' houses of Israel, at Jerusalem, in the chambers of the house of Yahweh.8:30 So the priests and the Levites received the weight of the silver and the gold, and the vessels, to bring them to Jerusalem to the house of our God.8:31 Then we departed from the river Ahava on the twelfth day of the first month, to go to Jerusalem: and the hand of our God was upon us, and he delivered us from the hand of the enemy and the lier-in-wait by the way.8:32 And we came to Jerusalem, and abode there three days.8:33 And on the fourth day the silver and the gold and the vessels were weighed in the house of our God into the hand of Meremoth the son of Uriah the priest; and with him was Eleazar the son of Phinehas; and with them was Jozabad the son of Jeshua, and Noadiah the son of Binnui, the Levite;8:34 the whole by number and by weight: and all the weight was written at that time.8:35 The children of the captivity, that were come out of exile, offered burnt offerings to the God of Israel, twelve bullocks for all Israel, ninety and six rams, seventy and seven lambs, twelve he-goats for a sin offering: all this was a burnt offering to Yahweh.8:36 And they delivered the king's commissions to the king's satraps, and to the governors beyond the River: and they furthered the people and the house of God.9:1 Now when these things were done, the princes drew near to me, saying, The people of Israel, and the priests and the Levites, have not separated themselves from the peoples of the lands, doing according to their abominations, even of the Canaanites, the Hittites, the Perizzites, the Jebusites, the Ammonites, the Moabites, the Egyptians, and the Amorites.9:2 For they have taken of their daughters for themselves and for their sons, so that the holy seed have mingled themselves with the peoples of the lands: yes, the hand of the princes and rulers has been chief in this trespass.9:3 And when I heard this thing, I tore my garment and my robe, and plucked out the hair of my head and of my beard, and sat down confounded.9:4 Then were assembled to me every one that trembled at the words of the God of Israel, because of the trespass of them of the captivity; and I sat confounded until the evening oblation.9:5 And at the evening oblation I arose from my humiliation, even with my garment and my robe rent; and I fell upon my knees, and spread out my hands to Yahweh my God;9:6 and I said, O my God, I am ashamed and blush to lift up my face to you, my God; for our iniquities are increased over our head, and our guiltiness is grown up to the heavens.9:7 Since the days of our fathers we have been exceedingly guilty to this day; and for our iniquities have we, our kings, and our priests, been delivered into the hand of the kings of the lands, to the sword, to captivity, and to plunder, and to confusion of face, as it is this day.9:8 And now for a little moment grace has been shown from Yahweh our God, to leave us a remnant to escape, and to give us a nail in his holy place, that our God may lighten our eyes, and give us a little reviving in our bondage.9:9 For we are bondmen; yet our God has not forsaken us in our bondage, but has extended lovingkindness to us in the sight of the kings of Persia, to give us a reviving, to set up the house of our God, and to repair the ruins thereof, and to give us a wall in Judah and in Jerusalem.9:10 And now, O our God, what shall we say after this?  for we have forsaken your commandments,9:11 which you have commanded by your servants the prophets, saying, The land, to which ye go to possess it, is an unclean land through the uncleanness of the peoples of the lands, through their abominations, which have filled it from one end to another with their filthiness:9:12 now therefore give not your daughters to their sons, neither take their daughters to your sons, nor seek their peace or their prosperity for ever; that ye may be strong, and eat the good of the land, and leave it for an inheritance to your children for ever.9:13 And after all that is come upon us for our evil deeds, and for our great guilt, seeing that you our God have punished us less than our iniquities deserve, and have given us such a remnant,9:14 shall we again break your commandments, and join in affinity with the peoples that do these abominations?  would not you be angry with us till you hadst consumed us, so that there should be no remnant, nor any to escape?9:15 O Yahweh, the God of Israel, you are righteous; for we are left a remnant that is escaped, as it is this day: behold, we are before you in our guiltiness; for none can stand before you because of this.10:1 Now while Ezra prayed and made confession, weeping and casting himself down before the house of God, there was gathered together to him out of Israel a very great assembly of men and women and children; for the people wept very sore.10:2 And Shecaniah the son of Jehiel, one of the sons of Elam, answered and said to Ezra, We have trespassed against our God, and have married foreign women of the peoples of the land: yet now there is hope for Israel concerning this thing.10:3 Now therefore let us make a covenant with our God to put away all the wives, and such as are born of them, according to the counsel of my lord, and of those that tremble at the commandment of our God; and let it be done according to the law.10:4 Arise; for the matter belongs to you, and we are with you: be of good courage, and do it.10:5 Then arose Ezra, and made the chiefs of the priests, the Levites, and all Israel, to swear that they would do according to this word.  So they swore.10:6 Then Ezra rose up from before the house of God, and went into the chamber of Jehohanan the son of Eliashib: and when he came there, he did eat no bread, nor drink water; for he mourned because of the trespass of them of the captivity.10:7 And they made proclamation throughout Judah and Jerusalem to all the children of the captivity, that they should gather themselves together to Jerusalem;10:8 and that whosoever came not within three days, according to the counsel of the princes and the elders, all his substance should be forfeited, and himself separated from the assembly of the captivity.10:9 Then all the men of Judah and Benjamin gathered themselves together to Jerusalem within the three days; it was the ninth month, on the twentieth day of the month: and all the people sat in the broad place before the house of God, trembling because of this matter, and for the great rain.10:10 And Ezra the priest stood up, and said to them, You have trespassed, and have married foreign women, to increase the guilt of Israel.10:11 Now therefore make confession to Yahweh, the God of your fathers, and do his pleasure; and separate yourselves from the peoples of the land, and from the foreign women.10:12 Then all the assembly answered and said with a loud voice, as you have said concerning us, so must we do.10:13 But the people are many, and it is a time of much rain, and we are not able to stand outside: neither is this a work of one day or two; for we have greatly transgressed in this matter.10:14 Let now our princes be appointed for all the assembly, and let all them that are in our cities that have married foreign women come at appointed times, and with them the elders of every city, and the judges thereof, until the fierce wrath of our God be turned from us, until this matter be despatched.10:15 Only Jonathan the son of Asahel and Jahzeiah the son of Tikvah stood up against this matter: and Meshullam and Shabbethai the Levite helped them.10:16 And the children of the captivity did so.  And Ezra the priest, with certain heads of fathers' houses, after their fathers' houses, and all of them by their names, were set apart; and they sat down in the first day of the tenth month to examine the matter.10:17 And they made an end with all the men that had married foreign women by the first day of the first month.10:18 And among the sons of the priests there were found that had married foreign women: namely, of the sons of Jeshua, the son of Jozadak, and his brethren, Maaseiah, and Eliezer, and Jarib, and Gedaliah.10:19 And they gave their hand that they would put away their wives; and being guilty, they offered a ram of the flock for their guilt.10:20 And of the sons of Immer: Hanani and Zebadiah.10:21 And of the sons of Harim: Maaseiah, and Elijah, and Shemaiah, and Jehiel, and Uzziah.10:22 And of the sons of Pashhur: Elioenai, Maaseiah, Ishmael, Nethanel, Jozabad, and Elasah.10:23 And of the Levites: Jozabad, and Shimei, and Kelaiah (the same is Kelita), Pethahiah, Judah, and Eliezer.10:24 And of the singers: Eliashib.  And of the porters: Shallum, and Telem, and Uri.10:25 And of Israel: Of the sons of Parosh: Ramiah, and Izziah, and Malchijah, and Mijamin, and Eleazar, and Malchijah, and Benaiah.10:26 And of the sons of Elam: Mattaniah, Zechariah, and Jehiel, and Abdi, and Jeremoth, and Elijah.10:27 And of the sons of Zattu: Elioenai, Eliashib, Mattaniah, and Jeremoth, and Zabad, and Aziza.10:28 And of the sons of Bebai: Jehohanan, Hananiah, Zabbai, athlai.10:29 And of the sons of Bani: Meshullam, Malluch, and Adaiah, Jashub, and Sheal, Jeremoth.10:30 And of the sons of Pahath-moab: Adna, and Chelal, Benaiah, Maaseiah, Mattaniah, Bezalel, and Binnui, and Manasseh.10:31 And of the sons of Harim: Eliezer, Isshijah, Malchijah, Shemaiah, Shimeon,10:32 Benjamin, Malluch, Shemariah.10:33 Of the sons of Hashum: Mattenai, Mattattah, Zabad, Eliphelet, Jeremai, Manasseh, Shimei.10:34 Of the sons of Bani: Maadai, amram, and Uel,10:35 Benaiah, Bedeiah, Cheluhi,10:36 Vaniah, Meremoth, Eliashib,10:37 Mattaniah, Mattenai, and Jaasu,10:38 and Bani, and Binnui, Shimei,10:39 and Shelemiah, and Nathan, and Adaiah,10:40 Machnadebai, Shashai, Sharai,10:41 Azarel, and Shelemiah, Shemariah,10:42 Shallum, amariah, Joseph.10:43 Of the sons of Nebo: Jeiel, Mattithiah, Zabad, Zebina, Iddo, and Joel, Benaiah.10:44 All these had taken foreign wives; and some of them had wives by whom they had children.End of EzraNehemiah1:1 The words of Nehemiah the son of Hacaliah.  Now it came to pass in the month Chislev, in the twentieth year, as I was in Shushan the palace,1:2 that Hanani, one of my brethren, came, he and certain men out of Judah; and I asked them concerning the Jews that had escaped, that were left of the captivity, and concerning Jerusalem.1:3 And they said to me, The remnant that are left of the captivity there in the province are in great affliction and reproach: the wall of Jerusalem also is broken down, and the gates thereof are burned with fire.1:4 And it came to pass, when I heard these words, that I sat down and wept, and mourned certain days; and I fasted and prayed before the God of heaven,1:5 and said, I beseech you, O Yahweh, the God of heaven, the great and terrible God, that keeps covenant and lovingkindness with them that love him and keep his commandments:1:6 Let your ear now be attentive, and your eyes open, that you may hearken to the prayer of your servant, which I pray before you at this time, day and night, for the children of Israel your servants while I confess the sins of the children of Israel, which we have sinned against you.  Yes, I and my father's house have sinned:1:7 we have dealt very corruptly against you, and have not kept the commandments, nor the statutes, nor the ordinances, which you commanded your servant Moses.1:8 Remember, I beseech you, the word that you commanded your servant Moses, saying, If ye trespass, I will scatter you abroad among the peoples:1:9 but if ye return to me, and keep my commandments and do them, though your outcasts were in the uttermost part of the heavens, yet will I gather them from there, and will bring them to the place that I have chosen, to cause my name to dwell there.1:10 Now these are your servants and your people, whom you have redeemed by your great power, and by your strong hand.1:11 O Lord, I beseech you, let now your ear be attentive to the prayer of your servant, and to the prayer of your servants, who delight to fear your name; and prosper, I pray you, your servant this day, and grant him mercy in the sight of this man.  Now I was cupbearer to the king.2:1 And it came to pass in the month Nisan, in the twentieth year of Artaxerxes the king, when wine was before him, that I took up the wine, and gave it to the king.  Now I had not previously been sad in his presence.2:2 And the king said to me, Why is your countenance sad, seeing you are not sick?  this is nothing else but sorrow of heart.  Then I was very sore afraid.2:3 And I said to the king, Let the king live for ever: why should not my countenance be sad, when the city, the place of my fathers' sepulchres, lies waste, and the gates thereof are consumed with fire?2:4 Then the king said to me, For what do you make request?  So I prayed to the God of heaven.2:5 And I said to the king, If it please the king, and if your servant have found favor in your sight, that you would send me to Judah, to the city of my fathers' sepulchres, that I may build it.2:6 And the king said to me (the queen also sitting by him,) For how long shall your journey be?  and when will you return?  So it pleased the king to send me; and I set him a time.2:7 Moreover I said to the king, If it please the king, let letters be given me to the governors beyond the River, that they may let me pass through till I come to Judah;2:8 and a letter to Asaph the keeper of the king's forest, that he may give me timber to make beams for the gates of the castle which appertains to the house, and for the wall of the city, and for the house that I shall enter into.  And the king granted me, according to the good hand of my God upon me.2:9 Then I came to the governors beyond the River, and gave them the king's letters.  Now the king had sent with me captains of the army and horsemen.2:10 And when Sanballat the Horonite, and Tobiah the servant, the Ammonite, heard of it, it grieved them exceedingly, for that there was come a man to seek the welfare of the children of Israel.2:11 So I came to Jerusalem, and was there three days.2:12 And I arose in the night, I and some few men with me; neither told I any man what my God put into my heart to do for Jerusalem; neither was there any beast with me, save the beast that I rode upon.2:13 And I went out by night by the valley gate, even toward the jackal's well, and to the dung gate, and viewed the walls of Jerusalem, which were broken down, and the gates thereof were consumed with fire.2:14 Then I went on to the fountain gate and to the king's pool: but there was no place for the beast that was under me to pass.2:15 Then went I up in the night by the brook, and viewed the wall; and I turned back, and entered by the valley gate, and so returned.2:16 And the rulers knew not whither I went, or what I did; neither had I as yet told it to the Jews, nor to the priests, nor to the nobles, nor to the rulers, nor to the rest that did the work.2:17 Then said I to them, You see the evil case that we are in, how Jerusalem lies waste, and the gates thereof are burned with fire: come, and let us build up the wall of Jerusalem, that we be no more a reproach.2:18 And I told them of the hand of my God which was good upon me, as also of the king's words that he had spoken to me.  And they said, Let us rise up and build.  So they strengthened their hands for the good work.2:19 But when Sanballat the Horonite, and Tobiah the servant, the Ammonite, and Geshem the Arabian, heard it, they laughed us to scorn, and despised us, and said, What is this thing that ye do?  will ye rebel against the king?2:20 Then answered I them, and said to them, The God of heaven, he will prosper us; therefore we his servants will arise and build: but ye have no portion, nor right, nor memorial, in Jerusalem.3:1 Then Eliashib the high priest rose up with his brethren the priests, and they built the sheep gate; they sanctified it, and set up the doors of it; even to the tower of Hammeah they sanctified it, to the tower of Hananel.3:2 And next to him built the men of Jericho.  And next to them built Zaccur the son of Imri.3:3 And the fish gate did the sons of Hassenaah build; they laid the beams thereof, and set up the doors thereof, the bolts thereof, and the bars thereof.3:4 And next to them repaired Meremoth the son of Uriah, the son of Hakkoz.  And next to them repaired Meshullam the son of Berechiah, the son of Meshezabel.  And next to them repaired Zadok the son of Baana.3:5 And next to them the Tekoites repaired; but their nobles put not their necks to the work of their lord.3:6 And the old gate repaired Joiada the son of Paseah and Meshullam the son of Besodeiah; they laid the beams thereof, and set up the doors thereof, and the bolts thereof, and the bars thereof.3:7 And next to them repaired Melatiah the Gibeonite, and Jadon the Meronothite, the men of Gibeon, and of Mizpah, that appertained to the throne of the governor beyond the River.3:8 Next to him repaired Uzziel the son of Harhaiah, goldsmiths.  And next to him repaired Hananiah one of the perfumers, and they fortified Jerusalem even to the broad wall.3:9 And next to them repaired Rephaiah the son of Hur, the ruler of half the district of Jerusalem.3:10 And next to them repaired Jedaiah the son of Harumaph, over against his house.  And next to him repaired Hattush the son of Hashabneiah.3:11 Malchijah the son of Harim, and Hasshub the son of Pahath-moab, repaired another portion, and the tower of the furnaces.3:12 And next to him repaired Shallum the son of Hallohesh, the ruler of half the district of Jerusalem, he and his daughters.3:13 The valley gate repaired Hanun, and the inhabitants of Zanoah; they built it, and set up the doors thereof, the bolts thereof, and the bars thereof, and a thousand cubits of the wall to the dung gate.3:14 And the dung gate repaired Malchijah the son of Rechab, the ruler of the district of Beth-haccherem; he built it, and set up the doors thereof, the bolts thereof, and the bars thereof.3:15 And the fountain gate repaired Shallun the son of Colhozeh, the ruler of the district of Mizpah; he built it, and covered it, and set up the doors thereof, the bolts thereof, and the bars thereof, and the wall of the pool of Shelah by the king's garden, even to the stairs that go down from the city of David.3:16 After him repaired Nehemiah the son of Azbuk, the ruler of half the district of Beth-zur, to the place over against the sepulchres of David, and to the pool that was made, and to the house of the mighty men.3:17 After him repaired the Levites, Rehum the son of Bani.  Next to him repaired Hashabiah, the ruler of half the district of Keilah, for his district.3:18 After him repaired their brethren, Bavvai the son of Henadad, the ruler of half the district of Keilah.3:19 And next to him repaired Ezer the son of Jeshua, the ruler of Mizpah, another portion, over against the ascent to the armory at the turning of the wall.3:20 After him Baruch the son of Zabbai earnestly repaired another portion, from the turning of the wall to the door of the house of Eliashib the high priest.3:21 After him repaired Meremoth the son of Uriah the son of Hakkoz another portion, from the door of the house of Eliashib even to the end of the house of Eliashib.3:22 And after him repaired the priests, the men of the Plain.3:23 After them repaired Benjamin and Hasshub over against their house.  After them repaired Azariah the son of Maaseiah the son of Ananiah beside his own house.3:24 After him repaired Binnui the son of Henadad another portion, from the house of Azariah to the turning of the wall, and to the corner.3:25 Palal the son of Uzai repaired over against the turning of the wall, and the tower that stands out from the upper house of the king, which is by the court of the guard.  After him Pedaiah the son of Parosh repaired.3:26 (Now the Nethinim dwelt in Ophel, to the place over against the water gate toward the east, and the tower that stands out.)3:27 After him the Tekoites repaired another portion, over against the great tower that stands out, and to the wall of Ophel.3:28 Above the horse gate repaired the priests, every one over against his own house.3:29 After them repaired Zadok the son of Immer over against his own house.  And after him repaired Shemaiah the son of Shecaniah, the keeper of the east gate.3:30 After him repaired Hananiah the son of Shelemiah, and Hanun the sixth son of Zalaph, another portion.  After him repaired Meshullam the son of Berechiah over against his chamber.3:31 After him repaired Malchijah one of the goldsmiths to the house of the Nethinim, and of the merchants, over against the gate of Hammiphkad, and to the ascent of the corner.3:32 And between the ascent of the corner and the sheep gate repaired the goldsmiths and the merchants.4:1 But it came to pass that, when Sanballat heard that we were building the wall, he was angry, and took great indignation, and mocked the Jews.4:2 And he spoke before his brethren and the army of Samaria, and said, What are these feeble Jews doing? Will they fortify themselves?  will they sacrifice?  Will they make an end in a day?  Will they revive the stones out of the heaps of rubbish, seeing they are burned?4:3 Now Tobiah the Ammonite was by him, and he said, Even that which they are building, if a fox go up, he shall break down their stone wall.4:4 Hear, O our God; for we are despised: and turn back their reproach upon their own head, and give them up for a spoil in a land of captivity;4:5 and cover not their iniquity, and let not their sin be blotted out from before you; for they have provoked you to anger before the builders.4:6 So we built the wall; and all the wall was joined together to half the height thereof: for the people had a mind to work.4:7 But it came to pass that, when Sanballat, and Tobiah, and the Arabians, and the Ammonites, and the Ashdodites, heard that the repairing of the walls of Jerusalem went forward, and that the breaches began to be stopped, then they were very angry;4:8 and they conspired all of them together to come and fight against Jerusalem, and to cause confusion therein.4:9 But we made our prayer to our God, and set a watch against them day and night, because of them.4:10 And Judah said, The strength of the bearers of burdens is decayed, and there is much rubbish; so that we are not able to build the wall.4:11 And our adversaries said, They shall not know, neither see, till we come into the midst of them, and slay them, and cause the work to cease.4:12 And it came to pass that, when the Jews that dwelt by them came, they said to us ten times from all places, You must return to us.4:13 Therefore set I in the lowest parts of the space behind the wall, in the open places, I set there the people after their families with their swords, their spears, and their bows.4:14 And I looked, and rose up, and said to the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of the people, Be not ye afraid of them: remember the Lord, who is great and terrible, and fight for your brethren, your sons, and your daughters, your wives, and your houses.4:15 And it came to pass, when our enemies heard that it was known to us, and God had brought their counsel to nought, that we returned all of us to the wall, every one to his work.4:16 And it came to pass from that time forth, that half of my servants wrought in the work, and half of them held the spears, the shields, and the bows, and the coats of mail; and the rulers were behind all the house of Judah.4:17 They all built the wall and they that bore burdens laded themselves; every one with one of his hands wrought in the work, and with the other held his weapon;4:18 and the builders, every one had his sword girded by his side, and so built.  And he that sounded the trumpet was by me.4:19 And I said to the nobles, and to the rulers and to the rest of the people, The work is great and large, and we are separated upon the wall, one far from another:4:20 in what place soever ye hear the sound of the trumpet, resort ye there to us; our God will fight for us.4:21 So we wrought in the work: and half of them held the spears from the rising of the morning till the stars appeared.4:22 Likewise at the same time said I to the people, Let every one with his servant lodge within Jerusalem, that in the night they may be a guard to us, and may labor in the day.4:23 So neither I, nor my brethren, nor my servants, nor the men of the guard that followed me, none of us put off our clothes, every one went with his weapon to the water.5:1 Then there arose a great cry of the people and of their wives against their brethren the Jews.5:2 For there were that said, We, our sons and our daughters, are many: let us get grain, that we may eat and live.5:3 Some also there were that said, We are mortgaging our fields, and our vineyards, and our houses: let us get grain, because of the famine.5:4 There were also that said, We have borrowed money for the king's tribute upon our fields and our vineyards.5:5 Yet now our flesh is as the flesh of our brethren, our children as their children: and, lo, we bring into bondage our sons and our daughters to be servants, and some of our daughters are brought into bondage already: neither is it in our power to help it; for other men have our fields and our vineyards.5:6 And I was very angry when I heard their cry and these words.5:7 Then I consulted with myself, and contended with the nobles and the rulers, and said to them, You exact usury, every one of his brother.  And I held a great assembly against them.5:8 And I said to them, We after our ability have redeemed our brethren the Jews, that were sold to the nations; and would ye even sell your brethren, and should they be sold to us?  Then held they their peace, and found never a word.5:9 Also I said, The thing that ye do is not good: ought ye not to walk in the fear of our God, because of the reproach of the nations our enemies?5:10 And I likewise, my brethren and my servants, do lend them money and grain.  I pray you, let us leave off this usury.5:11 Restore, I pray you, to them, even this day, their fields, their vineyards, their oliveyards, and their houses, also the hundredth part of the money, and of the grain, the new wine, and the oil, that ye exact of them.5:12 Then said they, We will restore them, and will require nothing of them; so will we do, even as you say.  Then I called the priests, and took an oath of them, that they would do according to this promise.5:13 Also I shook out my lap, and said, So God shake out every man from his house, and from his labor, that performs not this promise; even thus be he shaken out, and emptied.  And all the assembly said, amen, and praised Yahweh.  And the people did according to this promise.5:14 Moreover from the time that I was appointed to be their governor in the land of Judah, from the twentieth year even to the two and thirtieth year of Artaxerxes the king, that is, twelve years, I and my brethren have not eaten the bread of the governor.5:15 But the former governors that were before me were chargeable to the people, and took of them bread and wine, besides forty shekels of silver; yes, even their servants bore rule over the people: but so did not I, because of the fear of God.5:16 Yes, also I continued in the work of this wall, neither bought we any land: and all my servants were gathered there to the work.5:17 Moreover there were at my table, of the Jews and the rulers, a hundred and fifty men, besides those that came to us from among the nations that were round about us.5:18 Now that which was prepared for one day was one ox and six choice sheep; also fowls were prepared for me, and once in ten days store of all sorts of wine: yet for all this I demanded not the bread of the governor, because the bondage was heavy upon this people.5:19 Remember to me, O my God, for good, all that I have done for this people.6:1 Now it came to pass, when it was reported to Sanballat and Tobiah, and to Geshem the Arabian, and to the rest of our enemies, that I had built the wall, and that there was no breach left therein; (though even to that time I had not set up the doors in the gates;)6:2 that Sanballat and Geshem sent to me, saying, Come, let us meet together in one of the villages in the plain of Ono.  But they thought to do me mischief.6:3 And I sent messengers to them, saying, I am doing a great work, so that I cannot come down: why should the work cease, whilst I leave it, and come down to you?6:4 And they sent to me four times after this sort; and I answered them after the same manner.6:5 Then sent Sanballat his servant to me in like manner the fifth time with an open letter in his hand,6:6 in which was written, It is reported among the nations, and Gashmu says it, that you and the Jews plan to rebel; for which reason you are building the wall: and you would be their king, according to these words.6:7 And you have also appointed prophets to preach about you at Jerusalem, saying, There is a king in Judah: and now shall it be reported to the king according to these words.  Come now therefore, and let us take counsel together.6:8 Then I sent word to him, saying, There are no such things done like you are saying, but you manufacture them out of your own heart.6:9 For they all would have made us afraid, saying, Their hands shall be weakened from the work, that it be not done.  But now, O God, strengthen my hands.6:10 And I went to the house of Shemaiah the son of Delaiah the son of Mehetabel, who was shut up; and he said, Let us meet together in the house of God, within the temple, and let us shut the doors of the temple: for they will come to slay you; yes, in the night will they come to slay you.6:11 And I said, Should such a man as I flee?  and who is there, that, being such as I, would go into the temple to save his life?  I will not go in.6:12 And I discerned, and, lo, God had not sent him; but he pronounced this prophecy against me: and Tobiah and Sanballat had hired him.6:13 For this cause was he hired, that I should be afraid, and do so, and sin, and that they might have matter for an evil report, that they might reproach me.6:14 Remember, O my God, Tobiah and Sanballat according to these their works, and also the prophetess Noadiah, and the rest of the prophets, that would have put me in fear.6:15 So the wall was finished in the twenty and fifth day of the month Elul, in 52 days.6:16 And it came to pass, when all our enemies heard of it, that all the nations that were about us feared, and were much cast down in their own eyes; for they perceived that this work was wrought of our God.6:17 Moreover in those days the nobles of Judah sent many letters to Tobiah, and the letters of Tobiah came to them.6:18 For there were many in Judah sworn to him, because he was the son-in-law of Shecaniah the son of Arah; and his son Jehohanan had taken the daughter of Meshullam the son of Berechiah to wife.6:19 Also they spoke of his good deeds before me, and reported my words to him.  And Tobiah sent letters to put me in fear.7:1 Now it came to pass, when the wall was built, and I had set up the doors, and the porters and the singers and the Levites were appointed,7:2 that I gave my brother Hanani, and Hananiah the governor of the castle, charge over Jerusalem; for he was a faithful man, and feared God above many.7:3 And I said to them, Let not the gates of Jerusalem be opened until the sun be hot; and while they stand on guard, let them shut the doors, and bar ye them: and appoint watches of the inhabitants of Jerusalem, every one in his watch, and every one to be over against his house.7:4 Now the city was wide and large; but the people in it were few, and the houses were not built.7:5 And my God put into my heart to gather together the nobles, and the rulers, and the people, that they might be reckoned by genealogy.  And I found the book of the genealogy of those who came up at the first, and I found written in it:7:6 These are the children of the province, that went up out of the captivity of those that had been carried away, whom Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon had carried away, and that returned to Jerusalem and to Judah, every one to his city;7:7 who came with Zerubbabel, Jeshua, Nehemiah, azariah, Raamiah, Nahamani, Mordecai, Bilshan, Mispereth, Bigvai, Nehum, Baanah.  The number of the men of the people of Israel:7:8 The children of Parosh, 2,172.7:9 The children of Shephatiah, 372.7:10 The children of Arah, 652.7:11 The children of Pahath-moab, of the children of Jeshua and Joab, 2,818.7:12 The children of Elam, 1,254.7:13 The children of Zattu, 845.7:14 The children of Zaccai, 760.7:15 The children of Binnui, 648.7:16 The children of Bebai, 628.7:17 The children of Azgad, 2,322.7:18 The children of Adonikam, 667.7:19 The children of Bigvai, 2,067.7:20 The children of Adin, 655.7:21 The children of Ater, of Hezekiah, 98.7:22 The children of Hashum, 328.7:23 The children of Bezai, 324.7:24 The children of Hariph, 112.7:25 The children of Gibeon, 95.7:26 The men of Bethlehem and Netophah, 188.7:27 The men of Anathoth, 128.7:28 The men of Beth-azmaveth, 42.7:29 The men of Kiriath-jearim, Chephirah, and Beeroth, 743.7:30 The men of Ramah and Geba, 621.7:31 The men of Michmas, 122.7:32 The men of Beth-el and Ai, 123.7:33 The men of the other Nebo, 52.7:34 The children of the other Elam, 1,254.7:35 The children of Harim, 320.7:36 The children of Jericho, 345.7:37 The children of Lod, Hadid, and Ono, 721.7:38 The children of Senaah, 3,930.7:39 The priests: The children of Jedaiah, of the house of Jeshua, 973.7:40 The children of Immer, 1,052.7:41 The children of Pashhur, 1,247.7:42 The children of Harim, 1,017.7:43 The Levites: the children of Jeshua, of Kadmiel, of the children of Hodevah, 74.7:44 The singers: the children of Asaph, 148.7:45 The porters: the children of Shallum, the children of Ater, the children of Talmon, the children of Akkub, the children of Hatita, the children of Shobai, 138.7:46 The Nethinim: the children of Ziha, the children of Hasupha, the children of Tabbaoth,7:47 the children of Keros, the children of Sia, the children of Padon,7:48 the children of Lebana, the children of Hagaba, the children of Salmai,7:49 the children of Hanan, the children of Giddel, the children of Gahar,7:50 the children of Reaiah, the children of Rezin, the children of Nekoda,7:51 the children of Gazzam, the children of Uzza, the children of Paseah.7:52 The children of Besai, the children of Meunim, the children of Nephushesim,7:53 the children of Bakbuk, the children of Hakupha, the children of Harhur,7:54 the children of Bazlith, the children of Mehida, the children of Harsha,7:55 the children of Barkos, the children of Sisera, the children of Temah,7:56 the children of Neziah, the children of Hatipha.7:57 The children of Solomon's servants: the children of Sotai, the children of Sophereth, the children of Perida,7:58 the children of Jaala, the children of Darkon, the children of Giddel,7:59 the children of Shephatiah, the children of Hattil, the children of Pochereth-hazzebaim, the children of Amon.7:60 All the Nethinim, and the children of Solomon's servants, were three hundred ninety and two.7:61 And these were they that went up from Tel-melah, Tel-harsha, Cherub, addon, and Immer; but they could not show their fathers' houses, nor their seed, whether they were of Israel:7:62 The children of Delaiah, the children of Tobiah, the children of Nekoda, six hundred forty and two.7:63 And of the priests: the children of Hobaiah, the children of Hakkoz, the children of Barzillai, who took a wife of the daughters of Barzillai the Gileadite, and was called after their name.7:64 These sought their register among those that were reckoned by genealogy, but it was not found: therefore were they deemed polluted and put from the priesthood.7:65 And the governor said to them, that they should not eat of the most holy things, till there stood up a priest with Urim and Thummim.7:66 The whole assembly together was forty and two thousand three hundred and sixty,7:67 besides their men-servants and their maid-servants, of whom there were seven thousand three hundred thirty and seven: and they had two hundred forty and five singing men and singing women.7:68 Their horses were seven hundred thirty and six; their mules, two hundred forty and five;7:69 their camels, four hundred thirty and five; their asses, six thousand seven hundred and twenty.7:70 And some from among the heads of fathers' houses gave to the work.  The governor gave to the treasury a thousand darics of gold, fifty basins, five hundred and thirty priests' garments.7:71 And some of the heads of fathers' houses gave into the treasury of the work twenty thousand darics of gold, and two thousand and two hundred pounds of silver.7:72 And that which the rest of the people gave was twenty thousand darics of gold, and two thousand pounds of silver, and sixty-seven priests' garments.7:73 So the priests, and the Levites, and the porters, and the singers, and some of the people, and the Nethinim, and all Israel, dwelt in their cities.  And when the seventh month was come, the children of Israel were in their cities.8:1 And all the people gathered themselves together as one man into the broad place that was before the water gate; and they spoke to Ezra the scribe to bring the book of the law of Moses, which Yahweh had commanded to Israel.8:2 And Ezra the priest brought the law before the assembly, both men and women, and all that could hear with understanding, upon the first day of the seventh month.8:3 And he read therein before the broad place that was before the water gate from early morning until midday, in the presence of the men and the women, and of those that could understand; and the ears of all the people were attentive to the book of the law.8:4 And Ezra the scribe stood upon a pulpit of wood, which they had made for the purpose; and beside him stood Mattithiah, and Shema, and Anaiah, and Uriah, and Hilkiah, and Maaseiah, on his right hand; and on his left hand, Pedaiah, and Mishael, and Malchijah, and Hashum, and Hashbaddanah, Zechariah, and Meshullam.8:5 And Ezra opened the book in the sight of all the people; (for he was above all the people;) and when he opened it, all the people stood up:8:6 and Ezra blessed Yahweh, the great God.  And all the people answered, amen, amen, with the lifting up of their hands: and they bowed their heads, and worshipped Yahweh with their faces to the ground.8:7 Also Jeshua, and Bani, and Sherebiah, Jamin, akkub, Shabbethai, Hodiah, Maaseiah, Kelita, azariah, Jozabad, Hanan, Pelaiah, and the Levites, caused the people to understand the law: and the people stood in their place.8:8 And they read in the book, in the law of God, distinctly; and they gave the sense, so that they understood the reading.8:9 And Nehemiah, who was the governor, and Ezra the priest the scribe, and the Levites that taught the people, said to all the people, This day is holy to Yahweh your God; mourn not, nor weep.  For all the people wept, when they heard the words of the law.8:10 Then he said to them, Go your way, eat the fat, and drink the sweet, and send portions to him for whom nothing is prepared; for this day is holy to our Lord: neither be ye grieved; for the joy of Yahweh is your strength.8:11 So the Levites stilled all the people, saying, Hold your peace, for the day is holy; neither be ye grieved.8:12 And all the people went their way to eat, and to drink, and to send portions, and to make great mirth, because they had understood the words that were declared to them.8:13 And on the second day were gathered together the heads of fathers' houses of all the people, the priests, and the Levites, to Ezra the scribe, even to give attention to the words of the law.8:14 And they found written in the law, how that Yahweh had commanded by Moses, that the children of Israel should dwell in booths in the feast of the seventh month;8:15 and that they should publish and proclaim in all their cities, and in Jerusalem, saying, Go forth to the mount, and fetch olive branches, and branches of wild olive, and myrtle branches, and palm branches, and branches of thick trees, to make booths, as it is written.8:16 So the people went forth, and brought them, and made themselves booths, every one upon the roof of his house, and in their courts, and in the courts of the house of God, and in the broad place of the water gate, and in the broad place of the gate of Ephraim.8:17 And all the assembly of them that were come again out of the captivity made booths, and dwelt in the booths; for since the days of Jeshua the son of Nun to that day had not the children of Israel done so.  And there was very great gladness.8:18 Also day by day, from the first day to the last day, he read in the book of the law of God.  And they kept the feast seven days; and on the eighth day was a solemn assembly, according to the ordinance.9:1 Now in the twenty and fourth day of this month the children of Israel were assembled with fasting, and with sackcloth, and earth upon them.9:2 And the seed of Israel separated themselves from all foreigners, and stood and confessed their sins, and the iniquities of their fathers.9:3 And they stood up in their place, and read in the book of the law of Yahweh their God a fourth part of the day; and another fourth part they confessed, and worshipped Yahweh their God.9:4 Then stood up upon the stairs of the Levites, Jeshua, and Bani, Kadmiel, Shebaniah, Bunni, Sherebiah, Bani, and Chenani, and cried with a loud voice to Yahweh their God.9:5 Then the Levites, Jeshua, and Kadmiel, Bani, Hashabneiah, Sherebiah, Hodiah, Shebaniah, and Pethahiah, said, Stand up and bless Yahweh your God from everlasting to everlasting; and blessed be your glorious name, which is exalted above all blessing and praise.9:6 You are Yahweh, even you alone; you have made heaven, the heaven of heavens, with all their host, the earth and all things that are upon it, the seas and all that is in them, and you preserve them all; and the host of heaven worships you.9:7 You are Yahweh the God, who did choose Abram, and brought him forth out of Ur of the Chaldees, and gave him the name of Abraham,9:8 and found his heart faithful before you, and made a covenant with him to give the land of the Canaanite, the Hittite, the Amorite, and the Perizzite, and the Jebusite, and the Girgashite, to give it to his seed, and have performed your words; for you are righteous.9:9 And you saw the affliction of our fathers in Egypt, and heard their cry by the Red Sea,9:10 and showed signs and wonders upon Pharaoh, and on all his servants, and on all the people of his land; for you knew that they dealt proudly against them, and you made a name for yourself, which remains to this day.9:11 And you did divide the sea before them, so that they went through the midst of the sea on the dry land; and their pursuers you did cast into the depths, as a stone into the mighty waters.9:12 Moreover in a pillar of cloud you led them by day; and in a pillar of fire by night, to give them light in the way in which they should go.9:13 You came down also upon mount Sinai, and spoke with them from heaven, and gave them right ordinances and true laws, good statutes and commandments,9:14 and made known to them your holy sabbath, and commanded them commandments, and statutes, and a law, by Moses your servant,9:15 and gave them bread from heaven for their hunger, and brought forth water for them out of the rock for their thirst, and commanded them that they should go in to possess the land which you had sworn to give them.9:16 But they and our fathers dealt proudly and hardened their neck, and hearkened not to your commandments,9:17 and refused to obey, neither were mindful of your wonders that you did among them, but hardened their neck, and in their rebellion appointed a captain to return to their bondage.  But you are a God ready to pardon, gracious and merciful, slow to anger, and abundant in lovingkindness, and forsook them not.9:18 Yes, when they had made them a molten calf, and said, This is your God that brought you up out of Egypt, and had wrought great provocations;9:19 yet you in your manifold mercies forsook them not in the wilderness: the pillar of cloud departed not from over them by day, to lead them in the way; neither the pillar of fire by night, to show them light, and the way in which they should go.9:20 You gave also your good Spirit to instruct them, and withheld not your manna from their mouth, and gave them water for their thirst.9:21 Yes, forty years did you sustain them in the wilderness, and they lacked nothing; their clothes became not old, and their feet swelled not.9:22 Moreover you gave them kingdoms and peoples, which you did allot after their portions: so they possessed the land of Sihon, even the land of the king of Heshbon, and the land of Og king of Bashan.9:23 Their children also you multiplied as the stars of heaven, and brought them into the land concerning which you did say to their fathers, that they should go in to possess it.9:24 So the children went in and possessed the land, and you subdued before them the inhabitants of the land, the Canaanites, and gave them into their hands, with their kings, and the peoples of the land, that they might do with them as they would.9:25 And they took fortified cities, and a fat land, and possessed houses full of all good things, cisterns hewn out, vineyards, and oliveyards, and fruit trees in abundance: so they did eat, and were filled, and became fat, and delighted themselves in your great goodness.9:26 Nevertheless they were disobedient, and rebelled against you, and cast your law behind their back, and slew your prophets that testified against them to turn them again to you, and they wrought great provocations.9:27 Therefore you delivered them into the hand of their adversaries, who distressed them: and in the time of their trouble, when they cried to you, you heard from heaven; and according to your manifold mercies you gave them saviours who saved them out of the hand of their adversaries.9:28 But after they had rest, they did evil again before you; therefore left you them in the hand of their enemies, so that they had the dominion over them: yet when they returned, and cried to you, you heard from heaven; and many times did you deliver them according to your mercies,9:29 and testified against them, that you might bring them again to your law.  Yet they dealt proudly, and hearkened not to your commandments, but sinned against your ordinances, (which if a man do, he shall live in them,) and withdrew the shoulder, and hardened their neck, and would not hear.9:30 Yet many years did you bear with them, and testified against them by your Spirit through your prophets: yet would they not give ear: therefore gave you them into the hand of the peoples of the lands.9:31 Nevertheless in your manifold mercies you did not make a full end of them, nor forsake them; for you are a gracious and merciful God.9:32 Now therefore, our God, the great, the mighty, and the terrible God, who keepest covenant and lovingkindness, let not all the travail seem little before you, that has come upon us, on our kings, on our princes, and on our priests, and on our prophets, and on our fathers, and on all your people, since the time of the kings of Assyria to this day.9:33 Nevertheless you are just in all that is come upon us; for you have dealt truly, but we have done wickedly;9:34 neither have our kings, our princes, our priests, nor our fathers, kept your law, nor hearkened to your commandments and your testimonies with which you did testify against them.9:35 For they have not served you in their kingdom, and in your great goodness that you gave them, and in the large and fat land which you gave before them, neither turned they from their wicked works.9:36 Behold, we are servants this day, and as for the land that you gave to our fathers to eat the fruit thereof and the good thereof, behold, we are servants in it.9:37 And it yields much increase to the kings whom you have set over us because of our sins: also they have power over our bodies, and over our cattle, at their pleasure, and we are in great distress.9:38 And yet for all this we make a sure covenant, and write it; and our princes, our Levites, and our priests, seal to it.10:1 Now those that sealed were: Nehemiah the governor, the son of Hacaliah, and Zedekiah,10:2 Seraiah, azariah, Jeremiah,10:3 Pashhur, amariah, Malchijah,10:4 Hattush, Shebaniah, Malluch,10:5 Harim, Meremoth, Obadiah,10:6 Daniel, Ginnethon, Baruch,10:7 Meshullam, abijah, Mijamin,10:8 Maaziah, Bilgai, Shemaiah; these were the priests.10:9 And the Levites: namely, Jeshua the son of Azaniah, Binnui of the sons of Henadad, Kadmiel;10:10 and their brethren, Shebaniah, Hodiah, Kelita, Pelaiah, Hanan,10:11 Mica, Rehob, Hashabiah,10:12 Zaccur, Sherebiah, Shebaniah,10:13 Hodiah, Bani, Beninu.10:14 The chiefs of the people: Parosh, Pahath-moab, Elam, Zattu, Bani,10:15 Bunni, azgad, Bebai,10:16 Adonijah, Bigvai, adin,10:17 Ater, Hezekiah, azzur,10:18 Hodiah, Hashum, Bezai,10:19 Hariph, anathoth, Nobai,10:20 Magpiash, Meshullam, Hezir,10:21 Meshezabel, Zadok, Jaddua,10:22 Pelatiah, Hanan, anaiah,10:23 Hoshea, Hananiah, Hasshub,10:24 Hallohesh, Pilha, Shobek,10:25 Rehum, Hashabnah, Maaseiah,10:26 and Ahiah, Hanan, anan,10:27 Malluch, Harim, Baanah.10:28 And the rest of the people, the priests, the Levites, the porters, the singers, the Nethinim, and all they that had separated themselves from the peoples of the lands to the law of God, their wives, their sons, and their daughters, every one that had knowledge, and understanding;10:29 They clave to their brethren, their nobles, and entered into a curse, and into an oath, to walk in God's law, which was given by Moses the servant of God, and to observe and do all the commandments of Yahweh our Lord, and his ordinances and his statutes;10:30 and that we would not give our daughters to the peoples of the land, nor take their daughters for our sons;10:31 and if the peoples of the land bring wares or any grain on the sabbath day to sell, that we would not buy of them on the sabbath, or on a holy day; and that we would forego the seventh year, and the exaction of every debt.10:32 Also we made ordinances for us, to charge ourselves yearly with the third part of a shekel for the service of the house of our God;10:33 for the showbread, and for the continual meal offering, and for the continual burnt offering, for the sabbaths, for the new moons, for the set feasts, and for the holy things, and for the sin offerings to make atonement for Israel, and for all the work of the house of our God.10:34 And we cast lots, the priests, the Levites, and the people, for the wood-offering, to bring it into the house of our God, according to our fathers' houses, at times appointed, year by year, to burn upon the altar of Yahweh our God, as it is written in the law;10:35 and to bring the first-fruits of our ground, and the first-fruits of all fruit of all manner of trees, year by year, to the house of Yahweh;10:36 also the first-born of our sons, and of our cattle, as it is written in the law, and the firstlings of our herds and of our flocks, to bring to the house of our God, to the priests that minister in the house of our God;10:37 and that we should bring the first-fruits of our dough, and our heave-offerings, and the fruit of all manner of trees, the new wine and the oil, to the priests, to the chambers of the house of our God; and the tithes of our ground to the Levites; for they, the Levites, take the tithes in all the cities of our tillage.10:38 And the priest the son of Aaron shall be with the Levites, when the Levites take tithes: and the Levites shall bring up the tithe of the tithes to the house of our God, to the chambers, into the treasure-house.10:39 For the children of Israel and the children of Levi shall bring the heave-offering of the grain, of the new wine, and of the oil, to the chambers, where are the vessels of the sanctuary, and the priests that minister, and the porters, and the singers: and we will not forsake the house of our God.11:1 And the princes of the people dwelt in Jerusalem: the rest of the people also cast lots, to bring one of ten to dwell in Jerusalem the holy city, and nine parts in the other cities.11:2 And the people blessed all the men that willingly offered themselves to dwell in Jerusalem.11:3 Now these are the chiefs of the province that dwelt in Jerusalem: but in the cities of Judah dwelt every one in his possession in their cities, that is, Israel, the priests, and the Levites, and the Nethinim, and the children of Solomon's servants.11:4 And in Jerusalem dwelt certain of the children of Judah, and of the children of Benjamin.  Of the children of Judah: Athaiah the son of Uzziah, the son of Zechariah, the son of Amariah, the son of Shephatiah, the son of Mahalalel, of the children of Perez;11:5 and Maaseiah the son of Baruch, the son of Colhozeh, the son of Hazaiah, the son of Adaiah, the son of Joiarib, the son of Zechariah, the son of the Shilonite.11:6 All the sons of Perez that dwelt in Jerusalem were four hundred sixty-eight valiant men.11:7 And these are the sons of Benjamin: Sallu the son of Meshullam, the son of Joed, the son of Pedaiah, the son of Kolaiah, the son of Maaseiah, the son of Ithiel, the son of Jeshaiah.11:8 And after him Gabbai, Sallai, nine hundred twenty and eight.11:9 And Joel the son of Zichri was their overseer; and Judah the son of Hassenuah was second over the city.11:10 Of the priests: Jedaiah the son of Joiarib, Jachin,11:11 Seraiah the son of Hilkiah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Zadok, the son of Meraioth, the son of Ahitub, the ruler of the house of God,11:12 and their brethren that did the work of the house, eight hundred twenty and two; and Adaiah the son of Jeroham, the son of Pelaliah, the son of Amzi, the son of Zechariah, the son of Pashhur, the son of Malchijah,11:13 and his brethren, chiefs of fathers' houses, two hundred forty and two; and Amashsai the son of Azarel, the son of Ahzai, the son of Meshillemoth, the son of Immer,11:14 and their brethren, mighty men of valor, a hundred twenty and eight; and their overseer was Zabdiel, the son of Haggedolim.11:15 And of the Levites: Shemaiah the son of Hasshub, the son of Azrikam, the son of Hashabiah, the son of Bunni;11:16 and Shabbethai and Jozabad, of the chiefs of the Levites, who had the oversight of the outward business of the house of God;11:17 and Mattaniah the son of Mica, the son of Zabdi, the son of Asaph, who was the chief to begin the thanksgiving in prayer, and Bakbukiah, the second among his brethren; and Abda the son of Shammua, the son of Galal, the son of Jeduthun.11:18 All the Levites in the holy city were two hundred eighty-four.11:19 Moreover the porters, akkub, Talmon, and their brethren, that kept watch at the gates, were a hundred seventy and two.11:20 And the residue of Israel, of the priests, the Levites, were in all the cities of Judah, every one in his inheritance.11:21 But the Nethinim dwelt in Ophel: and Ziha and Gishpa were over the Nethinim.11:22 The overseer also of the Levites at Jerusalem was Uzzi the son of Bani, the son of Hashabiah, the son of Mattaniah, the son of Mica, of the sons of Asaph, the singers, over the business of the house of God.11:23 For there was a commandment from the king concerning them, and a settled provision for the singers, as every day required.11:24 And Pethahiah the son of Meshezabel, of the children of Zerah the son of Judah, was at the king's hand in all matters concerning the people.11:25 And as for the villages, with their fields, some of the children of Judah dwelt in Kiriath-arba and the towns thereof, and in Dibon and the towns thereof, and in Jekabzeel and the villages thereof,11:26 and in Jeshua, and in Moladah, and Beth-pelet,11:27 and in Hazar-shual, and in Beer-sheba and the towns thereof,11:28 and in Ziklag, and in Meconah and in the towns thereof,11:29 and in En-rimmon, and in Zorah, and in Jarmuth,11:30 Zanoah, adullam, and their villages, Lachish and the fields thereof, azekah and the towns thereof.  So they encamped from Beer-sheba to the valley of Hinnom.11:31 The children of Benjamin also dwelt from Geba onward, at Michmash and Aija, and at Beth-el and the towns thereof,11:32 at Anathoth, Nob, ananiah,11:33 Hazor, Ramah, Gittaim,11:34 Hadid, Zeboim, Neballat,11:35 Lod, and Ono, the valley of craftsmen.11:36 And of the Levites, certain courses in Judah were joined to Benjamin.12:1 Now these are the priests and the Levites that went up with Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua: Seraiah, Jeremiah, Ezra,12:2 Amariah, Malluch, Hattush,12:3 Shecaniah, Rehum, Meremoth,12:4 Iddo, Ginnethoi, abijah,12:5 Mijamin, Maadiah, Bilgah,12:6 Shemaiah, and Joiarib, Jedaiah.12:7 Sallu, amok, Hilkiah, Jedaiah.  These were the chiefs of the priests and of their brethren in the days of Jeshua.12:8 Moreover the Levites: Jeshua, Binnui, Kadmiel, Sherebiah, Judah, and Mattaniah, who was over the thanksgiving, he and his brethren.12:9 Also Bakbukiah and Unno, their brethren, were over against them according to their offices.12:10 And Jeshua begat Joiakim, and Joiakim begat Eliashib, and Eliashib begat Joiada,12:11 and Joiada begat Jonathan, and Jonathan begat Jaddua.12:12 And in the days of Joiakim were priests, heads of fathers' houses: of Seraiah, Meraiah; of Jeremiah, Hananiah;12:13 of Ezra, Meshullam; of Amariah, Jehohanan;12:14 of Malluchi, Jonathan; of Shebaniah, Joseph;12:15 of Harim, adna; of Meraioth, Helkai;12:16 of Iddo, Zechariah; of Ginnethon, Meshullam;12:17 of Abijah, Zichri; of Miniamin, of Moadiah, Piltai;12:18 of Bilgah, Shammua; of Shemaiah, Jehonathan;12:19 and of Joiarib, Mattenai; of Jedaiah, Uzzi;12:20 of Sallai, Kallai; of Amok, Eber;12:21 of Hilkiah, Hashabiah; of Jedaiah, Nethanel.12:22 As for the Levites, in the days of Eliashib, Joiada, and Johanan, and Jaddua, there were recorded the heads of fathers' houses; also the priests, in the reign of Darius the Persian.12:23 The sons of Levi, heads of fathers' houses, were written in the book of the chronicles, even until the days of Johanan the son of Eliashib.12:24 And the chiefs of the Levites: Hashabiah, Sherebiah, and Jeshua the son of Kadmiel, with their brethren over against them, to praise and give thanks, according to the commandment of David the man of God, watch next to watch.12:25 Mattaniah, and Bakbukiah, Obadiah, Meshullam, Talmon, akkub, were porters keeping the watch at the store-houses of the gates.12:26 These were in the days of Joiakim the son of Jeshua, the son of Jozadak, and in the days of Nehemiah the governor, and of Ezra the priest the scribe.12:27 And at the dedication of the wall of Jerusalem they sought the Levites out of all their places, to bring them to Jerusalem, to keep the dedication with gladness, both with thanksgivings, and with singing, with cymbals, psalteries, and with harps.12:28 And the sons of the singers gathered themselves together, both out of the plain round about Jerusalem, and from the villages of the Netophathites;12:29 also from Beth-gilgal, and out of the fields of Geba and Azmaveth: for the singers had built them villages round about Jerusalem.12:30 And the priests and the Levites purified themselves; and they purified the people, and the gates, and the wall.12:31 Then I brought up the princes of Judah upon the wall, and appointed two great companies that gave thanks and went in procession; whereof one went on the right hand upon the wall toward the dung gate:12:32 and after them went Hoshaiah, and half of the princes of Judah,12:33 and Azariah, Ezra, and Meshullam,12:34 Judah, and Benjamin, and Shemaiah, and Jeremiah,12:35 and certain of the priests' sons with trumpets: Zechariah the son of Jonathan, the son of Shemaiah, the son of Mattaniah, the son of Micaiah, the son of Zaccur, the son of Asaph;12:36 and his brethren, Shemaiah, and Azarel, Milalai, Gilalai, Maai, Nethanel, and Judah, Hanani, with the musical instruments of David the man of God; and Ezra the scribe was before them.12:37 And by the fountain gate, and straight before them, they went up by the stairs of the city of David, at the ascent of the wall, above the house of David, even to the water gate eastward.12:38 And the other company of them that gave thanks went to meet them, and I after them, with the half of the people, upon the wall, above the tower of the furnaces, even to the broad wall,12:39 and above the gate of Ephraim, and by the old gate, and by the fish gate, and the tower of Hananel, and the tower of Hammeah, even to the sheep gate: and they stood still in the gate of the guard.12:40 So stood the two companies of them that gave thanks in the house of God, and I, and the half of the rulers with me;12:41 and the priests, Eliakim, Maaseiah, Miniamin, Micaiah, Elioenai, Zechariah, and Hananiah, with trumpets;12:42 and Maaseiah, and Shemaiah, and Eleazar, and Uzzi, and Jehohanan, and Malchijah, and Elam, and Ezer.  And the singers sang loud, with Jezrahiah their overseer.12:43 And they offered great sacrifices that day, and rejoiced; for God had made them rejoice with great joy; and the women also and the children rejoiced: so that the joy of Jerusalem was heard even afar off.12:44 And on that day were men appointed over the chambers for the treasures, for the heave-offerings, for the first-fruits, and for the tithes, to gather into them, according to the fields of the cities, the portions appointed by the law for the priests and Levites: for Judah rejoiced for the priests and for the Levites that waited.12:45 And they kept the charge of their God, and the charge of the purification, and so did the singers and the porters, according to the commandment of David, and of Solomon his son.12:46 For in the days of David and Asaph of old there was a chief of the singers, and songs of praise and thanksgiving to God.12:47 And all Israel in the days of Zerubbabel, and in the days of Nehemiah, gave the portions of the singers and the porters, as every day required: and they set apart that which was for the Levites; and the Levites set apart that which was for the sons of Aaron.13:1 On that day they read in the book of Moses in the audience of the people; and therein was found written, that an Ammonite and a Moabite should not enter into the assembly of God for ever,13:2 because they met not the children of Israel with bread and with water, but hired Balaam against them, to curse them: even so our God turned the curse into a blessing.13:3 And it came to pass, when they had heard the law, that they separated from Israel all the mixed multitude.13:4 Now before this, Eliashib the priest, who was appointed over the chambers of the house of our God, being allied to Tobiah,13:5 had prepared for him a great chamber, where aforetime they laid the meal offerings, the frankincense, and the vessels, and the tithes of the grain, the new wine, and the oil, which were given by commandment to the Levites, and the singers, and the porters; and the heave-offerings for the priests.13:6 But in all this time I was not at Jerusalem; for in the two and thirtieth year of Artaxerxes king of Babylon I went to the king: and after certain days asked I leave of the king,13:7 and I came to Jerusalem, and understood the evil that Eliashib had done for Tobiah, in preparing him a chamber in the courts of the house of God.13:8 And it grieved me sore: therefore I cast forth all the household stuff of Tobiah out of the chamber.13:9 Then I commanded, and they cleansed the chambers: and there brought I again the vessels of the house of God, with the meal offerings and the frankincense.13:10 And I perceived that the portions of the Levites had not been given them; so that the Levites and the singers, that did the work, were fled every one to his field.13:11 Then contended I with the rulers, and said, Why is the house of God forsaken?  And I gathered them together, and set them in their place.13:12 Then brought all Judah the tithe of the grain and the new wine and the oil to the treasuries.13:13 And I made treasurers over the treasuries, Shelemiah the priest, and Zadok the scribe, and of the Levites, Pedaiah: and next to them was Hanan the son of Zaccur, the son of Mattaniah; for they were counted faithful, and their business was to distribute to their brethren.13:14 Remember me, O my God, concerning this, and wipe not out my good deeds that I have done for the house of my God, and for the observances thereof.13:15 In those days saw I in Judah some men treading wine-presses on the sabbath, and bringing in sheaves, and loading asses with them; as also wine, grapes, and figs, and all manner of burdens, which they brought into Jerusalem on the sabbath day: and I testified to them in the day they sold food.13:16 There dwelt men of Tyre also within in, who brought in fish, and all manner of wares, and sold on the sabbath to the children of Judah, and in Jerusalem.13:17 Then I contended with the nobles of Judah, and said to them, What evil thing is this that ye do, and profane the sabbath day?13:18 Did not your fathers do the same, and then did not our God bring all this evil upon us, and upon this city?  yet ye bring more wrath upon Israel by profaning the sabbath.13:19 And it came to pass that, when the gates of Jerusalem began to be dark before the sabbath, I commanded that the doors be shut, and commanded that they not be opened till after the sabbath: and some of my servants I set over the gates, that there should be no cargo brought in on the sabbath day.13:20 So the merchants and sellers of all kinds of wares lodged outside Jerusalem once or twice.13:21 Then I testified against them, and said to them, Why lodge ye around the wall?  if ye do so again, I will lay hands on you.  From that time on they came no more on the sabbath.13:22 And I commanded the Levites that they should purify themselves, and that they should come and keep the gates, to sanctify the sabbath day.  Remember on my account, O my God, this also, and spare me according to the greatness of your lovingkindness.13:23 In those days also saw I the Jews that had married women of Ashdod, of Ammon, and of Moab:13:24 and their children spoke half in the speech of Ashdod, and could not speak in the Jews' language, but according to the language of each people.13:25 And I contended with them, and cursed them, and smote certain of them, and plucked off their hair, and made them swear by God, saying, You shall not give your daughters to their sons, nor take their daughters for your sons, or for yourselves.13:26 Did not Solomon king of Israel sin by these things?  yet among many nations was there no king like him, and he was beloved of his God, and God made him king over all Israel: nevertheless even him did foreign women cause to sin.13:27 Shall we then hearken to you to do all this great evil, to trespass against our God in marrying foreign women?13:28 And one of the sons of Joiada, the son of Eliashib the high priest, was son-in-law to Sanballat the Horonite: therefore I chased him from me.13:29 Remember them, O my God, because they have defiled the priesthood, and the covenant of the priesthood, and of the Levites.13:30 Thus cleansed I them from all foreigners, and appointed charges for the priests and for the Levites, every one in his work;13:31 and for the wood-offering, at times appointed, and for the first-fruits.  Remember me, O my God, for good.End of NehemiahEsther1:1 Now it came to pass in the days of Ahasuerus (this is the Ahasuerus who reigned from India all the way to Ethiopia, over a hundred and twenty-seven provinces),1:2 that in those days, when Ahasuerus the king sat on the throne of his kingdom, which was in Shushan the fortress,1:3 in the third year of his reign, he made a feast for all his princes and his servants; with the power of Persia and Media, the nobles and princes of the provinces, all before him;1:4 as he showed the riches of his glorious kingdom and the honor of his excellent majesty for many days, even 180 days.1:5 And when these days were fulfilled, the king made a feast for all the people that were present in Shushan the fortress both great and small, for seven days, in the court of the garden of the king's palace.1:6 There were hangings of white cloth, of green, and of blue, fastened with cords of fine linen and purple to silver rings and pillars of marble: the couches were of gold and silver, upon a pavement of red, and white, and yellow, and black marble.1:7 And they gave them drink in vessels of gold (the vessels being diverse one from another), and royal wine in abundance, according to the bounty of the king.1:8 And the drinking was according to this law: "There is no compulsion;" for the king had given orders to all the officers of his house, that each should do as each one wished in this regard.1:9 And Vashti the queen also made a feast for the women in the royal house which belonged to king Ahasuerus.1:10 On the seventh day, when the heart of the king was merry with wine, he commanded Mehuman, Biztha, Harbona, Bigtha, and Abagtha, Zethar, and Carcas, the seven eunuchs that served in the presence of Ahasuerus the king,1:11 to bring Vashti the queen before the king with the royal crown, to show to the peoples and the princes her beauty; for she was lovely to look upon.1:12 But Vashti the queen refused to come at the king's commandment by the eunuchs: therefore the king became very angry, and his anger burned within him.1:13 Then the king said to the wise men, who knew the times, (for so was the king's manner toward all that knew law and judgment;1:14 and the men next to him were Carshena, Shethar, admatha, Tarshish, Meres, Marsena, and Memucan, the seven princes of Persia and Media, who saw the king's face,  and sat first in the kingdom),1:15 What shall we do to the queen Vashti according to law, because she has not done the bidding of the king Ahasuerus by the eunuchs?1:16 And Memucan answered before the king and the princes, Vashti the queen has not done wrong to the king only, but also to all the princes, and to all the peoples that are in all the provinces of the king Ahasuerus.1:17 For this deed of the queen will go abroad to all women, to make their husbands contemptible in their eyes, when it shall be reported, The king Ahasuerus commanded Vashti the queen to be brought in before him, but she did not come.1:18 And this day will the princesses of Persia and Media who have heard of the deed of the queen say the same to all the king's princes.  So will there arise much contempt and wrath.1:19 If it please the king, let there go forth a royal commandment from him, and let it be written among the laws of the Persians and the Medes, so it not be altered, that Vashti may come no longer before king Ahasuerus; and let the king give her royal estate to another who is better than she.1:20 And when the king's decree which he shall make shall be published throughout all his kingdom (for it is great), all the wives will give to their husbands honor, high and low alike.1:21 And this saying pleased the king and the princes; and the king did according to the word of Memucan:1:22 for he sent letters into all the king's provinces, into every province in its own writing, to every people in their own language, that every man be master in his own houshold, and speak according to the language of his own people.2:1 After these things, when the wrath of king Ahasuerus was pacified, he remembered Vashti, and what she had done, and what was decreed against her.2:2 Then said the king's servants that ministered to him, Let there be fair young virgins sought for the king:2:3 and let the king appoint officers in all the provinces of his kingdom, that they may gather together all the beautiful young virgins to Shushan the fortress, to the house of the women, to the custody of Hegai the king's eunuch, keeper of the women; and let cosmetics be given to them;2:4 and let the maiden that pleases the king be queen in place of Vashti.  And this pleased the king; and he did so.2:5 There was a certain Jew in Shushan the fortress, whose name was Mordecai, the son of Jair, the son of Shimei, the son of Kish, a Benjamite,2:6 who had been carried away from Jerusalem with the captives that had been carried away with Jeconiah king of Judah, whom Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon had carried away.2:7 And he had brought up Hadassah, that is, Esther, his uncle's daughter: for she had neither father nor mother, and the maiden was lovely and beautiful; and when her father and mother were dead, Mordecai took her as his own daughter.2:8 So it came to pass, when the king's commandment and his decree were heard, and when many maidens were gathered together to Shushan the fortress, to the custody of Hegai, that Esther was taken into the king's house, to the custody of Hegai, keeper of the women.2:9 And the maiden pleased him, and she obtained kindness from him; and he speedily gave her her cosmetics, with her portion of food, and the seven maidens who were chosen for her out of the king's house: and he trasnsferred her and her maidens to the best place in the house of the women.2:10 Esther had not made known her people or kindred; for Mordecai had commanded her not to make it known.2:11 And Mordecai walked every day before the court of the women's house, to know how Esther did, and what would become of her.2:12 Now when the turn of every maiden was come to go in to king Ahasuerus, once it had been done to her according to the law for the women twelve months (for so were the days of their beautifications accomplished, that is, six months with oil of myrrh, and six months with sweet odors and with the things for the beautifying of the women),2:13 then in this wise came the maiden to the king: whatsoever she desired was given her to go with her out of the house of the women to the king's house.2:14 In the evening she went, and on the morrow she returned into the second house of the women, to the custody of Shaashgaz, the king's eunuch, who kept the concubines: she came in to the king no more, except the king delighted in her, and she were called by name.2:15 Now when the turn of Esther, the daughter of Abihail the uncle of Mordecai, who had taken her for his daughter, was come to go in to the king, she required nothing but what Hegai the king's eunuch, the keeper of the women, appointed.  And Esther obtained favor in the sight of all them that looked upon her.2:16 So Esther was taken to king Ahasuerus into his house royal in the tenth month, which is the month Tebeth, in the seventh year of his reign.2:17 And the king loved Esther above all the women, and she obtained favor and kindness in his sight more than all the virgins; so that he set the royal crown upon her head, and made her queen instead of Vashti.2:18 Then the king made a great feast to all his princes and his servants, even Esther's feast; and he made a release to the provinces, and gave gifts, according to the bounty of the king.2:19 And when the virgins were gathered together the second time, then Mordecai was sitting in the king's gate.2:20 Esther had not yet made known her kindred nor her people; as Mordecai had charged her: for Esther did the commandment of Mordecai, like as when she was brought up with him.2:21 In those days, while Mordecai was sitting in the king's gate, two of the king's eunuchs, Bigthan and Teresh, of those that kept the threshold, were angry, and sought to assassinate  the king Ahasuerus.2:22 And the thing became known to Mordecai, who showed it to Esther the queen; and Esther told the king of it in Mordecai's name.2:23 And when inquisition was made of the matter, and it was found to be so, they were both hanged on a tree: and it was written in the book of the chronicles before the king.3:1 After these things did king Ahasuerus promote Haman the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, and advanced him, and set his seat above all the princes that were with him.3:2 And all the king's servants, that were in the king's gate, bowed down, and did reverence to Haman; for the king had so commanded concerning him.  But Mordecai bowed not down, nor did him reverence.3:3 Then the king's servants, that were in the king's gate, said to Mordecai, Why transgress you the king's commandment?3:4 Now it came to pass, when they spoke daily to him, and he hearkened not to them, that they told Haman, to see whether Mordecai's matters would stand: for he had told them that he was a Jew.3:5 And when Haman saw that Mordecai bowed not down, nor did him reverence, then was Haman full of wrath.3:6 But he thought scorn to lay hands on Mordecai alone; for they had made known to him the people of Mordecai: therefore Haman sought to destroy all the Jews that were throughout the whole kingdom of Ahasuerus, even the people of Mordecai.3:7 In the first month, which is the month Nisan, in the twelfth year of king Ahasuerus, they cast Pur, that is, the lot, before Haman from day to day, and from month to month, to the twelfth month, which is the month Adar.3:8 And Haman said to king Ahasuerus, There is a certain people scattered abroad and dispersed among the peoples in all the provinces of your kingdom; and their laws are different from those of every other people; neither keep they the king's laws: therefore it is not to the king's profit to tolerate them.3:9 If it please the king, let it be written that they be destroyed: and I will pay ten thousand talents of silver into the hands of those that have the charge of the king's business, to bring it into the king's treasuries.3:10 And the king took his ring from his hand, and gave it to Haman the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, the Jews' enemy.3:11 And the king said to Haman, The silver is given to you, the people also, to do with them as it seems good to you.3:12 Then were the king's scribes called in the first month, on the thirteenth day thereof; and there was written according to all that Haman commanded to the king's satraps, and to the governors that were over every province, and to the princes of every people, to every province according to the writing thereof, and to every people after their language; in the name of king Ahasuerus was it written, and it was sealed with the king's ring.3:13 And letters were sent by posts into all the king's provinces, to destroy, to slay, and to cause to perish, all Jews, both young and old, little children and women, in one day, even upon the thirteenth day of the twelfth month, which is the month Adar, and to take the spoil of them for a prey.3:14 A copy of the writing, that the decree should be given out in every province, was published to all the peoples, that they should be ready against that day.3:15 The posts went forth in haste by the king's commandment, and the decree was given out in Shushan the palace.  And the king and Haman sat down to drink; but the city of Shushan was perplexed.4:1 Now when Mordecai knew all that was done, Mordecai rent his clothes, and put on sackcloth with ashes, and went out into the midst of the city, and cried with a loud and a bitter cry;4:2 and he came right up to the king's gate: for no one may enter within the king's gate clothed with sackcloth.4:3 And in every province, wherever the king's commandment and his decree came, there was great mourning among the Jews, and fasting, and weeping, and wailing; and many lay in sackcloth and ashes.4:4 And Esther's maidens and her eunuchs came and told it to her; and the queen was exceedingly grieved: and she sent raiment to clothe Mordecai, and to take his sackcloth from off him; but he did not take it.4:5 Then called Esther for Hathach, one of the king's eunuchs, whom he had appointed to attend upon her, and charged him to go to Mordecai, to know what this was, and why it was.4:6 So Hathach went forth to Mordecai to the broad place of the city, which was before the king's gate.4:7 And Mordecai told him of all that had happened to him, and the exact sum of the money that Haman had promised to pay to the king's treasuries for the Jews, to destroy them.4:8 Also he gave him the copy of the writing of the decree that was given out in Shushan to destroy them, to show it to Esther, and to declare it to her, and to charge her that she should go in to the king, to make supplication to him, and to make request before him, for her people.4:9 And Hathach came and told Esther the words of Mordecai.4:10 Then Esther spoke to Hathach, and gave him a message to Mordecai saying:4:11 All the king's servants, and the people of the king's provinces, do know, that whosoever, whether man or woman, shall come to the king into the inner court, who is not called, there is one law for him, that he be put to death, except those to whom the king shall hold out the golden sceptre, that he may live: but I have not been called to come in to the king these thirty days.4:12 And they told to Mordecai Esther's words.4:13 Then Mordecai told them to reply to Esther: Think not to yourself that you shall escape in the king's house any more than the rest of the Jews.4:14 For if you altogether hold your peace at this time, then will relief and deliverance arise to the Jews from another place, but you and your father's house will perish: and who knows whether you are not come to the kingdom for such a time as this?4:15 Then Esther told them to reply to Mordecai,4:16 Go, gather together all the Jews that are present in Shushan, and fast ye for me, and neither eat nor drink three days, night or day: I also and my maidens will fast in like manner; and so will I go in to the king, which is not according to the law: and if I perish, I perish.4:17 So Mordecai went his way, and did according to all that Esther had commanded him.5:1 Now it came to pass on the third day, that Esther put on her royal apparel, and stood in the inner court of the king's house, over against the king's house: and the king sat upon his royal throne in the royal house, over against the entrance of the house.5:2 And it was so, when the king saw Esther the queen standing in the court, that she obtained favor in his sight; and the king held out to Esther the golden sceptre that was in his hand.  So Esther drew near, and touched the top of the sceptre.5:3 Then said the king to her, What will you, queen Esther?  and what is your request?  it shall be given you even to the half of the kingdom.5:4 And Esther said, If it seem good to the king, let the king and Haman come this day to the banquet that I have prepared for him.5:5 Then the king said, Cause Haman to make haste, that it may be done as Esther has said.  So the king and Haman came to the banquet that Esther had prepared.5:6 And the king said to Esther at the banquet of wine, What is your petition?  and it shall be granted you: and what is your request?  even to the half of the kingdom it shall be performed.5:7 Then answered Esther, and said, My petition and my request is:5:8 if I have found favor in the sight of the king, and if it please the king to grant my petition, and to perform my request, let the king and Haman come to the banquet that I shall prepare for them, and I will do tomorrow as the king has said.5:9 Then went Haman forth that day joyful and glad of heart: but when Haman saw Mordecai in the king's gate, that he stood not up nor moved for him, he was filled with wrath against Mordecai.5:10 Nevertheless Haman refrained himself, and went home; and he sent and fetched his friends and Zeresh his wife.5:11 And Haman recounted to them the glory of his riches, and the multitude of his children, and all the things in which the king had promoted him, and how he had advanced him above the princes and servants of the king.5:12 Haman said moreover, Yes, Esther the queen did let no man come in with the king to the banquet that she had prepared but myself; and tomorrow also am I invited by her together with the king.5:13 Yet all this avails me nothing, so long as I see Mordecai the Jew sitting at the king's gate.5:14 Then said Zeresh his wife and all his friends to him, Let a gallows be made fifty cubits high, and in the morning speak to the king that Mordecai may be hanged upon it: then go you in merrily with the king to the banquet.  And the thing pleased Haman; and he caused the gallows to be made.6:1 On that night could not the king sleep; and he commanded to bring the book of records of the chronicles, and they were read before the king.6:2 And it was found written, that Mordecai had told of Bigthana and Teresh, two of the king's eunuchs, of those that kept the threshold, who had sought to lay hands on the king Ahasuerus.6:3 And the king said, What honor and dignity has been bestowed on Mordecai for this?  Then said the king's servants that ministered to him, There is nothing done for him.6:4 And the king said, Who is in the court?  Now Haman was come into the outward court of the king's house, to speak to the king to hang Mordecai on the gallows that he had prepared for him.6:5 And the king's servants said to him, Behold, Haman stands in the court.  And the king said, Let him come in.6:6 So Haman came in.  And the king said to him, What shall be done to the man whom the king delights to honor?  Now Haman said in his heart, To whom would the king delight to do honor more than to myself?6:7 And Haman said to the king, For the man whom the king delights to honor,6:8 let royal apparel be brought which the king uses to wear, and the horse that the king rides upon, and on the head of which a crown royal is set:6:9 and let the apparel and the horse be delivered to the hand of one of the king's most noble princes, that they may array the man with it whom the king delights to honor, and cause him to ride on horseback through the street of the city, and proclaim before him, Thus shall it be done to the man whom the king delights to honor.6:10 Then the king said to Haman, Make haste, and take the apparel and the horse, as you have said, and do even so to Mordecai the Jew, that sits at the king's gate: let nothing fail of all that you have spoken.6:11 Then took Haman the apparel and the horse, and arrayed Mordecai, and caused him to ride through the street of the city, and proclaimed before him, Thus shall it be done to the man whom the king delights to honor.6:12 And Mordecai came again to the king's gate.  But Haman hasted to his house, mourning and having his head covered.6:13 And Haman recounted to Zeresh his wife and all his friends everything that had befallen him.  Then said his wise men and Zeresh his wife to him, If Mordecai, before whom you have begun to fall, be of the seed of the Jews, you shall not prevail against him, but shall surely fall before him.6:14 While they were yet talking with him, came the king's eunuchs, and hasted to bring Haman to the banquet that Esther had prepared.7:1 So the king and Haman came to banquet with Esther the queen.7:2 And the king said again to Esther on the second day at the banquet of wine, What is your petition, queen Esther?  and it shall be granted you: and what is your request?  even to the half of the kingdom it shall be performed.7:3 Then Esther the queen answered and said, If I have found favor in your sight, O king, and if it please the king, let my life be given me at my petition, and my people at my request:7:4 for we are sold, I and my people, to be destroyed, to be slain, and to perish.  But if we had been sold for bondmen and bondwomen, I had held my peace, although the adversary could not have compensated for the king's damage.7:5 Then spoke the king Ahasuerus and said to Esther the queen, Who is he, and where is he, that durst presume in his heart to do so?7:6 And Esther said, an adversary and an enemy, even this wicked Haman.  Then Haman was afraid before the king and the queen.7:7 And the king arose in his wrath from the banquet of wine and went into the palace garden: and Haman stood up to make request for his life to Esther the queen; for he saw that there was evil determined against him by the king.7:8 Then the king returned out of the palace garden into the place of the banquet of wine; and Haman was fallen upon the couch whereon Esther was.  Then said the king, Will he even force the queen before me in the house?  As the word went out of the king's mouth, they covered Haman's face.7:9 Then said Harbonah, one of the eunuchs that were before the king, Behold also, the gallows fifty cubits high, which Haman has made for Mordecai, who spoke good for the king, stands in the house of Haman.  And the king said, Hang him upon it.7:10 So they hanged Haman on the gallows that he had prepared for Mordecai.  Then was the king's wrath pacified.8:1 On that day did the king Ahasuerus give the house of Haman the Jews' enemy to Esther the queen.  And Mordecai came before the king; for Esther had told what he was to her.8:2 And the king took off his ring, which he had taken from Haman, and gave it to Mordecai.  And Esther set Mordecai over the house of Haman.8:3 And Esther spoke yet again before the king, and fell down at his feet, and besought him with tears to put away the mischief of Haman the Agagite, and his device that he had devised against the Jews.8:4 Then the king held out to Esther the golden sceptre.  So Esther arose, and stood before the king.8:5 And she said, If it please the king, and if I have found favor in his sight, and the thing seem right before the king, and I be pleasing in his eyes, let it be written to reverse the letters devised by Haman, the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, which he wrote to destroy the Jews that are in all the king's provinces:8:6 for how can I endure to see the evil that shall come to my people?  or how can I endure to see the destruction of my kindred?8:7 Then the king Ahasuerus said to Esther the queen and to Mordecai the Jew, Behold, I have given Esther the house of Haman, and him they have hanged upon the gallows, because he laid his hand upon the Jews.8:8 Write ye also to the Jews, as it pleases you, in the king's name, and seal it with the king's ring; for the writing which is written in the king's name, and sealed with the king's ring, may no man reverse.8:9 Then were the king's scribes called at that time, in the third month Sivan, on the three and twentieth day thereof; and it was written according to all that Mordecai commanded to the Jews, and to the satraps, and the governors and princes of the provinces which are from India to Ethiopia, a hundred twenty and seven provinces, to every province according to the writing thereof, and to every people after their language, and to the Jews according to their writing, and according to their language.8:10 And he wrote the name of king Ahasuerus, and sealed it with the king's ring, and sent letters by post on horseback, riding on swift steeds that were used in the king's service, bred of the stud:8:11 wherein the king granted the Jews that were in every city to gather themselves together, and to stand for their life, to destroy, to slay, and to cause to perish, all the power of the people and province that would assault them, their little ones and women, and to take the spoil of them for a prey,8:12 upon one day in all the provinces of king Ahasuerus, namely, upon the thirteenth day of the twelfth month, which is the month Adar.8:13 A copy of the writing, that the decree should be given out in every province, was published to all the peoples, and that the Jews should be ready against that day to avenge themselves on their enemies.8:14 So the posts that rode upon swift steeds that were used in the king's service went out, being hastened and pressed on by the king's commandment; and the decree was given out in Shushan the palace.8:15 And Mordecai went forth from the presence of the king in royal apparel of blue and white, and with a great crown of gold, and with a robe of fine linen and purple: and the city of Shushan shouted and was glad.8:16 The Jews had light and gladness, and joy and honor.8:17 And in every province, and in every city, wherever the king's commandment and his decree came, the Jews had gladness and joy, a feast and a good day.  And many from among the peoples of the land became Jews; for the fear of the Jews was fallen upon them.9:1 Now in the twelfth month, which is the month Adar, on the thirteenth day of the same, when the king's commandment and his decree drew near to be put in execution, on the day that the enemies of the Jews hoped to have rule over them, (whereas it was turned to the contrary, that the Jews had rule over them that hated them,)9:2 the Jews gathered themselves together in their cities throughout all the provinces of the king Ahasuerus, to lay hand on such as sought their hurt: and no man could withstand them; for the fear of them was fallen upon all the peoples.9:3 And all the princes of the provinces, and the satraps, and the governors, and they that did the king's business, helped the Jews; because the fear of Mordecai was fallen upon them.9:4 For Mordecai was great in the king's house, and his fame went forth throughout all the provinces; for the man Mordecai became greater and greater.9:5 And the Jews smote all their enemies with the stroke of the sword, and with slaughter and destruction, and did what they would to them that hated them.9:6 And in Shushan the palace the Jews slew and destroyed five hundred men.9:7 And Parshandatha, and Dalphon, and Aspatha,9:8 and Poratha, and Adalia, and Aridatha,9:9 and Parmashta, and Arisai, and Aridai, and Vaizatha,9:10 the ten sons of Haman the son of Hammedatha, the Jew's enemy, slew they; but on the spoil they laid not their hand.9:11 On that day the number of those that were slain in Shushan the palace was brought before the king.9:12 And the king said to Esther the queen, The Jews have slain and destroyed five hundred men in Shushan the palace, and the ten sons of Haman; what then have they done in the rest of the king's provinces! Now what is your petition?  and it shall be granted you: or what is your request further?  and it shall be done.9:13 Then said Esther, If it please the king, let it be granted to the Jews that are in Shushan to do tomorrow also according to this day's decree, and let Haman's ten sons be hanged upon the gallows.9:14 And the king commanded it so to be done: and a decree was given out in Shushan; and they hanged Haman's ten sons.9:15 And the Jews that were in Shushan gathered themselves together on the fourteenth day also of the month Adar, and slew three hundred men in Shushan; but on the spoil they laid not their hand.9:16 And the other Jews that were in the king's provinces gathered themselves together, and stood for their lives, and had rest from their enemies, and slew of them that hated them seventy and five thousand; but on the spoil they laid not their hand.9:17 This was done on the thirteenth day of the month Adar; and on the fourteenth day of the same they rested, and made it a day of feasting and gladness.9:18 But the Jews that were in Shushan assembled together on the thirteenth day thereof, and on the fourteenth thereof; and on the fifteenth day of the same they rested, and made it a day of feasting and gladness.9:19 Therefore do the Jews of the villages, that dwell in the unwalled towns, make the fourteenth day of the month Adar a day of gladness and feasting, and a good day, and of sending portions one to another.9:20 And Mordecai wrote these things, and sent letters to all the Jews that were in all the provinces of the king Ahasuerus, both near and far,9:21 to enjoin them that they should keep the fourteenth day of the month Adar, and the fifteenth day of the same, yearly,9:22 as the days in which the Jews had rest from their enemies, and the month which was turned to them from sorrow to gladness, and from mourning into a good day; that they should make them days of feasting and gladness, and of sending portions one to another, and gifts to the poor.9:23 And the Jews undertook to do as they had begun, and as Mordecai had written to them;9:24 because Haman the son of Hammedatha, the Agagite, the enemy of all the Jews, had plotted against the Jews to destroy them, and had cast Pur, that is the lot, to consume them, and to destroy them;9:25 but when the matter came before the king, he commanded by letters that his wicked device, which he had devised against the Jews, should return upon his own head, and that he and his sons should be hanged on the gallows.9:26 Wherefore they called these days Purim, after the name of Pur.  Therefore because of all the words of this letter, and of that which they had seen concerning this matter, and that which had come to them,9:27 the Jews ordained, and took upon them, and upon their seed, and upon all such as joined themselves to them, so that it should not fail, that they would keep these two days according to the writing thereof, and according to the appointed time thereof, every year;9:28 and that these days should be remembered and kept throughout every generation, every family, every province, and every city; and that these days of Purim should not fail from among the Jews, nor the remembrance of them perish from their seed.9:29 Then Esther the queen, the daughter of Abihail, and Mordecai the Jew, wrote with all authority to confirm this second letter of Purim.9:30 And he sent letters to all the Jews, to the hundred twenty and seven provinces of the kingdom of Ahasuerus, with words of peace and truth,9:31 to confirm these days of Purim in their appointed times, according as Mordecai the Jew and Esther the queen had enjoined them, and as they had ordained for themselves and for their seed, in the matter of the fastings and their cry.9:32 And the commandment of Esther confirmed these matters of Purim; and it was written in the book.10:1 And the king Ahasuerus laid a tribute upon the land, and upon the isles of the sea.10:2 And all the acts of his power and of his might, and the full account of the greatness of Mordecai, whereto the king advanced him, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Media and Persia?10:3 For Mordecai the Jew was next to king Ahasuerus, and great among the Jews, and accepted of the multitude of his brethren, seeking the good of his people, and speaking peace to all his seed.End of EstherJob1:1 There was a man in the land of Uz, whose name was Job; and that man was perfect and upright, and one that feared God, and turned away from evil.1:2 And there were born to him seven sons and three daughters.1:3 His substance also was seven thousand sheep, and three thousand camels, and five hundred yoke of oxen, and five hundred she-asses, and a very great household; such that this man was the greatest of all the children of the east.1:4 And his sons went and held a feast in the house of each one upon his day; and they sent and called for their three sisters to eat and to drink with them.1:5 And it was so, when the days of their feasting were gone about, that Job sent and sanctified them, and rose up early in the morning, and offered burnt offerings according to the number of them all: for Job said, It may be that my sons have sinned, and renounced God in their hearts.  Thus did Job continually.1:6 Now it came to pass on the day when the sons of God came to present themselves before Yahweh, that Satan also came among them.1:7 And Yahweh said to Satan, From where have you come?  Then Satan answered Yahweh, and said, From going to and fro in the earth, and from walking up and down in it.1:8 And Yahweh said to Satan, Have you considered my servant Job?  for there is no one like him in the earth, a perfect and an upright man, one that fears God, and turns away from evil.1:9 Then Satan answered Yahweh, and said, Does Job fear God for nothing?1:10 Have you not made a hedge all around him, and around his house, and around all that he has, on every side?  you have blessed the work of his hands, and his substance is increased in the land.1:11 But put forth your hand now, and touch all that he has, and he will renounce you to your face.1:12 And Yahweh said to Satan, Behold, all that he has is in your power; only on his person put not forth your hand.  So Satan went forth from the presence of Yahweh.1:13 And it fell on a day when his sons and his daughters were eating and drinking wine in their eldest brother's house,1:14 that there came a messenger to Job, and said, The oxen were plowing, and the asses feeding beside them;1:15 and the Sabeans fell upon them, and took them away: yes, they have slain the servants with the edge of the sword; and I only am escaped alone to tell you.1:16 While he was still speaking, there came also another, and said, The fire of God is fallen from heaven, and has burned up the sheep and the servants, and consumed them; and I only am escaped alone to tell you.1:17 While he was still speaking, there came also another, and said, The Chaldeans made three bands, and fell upon the camels, and have taken them away, yes, and slain the servants with the edge of the sword; and I only am escaped alone to tell you.1:18 While he was still speaking, there came also another, and said, Your sons and your daughters were eating and drinking wine in their eldest brother's house;1:19 and, behold, there came a great wind from the wilderness, and smote the four corners of the house, and it fell upon the young men, and they are dead; and I only am escaped alone to tell you.1:20 Then Job arose, and rent his robe, and shaved his head, and fell down upon the ground, and worshipped;1:21 and he said, Naked I came out of my mother's womb, and naked I shall return there: Yahweh gave, and Yahweh has taken away; blessed be the name of Yahweh.1:22 In all this Job sinned not, nor charged God foolishly.2:1 Again it came to pass on the day when the sons of God came to present themselves before Yahweh, that Satan came also among them to present himself before Yahweh.2:2 And Yahweh said to Satan, From where have you come?  And Satan answered Yahweh, and said, From going to and fro in the earth, and from walking up and down in it.2:3 And Yahweh said to Satan, Have you considered my servant Job?  for there is no one like him in the earth, a perfect and an upright man, one that fears God, and turns away from evil: and he still holds fast his integrity, though you moved me against him, to destroy him without cause.2:4 And Satan answered Yahweh, and said, Skin for skin, yes, all that a man has he will give for his life.2:5 But put forth your hand now, and touch his bone and his flesh, and he will renounce you to your face.2:6 And Yahweh said to Satan, Behold, he is in your hand; only spare his life.2:7 So Satan went forth from the presence of Yahweh, and smote Job with sore boils from the sole of his foot to his crown.2:8 And he took him a potsherd to scrape himself with it; and he sat among the ashes.2:9 Then said his wife to him, Do you still hold fast your integrity?  renounce God, and die.2:10 But he said to her, You speak as one of the foolish women speaks.  What?  shall we receive good at the hand of God, and shall we not receive evil?  In all this Job did not sin with his lips.2:11 Now when Job's three friends heard of all this evil that was come upon him, they came every one from his own place: Eliphaz the Temanite, and Bildad the Shuhite, and Zophar the Naamathite, and they made an appointment together to come to bemoan him and to comfort him.2:12 And when they lifted up their eyes afar off, and knew him not, they lifted up their voice, and wept; and they rent every one his robe, and sprinkled dust upon their heads toward heaven.2:13 So they sat down with him upon the ground seven days and seven nights, and none spoke a word to him: for they saw that his grief was very great.3:1 After this opened Job his mouth, and cursed his day.3:2 And Job answered and said:3:3 Let the day perish in which I was born, and the night which said, There is a man-child conceived.3:4 Let that day be darkness; Let not God from above seek for it, Neither let the light shine upon it.3:5 Let darkness and the shadow of death claim it for their own; Let a cloud dwell upon it; Let all that makes black the day terrify it.3:6 As for that night, let thick darkness seize upon it: Let it not rejoice among the days of the year; Let it not come into the number of the months.3:7 Lo, let that night be barren; Let no joyful voice come therein.3:8 Let them curse it that curse the day, Who are ready to rouse up leviathan.3:9 Let the stars of the twilight thereof be dark: Let it look for light, but have none; Neither let it behold the eyelids of the morning:3:10 Because it shut not up the doors of my mother's womb, Nor hid trouble from my eyes.3:11 Why died I not from the womb?  Why did I not give up the ghost when my mother bore me?3:12 Why did the knees receive me?  Or why the breast, that I should suck?3:13 For now should I have lain down and been quiet; I should have slept; then had I been at rest,3:14 With kings and counsellors of the earth, Who built up waste places for themselves;3:15 Or with princes that had gold, Who filled their houses with silver:3:16 Or as a hidden untimely birth I had not been, as infants that never saw light.3:17 There the wicked cease from troubling; And there the weary are at rest.3:18 There the prisoners are at ease together; They hear not the voice of the taskmaster.3:19 The small and the great are there: And the servant is free from his master.3:20 Wherefore is light given to him that is in misery, and life to the bitter in soul;3:21 Who long for death, but it comes not, and dig for it more than for hid treasures;3:22 Who rejoice exceedingly, and are glad, when they can find the grave?3:23 Why is light given to a man whose way is hid, and whom God has hedged in?3:24 For my sighing comes before I eat, and my groanings are poured out like water.3:25 For the thing which I fear comes upon me, and that which I am afraid of comes to me.3:26 I am not at ease, neither am I quiet, neither have I rest; But trouble comes.4:1 Then answered Eliphaz the Temanite, and said,4:2 If one assay to commune with you, will you be grieved?  But who can withhold himself from speaking?4:3 Behold, you have instructed many, and you have strengthened the weak hands.4:4 Your words have upholden him that was falling, and you have made firm the feeble knees.4:5 But now it is come to you, and you faintest; It touches you, and you are troubled.4:6 Is not your fear of God your confidence, and the integrity of your ways your hope?4:7 Remember, I pray you, who ever perished, being innocent?  Or where were the upright cut off?4:8 According as I have seen, they that plow iniquity, and sow trouble, reap the same.4:9 By the breath of God they perish, and by the blast of his anger are they consumed.4:10 The roaring of the lion, and the voice of the fierce lion, and the teeth of the young lions, are broken.4:11 The old lion perishes for lack of prey, and the whelps of the lioness are scattered abroad.4:12 Now a thing was secretly brought to me, and my ear received a whisper thereof.4:13 In thoughts from the visions of the night, When deep sleep falls on men,4:14 Fear came upon me, and trembling, Which made all my bones to shake.4:15 Then a spirit passed before my face; The hair of my flesh stood up.4:16 It stood still, but I could not discern the appearance thereof; A form was before my eyes: There was silence, and I heard a voice, saying,4:17 Shall mortal man be more just than God?  Shall a man be more pure than his Maker?4:18 Behold, he puts no trust in his servants; And his angels he charges with folly:4:19 How much more them that dwell in houses of clay, Whose foundation is in the dust, Who are crushed before the moth!4:20 Between morning and evening they are destroyed: They perish for ever without any regarding it.4:21 Is not their tent-cord plucked up within them?  They die, and that without wisdom.5:1 Call now; is there any that will answer you?  And to which of the holy ones will you turn?5:2 For vexation kills the foolish man, and jealousy slays the silly one.5:3 I have seen the foolish taking root: But suddenly I cursed his habitation.5:4 His children are far from safety, and they are crushed in the gate, Neither is there any to deliver them:5:5 Whose harvest the hungry eats up, and takes it even out of the thorns; And the snare gapes for their substance.5:6 For affliction comes not forth from the dust, Neither does trouble spring out of the ground;5:7 But man is born to trouble, as the sparks fly upward.5:8 But as for me, I would seek to God, and to God would I commit my cause;5:9 Who does great things and unsearchable, Marvellous things without number:5:10 Who gives rain upon the earth, and sends waters upon the fields;5:11 So that he sets up on high those that are low, and those that mourn are exalted to safety.5:12 He frustrates the devices of the crafty, So that their hands cannot perform their enterprise.5:13 He takes the wise in their own craftiness; And the counsel of the cunning is carried headlong.5:14 They meet with darkness in the day-time, and grope at noonday as in the night.5:15 But he saves from the sword of their mouth, Even the needy from the hand of the mighty.5:16 So the poor has hope, and iniquity stops her mouth.5:17 Behold, happy is the man whom God correcteth: Therefore despise not you the chastening of the Almighty.5:18 For he makes sore, and binds up; He wounds, and his hands make whole.5:19 He will deliver you in six troubles; Yes, in seven there shall no evil touch you.5:20 In famine he will redeem you from death; And in war from the power of the sword.5:21 You shall be hid from the scourge of the tongue; Neither shall you be afraid of destruction when it comes.5:22 At destruction and famine you shall laugh; Neither shall you be afraid of the beasts of the earth.5:23 For you shall be in league with the stones of the field; And the beasts of the field shall be at peace with you.5:24 And you shall know that your tent is in peace; And you shall visit your fold, and shall miss nothing.5:25 You shall know also that your seed shall be great, and your offspring as the grass of the earth.5:26 You shall come to your grave in a full age, Like as a shock of grain comes in in its season.5:27 Lo this, we have searched it, so it is; Hear it, and know you it for your good.6:1 Then Job answered and said,6:2 Oh that my vexation were but weighed, and all my calamity laid in the balances!6:3 For now it would be heavier than the sand of the seas: Therefore have my words been rash.6:4 For the arrows of the Almighty are within me, The poison whereof my spirit drinks up: The terrors of God do set themselves in array against me.6:5 Does the wild donkey bray when he has grass?  Or lows the ox over his fodder?6:6 Can that which has no savor be eaten without salt?  Or is there any taste in the white of an egg?6:7 My soul refuses to touch them; They are as loathsome food to me.6:8 Oh that I might have my request; And that God would grant me the thing that I long for!6:9 Even that it would please God to crush me; That he would let loose his hand, and cut me off!6:10 And be it still my consolation, Yes, let me exult in pain that spares not, That I have not denied the words of the Holy One.6:11 What is my strength, that I should wait?  And what is my end, that I should be patient?6:12 Is my strength the strength of stones?  Or is my flesh of brass?6:13 Is it not that I have no help in me, and that wisdom is driven quite from me?6:14 To him that is ready to faint kindness should be shown from his friend; Even to him that forsakes the fear of the Almighty.6:15 My brethren have dealt deceitfully as a brook, as the channel of brooks that pass away;6:16 Which are black by reason of the ice, and in which the snow hides itself:6:17 What time they grow warm, they vanish; When it is hot, they are consumed out of their place.6:18 The caravans that travel by the way of them turn aside; They go up into the waste, and perish.6:19 The caravans of Tema looked, The companies of Sheba waited for them.6:20 They were put to shame because they had hoped; They came there, and were confounded.6:21 For now ye are nothing; You see a terror, and are afraid.6:22 Did I say, Give to me?  Or, Offer a present for me of your substance?6:23 Or, Deliver me from the adversary's hand?  Or, Redeem me from the hand of the oppressors?6:24 Teach me, and I will hold my peace; And cause me to understand the way in which I have erred.6:25 How forcible are words of uprightness! But your reproof, what does it reprove?6:26 Do ye think to reprove words, Seeing that the speeches of one that is desperate are as wind?6:27 Yes, ye would cast lots upon the fatherless, and make merchandise of your friend.6:28 Now therefore be pleased to look upon me; For surely I shall not lie to your face.6:29 Return, I pray you, let there be no injustice; Yes, return again, my cause is righteous.6:30 Is there injustice on my tongue?  Cannot my taste discern mischievous things?7:1 Is there not a warfare to man upon earth?  And are not his days like the days of a hireling?7:2 As a servant that earnestly desires the shadow, and as a hireling that looks for his wages:7:3 So am I made to possess months of misery, and wearisome nights are appointed to me.7:4 When I lie down, I say, When shall I arise, and the night be gone?  And I am full of tossings to and fro to the dawning of the day.7:5 My flesh is clothed with worms and clods of dust; My skin closes up, and breaks out afresh.7:6 My days are swifter than a weaver's shuttle, and are spent without hope.7:7 Oh remember that my life is a breath: Mine eye shall no more see good.7:8 The eye of him that sees me shall behold me no more; Your eyes shall be upon me, but I shall not be.7:9 As the cloud is consumed and vanishes away, So he that goes down to Sheol shall come up no more.7:10 He shall return no more to his house, Neither shall his place know him any more.7:11 Therefore I will not refrain my mouth; I will speak in the anguish of my spirit; I will complain in the bitterness of my soul.7:12 Am I a sea, or a sea-monster, That you set a watch over me?7:13 When I say, My bed shall comfort me, My couch shall ease my complaint;7:14 Then you scare me with dreams, and terrify me through visions:7:15 So that my soul chooses strangling, and death rather than these my bones.7:16 I loathe my life; I would not live alway: Let me alone; for my days are vanity.7:17 What is man, that you should magnify him, and that you should set your mind upon him,7:18 And that you should visit him every morning, and try him every moment?7:19 How long will you not look away from me, Nor let me alone till I swallow down my spittle?7:20 If I have sinned, what do I to you, O you watcher of men?  Why have you set me as a mark for you, So that I am a burden to myself?7:21 And why do you not pardon my transgression, and take away my iniquity?  For now shall I lie down in the dust; And you will seek me diligently, but I shall not be.8:1 Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said,8:2 How long will you speak these things?  And how long shall the words of your mouth be like a mighty wind?8:3 Does God pervert justice?  Or does the Almighty pervert righteousness?8:4 If your children have sinned against him, and he has delivered them into the hand of their transgression;8:5 If you would seek diligently to God, and make your supplication to the Almighty;8:6 If you wert pure and upright: Surely now he would awake for you, and make the habitation of your righteousness prosperous.8:7 And though your beginning was small, Yet your latter end would greatly increase.8:8 For inquire, I pray you, of the former age, and apply yourself to that which their fathers have searched out:8:9 (For we are but of yesterday, and know nothing, Because our days upon earth are a shadow);8:10 Shall not they teach you, and tell you, and utter words out of their heart?8:11 Can the rush grow up without mire?  Can the flag grow without water?8:12 Whilst it is yet in its greenness, and not cut down, It withers before any other herb.8:13 So are the paths of all that forget God; And the hope of the godless man shall perish:8:14 Whose confidence shall break in sunder, and whose trust is a spider's web.8:15 He shall lean upon his house, but it shall not stand: He shall hold fast thereby, but it shall not endure.8:16 He is green before the sun, and his shoots go forth over his garden.8:17 His roots are wrapped about the stone-heap, He beholds the place of stones.8:18 If he be destroyed from his place, Then it shall deny him, saying, I have not seen you.8:19 Behold, this is the joy of his way; And out of the earth shall others spring.8:20 Behold, God will not cast away a perfect man, Neither will he uphold the evil-doers.8:21 He will yet fill your mouth with laughter, and your lips with shouting.8:22 They that hate you shall be clothed with shame; And the tent of the wicked shall be no more.9:1 Then Job answered and said,9:2 Of a truth I know that it is so: But how can man be just with God?9:3 If he be pleased to contend with him, He cannot answer him one of a thousand.9:4 He is wise in heart, and mighty in strength: Who has hardened himself against him, and prospered?-9:5 him that removes the mountains, and they know it not, When he overturns them in his anger;9:6 That shakes the earth out of its place, and the pillars thereof tremble;9:7 That commands the sun, and it rises not, and seals up the stars;9:8 That alone stretches out the heavens, and treads upon the waves of the sea;9:9 That makes the Bear, Orion, and the Pleiades, and the chambers of the south;9:10 That does great things past finding out, Yes, marvellous things without number.9:11 Lo, he goes by me, and I see him not: He passes on also, but I perceive him not.9:12 Behold, he seizes the prey, who can hinder him?  Who will say to him, What do you?9:13 God will not withdraw his anger; The helpers of Rahab do stoop under him.9:14 How much less shall I answer him, and choose out my words to reason with him?9:15 Whom, though I were righteous, yet would I not answer; I would make supplication to my judge.9:16 If I had called, and he had answered me, Yet would I not believe that he hearkened to my voice.9:17 For he breaks me with a tempest, and multiplies my wounds without cause.9:18 He will not allow me to take my breath, But fills me with bitterness.9:19 If we speak of strength, lo, he is mighty! And if of justice, Who, he says, will summon me?9:20 Though I be righteous, my own mouth shall condemn me: Though I be perfect, it shall prove me perverse.9:21 I am perfect; I regard not myself; I despise my life.9:22 It is all one; therefore I say, He destroys the perfect and the wicked.9:23 If the scourge slay suddenly, He will mock at the trial of the innocent.9:24 The earth is given into the hand of the wicked; He covers the faces of the judges thereof: If it be not he, who then is it?9:25 Now my days are swifter than a post: They flee away, they see no good,9:26 They are passed away as the swift ships; As the eagle that swoops on the prey.9:27 If I say, I will forget my complaint, I will put off my sad countenance, and be of good cheer;9:28 I am afraid of all my sorrows, I know that you will not hold me innocent.9:29 I shall be condemned; Why then do I labor in vain?9:30 If I wash myself with snow water, and make my hands never so clean;9:31 Yet will you plunge me in the ditch, and my own clothes shall abhor me.9:32 For he is not a man, as I am, that I should answer him, That we should come together in judgment.9:33 There is no umpire between us, That might lay his hand upon us both.9:34 Let him take his rod away from me, and let not his terror make me afraid:9:35 Then would I speak, and not fear him; For I am not so in myself.10:1 My soul is weary of my life; I will give free course to my complaint; I will speak in the bitterness of my soul.10:2 I will say to God, Do not condemn me; Show me why you are contending with me.10:3 Is it good to you that you should oppress, That you should despise the work of your hands, and shine upon the counsel of the wicked?10:4 Have you eyes of flesh?  Or see you as man sees?10:5 Are your days as the days of man, Or your years as man's days,10:6 That you inquire after my iniquity, and search after my sin,10:7 Although you know that I am not wicked, and there is none that can deliver out of your hand?10:8 Your hands have framed me and fashioned me Together round about; yet you do destroy me.10:9 Remember, I beseech you, that you have fashioned me as clay; And will you bring me into dust again?10:10 Have you not poured me out as milk, and curdled me like cheese?10:11 You have clothed me with skin and flesh, and knit me together with bones and sinews.10:12 You have granted me life and lovingkindness; And your visitation has preserved my spirit.10:13 Yet these things you did hide in your heart; I know that this is with you:10:14 If I sin, then you mark me, and you will not acquit me from my iniquity.10:15 If I be wicked, woe to me; And if I be righteous, yet shall I not lift up my head; Being filled with ignominy, and looking upon my affliction.10:16 And if my head exalt itself, you hunt me as a lion; And again you show yourself marvellous upon me.10:17 You renew your witnesses against me, and increase your indignation upon me: Changes and warfare are with me.10:18 Why then have you brought me forth out of the womb?  I had given up the ghost, and no eye had seen me.10:19 I should have been as though I had not been; I should have been carried from the womb to the grave.10:20 Are not my days few?  cease then, and let me alone, that I may take comfort a little,10:21 Before I go whence I shall not return, even to the land of darkness and of the shadow of death;10:22 The land dark as midnight, The land of the shadow of death, without any order, and where the light is as midnight.11:1 Then answered Zophar the Naamathite, and said,11:2 Should not the multitude of words be answered?  And should a man full of talk be justified?11:3 Should your boastings make men hold their peace?  And when you mockest, shall no man make you ashamed?11:4 For you say, My doctrine is pure, and I am clean in your eyes.11:5 But oh that God would speak, and open his lips against you,11:6 And that he would show you the secrets of wisdom! For he is manifold in understanding.  Know therefore that God exacts of you less than your iniquity deserves.11:7 Can you by searching find out God?  Can you find out the Almighty to perfection?11:8 It is high as heaven; what can you do?  Deeper than Sheol; what can you know?11:9 The measure thereof is longer than the earth, and broader than the sea.11:10 If he pass through, and shut up, and all to judgment, then who can hinder him?11:11 For he knows false men: He sees iniquity also, even though he consider it not.11:12 But vain man is void of understanding, Yes, man is born as a wild donkey's colt.11:13 If you set your heart aright, and stretch out your hands toward him;11:14 If iniquity be in your hand, put it far away, and let not unrighteousness dwell in your tents.11:15 Surely then shall you lift up your face without spot; Yes, you shall be stedfast, and shall not fear:11:16 For you shall forget your misery; You shall remember it as waters that are passed away,11:17 And your life shall be clearer than the noonday;  Though there be darkness, it shall be as the morning.11:18 And you shall be secure, because there is hope; Yes, you shall search about you, and shall take your rest in safety.11:19 Also you shall lie down, and none shall make you afraid; Yes, many shall make suit to you.11:20 But the eyes of the wicked shall fail, and they shall have no way to flee; And their hope shall be the giving up of the ghost.12:1 Then Job answered and said,12:2 No doubt but ye are the people, and wisdom shall die with you.12:3 But I have understanding as well as you; I am not inferior to you: Yes, who knows not such things as these?12:4 I am as one that is a laughing-stock to his neighbor, I who called upon God, and he answered: The just, the perfect man is a laughing-stock.12:5 In the thought of him that is at ease there is contempt for misfortune; It is ready for them whose foot slips.12:6 The tents of robbers prosper, and they that provoke God are secure; into whose hand God brings abundantly.12:7 But ask now the beasts, and they shall teach you; And the birds of the heavens, and they shall tell you:12:8 Or speak to the earth, and it shall teach you; And the fishes of the sea shall declare to you.12:9 Who knows not in all these, That the hand of Yahweh has wrought this,12:10 In whose hand is the soul of every living thing, and the breath of all mankind?12:11 Does not the ear try words, Even as the palate tastes its food?12:12 With aged men is wisdom, and in length of days understanding.12:13 With God is wisdom and might; He has counsel and understanding.12:14 Behold, he breaks down, and it cannot be built again; He shuts up a man, and there can be no opening.12:15 Behold, he withholds the waters, and they dry up; Again, he sends them out, and they overturn the earth.12:16 With him is strength and wisdom; The deceived and the deceiver are his.12:17 He leads counsellors away stripped, and judges makes he fools.12:18 He looses the bond of kings, and he binds their loins with a girdle.12:19 He leads priests away stripped, and overthrows the mighty.12:20 He removes the speech of the trusty, and takes away the understanding of the elders.12:21 He pours contempt upon princes, and looses the belt of the strong.12:22 He uncovers deep things out of darkness,  And brings out to light the shadow of death.12:23 He increases the nations, and he destroys them: He enlarges the nations, and he leads them captive.12:24 He takes away understanding from the chiefs of the people of the earth, and causes them to wander in a wilderness where there is no way.12:25 They grope in the dark without light; And he makes them to stagger like a drunken man.Chapter 1313:1 Lo, my eye has seen all this, Mine ear has heard and understood it.13:2 What ye know, the same do I know also: I am not inferior to you.13:3 Surely I would speak to the Almighty, and I desire to reason with God.13:4 But ye are forgers of lies; Ye are all physicians of no value.13:5 Oh that ye would altogether hold your peace! And that would be your wisdom.13:6 Hear now my reasoning, and hearken to the pleadings of my lips.13:7 Will ye speak unrighteously for God, and talk deceitfully for him?13:8 Will ye show partiality to him?  Will ye contend for God?13:9 Is it good that he should search you out?  Or as one deceives a man, will ye deceive him?13:10 He will surely reprove you if ye do secretly show partiality.13:11 Shall not his majesty make you afraid, and his dread fall upon you?13:12 Your memorable sayings are proverbs of ashes, your defences are defences of clay.13:13 Hold your peace, leave me alone, that I may speak; and let come on me what will.13:14 Why should I take my flesh in my teeth, and put my life in my hand?13:15 Behold, he will slay me; I have no hope: Nevertheless I will maintain my ways before him.13:16 This also shall be my salvation, That a godless man shall not come before him.13:17 Hear diligently my speech, and let my declaration be in your ears.13:18 Behold now, I have set my cause in order; I know that I am righteous.13:19 Who is he that will contend with me?  For then would I hold my peace and give up the ghost.13:20 Only do not two things to me; Then will I not hide myself from your face:13:21 Withdraw your hand far from me; And let not your terror make me afraid.13:22 Then call you, and I will answer; Or let me speak, and answer you me.13:23 How many are my iniquities and sins?  Make me to know my transgression and my sin.13:24 Why do you hide your face, and hold me as your enemy?13:25 Will you harass a driven leaf?  And will you pursue the dry stubble?13:26 For you write bitter things against me, and cause me to inherit the iniquities of my youth:13:27 You put my feet also in the stocks, and mark all my paths; You set a bound to the soles of my feet:13:28 Though I am like a rotten thing that consumes, Like a garment that is moth-eaten.14:1 Man, that is born of a woman, Is of few days, and full of trouble.14:2 He comes forth like a flower, and is cut down: He flees also as a shadow, and continues not.14:3 And do you open your eyes upon such a one, and bring me into judgment with you?14:4 Who can bring a clean thing out of an unclean?  not one.14:5 Seeing his days are determined, The number of his months is with you, and you have appointed his bounds that he cannot pass;14:6 Look away from him, that he may rest, Till he shall accomplish, as a hireling, his day.14:7 For there is hope of a tree, If it be cut down, that it will sprout again, and that the tender branch thereof will not cease.14:8 Though the root thereof grow old in the earth, and the stock thereof die in the ground;14:9 Yet through the scent of water it will bud, and put forth boughs like a plant.14:10 But man dies, and is laid low: Yes, man gives up the ghost, and where is he?14:11 as the waters fail from the sea, and the river wastes and dries up;14:12 So man lies down and rises not: Till the heavens be no more, they shall not awake, Nor be roused out of their sleep.14:13 Oh that you would hide me in Sheol, That you would keep me secret, until your wrath be past, That you would appoint me a set time, and remember me!14:14 If a man die, shall he live again?  All the days of my warfare would I wait, Till my release should come.14:15 You would call, and I would answer you: You would have a desire to the work of your hands.14:16 But now you number my steps: Do you not watch over my sin?14:17 My transgression is sealed up in a bag, and you fasten up my iniquity.14:18 But the mountain falling comes to nought; And the rock is removed out of its place;14:19 The waters wear the stones; The overflowings thereof wash away the dust of the earth: So you destroy the hope of man.14:20 You prevail for ever against him, and he passes; You change his countenance, and send him away.14:21 His sons come to honor, and he knows it not; And they are brought low, but he perceives it not of them.14:22 But his flesh upon him has pain, and his soul within him mourns.15:1 Then answered Eliphaz the Temanite, and said,15:2 Should a wise man make answer with vain knowledge, and fill himself with the east wind?15:3 Should he reason with unprofitable talk, Or with speeches with which he can do no good?15:4 Yes, you do away with fear, and hinder devotion before God.15:5 For your iniquity teaches your mouth, and you choose the tongue of the crafty.15:6 Your own mouth condemns you, and not I; Yes, your own lips testify against you.15:7 Are you the first man that was born?  Or were you brought forth before the hills?15:8 Have you heard the secret counsel of God?  And do you limit wisdom to yourself?15:9 What know you, that we know not?  What do you understand, which is not in us?15:10 With us are both the gray-headed and the very aged men, Much elder than your father.15:11 Are the consolations of God too small for you, Even the word that is gentle toward you?15:12 Why does your heart carry you away?  And why do your eyes flash,15:13 That against God you turn your spirit, and let words go out of your mouth?15:14 What is man, that he should be clean?  And he that is born of a woman, that he should be righteous?15:15 Behold, he puts no trust in his holy ones; Yes, the heavens are not clean in his sight:15:16 How much less one that is abominable and corrupt, a man that drinks iniquity like water! 15:17 I will show you, hear you me; And that which I have seen I will declare:15:18 (Which wise men have told From their fathers, and have not hid it;15:19 To whom alone the land was given, and no stranger passed among them):15:20 The wicked man travails with pain all his days, Even the number of years that are laid up for the oppressor.15:21 A sound of terrors is in his ears; In prosperity the destroyer shall come upon him.15:22 He believes not that he shall return out of darkness, and he is waited for of the sword.15:23 He wanders abroad for bread, saying, Where is it?  He knows that the day of darkness is ready at his hand.15:24 Distress and anguish make him afraid; They prevail against him, as a king ready to the battle.15:25 Because he has stretched out his hand against God, and behaves himself proudly against the Almighty;15:26 He runs upon him with a stiff neck, With the thick bosses of his bucklers;15:27 Because he has covered his face with his fatness, and gathered fat upon his loins;15:28 And he has dwelt in desolate cities, In houses which no man inhabited, Which were ready to become heaps;15:29 He shall not be rich, neither shall his substance continue, Neither shall their possessions be extended on the earth.15:30 He shall not depart out of darkness; The flame shall dry up his branches, and by the breath of God's mouth shall he go away.15:31 Let him not trust in vanity, deceiving himself; For vanity shall be his recompense.15:32 It shall be accomplished before his time, and his branch shall not be green.15:33 He shall shake off his unripe grape as the vine, and shall cast off his flower as the olive-tree.15:34 For the company of the godless shall be barren, and fire shall consume the tents of bribery.15:35 They conceive mischief, and bring forth iniquity, and their heart prepares deceit.16:1 Then Job answered and said,16:2 I have heard many such things: Miserable comforters are ye all.16:3 Shall vain words have an end?  Or what provokes you that you answer?16:4 I also could speak as ye do; If your soul were in my soul's stead, I could join words together against you, and shake my head at you.16:5 But I would strengthen you with my mouth, and the solace of my lips would assuage your grief.16:6 Though I speak, my grief is not assuaged; And though I forbear, what am I eased?16:7 But now he has made me weary: You have made desolate all my company.16:8 And you have laid fast hold on me, which is a witness against me: And my leanness rises up against me, It testifies to my face.16:9 He has torn me in his wrath, and persecuted me; He has gnashed upon me with his teeth: Mine adversary sharpens his eyes upon me.16:10 They have gaped upon me with their mouth; They have smitten me upon the cheek reproachfully: They gather themselves together against me.16:11 God delivers me to the ungodly, and casts me into the hands of the wicked.16:12 I was at ease, and he broke me asunder; Yes, he has taken me by the neck, and dashed me to pieces: He has also set me up for his mark.16:13 His archers compass me round about; He splits my kidneys asunder, and does not spare; He pours out my gall upon the ground.16:14 He breaks me with breach upon breach; He runs upon me like a giant.16:15 I have sewed sackcloth upon my skin, and have laid my horn in the dust.16:16 My face is red with weeping, and on my eyelids is the shadow of death;16:17 Although there is no violence in my hands, and my prayer is pure.16:18 O earth, cover you not my blood, and let my cry have no resting-place.16:19 Even now, behold, my witness is in heaven, and he that vouches for me is on high.16:20 My friends scoff at me: But my eye pours out tears to God,16:21 That he would maintain the right of a man with God, and of a son of man with his neighbor!16:22 For when a few years are come, I shall go the way whence I shall not return.17:1 My spirit is consumed, my days are extinct, The grave is ready for me.17:2 Surely there are mockers with me, and my eye dwells upon their provocation.17:3 Give now a pledge, be surety for me with yourself; Who is there that will strike hands with me?17:4 For you have hid their heart from understanding: Therefore shall you not exalt them.17:5 He that denounces his friends for a prey, Even the eyes of his children shall fail.17:6 But he has made me a byword of the people; And they spit in my face.17:7 Mine eye also is dim by reason of sorrow, and all my members are as a shadow.17:8 Upright men shall be astonished at this, and the innocent shall stir up himself against the godless.17:9 Yet shall the righteous hold on his way, and he that has clean hands shall grow stronger and stronger.17:10 But as for you all, come on now again; And I shall not find a wise man among you.17:11 My days are past, my purposes are broken off, Even the thoughts of my heart.17:12 They change the night into day: The light, say they, is near to the darkness.17:13 If I look for Sheol as my house; If I have spread my couch in the darkness;17:14 If I have said to corruption, You are my father; To the worm, You are my mother, and my sister;17:15 Where then is my hope?  And as for my hope, who shall see it?17:16 It shall go down to the bars of Sheol, When once there is rest in the dust.18:1 Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said,18:2 How long will ye hunt for words?  Consider, and afterwards we will speak.18:3 Why are we counted as beasts, and are become unclean in your sight?18:4 You that tear yourself in your anger, Shall the earth be forsaken for you?  Or shall the rock be removed out of its place?18:5 Yes, the light of the wicked shall be put out, and the spark of his fire shall not shine.18:6 The light shall be dark in his tent, and his lamp above him shall be put out.18:7 The steps of his strength shall be straitened, and his own counsel shall cast him down.18:8 For he is cast into a net by his own feet, and he walks upon the toils.18:9 A gin shall take him by the heel, and a snare shall lay hold on him.18:10 A noose is hid for him in the ground, and a trap for him in the way.18:11 Terrors shall make him afraid on every side, and shall chase him at his heels.18:12 His strength shall be hunger-bitten, and calamity shall be ready at his side.18:13 The members of his body shall be devoured, Yes, the first-born of death shall devour his members.18:14 He shall be rooted out of his tent where he trusts; And he shall be brought to the king of terrors.18:15 There shall dwell in his tent that which is none of his: Brimstone shall be scattered upon his habitation.18:16 His roots shall be dried up beneath, and above shall his branch be cut off.18:17 His remembrance shall perish from the earth, and he shall have no name in the street.18:18 He shall be driven from light into darkness, and chased out of the world.18:19 He shall have neither son nor son's son among his people, Nor any remaining where he sojourned.18:20 They that come after shall be astonished at his day, as they that went before were affrighted.18:21 Surely such are the dwellings of the unrighteous, and this is the place of him that knows not God.19:1 Then Job answered and said,19:2 How long will ye vex my soul, and break me in pieces with words?19:3 These ten times have ye reproached me: You are not ashamed that ye deal hardly with me.19:4 And be it indeed that I have erred, Mine error remains with myself.19:5 If indeed ye will magnify yourselves against me, and plead against me my reproach;19:6 Know now that God has subverted me in my cause, and has enveloped me with his net.19:7 Behold, I cry out of wrong, but I am not heard: I cry for help, but there is no justice.19:8 He has walled up my way that I cannot pass, and has set darkness in my paths.19:9 He has stripped me of my glory, and taken the crown from my head.19:10 He has broken me down on every side, and I am gone; And my hope has he plucked up like a tree.19:11 He has also kindled his wrath against me, and he counts me to him as one of his adversaries.19:12 His troops come on together, and cast up their way against me, and encamp round about my tent.19:13 He has put my brethren far from me, and my acquaintances wholly estranged from me.19:14 My kinsfolk have disowned me, my familiar friends have forgotten me.19:15 They that dwell in my house, and my maids, count me as a stranger; I am an alien in their sight.19:16 I call to my servant, and he gives me no answer, Though I entreat him with my mouth.19:17 My breath is strange to my wife, and my supplication to the children of my own mother.19:18 Even young children despise me.  If I arise, they speak against me.19:19 All my familiar friends abhor me, and they whom I loved are turned against me.19:20 My bone cleaves to my skin and to my flesh, and I am escaped with the skin of my teeth.19:21 Have pity upon me, have pity upon me, O ye my friends; For the hand of God has touched me.19:22 Why do ye persecute me as God, and are not satisfied with my flesh?19:23 Oh that my words were now written! Oh that they were inscribed in a book!19:24 That with an iron pen and lead they were graven in the rock for ever!19:25 But as for me I know that my Redeemer lives, and at last he will stand up upon the earth:19:26 And after my skin, even this body, is destroyed, Then without my flesh shall I see God;19:27 Whom I, even I, shall see, on my side, and my eyes shall behold, and not as a stranger.  My heart is consumed within me.19:28 If ye say, How we will persecute him! And that the root of the matter is found in me;19:29 Be ye afraid of the sword: For wrath brings the punishments of the sword, That ye may know there is a judgment.20:1 Then answered Zophar the Naamathite, and said,20:2 Therefore do my thoughts give answer to me, Even by reason of my haste that is in me.20:3 I have heard the reproof which puts me to shame; And the spirit of my understanding answers me.20:4 Know you not this of old time, Since man was placed upon earth,20:5 That the triumphing of the wicked is short, and the joy of the godless but for a moment?20:6 Though his height mount up to the heavens, and his head reach to the clouds;20:7 Yet he shall perish for ever like his own dung: They that have seen him shall say, Where is he?20:8 He shall fly away as a dream, and shall not be found: Yes, he shall be chased away as a vision of the night.20:9 The eye which saw him shall see him no more; Neither shall his place any more behold him.20:10 His children shall seek the favor of the poor, and his hands shall give back his wealth.20:11 His bones are full of his youth, But it shall lie down with him in the dust.20:12 Though wickedness be sweet in his mouth, Though he hide it under his tongue,20:13 Though he spare it, and will not let it go, But keep it still within his mouth;20:14 Yet his food in his bowels is turned, It is the gall of asps within him.20:15 He has swallowed down riches, and he shall vomit them back up; God will cast them out of his belly.20:16 He shall suck the poison of asps: The viper's tongue shall slay him.20:17 He shall not look upon the rivers, The flowing streams of honey and butter.20:18 That which he labored for shall he give back, and shall not swallow it down; According to the substance that he has gotten, he shall not rejoice.20:19 For he has oppressed and forsaken the poor; He has violently taken away a house, and he shall not build it up.20:20 Because he knew no contentedness within him, He shall not save anything of that in which he delights.20:21 There was nothing left that he did not devour; Therefore his prosperity shall not endure.20:22 In the fulness of his sufficiency he shall be in narrows: The hand of every one that is in misery shall come upon him.20:23 When he is about to fill his belly, God will cast the fierceness of his wrath upon him, and will rain it upon him while he is eating.20:24 He shall flee from the iron weapon, and the bow of brass shall strike him through.20:25 He draws it forward, and it comes out of his body; Yes, the glittering point comes out of his gall: Terrors are upon him.20:26 All darkness is stored up to be his treasures: A fire not blown by man shall devour him; It shall consume that which is left in his tent.20:27 The heaven shall reveal his iniquity, and the earth shall rise up against him.20:28 The increase of his house shall depart; His goods shall flow away in the day of his wrath.20:29 This is the portion of a wicked man from God, and the inheritance appointed for him by God.21:1 Then Job answered and said,21:2 Hear diligently my speech; And let this be your consolations.21:3 Allow me, and I also will speak; And after that I have spoken, mock on.21:4 As for me, is my complaint to man?  And why should I not be impatient?21:5 Mark me, and be astonished,  And lay your hand upon your mouth.21:6 Even when I remember I am troubled, and horror takes hold on my flesh.21:7 Why do the wicked live, Become old, yes, grow mighty in power?21:8 Their seed is established with them in their sight, and their offspring before their eyes.21:9 Their houses are safe from fear, Neither is the rod of God upon them.21:10 Their bull gendereth, and fails not; Their cow calveth, and casts not her calf.21:11 They send forth their little ones like a flock, and their children dance.21:12 They sing to the timbrel and harp, and rejoice at the sound of the pipe.21:13 They spend their days in prosperity, and in a moment they go down to Sheol.21:14 And they say to God, Depart from us; For we desire not the knowledge of your ways.21:15 What is the Almighty, that we should serve him?  And what profit should we have, if we pray to him?21:16 Lo, their prosperity is not in their hand: The counsel of the wicked is far from me.21:17 How often is it that the lamp of the wicked is put out?  That their calamity comes upon them?  That God distributes sorrows in his anger?21:18 That they are as stubble before the wind, and as chaff that the storm carries away?21:19 You say, God lays up his iniquity for his children.  Let him recompense it to himself, that he may know it:21:20 Let his own eyes see his destruction, and let him drink of the wrath of the Almighty.21:21 For what cares he for his house after him, When the number of his months is cut off?21:22 Shall any teach God knowledge, Seeing he judges those that are high?21:23 One dies in his full strength, Being wholly at ease and quiet:21:24 His pails are full of milk, and the marrow of his bones is moistened.21:25 And another dies in bitterness of soul, and never tastes of good.21:26 They lie down alike in the dust, and the worm covers them.21:27 Behold, I know your thoughts, and the devices with which ye would wrong me.21:28 For ye say, Where is the house of the prince?  And where is the tent in which the wicked dwelt?21:29 Have ye not asked wayfaring men?  And do ye not know their evidences,21:30 That the evil man is reserved to the day of calamity?  That they are led forth to the day of wrath?21:31 Who shall declare his way to his face?  And who shall repay him what he has done?21:32 Yet shall he be borne to the grave, and men shall keep watch over the tomb.21:33 The clods of the valley shall be sweet to him, and all men shall draw after him, as there were innumerable before him.21:34 How then comfort ye me in vain, Seeing in your answers there remains only falsehood?22:1 Then answered Eliphaz the Temanite, and said,22:2 Can a man be profitable to God?  Surely he that is wise is profitable to himself.22:3 Is it any pleasure to the Almighty, that you are righteous?  Or is it gain to him, that you make your ways perfect?22:4 Is it for your fear of him that he reproves you, That he enters with you into judgment?22:5 Is not your wickedness great?  Neither is there any end to your iniquities.22:6 For you have taken pledges of your brother for no reason, and stripped the naked of their clothing.22:7 You have not given water to the weary to drink, and you have withheld bread from the hungry.22:8 But as for the mighty man, he had the earth; And the honorable man, he dwelt in it.22:9 You have sent widows away empty, and the arms of the fatherless have been broken.22:10 Therefore snares are round about you, and sudden fear troubles you,22:11 Or darkness, so that you cannot see, and abundance of waters cover you.22:12 Is not God in the height of heaven?  And behold the height of the stars, how high they are!22:13 And you say, What does God know?  Can he judge through the thick darkness?22:14 Thick clouds are a covering to him, so that he sees not; And he walks on the vault of heaven.22:15 Will you keep the old way which wicked men have trodden?22:16 Who were snatched away before their time, whose foundation was poured out as a stream,22:17 Who said to God, Depart from us; and, What can the Almighty do for us?22:18 Yet he filled their houses with good things: But the counsel of the wicked is far from me.22:19 The righteous see it, and are glad; And the innocent laugh them to scorn,22:20 Saying, Surely they that did rise up against us are cut off, and the remnant of them the fire has consumed.22:21 Acquaint now yourself with him, and be at peace: Thereby good shall come to you.22:22 Receive, I pray you, the law from his mouth, and lay up his words in your heart.22:23 If you return to the Almighty, you shall be built up, If you put away unrighteousness far from your tents.22:24 And lay you your treasure in the dust, and the gold of Ophir among the stones of the brooks;22:25 And the Almighty will be your treasure, and precious silver to you.22:26 For then shall you delight yourself in the Almighty, and shall lift up your face to God.22:27 You shall make your prayer to him, and he will hear you; And you shall pay your vows.22:28 You shall also decree a thing, and it shall be established to you; And light shall shine upon your ways.22:29 When they cast you down, you shall say, There is lifting up; And the humble person he will save.22:30 He will deliver even him that is not innocent: Yes, he shall be delivered through the cleanness of your hands.23:1 Then Job answered and said,23:2 Even today is my complaint rebellious: My stroke is heavier than my groaning.23:3 Oh that I knew where I might find him! That I might come even to his seat!23:4 I would set my cause in order before him, and fill my mouth with arguments.23:5 I would know the words which he would answer me, and understand what he would say to me.23:6 Would he contend with me in the greatness of his power?  Nay; but he would give heed to me.23:7 There the upright might reason with him; So should I be delivered for ever from my judge.23:8 Behold, I go forward, but he is not there; And backward, but I cannot perceive him;23:9 On the left hand, when he does work, but I cannot behold him; He hides himself on the right hand, that I cannot see him.23:10 But he knows the way that I take; When he has tried me, I shall come forth as gold.23:11 My foot has held fast to his steps; His way have I kept, and turned not aside.23:12 I have not gone back from the commandment of his lips; I have treasured up the words of his mouth more than my necessary food.23:13 But he is in one mind, and who can turn him?  And what his soul desires, even that he does.23:14 For he performs that which is appointed for me: And many such things are with him.23:15 Therefore am I terrified at his presence; When I consider, I am afraid of him.23:16 For God has made my heart faint, and the Almighty has terrified me;23:17 Because I was not cut off before the darkness, Neither did he cover the thick darkness from my face.24:1 Why are times not laid up by the Almighty?  And why do not they that know him see his days?24:2 There are that remove the landmarks; They violently take away flocks, and feed them.24:3 They drive away the donkey of the fatherless; They take the widow's ox for a pledge.24:4 They turn the needy out of the way: The poor of the earth all hide themselves.24:5 Behold, as wild asses in the desert They go forth to their work, seeking diligently for food; The wilderness yields them bread for their children.24:6 They cut their provender in the field; And they glean the vintage of the wicked.24:7 They lie all night naked without clothing, and have no covering in the cold.24:8 They are wet with the showers of the mountains, and embrace the rock for want of a shelter.24:9 There are that pluck the fatherless from the breast, and take a pledge of the poor;24:10 So that they go about naked without clothing, and being hungry they carry the sheaves.24:11 They make oil within the walls of these men;  They tread their winepresses, and suffer thirst.24:12 From out of the populous city men groan,  And the soul of the wounded cries out:  Yet God regards not the folly.24:13 These are of them that rebel against the light; They know not the ways thereof, Nor abide in the paths thereof.24:14 The murderer rises with the light; He kills the poor and needy; And in the night he is as a thief.24:15 The eye also of the adulterer waits for the twilight, Saying, No eye shall see me: And he disguises his face.24:16 In the dark they dig through houses: They shut themselves up in the day-time; They know not the light.24:17 For the morning is to all of them as thick darkness; For they know the terrors of the thick darkness.24:18 Swiftly they pass away upon the face of the waters; Their portion is cursed in the earth: They turn not into the way of the vineyards.24:19 Drought and heat consume the snow waters: So does Sheol those that have sinned.24:20 The womb shall forget him; The worm shall feed sweetly on him; He shall be no more remembered; And unrighteousness shall be broken as a tree.24:21 He devours the barren that bears not, and does not good to the widow.24:22 Yet God preserves the mighty by his power: He rises up that has no assurance of life.24:23 God gives them to be in security, and they rest upon it; And his eyes are upon their ways.24:24 They are exalted; yet a little while, and they are gone; Yes, they are brought low, they are taken out of the way as all others, and are cut off as the tops of the ears of grain.24:25 And if it be not so now, who will prove me a liar, and make my speech nothing worth?25:1 Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said,25:2 Dominion and fear are with him; He makes peace in his high places.25:3 Is there any number of his armies?  And upon whom does not his light arise?25:4 How then can man be just with God?  Or how can he be clean that is born of a woman?25:5 Behold, even the moon has no brightness, and the stars are not pure in his sight:25:6 How much less man, that is a worm! And the son of man, that is a worm!26:1 Then Job answered and said,26:2 How have you helped him that is without power! How have you saved the arm that has no strength!26:3 How have you counselled him that has no wisdom, and plentifully declared sound knowledge!26:4 To whom have you uttered words?  And whose spirit came forth from you?26:5 They that are deceased tremble Beneath the waters and the inhabitants thereof.26:6 Sheol is naked before God, and Abaddon has no covering.26:7 He stretches out the north over empty space, and hangs the earth upon nothing.26:8 He binds up the waters in his thick clouds; And the cloud is not rent under them.26:9 He incloses the face of his throne, and spreads his cloud upon it.26:10 He has described a boundary upon the face of the waters, To the confines of light and darkness.26:11 The pillars of heaven tremble And are astonished at his rebuke.26:12 He stirs up the sea with his power, and by his understanding he strikes through Rahab.26:13 By his Spirit the heavens are garnished; His hand has pierced the swift serpent.26:14 Lo, these are but the outskirts of his ways: And how small a whisper do we hear of him! But the thunder of his power who can understand?27:1 And Job again took up his parable, and said,27:2 As God lives, who has taken away my right, and the Almighty, who has vexed my soul:27:3 (For my life is yet whole in me, and the spirit of God is in my nostrils);27:4 Surely my lips shall not speak unrighteousness, Neither shall my tongue utter deceit.27:5 Far be it from me that I should justify you: Till I die I will not put away my integrity from me.27:6 My righteousness I hold fast, and will not let it go: My heart shall not reproach me so long as I live.27:7 Let my enemy be as the wicked, and let him that rises up against me be as the unrighteous.27:8 For what is the hope of the godless, though he get him gain, When God takes away his soul?27:9 Will God hear his cry, When trouble comes upon him?27:10 Will he delight himself in the Almighty, and call upon God at all times?27:11 I will teach you concerning the hand of God; That which is with the Almighty will I not conceal.27:12 Behold, all ye yourselves have seen it; Why then are ye become altogether vain?27:13 This is the portion of a wicked man with God, and the heritage of oppressors, which they receive from the Almighty:27:14 If his children be multiplied, it is for the sword; And his offspring shall not be satisfied with bread.27:15 Those that remain of him shall be buried in death, and his widows shall make no lamentation.27:16 Though he heap up silver as the dust, and prepare raiment as the clay;27:17 He may prepare it, but the just shall put it on, and the innocent shall divide the silver.27:18 He builds his house as the moth, and as a booth which the keeper makes.27:19 He lies down rich, but he shall not be gathered to his fathers; He opens his eyes, and he is not.27:20 Terrors overtake him like waters; A tempest steals him away in the night.27:21 The east wind carries him away, and he departs; And it sweeps him out of his place.27:22 For God shall hurl at him, and not spare: He would fain flee out of his hand.27:23 Men shall clap their hands at him, and shall hiss him out of his place.28:1 Surely there is a mine for silver,  And a place for gold which they refine.28:2 Iron is taken out of the earth, and copper is molten out of the stone.28:3 Man sets an end to darkness, and searches out, to the furthest bound, The stones of obscurity and of thick darkness.28:4 He breaks open a shaft away from where men sojourn; They are forgotten of the foot; They hang afar from men, they swing to and fro.28:5 As for the earth, out of it comes bread; And underneath it is turned up as it were by fire.28:6 The stones thereof are the place of sapphires, and it has dust of gold.28:7 That path no bird of prey knows, Neither has the falcon's eye seen it:28:8 The proud beasts have not trodden it, Nor has the fierce lion passed thereby.28:9 He puts forth his hand upon the flinty rock; He overturns the mountains by the roots.28:10 He cuts out channels among the rocks; And his eye sees every precious thing.28:11 He binds the streams that they trickle not;  And the thing that is hid brings he forth to light.28:12 But where shall wisdom be found?  And where is the place of understanding?28:13 Man knows not the price thereof; Neither is it found in the land of the living.28:14 The deep says, It is not in me; And the sea says, It is not with me.28:15 It cannot be gotten for gold, Neither shall silver be weighed for the price thereof.28:16 It cannot be valued with the gold of Ophir, With the precious onyx, or the sapphire.28:17 Gold and glass cannot equal it, Neither shall it be exchanged for jewels of fine gold.28:18 No mention shall be made of coral or of crystal: Yes, the price of wisdom is above rubies.28:19 The topaz of Ethiopia shall not equal it, Neither shall it be valued with pure gold.28:20 From where then comes wisdom?  And where is the place of understanding?28:21 Seeing it is hid from the eyes of all living, and kept close from the birds of the heavens.28:22 Destruction and Death say, We have heard a rumor thereof with our ears.28:23 God understands the way thereof, and he knows the place thereof.28:24 For he looks to the ends of the earth, and sees under the whole heaven;28:25 To make a weight for the wind: Yes, he metes out the waters by measure.28:26 When he made a decree for the rain, and a way for the lightning of the thunder;28:27 Then did he see it, and declare it; He established it, yes, and searched it out.28:28 And to man he said, Behold, the fear of the Lord, that is wisdom; And to depart from evil is understanding.29:1 And Job again took up his parable, and said,29:2 Oh that I were as in the months of old, as in the days when God watched over me;29:3 When his lamp shined upon my head, and by his light I walked through darkness;29:4 As I was in the ripeness of my days, When the friendship of God was upon my tent;29:5 When the Almighty was yet with me, and my children were about me;29:6 When my steps were washed with butter, and the rock poured me out streams of oil!29:7 When I went forth to the gate to the city, When I prepared my seat in the street,29:8 The young men saw me and hid themselves, and the aged rose up and stood;29:9 The princes refrained from talking, and laid their hand on their mouth;29:10 The voice of the nobles was hushed, and their tongue cleaved to the roof of their mouth.29:11 For when the ear heard me, then it blessed me; And when the eye saw me, it gave witness to me:29:12 Because I delivered the poor that cried, The fatherless also, that had none to help him.29:13 The blessing of him that was ready to perish came upon me; And I caused the widow's heart to sing for joy.29:14 I put on righteousness, and it clothed me: My justice was as a robe and a diadem.29:15 I was eyes to the blind, and feet was I to the lame.29:16 I was a father to the needy: And the cause of him that I knew not I searched out.29:17 And I broke the jaws of the unrighteous, and plucked the prey out of his teeth.29:18 Then I said, I shall die in my nest, and I shall multiply my days as the sand:29:19 My root is spread out to the waters, and the dew lies all night upon my branch;29:20 My glory is fresh in me, and my bow is renewed in my hand.29:21 To me men gave ear, and waited, and kept silence for my counsel.29:22 After my words they spoke not again; And my speech distilled upon them.29:23 And they waited for me as for the rain; And they opened their mouth wide as for the latter rain.29:24 I smiled on them, when they had no confidence; And the light of my countenance they cast not down.29:25 I chose out their way, and sat as chief, and dwelt as a king in the army, as one that comforts the mourners.30:1 But now they that are younger than I have me in derision, Whose fathers I disdained to set with the dogs of my flock.30:2 Yes, the strength of their hands, whereto should it profit me?  Men in whom ripe age is perished.30:3 They are gaunt with want and famine; They gnaw the dry ground, in the gloom of wasteness and desolation.30:4 They pluck salt-wort by the bushes;  And the roots of the broom are their food.30:5 They are driven forth from the midst of men; They cry after them as after a thief;30:6 So that they dwell in frightful valleys, In holes of the earth and of the rocks.30:7 Among the bushes they bray; Under the nettles they are gathered together.30:8 They are children of fools, yes, children of base men; They were scourged out of the land.30:9 And now I am become their song, Yes, I am a byword to them.30:10 They abhor me, they stand aloof from me, and spare not to spit in my face.30:11 For he has loosed his cord, and afflicted me; And they have cast off the bridle before me.30:12 Upon my right hand rise the rabble; They thrust aside my feet, and they cast up against me their ways of destruction.30:13 They mar my path, They set forward my calamity, even men that have no helper.30:14 As through a wide breach they come: In the midst of the ruin they roll themselves upon me.30:15 Terrors are turned upon me; They chase my honor as the wind; And my welfare is passed away as a cloud.30:16 And now my soul is poured out within me; Days of affliction have taken hold upon me.30:17 In the night season my bones are pierced in me, and the pains that gnaw me take no rest.30:18 By God's great force is my garment disfigured; It binds me about as the collar of my coat.30:19 He has cast me into the mire, and I am become like dust and ashes.30:20 I cry to you, and you do not answer me: I stand up, and you gaze at me.30:21 You are turned to be cruel to me; With the might of your hand you persecutest me.30:22 You lift me up to the wind, you causest me to ride upon it;  And you dissolvest me in the storm.30:23 For I know that you will bring me to death, and to the house appointed for all living.30:24 Yet does not one stretch out the hand in his fall?  Or in his calamity therefore cry for help?30:25 Did not I weep for him that was in trouble?  Was not my soul grieved for the needy?30:26 When I looked for good, then evil came; And when I waited for light, there came darkness.30:27 My heart is troubled, and rests not;  Days of affliction are come upon me.30:28 I go mourning without the sun: I stand up in the assembly, and cry for help.30:29 I am a brother to jackals, and a companion to ostriches.30:30 My skin is black, and falls from me, and my bones are burned with heat.30:31 Therefore is my harp turned to mourning, and my pipe into the voice of them that weep.31:1 I made a covenant with my eyes; How then should I look upon a virgin?31:2 For what is the portion from God above, and the heritage from the Almighty on high?31:3 Is it not calamity to the unrighteous, and disaster to the workers of iniquity?31:4 Does not he see my ways, and number all my steps?31:5 If I have walked with falsehood, and my foot has hasted to deceit31:6 (Let me be weighed in an even balance, That God may know my integrity);31:7 If my step has turned out of the way, and my heart walked after my eyes, and if any spot has cleaved to my hands:31:8 Then let me sow, and let another eat; Yes, let the produce of my field be rooted out.31:9 If my heart has been enticed to a woman, and I have laid wait at my neighbor's door;31:10 Then let my wife grind for another, and let others bow down upon her. 31:11 For that would be a heinous crime; Yes, it would be an iniquity to be punished by the judges:31:12 For it is a fire that consumes to Destruction, and would root out all my increase.31:13 If I have despised the cause of my man-servant or of my maid-servant, When they contended with me;31:14 What then shall I do when God rises up?  And when he visiteth, what shall I answer him?31:15 Did not he that made me in the womb make him?  And did not one fashion us in the womb?31:16 If I have withheld the poor from their desire, Or have caused the eyes of the widow to fail,31:17 Or have eaten my morsel alone, and the fatherless has not eaten thereof31:18 (Nay, from my youth he grew up with me as with a father,  And her have I guided from my mother's womb);31:19 If I have seen any perish for want of clothing, Or that the needy had no covering;31:20 If his loins have not blessed me, and if he has not been warmed with the fleece of my sheep;31:21 If I have lifted up my hand against the fatherless, Because I saw my help in the gate:31:22 Then let my shoulder fall from the shoulder-blade, and my arm be broken from the bone.31:23 For calamity from God is a terror to me, and by reason of his majesty I can do nothing.31:24 If I have made gold my hope, and have said to the fine gold, You are my confidence;31:25 If I have rejoiced because my wealth was great, and because my hand had gotten much;31:26 If I have beheld the sun when it shined, Or the moon walking in brightness,31:27 And my heart has been secretly enticed, and my mouth has kissed my hand:31:28 This also were an iniquity to be punished by the judges; For I should have denied the God that is above.31:29 If I have rejoiced at the destruction of him that hated me, Or lifted up myself when evil found him;31:30 (Yes, I have not allowed by mouth to sin By asking his life with a curse);31:31 If the men of my tent have not said, Who can find one that has not been filled with his meat?31:32 (The sojourner has not lodged in the street; But I have opened my doors to the traveller);31:33 If like Adam I have covered my transgressions, By hiding my iniquity in my bosom,31:34 Because I feared the great multitude, and the contempt of families terrified me, So that I kept silence, and went not out of the door-31:35 Oh that I had one to hear me! (Lo, here is my signature, let the Almighty answer me); And that I had the indictment which my adversary has written!31:36 Surely I would carry it upon my shoulder; I would bind it to me as a crown:31:37 I would declare to him the number of my steps; As a prince would I go near to him.31:38 If my land cries out against me, and the furrows thereof weep together;31:39 If I have eaten the fruits thereof without money, Or have caused the owners thereof to lose their life:31:40 Let thistles grow instead of wheat, and cockle instead of barley.  The words of Job are ended.32:1 So these three men ceased to answer Job, because he was righteous in his own eyes.32:2 Then was kindled the wrath of Elihu the son of Barachel the Buzite, of the family of Ram: against Job was his wrath kindled, because he justified himself rather than God.32:3 Also against his three friends was his wrath kindled, because they had found no answer, and yet had condemned Job.32:4 Now Elihu had waited to speak to Job, because they were elder than he.32:5 And when Elihu saw that there was no answer in the mouth of these three men, his wrath was kindled.32:6 And Elihu the son of Barachel the Buzite answered and said, I am young, and ye are very old; Wherefore I held back, and durst not show you my opinion.32:7 I said, Days should speak, and multitude of years should teach wisdom.32:8 But there is a spirit in man, and the breath of the Almighty gives them understanding.32:9 It is not the great that are wise, Nor the aged that understand justice.32:10 Therefore I said, Hearken to me; I also will show my opinion.32:11 Behold, I waited for your words, I listened for your reasonings, Whilst ye searched out what to say.32:12 Yes, I attended to you, and, behold, there was none that convinced Job, Or that answered his words, among you.32:13 Beware lest ye say, We have found wisdom; God may vanquish him, not man:32:14 For he has not directed his words against me; Neither will I answer him with your speeches.32:15 They are amazed, they answer no more: They have not a word to say.32:16 And shall I wait, because they speak not, Because they stand still, and answer no more?32:17 I also will answer my part, I also will show my opinion.32:18 For I am full of words; The spirit within me constrains me.32:19 Behold, my breast is as wine which has no vent; Like new wine-skins it is ready to burst.32:20 I will speak, that I may be refreshed; I will open my lips and answer.32:21 Let me not, I pray you, respect any man's person; Neither will I give flattering titles to any man.32:22 For I know not to give flattering titles; Else would my Maker soon take me away.33:1 But now, Job, I pray you, hear my speech, and hearken to all my words.33:2 Behold now, I have opened my mouth; My tongue has spoken in my mouth.33:3 My words shall utter the uprightness of my heart; And that which my lips know they shall speak sincerely.33:4 The Spirit of God has made me, and the breath of the Almighty gives me life.33:5 If you can, answer you me; Set your words in order before me, stand forth.33:6 Behold, I am toward God even as you are: I also am formed out of the clay.33:7 Behold, my terror shall not make you afraid, Neither shall my pressure be heavy upon you.33:8 Surely you have spoken in my hearing, and I have heard the voice of your words, saying,33:9 I am clean, without transgression; I am innocent, neither is there iniquity in me:33:10 Behold, he finds occasions against me, He counts me for his enemy:33:11 He puts my feet in the stocks, He marks all my paths.33:12 Behold, I will answer you, in this you are not just; For God is greater than man.33:13 Why do you strive against him, For that he gives not account of any of his matters?33:14 For God speaks once, Yes twice, though man regards it not.33:15 In a dream, in a vision of the night, When deep sleep falls upon men, In slumberings upon the bed;33:16 Then he opens the ears of men, and seals their instruction,33:17 That he may withdraw man from his purpose, and hide pride from man;33:18 He keeps back his soul from the pit, and his life from perishing by the sword.33:19 He is chastened also with pain upon his bed, and with continual strife in his bones;33:20 So that his life abhors bread, and his soul dainty food.33:21 His flesh is consumed away, that it cannot be seen; And his bones that were not seen stick out.33:22 Yes, his soul draws near to the pit, and his life to the destroyers.33:23 If there be with him an angel, an interpreter, one among a thousand, To show to man what is right for him;33:24 Then God is gracious to him, and says, Deliver him from going down to the pit, I have found a ransom.33:25 His flesh shall be fresher than a child's; He returns to the days of his youth.33:26 He prays to God, and he is favorable to him, So that he sees his face with joy: And he restores to man his righteousness.33:27 He sings before men, and says, I have sinned, and perverted that which was right, and it gained me nothing:33:28 He has redeemed my soul from going into the pit, and my life shall behold the light.33:29 Lo, all these things does God work, Twice, yes thrice, with a man,33:30 To bring back his soul from the pit, that he may be enlightened with the light of the living.33:31 Mark well, O Job, hearken to me: Hold your peace, and I will speak.33:32 If you have anything to say, answer me: Speak, for I desire to justify you.33:33 If not, hearken you to me: Hold your peace, and I will teach you wisdom.34:1 Moreover Elihu answered and said,34:2 Hear my words, ye wise men; and give ear to me, ye that have knowledge.34:3 For the ear tries words, as the palate tastes food.34:4 Let us choose for us that which is right: Let us know among ourselves what is good.34:5 For Job has said, I am righteous, and God has taken away my right:34:6 Notwithstanding my right I am accounted a liar; My wound is incurable, though I am without transgression.34:7 What man is like Job, Who drinks up scoffing like water,34:8 Who goes in company with the workers of iniquity, and walks with wicked men?34:9 For he has said, It profits a man nothing That he should delight himself with God.34:10 Therefore hearken to me, ye men of understanding: Far be it from God, that he should do wickedness, and from the Almighty, that he should commit iniquity.34:11 For the work of a man will he render to him, and cause every man to find according to his ways.34:12 Yes, of a surety, God will not do wickedly, Neither will the Almighty pervert justice.34:13 Who gave him a charge over the earth?  Or who has disposed the whole world?34:14 If he set his heart upon himself, If he gather to himself his spirit and his breath;34:15 All flesh shall perish together, and man shall turn again to dust.34:16 If now you have understanding, hear this: Hearken to the voice of my words.34:17 Shall even one that hates justice govern?  And will you condemn him that is righteous and mighty?-34:18 him that says to a king, You are vile, Or to nobles, You are wicked;34:19 That respects not the persons of princes, Nor regards the rich more than the poor; For they all are the work of his hands.34:20 In a moment they die, even at midnight; The people are shaken and pass away, and the mighty are taken away without hand.34:21 For his eyes are upon the ways of a man, and he sees all his goings.34:22 There is no darkness, nor thick gloom, Where the workers of iniquity may hide themselves.34:23 For he needs not further to consider a man, That he should go before God in judgment.34:24 He breaks in pieces mighty men in ways past finding out, and sets others in their stead.34:25 Therefore he takes knowledge of their works; And he overturns them in the night, so that they are destroyed.34:26 He srikes them as wicked men In the open sight of others;34:27 Because they turned aside from following him, and would not have regard in any of his ways:34:28 So that they caused the cry of the poor to come to him, and he heard the cry of the afflicted.34:29 When he gives quietness, who then can condemn?  And when he hides his face, who then can behold him?  Alike whether it be done to a nation, or to a man:34:30 That the godless man reign not, That there be none to ensnare the people.34:31 For has any said to God, I have borne chastisement, I will not offend any more:34:32 That which I see not teach you me: If I have done iniquity, I will do it no more?34:33 Shall his recompense be as you will, that you refuse it?  For you must choose, and not I: Therefore speak what you know.34:34 Men of understanding will say to me, Yes, every wise man that hears me:34:35 Job speaks without knowledge, and his words are without wisdom.34:36 Would that Job were tried to the end, Because of his answering like wicked men.34:37 For he adds rebellion to his sin; He claps his hands among us, and multiplies his words against God.35:1 Moreover Elihu answered and said,35:2 Think you this to be your right, Or do you say, My righteousness is more than God's,35:3 That you say, What advantage will it be to me?  And, What profit shall I have, more than if I had sinned?35:4 I will answer you, and your companions along with you.35:5 Look to the heavens, and see; And behold the skies, which are higher than you.35:6 If you have sinned, what effect do you have against him?  And if your transgressions are multiplied, what do you do to him?35:7 If you be righteous, what do you give him?  Or what receives he from your hand?35:8 Your wickedness may hurt another man like you; And your righteousness may profit some son of man.35:9 By reason of the multitude of oppressions they cry out; They cry for help by reason of the arm of the mighty.35:10 But no one says, Where is God my Maker, Who gives songs in the night,35:11 Who teaches us more than he teaches the beasts of the earth, and makes us wiser than the birds of the heavens?35:12 There they cry, but no one gives answer, Because of the pride of evil men.35:13 Surely God will not hear an empty cry, Neither will the Almighty regard it.35:14 How much less when you say you behold him not, that the cause is before him, and you are waiting for him!35:15 But now, because he has not visited in his anger, and does not closely watch arrogance;35:16 Therefore does Job open his mouth in vanity; He multiplies words without knowledge.36:1 Elihu also proceeded, and said,36:2 Allow me a little, and I will show you; For I have yet somewhat to say on God's behalf.36:3 I will fetch my knowledge from afar, and will ascribe righteousness to my Maker.36:4 For truly my words are not false: One that is perfect in knowledge is with you.36:5 Behold, God is mighty, and despises not any: He is mighty in strength of understanding.36:6 He preserves not the life of the wicked, But gives to the afflicted their right.36:7 He withdraws not his eyes from the righteous: But with kings upon the throne He sets them for ever, and they are exalted.36:8 And if they be bound in fetters, and be taken in the cords of afflictions;36:9 Then he shows them their work, and their transgressions, that they have behaved themselves proudly.36:10 He opens also their ear to instruction, and commands that they return from iniquity.36:11 If they hearken and serve him, They shall spend their days in prosperity, and their years in pleasures.36:12 But if they hearken not, they shall perish by the sword, and they shall die without knowledge.36:13 But they that are godless in heart lay up anger: They cry not for help when he binds them.36:14 They die in youth, and their life perishes among the unclean.36:15 He delivers the afflicted by their affliction, and opens their ear in oppression.36:16 Yes, he would have allured you out of distress Into a broad place, where there is no straitness; And that which is set on your table would be full of fatness.36:17 But you are full of the judgment of the wicked: Judgment and justice take hold on you.36:18 For let not wrath stir you up against chastisements; Neither let the greatness of the ransom turn you aside.36:19 Will your cry avail, that you be not in distress, Or all the forces of your strength?36:20 Desire not the night, When peoples are cut off in their place.36:21 Take heed, regard not iniquity: For this have you chosen rather than affliction.36:22 Behold, God does loftily in his power: Who is a teacher like him?36:23 Who has enjoined him his way?  Or who can say, You have wrought unrighteousness?36:24 Remember that you magnify his work, About which men have sung.36:25 All men have looked upon it; Man beholds it afar off.36:26 Behold, God is great, and we know him not; The number of his years is unsearchable.36:27 For he draws up the drops of water, Which distill in rain from his vapor,36:28 Which the skies pour down and drop upon man abundantly.36:29 Yes, can any understand the spreadings of the clouds, the thunderings of his pavilion?36:30 Behold, he spreads his light around him; And he covers the bottom of the sea.36:31 For by these he judges the peoples; He gives food in abundance.36:32 He covers his hands with the lightning, and gives it a charge that it strikes the mark.36:33 The noise of tells about him, The cattle also concerning the storm that comes up.37:1 Yes, at this my heart trembles, and is moved out of its place.37:2 Hear, oh, hear the noise of his voice, and the sound that goes out of his mouth.37:3 He sends it forth under the whole heaven, and his lightening to the ends of the earth.37:4 After it a voice roareth; He thunders with the voice of his majesty; And he restrains not the lightnings when his voice is heard.37:5 God thunders marvellously with his voice; Great things does he, which we cannot comprehend.37:6 For he says to the snow, Fall you on the earth; Likewise to the shower of rain, and to the showers of his mighty rain.37:7 He seals up the hand of every man, That all men whom he has made may know it.37:8 Then the beasts go into coverts, and remain in their dens.37:9 Out of the chamber of the south comes the storm, and cold out of the north.37:10 By the breath of God ice is given; And the breadth of the waters is straitened.37:11 Yes, he loads the thick cloud with moisture; He spreads abroad the cloud of his lightning:37:12 And it is turned round about by his guidance, That they may do whatsoever he commands them Upon the face of the habitable world,37:13 Whether it be for correction, or for his land, Or for lovingkindness, that he cause it to come.37:14 Hearken to this, O Job: Stand still, and consider the wondrous works of God.37:15 Do you know how God lays his charge upon them, and causes the lightning of his cloud to shine?37:16 Do you know the balancings of the clouds, The wondrous works of him who is perfect in knowledge?37:17 How your garments are warm, When the earth is still by reason of the south wind?37:18 Can you with him spread out the sky, Which is strong as a molten mirror?37:19 Teach us what we shall say to him; For we cannot set our speech in order by reason of darkness.37:20 Shall it be told him that I would speak?  Or should a man wish that he were swallowed up?37:21 And now men see not the light which is bright in the skies; But the wind passes, and clears them.37:22 Out of the north comes golden splendor: God has upon him terrible majesty.37:23 Touching the Almighty, we cannot find him out  He is excellent in power; And in justice and plenteous righteousness he will not afflict.37:24 Men do therefore fear him: He regards not any that are wise of heart.38:1 Then Yahweh answered Job out of the whirlwind, and said,38:2 Who is this that darkens counsel By words without knowledge?38:3 Gird up now your loins like a man; For I will demand of you, and declare you to me.38:4 Where were you when I laid the foundations of the earth?  Declare, if you have understanding.38:5 Who determined the measures thereof, if you know?  Or who stretched the line upon it?38:6 Whereupon were the foundations thereof fastened?  Or who laid the corner-stone thereof,38:7 When the morning stars sang together, and all the sons of God shouted for joy?38:8 Or who shut up the sea with doors, When it broke forth, as if it had issued out of the womb;38:9 When I made clouds the garment thereof, and thick darkness a swaddling-band for it,38:10 And marked out for it my bound, and set bars and doors,38:11 And said, Hitherto shall you come, but no further; And here shall your proud waves be stayed?38:12 Have you commanded the morning since your days began, and caused the dayspring to know its place;38:13 That it might take hold of the ends of the earth, and the wicked be shaken out of it?38:14 It is changed as clay under the seal; And all things stand forth as a garment:38:15 And from the wicked their light is withholden, and the high arm is broken.38:16 Have you entered into the springs of the sea?  Or have you walked in the recesses of the deep?38:17 Have the gates of death been revealed to you?  Or have you seen the gates of the shadow of death?38:18 Have you comprehended the earth in its breadth?  Declare, if you know it all.38:19 Where is the way to the dwelling of light?  And as for darkness, where is the place thereof,38:20 That you should take it to the bound thereof, and that you should discern the paths to the house thereof?38:21 Doubtless, you know, for you were then born, and the number of your days is great!38:22 Have you entered the treasuries of the snow, Or have you seen the treasures of the hail,38:23 Which I have reserved against the time of trouble, against the day of battle and war?38:24 By what way is the light parted, Or the east wind scattered upon the earth?38:25 Who has cleft a channel for the waterflood, Or the way for the lightning of the thunder;38:26 To cause it to rain on a land where no man is; On the wilderness, in which there is no man;38:27 To satisfy the waste and desolate ground, and to cause the tender grass to spring forth?38:28 Has the rain a father?  Or who has begotten the drops of dew?38:29 Out of whose womb came the ice?  And the hoary frost of heaven, who has gendered it?38:30 The waters hide themselves and become like stone, and the face of the deep is frozen.38:31 Can you bind the cluster of the Pleiades, Or loose the bands of Orion?38:32 Can you lead forth the Mazzaroth in their season?  Or can you guide the Bear with her train?38:33 Know you the ordinances of the heavens?  Can you establish the dominion thereof in the earth?38:34 Can you lift up your voice to the clouds, That abundance of waters may cover you?38:35 Can you send forth lightnings, that they may go, and say to you, Here we are?38:36 Who has put wisdom in the inward parts?  Or who has given understanding to the mind?38:37 Who can number the clouds by wisdom?  Or who can pour out the bottles of heaven,38:38 When the dust runs into a mass, and the clods cleave fast together?38:39 Can you hunt the prey for the lioness, Or satisfy the appetite of the young lions,38:40 When they crouch in their dens, and abide in the covert to lie in wait?38:41 Who provides for the raven his prey, When his young ones cry to God, and wander for lack of food?39:1 Know you the time when the wild goats of the rock bring forth?  Or can you mark when the hinds do calve?39:2 Can you number the months that they fulfil?  Or know you the time when they bring forth?39:3 They bow themselves, they bring forth their young, They cast out their pains.39:4 Their young ones become strong, they grow up in the open field; They go forth, and return not again.39:5 Who has sent out the wild donkey free?  Or who has loosed the bonds of the swift donkey,39:6 Whose home I have made the wilderness, and the salt land his dwelling-place?39:7 He scorns the tumult of the city, Neither hears he the shoutings of the driver.39:8 The range of the mountains is his pasture, and he searches after every green thing.39:9 Will the wild-ox be content to serve you?  Or will he abide by your crib?39:10 Can you bind the wild-ox with his band in the furrow?  Or will he harrow the valleys after you?39:11 Will you trust him, because his strength is great?  Or will you leave to him your labor?39:12 Will you confide in him, that he will bring home your seed, and gather the grain of your threshing-floor?39:13 The wings of the ostrich wave proudly; But are they the pinions and plumage of love?39:14 For she leaves her eggs on the earth, and warms them in the dust,39:15 And forgets that the foot may crush them, Or that the wild beast may trample them.39:16 She deals hardly with her young ones, as if they were not hers: Though her labor be in vain, she is without fear;39:17 Because God has deprived her of wisdom, Neither has he imparted to her understanding.39:18 What time she lifts up herself on high, She scorns the horse and his rider.39:19 Have you given the horse his might?  Have you clothed his neck with the quivering mane?39:20 Have you made him to leap as a locust?  The glory of his snorting is terrible.39:21 He paws in the valley, and rejoices in his strength: He goes out to meet the armed men.39:22 He mocks at fear, and is not dismayed; Neither turns he back from the sword.39:23 The quiver rattles against him, The flashing spear and the javelin.39:24 He swallows the ground with fierceness and rage; Neither believes he that it is the voice of the trumpet.39:25 As oft as the trumpet sounds he says, aha! And he smells the battle afar off, The thunder of the captains, and the shouting.39:26 Is it by your wisdom that the hawk soareth, (And) stretches her wings toward the south?39:27 Is it at your command that the eagle mounts up, and makes her nest on high?39:28 On the cliff she dwells, and makes her home, Upon the point of the cliff, and the stronghold.39:29 From there she spies out the prey; Her eyes behold it afar off.39:30 Her young ones also suck up blood: And where the slain are, there is she.40:1 Moreover Yahweh answered Job, and said,40:2 Shall he that finds fault contend with the Almighty?  He that argues with God, let him answer it.40:3 Then Job answered Yahweh, and said,40:4 Behold, I am of small account; What shall I answer you?  I lay my hand upon my mouth.40:5 Once have I spoken, and I will not answer; Yes, twice, but I will proceed no further.40:6 Then Yahweh answered Job out of the whirlwind, and said,40:7 Gird up your loins now like a man: I will demand of you, and declare you to me.40:8 Will you even annul my judgment?  Will you condemn me, that you may be justified?40:9 Or have you an arm like God?  And can you thunder with a voice like him?40:10 Deck yourself now with excellency and dignity; And array yourself with honor and majesty.40:11 Pour forth the overflowings of your anger; And look upon every one that is proud, and abase him.40:12 Look on every one that is proud, and bring him low; And tread down the wicked where they stand.40:13 Hide them in the dust together; Bind their faces in the hidden place.40:14 Then will I also confess of you That your own right hand can save you.40:15 Behold now, behemoth, which I made as well as you; He eats grass as an ox.40:16 Lo now, his strength is in his loins, and his force is in the muscles of his belly.40:17 He moves his tail like a cedar: The sinews of his thighs are knit together.40:18 His bones are as tubes of brass; His limbs are like bars of iron.40:19 He is the chief of the ways of God: He only that made him gives him his sword.40:20 Surely the mountains bring him forth food, Where all the beasts of the field do play.40:21 He lies under the lotus-trees, In the covert of the reed, and the fen.40:22 The lotus-trees cover him with their shade; The willows of the brook compass him about.40:23 Behold, if a river overflows, he trembles not; He is confident, though a Jordan swell even to his mouth.40:24 Shall any take him when he is on the watch, Or pierce through his nose with a snare?41:1 Can you draw out leviathan with a fishhook?  Or press down his tongue with a cord?41:2 Can you put a rope into his nose?  Or pierce his jaw through with a hook?41:3 Will he make many supplications to you?  Or will he speak soft words to you?41:4 Will he make a covenant with you, That you should take him for a servant for ever?41:5 Will you play with him as with a bird?  Or will you bind him for your maidens?41:6 Will the bands of fishermen make traffic of him?  Will they part him among the merchants?41:7 Can you fill his skin with barbed irons, Or his head with fish-spears?41:8 Lay your hand upon him; Remember the battle, and do so no more.41:9 Behold, the hope of him is in vain: Will not one be cast down even at the sight of him?41:10 None is so fierce that he dare stir him up; Who then is he that can stand before me?41:11 Who has first given to me, that I should repay him?  Whatsoever is under the whole heaven is mine.41:12 I will not keep silence concerning his limbs, Nor his mighty strength, nor his goodly frame.41:13 Who can strip off his outer garment?  Who shall come within his jaws?41:14 Who can open the doors of his face?  Round about his teeth is terror.41:15 his strong scales are his pride, Shut up together as with a close seal.41:16 One is so near to another, That no air can come between them.41:17 They are joined one to another; They stick together, so that they cannot be sundered.41:18 His sneezings flash forth light, and his eyes are like the eyelids of the morning.41:19 Out of his mouth go burning torches, and sparks of fire leap forth.41:20 Out of his nostrils a smoke goes, as of a boiling pot and burning rushes.41:21 His breath kindles coals, and a flame goes forth from his mouth.41:22 In his neck abides strength, and terror dances before him.41:23 The flakes of his flesh are joined together: They are firm upon him; they cannot be moved.41:24 His heart is as firm as a stone; Yes, firm as the nether millstone.41:25 When he raises himself up, the mighty are afraid: By reason of consternation they are beside themselves.41:26 If one lay at him with the sword, it cannot avail; Nor the spear, the dart, nor the pointed shaft.41:27 He counts iron as straw, and brass as rotten wood.41:28 The arrow cannot make him flee; with him, sling-stones are turned into stubble.41:29 Clubs are counted as stubble: He laughs at the rushing of the javelin.41:30 His underparts are as sharp pot shards: He spreads as it were a threshing-wain upon the mire.41:31 He makes the deep to boil like a pot: He makes the sea like a pot of ointment.41:32 He makes a path to shine after him; One would think the deep to be hoary.41:33 Upon earth there is not his like, That is made without fear.41:34 He beholds everything that is high: He is king over all the sons of pride.42:1 Then Job answered Yahweh, and said,42:2 I know that you can do all things, and that no purpose of yours can be restrained.42:3 Who is this that hides counsel without knowledge?  Therefore have I uttered that which I understood not, Things too wonderful for me, which I knew not.42:4 Hear, I beseech you, and I will speak; I will demand of you, and declare you to me.42:5 I had heard of you by the hearing of the ear; But now my eye sees you:42:6 Wherefore I abhor myself, and repent in dust and ashes.42:7 And it was so, that, after Yahweh had spoken these words to Job, Yahweh said to Eliphaz the Temanite, My wrath is kindled against you, and against your two friends; for ye have not spoken of me the thing that is right, as my servant Job has.42:8 Now therefore, take to you seven bullocks and seven rams, and go to my servant Job, and offer up for yourselves a burnt offering; and my servant Job shall pray for you; for him will I accept, that I deal not with you after your folly; for ye have not spoken of me the thing that is right, as my servant Job has.42:9 So Eliphaz the Temanite and Bildad the Shuhite and Zophar the Naamathite went, and did according as Yahweh commanded them: and Yahweh accepted Job.42:10 And Yahweh turned the captivity of Job, when he prayed for his friends: and Yahweh gave Job twice as much as he had before.42:11 Then came there to him all his brethren, and all his sisters, and all they that had been of his acquaintance before, and did eat bread with him in his house: and they bemoaned him, and comforted him concerning all the evil that Yahweh had brought upon him: every man also gave him a piece of money, and every one a ring of gold.42:12 So Yahweh blessed the latter end of Job more than his beginning: And he had fourteen thousand sheep, and six thousand camels, and a thousand yoke of oxen, and a thousand she-asses.42:13 He had also seven sons and three daughters.42:14 And he called the name of the first, Jemimah: and the name of the second, Keziah; and the name of the third, Keren-happuch.42:15 And in all the land were no women found so fair as the daughters of Job: and their father gave them inheritance among their brethren.42:16 And after this Job lived a hundred and forty years, and saw his sons, and his sons' sons, even four generations.42:17 So Job died, being old and full of days.End of JobPsalmsBook IPsalm 11:1 Blessed is the man that walks not in the counsel of the wicked, nor stands in the way of sinners, nor sits in the seat of scoffers:1:2 But his delight is in the law of Yahweh; and on his law does he meditate day and night.1:3 And he shall be like a tree planted by the streams of water, that brings forth its fruit in its season, whose leaf also does not wither; and whatever he does shall prosper.1:4 The wicked are not so, but are like the chaff which the wind drives away.1:5 Therefore the wicked shall not stand in the judgment, nor sinners in the congregation of the righteous.1:6 For Yahweh knows the way of the righteous; but the way of the wicked shall perish.Psalm 22:1 Why do the nations rage, and the peoples meditate a vain thing?2:2 The kings of the earth set themselves, and the rulers take counsel together, against Yahweh, and against his anointed, saying,2:3 Let us break their bonds asunder, and cast away their cords from us.2:4 He that sits in the heavens will laugh: the Lord will have them in derision.2:5 Then will he speak to them in his wrath, and vex them in his sore displeasure:2:6 Yet I have set my king upon my holy hill of Zion.2:7 I will tell of the decree: Yahweh said to me, You are my son; this day have I begotten you.2:8 Ask of me, and I will give the nations for your inheritance, and the uttermost parts of the earth for your possession.2:9 You shall break them with a rod of iron; you shall dash them in pieces like a potter's vessel.2:10 Now therefore be wise, O ye kings: Be instructed, ye judges of the earth.2:11 Serve Yahweh with fear, and rejoice with trembling.2:12 Kiss the son, lest he be angry, and ye perish in the way; for his wrath will soon be kindled.  Blessed are all they that take refuge in him.Psalm 3A Psalm of David, when he fled from Absalom his son.3:1 Yahweh, how increased are my adversaries!  Many are they that rise up against me.3:2 Many there are that say of my soul, There is no help for him in God.  Selah3:3 But you, O Yahweh, are a shield about me; my glory and the lifter of my head.3:4 I cry to Yahweh with my voice, and he answers me out of his holy hill.  Selah3:5 I laid me down and slept; I awoke; for Yahweh sustains me.3:6 I will not be afraid of ten thousands of the people that have set themselves against me round about.3:7 Arise, O Yahweh; save me, O my God: For you have smitten all my enemies upon the cheek bone; You have broken the teeth of the wicked. 3:8 Salvation belongs to Yahweh: Your blessing be upon your people.  Selah.Psalm 4For the Chief Musician; on stringed instruments.  A Psalm of David.4:1 Answer me when I call, O God of my righteousness.  You have set me free when I was in distress.  Have mercy upon me, and hear my prayer.4:2 O ye sons of men, how long shall my glory be turned into dishonor?  How long will ye love vanity, and seek after falsehood?  Selah4:3 But know that Yahweh has set apart for himself him who is godly: Yahweh will hear when I call to him.4:4 Stand in awe, and sin not: Commune with your own heart upon your bed, and be still.  Selah4:5 Offer the sacrifices of righteousness, and put your trust in Yahweh.4:6 Many there are that say, Who will show us any good?  Yahweh, lift up the light of your countenance upon us.4:7 You have put gladness in my heart, more than they get when their grain and their new wine are increased.4:8 In peace will I both lay me down and sleep; For you, Yahweh, you alone make me dwell in safety.Psalm 5For the Chief Musician; with the Nehiloth.  A Psalm of David.5:1 Give ear to my words, O Yahweh; consider my meditation.5:2 Hearken to the voice of my cry, my King, and my God; for unto you do I pray.5:3 O Yahweh, in the morning you shall hear my voice; in the morning I will order my prayer unto you, and will keep watch.5:4 For you are not a God that has pleasure in wickedness.  Evil shall not sojourn with you.5:5 The arrogant shall not stand in your sight.  You hate all workers of iniquity.5:6 You will destroy them that speak lies: Yahweh abhors the blood-thirsty and deceitful man.5:7 But as for me, in the abundance of your lovingkindness will I come into your house: In your fear will I worship toward your holy temple.5:8 Lead me, O Yahweh, in your righteousness because of my enemies; Make your way straight before my face.5:9 For there is no faithfulness in their mouth; Their inward part is destruction itself; Their throat is an open grave; They flatter with their tongue.5:10 Hold them guilty, O God; Let them fall by their own counsels; Thrust them out in the multitude of their transgressions; For they have rebelled against you.5:11 But let all those that take refuge in you rejoice, Let them ever shout for joy, because you defend them: Let those also that love your name be joyful in you.5:12 For you will bless the righteous; O Yahweh, you will surround him with favor as with a shield.Psalm 6For the Chief Musician; on stringed instruments, set to the Sheminith.  A Psalm of David.6:1 O Yahweh, rebuke me not in your anger, Neither chasten me in your hot displeasure.6:2 Have mercy upon me, O Yahweh; for I am withered away: O Yahweh, heal me; for my bones are troubled.6:3 My soul also is sore troubled: And you, O Yahweh, how long?6:4 Return, O Yahweh, deliver my soul: Save me for your lovingkindness' sake.6:5 For in death there is no remembrance of you: In Sheol who shall give you thanks?6:6 I am weary with my groaning; Every night make I my bed to swim; I water my couch with my tears.6:7 My eye wastes away because of grief; It grows old because of all my adversaries.6:8 Depart from me, all ye workers of iniquity; For Yahweh has heard the voice of my weeping.6:9 Yahweh has heard my supplication; Yahweh will receive my prayer.6:10 All my enemies shall be put to shame and sore troubled: They shall turn aback, they shall be put to shame asuddenly.Psalm 7Shiggaion of David, which he sang to Yahweh, concerning the words of Cush a Benjamite.7:1 O Yahweh my God, in you do I take refuge: Save me from all them that pursue me, and deliver me,7:2 Lest they tear my soul like a lion, rending it in pieces, while there is no one to deliver.7:3 O Yahweh my God, if I have done this; if there be iniquity in my hands;7:4 If I have repaid evil to him that was at peace with me; (Yes, I have delivered him that without cause was my adversary;)7:5 Let the enemy pursue my soul, and overtake it; yes, let him tread my life down to the earth, and lay my glory in the dust.  Selah7:6 Arise, O Yahweh, in your anger; lift up yourself against the rage of my adversaries, and awake for me; you have commanded judgment.7:7 And let the congregation of the peoples compass you about; and over them return thou on high.7:8 Yahweh ministers judgment to the peoples: Judge me, O Yahweh, according to my righteousness, and to my integrity that is in me.7:9 O let the wickedness of the wicked come to an end, but establish thou the righteous.  For the righteous God tries the minds and hearts.7:10 My shield is with God, who saves the upright in heart.7:11 God is a righteous judge; Yes, a God that has indignation every day.7:12 If a man turn not, He will whet his sword; He has bent his bow, and made it ready.7:13 He has also prepared for him the instruments of death; He makes his arrows fiery shafts.7:14 Behold, he travails with iniquity; Yes, he has conceived mischief, and brought forth falsehood.7:15 He has made a pit, and dug it, and is fallen into the ditch which he made.7:16 His mischief shall return upon his own head, and his violence shall come down upon his own pate.7:17 I will give thanks to Yahweh according to his righteousness, and will sing praise to the name of Yahweh Most High.Psalm 8For the Chief Musician; set to the Gittith.  A Psalm of David.8:1 O Yahweh, our Lord, how excellent is your name in all the earth, who have set your glory upon the heavens!8:2 Out of the mouth of babes and sucklings have you established strength, because of your adversaries, that you might still the enemy and the avenger.8:3 When I consider your heavens, the work of your fingers, the moon and the stars, which you have ordained;8:4 What is man, that you are mindful of him?  And the son of man, that you visit him?8:5 For you have made him but a little lower than God, and you crown him with glory and honor.8:6 You cause him to have dominion over the works of your hands; you have put all things under his feet:8:7 All sheep and oxen, yes, and the beasts of the field,8:8 The birds of the heavens, and the fish of the sea, whatsoever passes through the paths of the seas.8:9 O Yahweh, our Lord, how excellent is your name in all the earth!Psalm 9For the Chief Musician; set to Muthlabben.  A Psalm of David.9:1 I will give thanks to Yahweh with my whole heart; I will show forth all your marvellous works.9:2 I will be glad and exult in you; I will sing praise to your name, O you Most High.9:3 When my enemies turn back, they stumble and perish at your presence.9:4 For you have maintained my right and my cause; you sit in the throne judging righteously.9:5 You have rebuked the nations, you have destroyed the wicked; you have blotted out their name for ever and ever.9:6 The enemy have come to an end, they are desolate for ever; and the cities which you have overthrown, the very remembrance of them is perished.9:7 But Yahweh sits as king for ever: He has prepared his throne for judgment;9:8 And he will judge the world in righteousness, he will minister judgment to the peoples in uprightness.9:9 Yahweh also will be a high tower for the oppressed, a high tower in times of trouble;9:10 And they that know your name will put their trust in you; for you, Yahweh, have not forsaken them that seek you.9:11 Sing praises to Yahweh, who dwells in Zion: declare among the people his doings.9:12 For he that makes inquisition for blood remembers them; he forgets not the cry of the poor.9:13 Have mercy upon me, O Yahweh; behold my affliction which I suffer by them that hate me, you who lift me up from the gates of death;9:14 that I may show forth all your praise.  In the gates of the daughter of Zion I will rejoice in your salvation.9:15 The nations are sunk down in the pit that they made: in the net which they hid, their own foot is taken.9:16 Yahweh has made himself known, he has executed judgment: the wicked man is snared in the work of his own hands.  Higgaion.  Selah9:17 The wicked shall be turned back to Sheol, even all the nations that forget God.9:18 For the needy shall not always be forgotten, nor the expectation of the poor perish for ever.9:19 Arise, O Yahweh; let not man prevail: let the nations be judged in your sight.9:20 Put them in fear, O Yahweh: let the nations know themselves to be but men.  SelahPsalm 1010:1 Why do you stand afar off, O Yahweh?  Why do you hide yourself in times of trouble?10:2 In the pride of the wicked the poor is hotly pursued; Let them be taken in the devices that they have conceived.10:3 For the wicked person boasts of his heart's desire, and the covetous renounces, yes, he spurns Yahweh.10:4 The wicked, in the pride of his countenance, says, He will not require it.  All his thoughts are, There is no God.10:5 His ways are firm at all times; your judgments are far above out of his sight: as for all his adversaries, he puffs at them.10:6 He says in his heart, I shall not be moved; to all generations I shall not be in adversity.10:7 His mouth is full of cursing and deceit and oppression: Under his tongue is mischief and iniquity.10:8 He sits in the lurking-places of the villages; In the secret places does he murder the innocent; His eyes are privily set against the helpless.10:9 He lurks in secret as a lion in his covert; He lies in wait to catch the poor: He does catch the poor, when he draws him in his net.10:10 He croucheth, he bows down, and the helpless fall by his strong ones.10:11 He says in his heart, God has forgotten; He hides his face; he will never see it.10:12 Arise, O Yahweh; O God, lift up your hand: Forget not the poor.10:13 Why does the wicked spurn God, and say in his heart, You will not require it?10:14 You have seen it; for you behold mischief and spite, to requite it with your hand: The helpless commits himself to you; You have been the helper of the fatherless.10:15 Break you the arm of the wicked; And as for the evil man, seek out his wickedness till you find none.10:16 Yahweh is King for ever and ever: The nations are perished out of his land.10:17 Yahweh, you have heard the desire of the meek: You will prepare their heart, you will cause your ear to hear;10:18 To judge the fatherless and the oppressed, That man who is of the earth may be terrible no more.Psalm 11For the Chief Musician.  [A Psalm] of David.11:1 In Yahweh do I take refuge: How say ye to my soul, Flee as a bird to your mountain;11:2 For, lo, the wicked bend the bow, they make ready their arrow upon the string, that they may shoot in darkness at the upright in heart;11:3 If the foundations be destroyed, what can the righteous do?11:4 Yahweh is in his holy temple; Yahweh, his throne is in heaven; his eyes behold, his eyelids try, the children of men.11:5 Yahweh tries the righteous; but the wicked and him that loves violence his soul hates.11:6 Upon the wicked he will rain snares; Fire and brimstone and burning wind shall be their destiny. 11:7 For Yahweh is righteous; he loves righteousness: The upright shall behold his face.Psalm 12For the Chief Musician; set to the Sheminith.  A Psalm of David.12:1 Help, Yahweh; for the godly man ceases; For the faithful fail from among the children of men.12:2 They speak falsehood every one with his neighbor: With flattering lip, and with a double heart, do they speak.12:3 Yahweh will cut off all flattering lips, The tongue that speaks great things;12:4 Who have said, With our tongue will we prevail; Our lips are our own: who is lord over us?12:5 Because of the oppression of the poor, because of the sighing of the needy one, Now will I arise, says Yahweh; I will set him in the safety he pants for.12:6 The words of Yahweh are pure words; as silver tried in a furnace of clay, purified seven times.12:7 You will keep us, O Yahweh.  You will protect us  from this generation for ever.12:8 The wicked walk on every side, When vileness is exalted among the sons of men.Psalm 13For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.13:1 How long, O Yahweh?  will you forget me for ever?  How long will you hide your face from me?13:2 How long shall I take counsel in my soul, Having sorrow in my heart all the day?  How long shall my enemy be exalted over me?13:3 Consider and answer me, O Yahweh my God: Lighten my eyes, lest I sleep the sleep of death;13:4 Lest my enemy say, I have prevailed against him; Lest my adversaries rejoice when I am moved.13:5 But I have trusted in your lovingkindness; My heart shall rejoice in your salvation.13:6 I will sing to Yahweh, Because he has dealt bountifully with me.Psalm 14For the Chief Musician.  [A Psalm] of David.14:1 The fool has said in his heart, There is no God.  They are corrupt, they have done abominable works; there is none that does good.14:2 Yahweh looked down from heaven upon the children of men, to see if there were any that did understand, that did seek after God.14:3 They are all gone aside; they are together become filthy; there is none that does good, no, not one.14:4 Have all the workers of iniquity no knowledge, who eat up my people as they eat bread, and call not upon Yahweh?14:5 There were they in great fear; for God is in the generation of the righteous.14:6 You put to shame the counsel of the poor, because Yahweh is his refuge.14:7 Oh that the salvation of Israel were come out of Zion! When Yahweh brings back the captivity of his people, then shall Jacob rejoice, and Israel shall be glad.Psalm 15A Psalm of David.15:1 Yahweh, who shall sojourn in your tabernacle?  Who shall dwell in your holy hill?15:2 He that walks uprightly, and works righteousness, and speaks truth in his heart;15:3 He that slanders not with his tongue, Nor does evil to his friend, Nor takes up a reproach against his neighbor;15:4 In whose eyes a reprobate is despised, But who honors them that fear Yahweh; He that swears to his own hurt, and changes not;15:5 He that puts not out his money to interest, Nor takes reward against the innocent.  He that does these things shall never be moved.Psalm 16Michtam of David.16:1 Preserve me, O God; for in you do I take refuge.16:2 O my soul, you have said to Yahweh, You are my Lord: I have no good beyond you.16:3 As for the saints that are in the earth, They are the excellent in whom is all my delight.16:4 Their sorrows shall be multiplied that give gifts for another god: Their drink offerings of blood will I not offer, Nor take their names upon my lips.16:5 Yahweh is the portion of my inheritance and of my cup: You maintain my lot.16:6 The lines are fallen to me in pleasant places; Yes, I have a goodly heritage.16:7 I will bless Yahweh, who has given me counsel; Yes, my heart instructs me in the night seasons.16:8 I have set Yahweh always before me: Because he is at my right hand, I shall not be moved.16:9 Therefore my heart is glad, and my glory rejoices; My flesh also shall dwell in safety.16:10 For you will not leave my soul to Sheol; Neither will you allow your holy one to see corruption.16:11 You will show me the path of life: In your presence is fulness of joy; In your right hand there are pleasures for evermore.Psalm 17A Prayer of David.17:1 Hear the right, O Yahweh, attend to my cry; Give ear to my prayer, that goes not out of feigned lips.17:2 Let my sentence come forth from your presence; Let your eyes look upon equity.17:3 You have proved my heart; you have visited me in the night; You have tried me, and find nothing; I am purposed that my mouth shall not transgress.17:4 As for the works of men, by the word of your lips I have kept me from the ways of the violent.17:5 My steps have held fast to your paths, My feet have not slipped.17:6 I have called upon you, for you will answer me, O God: Incline your ear to me and hear my speech.17:7 Show your marvellous lovingkindness, O you that save by your right hand them that take refuge in you From those that rise up against them.17:8 Keep me as the apple of the eye; Hide me under the shadow of your wings,17:9 From the wicked that oppress me, My deadly enemies, that compass me about.17:10 They are inclosed in their own fat: With their mouth they speak proudly.17:11 They have now surrounded our steps; They set their eyes to cast us down to the earth.17:12 He is like a lion that is greedy of his prey, and as it were a young lion lurking in secret places.17:13 Arise, O Yahweh,  Confront him, cast him down: Deliver my soul from the wicked by your sword;17:14 From men by your hand, O Yahweh, From men of the world, whose portion is in this life, and whose belly you fill with your treasure: They are satisfied with children, and leave the rest of their substance to their babes.17:15 As for me, I shall behold your face in righteousness; I shall be satisfied, when I awake, with beholding your form.Psalm 18For the Chief Musician.  [A Psalm] of David the servant of Yahweh, who spoke to Yahweh the words of this song in the day that Yahweh delivered him from the hand of all his enemies, and from the hand of Saul: and he said,18:1 I love you, O Yahweh, my strength.18:2 Yahweh is my rock, and my fortress, and my deliverer; My God, my rock, in whom I will take refuge; My shield, and the horn of my salvation, my high tower.18:3 I will call upon Yahweh, who is worthy to be praised: So shall I be saved from my enemies.18:4 The cords of death encompassed me, and the floods of ungodliness made me afraid.18:5 The cords of Sheol were round about me; The snares of death came upon me.18:6 In my distress I called upon Yahweh, and cried to my God: He heard my voice out of his temple, and my cry before him came into his ears.18:7 Then the earth shook and trembled; The foundations also of the mountains quaked And were shaken, because he was angry.18:8 There went up a smoke out of his nostrils, and fire out of his mouth devoured: Coals were kindled by it.18:9 He bowed the heavens also, and came down; And thick darkness was under his feet.18:10 And he rode upon a cherub, and did fly; Yes, he soared upon the wings of the wind.18:11 He made darkness his hiding place, his pavilion round about him, Darkness of waters, thick clouds of the skies.18:12 At the brightness before him his thick clouds passed, Hailstones and coals of fire.18:13 Yahweh also thundered in the heavens, and the Most High uttered his voice, Hailstones and coals of fire.18:14 And he sent out his arrows, and scattered them; Yes, lightnings manifold, and discomfited them.18:15 Then the channels of waters appeared, and the foundations of the world were laid bare, at your rebuke, O Yahweh, at the blast of the breath of your nostrils.18:16 He sent from on high, he took me; He drew me out of many waters.18:17 He delivered me from my strong enemy, and from them that hated me; for they were too mighty for me.18:18 They came upon me in the day of my calamity; But Yahweh was my stay.18:19 He brought me forth also into a large place; He delivered me, because he delighted in me.18:20 Yahweh has rewarded me according to my righteousness; According to the cleanness of my hands has he recompensed me.18:21 For I have kept the ways of Yahweh, and have not wickedly departed from my God.18:22 For all his ordinances were before me, and I put not away his statutes from me.18:23 I was also perfect with him, and I kept myself from my iniquity.18:24 Therefore has Yahweh recompensed me according to my righteousness, according to the cleanness of my hands in his eyesight.18:25 With the merciful you will show yourself merciful; With the perfect man you will show yourself perfect;18:26 With the pure you will show yourself pure; And with the perverse you will show yourself froward.18:27 For you will save the afflicted people; But the haughty eyes you will bring down.18:28 For you will light my lamp: Yahweh my God will lighten my darkness.18:29 For by you I run upon a troop; And by my God do I leap over a wall.18:30 As for God, his way is perfect: The word of Yahweh is tried; He is a shield for all them that take refuge in him.18:31 For who is God, save Yahweh?  And who is a rock, besides our God,18:32 The God that girds me with strength, and makes my way perfect?18:33 He makes my feet like hinds' feet: And sets me upon my high places.18:34 He teaches my hands to war; So that my arms do bend a bow of brass.18:35 You have also given me the shield of your salvation; And your right hand has holden me up, and your gentleness has made me great.18:36 You have enlarged my steps under me, and my feet have not slipped.18:37 I will pursue my enemies, and overtake them; Neither will I turn again till they are consumed.18:38 I will smite them through, so that they shall not be able to rise: They shall fall under my feet.18:39 For you have girded me with strength for the battle: You have subdued under me those that rose up against me.18:40 You have also made my enemies turn their backs to me, That I might cut off them that hate me.18:41 They cried, but there was none to save; Even to Yahweh, but he answered them not.18:42 Then did I beat them small as the dust before the wind; I did cast them out as the mire of the streets.18:43 You have delivered me from the strivings of the people; You have made me the head of the nations: A people whom I have not known shall serve me.18:44 As soon as they hear of me they shall obey me; The foreigners shall submit themselves to me.18:45 The foreigners shall fade away, and shall come trembling out of their close places.18:46 Yahweh lives; and blessed be my rock; And exalted be the God of my salvation,18:47 Even the God that executes vengeance for me, and subdues peoples under me.18:48 He rescues me from my enemies; Yes, you lift me up above them that rise up against me; You deliver me from the violent man.18:49 Therefore I will give thanks to you, O Yahweh, among the nations, and will sing praises to your name.18:50 Great deliverance gives he to his king, and shows lovingkindness to his anointed, To David and to his seed, for evermore.Psalm 19For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.19:1 The heavens declare the glory of God; And the firmament shows his handiwork.19:2 Day unto day utters speech, and night unto night imparts knowledge.19:3 There is no speech or language; their voice is not heard.19:4 Their line  is gone out through all the earth, and their words unto the ends of the world.  In them he has set a tabernacle for the sun,19:5 which is like a bridegroom coming out of his chamber, and rejoicing as a strong man to run his course.19:6 His going forth is from the end of heaven, and his circuit unto the ends of it; and there is nothing hidden from its heat.19:7 The law of Yahweh is perfect, restoring the soul: The testimony of Yahweh is sure, making wise the simple.19:8 The precepts of Yahweh are right, rejoicing the heart: The commandment of Yahweh is pure, enlightening the eyes.19:9 The fear of Yahweh is clean, enduring for ever: The ordinances of Yahweh are true, and righteous altogether.19:10 More to be desired are they than gold, yes, than much fine gold; Sweeter also than honey and the droppings of the honeycomb.19:11 Moreover by them is your servant warned: In keeping them there is great reward.19:12 Who can discern his errors?  Clear thou me from hidden faults.19:13 Keep back your servant also from presumptuous sins; Let them not have dominion over me: Then shall I be upright, and I shall be clear from great transgression.19:14 Let the words of my mouth and the meditation of my heart Be acceptable in your sight, O Yahweh, my rock, and my redeemer.Psalm 20For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.20:1 May Yahweh answer you in the day of trouble; The name of the God of Jacob set you up on high;20:2 Send you help from the sanctuary, and strengthen you out of Zion;20:3 Remember all your offerings, and accept your burnt-sacrifice;  Selah20:4 May he grant you your heart's desire, and fulfil all your counsel.20:5 We will triumph in your salvation, and in the name of our God we will set up our banners: Yahweh fulfil all your petitions.20:6 Now know I that Yahweh saves his anointed; He will answer him from his holy heaven With the saving strength of his right hand.20:7 Some trust in chariots, and some in horses; But we will make mention of the name of Yahweh our God.20:8 They are bowed down and fallen; But we are risen, and stand upright.20:9 Save, Yahweh: Let the King answer us when we call.Psalm 21For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.21:1 The king shall joy in your strength, O Yahweh; And in your salvation how greatly shall he rejoice!21:2 You have given him his heart's desire, and have not withheld the request of his lips.  Selah21:3 For you meet him with the blessings of goodness: You set a crown of fine gold on his head.21:4 He asked life of you, you gave it to him, Even length of days for ever and ever.21:5 His glory is great in your salvation: Honor and majesty do you lay upon him.21:6 For you make him most blessed for ever: You make him glad with joy in your presence.21:7 For the king trusts in Yahweh; And through the lovingkindness of the Most High he shall not be moved.21:8 Your hand will find out all your enemies; Your right hand will find out those that hate you.21:9 You will make them as a fiery furnace in the time of your anger: Yahweh will swallow them up in his wrath, and the fire shall devour them.21:10 Their fruit will you destroy from the earth, and their seed from among the children of men.21:11 For they intended evil against you; They conceived a device which they are not able to perform.21:12 For you will make them turn their back; You will make ready with your bowstrings against their face.21:13 Be thou exalted, O Yahweh, in your strength: So will we sing and praise your power.Psalm 22For the Chief Musician; set to Aijaleth hash-Shahar.  A Psalm of David.22:1 My God, my God, why have you forsaken me?  Why are you so far from helping me, and from the words of my groaning?22:2 O my God, I cry in the daytime, but you answer not; And in the night season, and am not silent.22:3 But you are holy, O you that inhabit the praises of Israel.22:4 Our fathers trusted in you: They trusted, and you did deliver them.22:5 They cried to you, and were delivered: They trusted in you, and were not put to shame.22:6 But I am a worm, and no man; A reproach of men, and despised by the people.22:7 All they that see me laugh me to scorn: They shoot out their lip, they shake their head, saying,22:8 Commit yourself to Yahweh; Let him deliver him: Let him rescue him, seeing he delights in him.22:9 But you are he that took me out of the womb; You did make me trust when I was upon my mother's breasts.22:10 I was cast upon you from the womb; You are my God since my mother bore me.22:11 Be not far from me; for trouble is near; For there is no one to help.22:12 Many bulls have compassed me; Strong bulls of Bashan have beset me around.22:13 They gape upon me with their mouth, as a ravening and a roaring lion.22:14 I am poured out like water, and all my bones are out of joint: My heart is like wax; It is melted within me.22:15 My strength is dried up like a potsherd; And my tongue cleaves to my jaws; And you have brought me into the dust of death.22:16 For dogs have encircled me: A company of evil-doers have inclosed me; They pierced  my hands and my feet.22:17 I can count all my bones; They look and stare upon me.22:18 They part my garments among them, and upon my clothing they cast lots.22:19 But be not far off, O Yahweh: O you my succor, make haste to help me.22:20 Deliver my soul from the sword, My dear life from the power of the dog.22:21 Save me from the lion's mouth; Yes, from the horns of the wild oxen you have answered me.22:22 I will declare your name to my brethren: In the midst of the assembly will I praise you.22:23 You that fear Yahweh, praise him; All ye the seed of Jacob, glorify him; And stand in awe of him, all ye the seed of Israel.22:24 For he has not despised nor abhorred the affliction of the afflicted; Neither has he hid his face from him; But when he cried to him, he heard.22:25 Of you comes my praise in the great assembly: I will pay my vows before them that fear him.22:26 The meek shall eat and be satisfied; They shall praise Yahweh that seek after him: Let your heart live for ever.22:27 All the ends of the earth shall remember and turn to Yahweh; and all the kindreds of the nations shall worship before you.22:28 For the kingdom is Yahweh's; and he is the ruler over the nations.22:29 All the fat ones of the earth shall eat and worship: all they that go down to the dust shall bow before him, even he that cannot keep his soul alive.22:30 A seed shall serve him; it shall be told of the Lord to the next generation.22:31 They shall come and shall declare his righteousness To a people that shall be born, that he has done it.Psalm 23A Psalm of David.23:1 Yahweh is my shepherd; I shall not want.23:2 He makes me to lie down in green pastures; He leads me beside still waters.23:3 He restores my soul: He guides me in the paths of righteousness for his name's sake.23:4 Yea, though I walk through the valley of the shadow of death, I will fear no evil; for you are with me; Your rod and your staff, they comfort me.23:5 You prepare a table before me in the presence of my enemies: You have anointed my head with oil; My cup is running over.23:6 Surely goodness and lovingkindness shall follow me all the days of my life; And I shall dwell in the house of Yahweh for ever.Psalm 24A Psalm of David.24:1 The earth is Yahweh's, and the fulness thereof; the world, and they that dwell therein.24:2 For he has founded it upon the seas, and established it upon the floods.24:3 Who shall ascend into the hill of Yahweh?  And who shall stand in his holy place?24:4 He that has clean hands, and a pure heart; Who has not lifted up his soul to falsehood, and has not sworn deceitfully.24:5 He shall receive a blessing from Yahweh, and righteousness from the God of his salvation.24:6 This is the generation of them that seek after him, That seek your face, even Jacob.  Selah 24:7 Lift up your heads, O ye gates; and be ye lifted up, ye everlasting doors: and the King of glory will come in.24:8 Who is the King of glory?  Yahweh strong and mighty, Yahweh mighty in battle.24:9 Lift up your heads, O ye gates; Yes, lift them up, ye everlasting doors: and the King of glory will come in.24:10 Who is this King of glory?  Yahweh of hosts, He is the King of glory.  SelahPsalm 25[A Psalm] of David.25:1 To you, O Yahweh, do I lift up my soul.25:2 O my God, in you have I trusted, Let me not be put to shame; Let not my enemies triumph over me.25:3 Yes, none that wait for you shall be put to shame: Those shall be put to shame who deal treacherously without cause.25:4 Show me your ways, O Yahweh; Teach me your paths.25:5 Guide me in your truth, and teach me; For you are the God of my salvation; For you do I wait all the day.25:6 Remember, O Yahweh, your tender mercies and your lovingkindness; For they have been ever of old.25:7 Remember not the sins of my youth, nor my transgressions: According to your lovingkindness remember thou me, For your goodness' sake, O Yahweh.25:8 Good and upright is Yahweh: Therefore will he instruct sinners in the way.25:9 The meek will he guide in justice; And the meek will he teach his way.25:10 All the paths of Yahweh are lovingkindness and truth To such as keep his covenant and his testimonies.25:11 For your name's sake, O Yahweh, Pardon my iniquity, for it is great.25:12 What man is he that fears Yahweh?  Him shall he instruct in the way that he shall choose.25:13 His soul shall dwell at ease; And his seed shall inherit the land.25:14 The friendship of Yahweh is with them that fear him; and he will show them his covenant.25:15 Mine eyes are ever toward Yahweh; For he will pluck my feet out of the net.25:16 Turn thou to me, and have mercy upon me; For I am desolate and afflicted.25:17 The troubles of my heart are enlarged: Oh bring me out of my distresses.25:18 Consider my affliction and my travail; And forgive all my sins.25:19 Consider my enemies, for they are many; And they hate me with cruel hatred.25:20 Oh keep my soul, and deliver me: Let me not be put to shame, for I take refuge in you.25:21 Let integrity and uprightness preserve me, For I wait for you.25:22 Redeem Israel, O God, Out all of his troubles.Psalm 26[A Psalm] of David.26:1 Judge me, O Yahweh, for I have walked in my integrity: I have trusted also in Yahweh without wavering.26:2 Examine me, O Yahweh, and prove me; Try my heart and my mind.26:3 For your lovingkindness is before my eyes; And I have walked in your truth.26:4 I have not sat with men of falsehood; Neither will I go in with dissemblers.26:5 I hate the assembly of evil-doers, and will not sit with the wicked.26:6 I will wash my hands in innocency: So will I compass your altar, O Yahweh;26:7 That I may make the voice of thanksgiving to be heard, and tell of all your wondrous works.26:8 Yahweh, I love the habitation of your house, and the place where your glory dwells.26:9 Gather not my soul with sinners, Nor my life with men of blood;26:10 In whose hands is wickedness, and their right hand is full of bribes.26:11 But as for me, I will walk in my integrity: Redeem me, and be merciful to me.26:12 My foot stands in an even place: In the congregations will I bless Yahweh.Psalm 27[A Psalm] of David.27:1 Yahweh is my light and my salvation; Whom shall I fear?  Yahweh is the strength of my life; of whom shall I be afraid?27:2 When evil-doers came upon me to eat up my flesh, Even my adversaries and my foes, they stumbled and fell.27:3 Though a host should encamp against me, my heart shall not fear: Though war should rise against me, even then will I be confident.27:4 One thing have I asked of Yahweh, and that will I seek after; that I may dwell in the house of Yahweh all the days of my life, to behold the beauty of Yahweh, and to inquire in his temple.27:5 For in the day of trouble he will keep me secretly in his pavilion: In the covert of his tabernacle will he hide me; He will lift me up upon a rock.27:6 And now shall my head be lifted up above my enemies round about me.  And I will offer in his tabernacle sacrifices of joy; I will sing, yes, I will sing praises to Yahweh.27:7 Hear, O Yahweh, when I cry with my voice: Have mercy also upon me, and answer me.27:8 When you said, Seek ye my face; My heart said to you, your face, Yahweh, will I seek.27:9 Hide not your face from me; put not your servant away in anger: you have been my help; Cast me not off, neither forsake me, O God of my salvation.27:10 When my father and my mother forsake me, then Yahweh will take me up.27:11 Teach me your way, O Yahweh; and lead me in a plain path, because of my enemies.27:12 Deliver me not over to the will of my adversaries: For false witnesses are risen up against me, and such as breathe out cruelty.27:13 I would have fainted, unless I had believed to see the goodness of Yahweh in the land of the living.27:14 Wait for Yahweh: Be strong, and let your heart take courage; Yes, you wait for Yahweh.Psalm 28[A Psalm] of David.28:1 To you, O Yahweh, will I call: My rock, be not deaf to me; Lest, if you be silent to me, I become like those that go down into the pit.28:2 Hear the voice of my supplications, when I cry to you, When I lift up my hands toward your holy oracle.28:3 Draw me not away along with the wicked, and with the workers of iniquity; who speak peace with their neighbors, but mischief is in their hearts.28:4 Give them according to their work, and according to the wickedness of their doings: Give them after the operation of their hands; Render to them their desert.28:5 Because they regard not the works of Yahweh, Nor the operation of his hands, He will break them down and not build them up.28:6 Blessed be Yahweh, Because he has heard the voice of my supplications.28:7 Yahweh is my strength and my shield; My heart has trusted in him, and I am helped: Therefore my heart greatly rejoices; And with my song will I praise him.28:8 Yahweh is their strength, and he is a stronghold of salvation to his anointed.28:9 Save your people, and bless your inheritance: Be their shepherd also, and bear them up for ever.Psalm 29A Psalm of David.29:1 Ascribe to Yahweh, O ye sons of the mighty, ascribe to Yahweh glory and strength.29:2 Ascribe to Yahweh the glory due his name; worship Yahweh in holy array.29:3 The voice of Yahweh is upon the waters: the God of glory thunders, even Yahweh upon many waters.29:4 The voice of Yahweh is powerful; the voice of Yahweh is full of majesty.29:5 The voice of Yahweh breaks the cedars; yes, Yahweh breaks in pieces the cedars of Lebanon.29:6 He makes them also to skip like a calf; Lebanon and Sirion like a young wild ox.29:7 The voice of Yahweh splits the flames of fire.29:8 The voice of Yahweh shakes the wilderness; Yahweh shakes the wilderness of Kadesh.29:9 The voice of Yahweh causes the deer to calve, and strips the forests bare: And in his temple everything says, Glory.29:10 Yahweh sat as King at the Flood; Yes, Yahweh sits as King for ever.29:11 Yahweh will give strength to his people; Yahweh will bless his people with peace.Psalm 30A Psalm; a Song at the Dedication of the House.  [A Psalm] of David.30:1 I will extol you, O Yahweh; for you have raised me up, and have not made my foes to rejoice over me.30:2 O Yahweh my God, I cried to you, and you have healed me.30:3 O Yahweh, you have brought up my soul from Sheol; You have kept me alive, that I should not go down to the pit.30:4 Sing praise to Yahweh, O ye saints of his, and give thanks to his holy name.30:5 For his anger is but for a moment; His favor is for a life-time: Weeping may tarry for the night, But joy comes in the morning.30:6 As for me, I said in my prosperity, I shall never be moved. 30:7 You, Yahweh, of your favor had made my mountain to stand strong.  You hid your face; I was troubled.30:8 I cried to you, O Yahweh; And to Yahweh I made supplication:30:9 What profit is there in my destruction, when I go down to the pit?  Shall the dust praise you?  shall it declare your truth?30:10 Hear, O Yahweh, and have mercy upon me: Yahweh, be thou my helper.30:11 You have turned my mourning into dancing for me; You have put off my sackcloth, and girded me with gladness,30:12 to the end that my glory may sing praise to you, and not be silent.  O Yahweh my God, I will give thanks to you for ever.Psalm 31For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.31:1 In you, O Yahweh, do I take refuge; Let me never be put to shame: Deliver me in your righteousness.31:2 Bow down your ear to me; deliver me speedily: Be thou to me a strong rock, a house of defence to save me.31:3 For you are my rock and my fortress; Therefore for your name's sake lead me and guide me.31:4 Pluck me out of the net that they have laid secretly for me; For you are my stronghold.31:5 Into your hand I commend my spirit: You have redeemed me, O Yahweh, you God of truth.31:6 I hate them that regard lying vanities; But I trust in Yahweh.31:7 I will be glad and rejoice in your lovingkindness; For you have seen my affliction: You have known my soul in adversities;31:8 And you have not shut me up into the hand of the enemy; You have set my feet in a large place.31:9 Have mercy upon me, O Yahweh, for I am in distress: Mine eye wastes away with grief, yes, my soul and my body as well.31:10 For my life is spent with sorrow, and my years with sighing: My strength fails because of my iniquity, and my bones are wasted away.31:11 Because of all my adversaries I am become a reproach, Yes, to my neighbors exceedingly, and a fear to my acquaintance: those who did see me outside fled away from me.31:12 I am forgotten as a dead man out of mind: I am like a broken vessel.31:13 For I have heard the defaming of many, Terror on every side: While they took counsel together against me, They devised to take away my life.31:14 But I trusted in you, O Yahweh: I said, You are my God.31:15 My times are in your hand: Deliver me from the hand of my enemies, and from them that persecute me.31:16 Make your face to shine upon your servant: Save me in your lovingkindness.31:17 Let me not be put to shame, O Yahweh; for I have called upon you: Let the wicked be put to shame, let them be silent in Sheol.31:18 Let the lying lips be mute, Which speak against the righteous insolently, With pride and contempt.31:19 Oh how great is your goodness, Which you have laid up for them that fear you, Which you have wrought for them that take refuge in you, Before the sons of men!31:20 In the cover of your presence will you hide them from the plottings of man: You will keep them secretly in a pavilion from the strife of tongues.31:21 Blessed be Yahweh; For he has shown me his marvellous lovingkindness in a strong city.31:22 As for me, I said in my haste, I am cut off from before your eyes: Nevertheless you heard the voice of my supplications When I cried to you.31:23 Oh love Yahweh, all ye his saints: Yahweh preserves the faithful, and plentifully repays him that deals proudly.31:24 Be strong, and let your heart take courage, all ye who hope in Yahweh.Psalm 32[A Psalm] of David.  Maschil.32:1 Blessed is he whose transgression is forgiven, whose sin is covered.32:2 Blessed is the man to whom Yahweh imputes not iniquity, and in whose spirit there is no guile.32:3 When I kept silence, my bones wasted away through my groaning all the day long.32:4 For day and night your hand was heavy upon me: my moisture was changed as with the drought of summer.  Selah32:5 I acknowledged my sin to you, and my iniquity I did not hide: I said, I will confess my transgressions to Yahweh.  And you forgave the iniquity of my sin.  Selah32:6 For this let every one that is godly pray to you in a time when you may be found: Surely when the great waters overflow they shall not reach to him.32:7 You are my hiding-place; you will preserve me from trouble; you will compass me about with songs of deliverance.  Selah32:8 I will instruct you and teach you in the way which you shall go: I will counsel you with my eye upon you.32:9 Be ye not as the horse, or as the mule, which have no understanding; whose trappings must be bit and bridle to hold them in, else they will not come near to you.32:10 Many sorrows shall be to the wicked; but he that trusts in Yahweh, lovingkindness shall compass him about.32:11 Be glad in Yahweh, and rejoice, ye righteous; and shout for joy, all ye that are upright in heart.Psalm 3333:1 Rejoice in Yahweh, O ye righteous: Praise is comely for the upright.33:2 Give thanks to Yahweh with the lyre: Sing praises to him with the harp of ten strings.33:3 Sing to him a new song; Play skillfully with a loud noise.33:4 For the word of Yahweh is right; And all his work is done in faithfulness.33:5 He loves righteousness and justice: The earth is full of the lovingkindness of Yahweh.33:6 By the word of Yahweh were the heavens made, and all the host of them by the breath of his mouth.33:7 He gathers the waters of the sea together as a heap: He lays up the deeps in store-houses.33:8 Let all the earth fear Yahweh: Let all the inhabitants of the world stand in awe of him.33:9 For he spoke, and it was done; He commanded, and it stood fast.33:10 Yahweh brings the counsel of the nations to nothing; He makes the thoughts of the peoples to be of no effect.33:11 The counsel of Yahweh stands fast for ever, The thoughts of his heart to all generations.33:12 Blessed is the nation whose God is Yahweh, The people whom he has chosen for his own inheritance.33:13 Yahweh looks from heaven; He beholds all the sons of men;33:14 From the place of his habitation he looks forth Upon all the inhabitants of the earth,33:15 He that fashions the hearts of them all, That considers all their works.33:16 There is no king saved by the multitude of an army: A mighty man is not delivered by great strength.33:17 A horse is a vain thing for safety; Neither does he deliver any by his great power.33:18 Behold, the eye of Yahweh is upon them that fear him, Upon them that hope in his lovingkindness;33:19 To deliver their soul from death, and to keep them alive in famine.33:20 Our soul has waited for Yahweh: He is our help and our shield.33:21 For our heart shall rejoice in him, Because we have trusted in his holy name.33:22 Let your lovingkindness, O Yahweh, be upon us, according as we have hoped in you.Psalm 34A Psalm of David; when he changed his behavior before Abimelech, who drove him away, and he departed.34:1 I will bless Yahweh at all times: His praise shall continually be in my mouth.34:2 My soul shall make its boast in Yahweh: The meek shall hear of it, and be glad.34:3 Oh magnify Yahweh with me, and let us exalt his name together.34:4 I sought out Yahweh, and he answered me, and delivered me from all my fears.34:5 They looked to him, and were radiant; and their faces shall never be confounded.34:6 This poor man cried, and Yahweh heard him, and saved him out of all his troubles.34:7 The angel of Yahweh encamps round about those who fear him, and delivers them.34:8 Oh taste and see that Yahweh is good: Blessed is the man that takes refuge in him.34:9 Oh fear Yahweh, ye his saints; for there is no lack to them that fear him.34:10 The young lions do lack, and suffer hunger; but they that seek Yahweh shall not go without any good thing.34:11 Come, ye children, hearken to me: I will teach you the fear of Yahweh.34:12 What man is he that desires life, and loves many days, that he may see good?34:13 Keep your tongue from evil, and your lips from speaking guile.34:14 Depart from evil, and do good; Seek peace, and pursue it.34:15 The eyes of Yahweh are toward the righteous, and his ears are open to their cry.34:16 The face of Yahweh is against them that do evil, To cut off the remembrance of them from the earth.34:17 The righteous cried, and Yahweh heard, and delivered them out of all their troubles.34:18 Yahweh is near to them that are of a broken heart, and saves such as are of a contrite spirit.34:19 Many are the afflictions of the righteous; But Yahweh delivers him out of them all.34:20 He preserves all his bones: Not one of them is broken.34:21 Evil shall slay the wicked; And they that hate the righteous shall be condemned.34:22 Yahweh redeems the soul of his servants; And none of them that take refuge in him shall be condemned.Psalm 35[A Psalm] of David.35:1 Strive thou, O Yahweh, with them that strive with me: Fight thou against them that fight against me.35:2 Take hold of shield and buckler, and stand up for my help.35:3 Draw out also the spear, and stop the way against those who pursue me: Say to my soul, I am your salvation.35:4 Let them be put to shame and brought to dishonor that seek after my soul: Let them be turned back and confounded that devise my hurt.35:5 Let them be as chaff before the wind, and the angel of Yahweh driving them on.35:6 Let their way be dark and slippery, and the angel of Yahweh pursuing them.35:7 For without cause have they hid for me their net in a pit; Without cause have they dug a pit for my soul.35:8 Let destruction come upon him unawares; And let his net that he has hid catch himself: With destruction let him fall therein.35:9 And my soul shall be joyful in Yahweh: It shall rejoice in his salvation.35:10 All my bones shall say, Yahweh, who is like you, Who delivers the poor from him that is too strong for him, Yes, the poor and the needy from him that robs him?35:11 Unrighteous witnesses rise up; They ask me about things that I know not.35:12 They repay me evil for good, To the bereaving of my soul.35:13 But as for me, when they were sick, my clothing was sackcloth: I afflicted my soul with fasting; And my prayer returned into my own bosom.35:14 I behaved myself as though it had been my friend or my brother: I bowed down mourning, as one that bewails his mother.35:15 But in my adversity they rejoiced, and gathered themselves together: The abjects gathered themselves together against me, and I knew it not; They tore at me, and they ceased not:35:16 Like the profane mockers in feasts, They gnashed upon me with their teeth.35:17 Lord, how long will you look on?  Rescue my soul from their destructions, My dear life from the lions.35:18 I will give you thanks in the great assembly: I will praise you among much people.35:19 Let not them who are my enemies wrongfully rejoice over me; Neither let those wink with the eye who hate me without a cause.35:20 For they speak not peace; But they devise deceitful words against those who are quiet in the land.35:21 Yes, they opened their mouth wide against me; They said, aha, aha, our eye has seen it.35:22 You have seen it, O Yahweh; keep not silence: O Lord, be not far from me.35:23 Stir up yourself, and awake to the justice due to me, Even to my cause, my God and my Lord.35:24 Judge me, O Yahweh my God, according to your righteousness; And let them not rejoice over me.35:25 Let them not say in their heart, aha, this is what we wanted: Let them not say, We have swallowed him up.35:26 Let them be put to shame and confounded together that rejoice at my hurt: Let them be clothed with shame and dishonor that magnify themselves against me.35:27 Let them shout for joy, and be glad, that favor my righteous cause: Yes, let them say continually, Yahweh be magnified, Who has pleasure in the prosperity of his servant.35:28 And my tongue shall talk of your righteousness And of your praise all the day long.Psalm 36For the Chief Musician.  [A Psalm] of David the servant of Yahweh.36:1 The transgression of the wicked says within my heart, There is no fear of God before his eyes.36:2 For he flatters himself in his own eyes, thinking that his iniquity will not be found out and be hated.36:3 The words of his mouth are iniquity and deceit: He has ceased to be wise and to do good.36:4 He devises iniquity upon his bed; He sets himself in a way that is not good; He does not abhor evil.36:5 Your lovingkindness, O Yahweh, is in the heavens; Your faithfulness reaches to the skies.36:6 Your righteousness is like the mountains of God; Your judgments are a great deep: O Yahweh, you preserve man and beast.36:7 How precious is your lovingkindness, O God! And the children of men take refuge under the shadow of your wings.36:8 They shall be abundantly satisfied with the fatness of your house; And you will make them drink of the river of your pleasures.36:9 For with you is the fountain of life: In your light shall we see light.36:10 Oh continue your lovingkindness to them that know you, and your righteousness to the upright in heart.36:11 Let not the foot of pride come against me, and let not the hand of the wicked drive me away.36:12 There are the workers of iniquity fallen: They are thrust down, and shall not be able to rise.Psalm 37[A Psalm] of David.37:1 Fret not yourself because of evil-doers, Neither be envious against them that work unrighteousness.37:2 For they shall soon be cut down like the grass, and wither as the green herb.37:3 Trust in Yahweh, and do good; Dwell in the land, and feed on his faithfulness.37:4 Delight yourself also in Yahweh; And he will give you the desires of your heart.37:5 Commit your way to Yahweh; Trust also in him, and he will bring it to pass.37:6 And he will cause your righteousness to go forth as the light, and your justice as the noon-day.37:7 Rest in Yahweh, and wait patiently for him: Fret not yourself because of him who prospers in his way, Because of the man who brings wicked devices to pass.37:8 Cease from anger, and forsake wrath: Fret not yourself, it tends only to evil-doing.37:9 For evil-doers shall be cut off; But those that wait for Yahweh, they shall inherit the land.37:10 For yet a little while, and the wicked shall not be: Yes, you shall diligently consider his place, and he shall not be there.37:11 But the meek shall inherit the land, and shall delight themselves in the abundance of peace.37:12 The wicked plots against the just, and gnashes at him with his teeth.37:13 The Lord will laugh at him; For He sees that his day is coming.37:14 The wicked have drawn out the sword, and have bent their bow, To cast down the poor and needy, To slay such as are upright in the way.37:15 Their sword shall enter into their own heart, and their bows shall be broken.37:16 Better is a little that the righteous person has, than the abundance of many wicked.37:17 For the arms of the wicked shall be broken; But Yahweh upholds the righteous.37:18 Yahweh knows the days of the perfect; And their inheritance shall be for ever.37:19 They shall not be put to shame in the time of evil; And in the days of famine they shall be satisfied.37:20 But the wicked shall perish, and the enemies of Yahweh shall be as the fat of lambs: They shall consume; In smoke shall they consume away.37:21 The wicked borrows, and pays not back; But the righteous deals graciously, and gives.37:22 For such as are blessed by him shall inherit the land; And they that are cursed by him shall be cut off.37:23 A man's goings are established from Yahweh; And he delights in his way.37:24 Though he may fall, he shall not be utterly cast down; For Yahweh upholds him with his hand.37:25 I have been young, and now am old; Yet I have not seen the righteous forsaken, Nor his seed begging bread.37:26 All the day long he deals graciously, and lends; And his seed is blessed.37:27 Depart from evil, and do good; And abide for evermore.37:28 For Yahweh loves justice, and forsakes not his saints; They are preserved for ever: But the seed of the wicked shall be cut off.37:29 The righteous shall inherit the land, and dwell therein for ever.37:30 The mouth of the righteous talks of wisdom, and his tongue speaks justice.37:31 The law of his God is in his heart; None of his steps shall slide.37:32 The wicked watches the righteous, and seeks to slay him.37:33 Yahweh will not leave him in his hand, Nor condemn him when he is judged.37:34 Wait for Yahweh, and keep his way, and he will exalt you to inherit the land: When the wicked are cut off, you shall see it.37:35 I have seen the wicked in great power, and spreading himself like a green tree in its native soil.37:36 But one passed by, and, lo, he was not: Yes, I sought him, but he could not be found.37:37 Mark the perfect man, and behold the upright; For there is a happy end to the man of peace.37:38 As for transgressors, they shall be destroyed together; The end of the wicked shall be cut off.37:39 But the salvation of the righteous is of Yahweh; He is their stronghold in the time of trouble.37:40 And Yahweh helps them, and rescues them; He rescues them from the wicked, and saves them, Because they have taken refuge in him.Psalm 38A Psalm of David, to bring to remembrance.38:1 O Yahweh, rebuke me not in your wrath; Neither chasten me in your hot displeasure.38:2 For your arrows stick fast in me, and your hand presses me sore.38:3 There is no soundness in my flesh because of your indignation; Neither is there any health in my bones because of my sin.38:4 For my iniquities are gone over my head: As a heavy burden they are too heavy for me.38:5 My wounds are loathsome and corrupt, Because of my foolishness.38:6 I am pained and bowed down greatly; I go mourning all the day long.38:7 For my loins are filled with burning; And there is no soundness in my flesh.38:8 I am faint and sore bruised: I have groaned by reason of the disquietness of my heart.38:9 Lord, all my desire is before you; And my groaning is not hidden from you.38:10 My heart throbs, my strength fails me: As for the light of my eyes, it also is gone from me.38:11 My lovers and my friends stand aloof from my plague; And my kinsmen stand afar off.38:12 Those also who seek after my life lay snares for me; And those who seek my hurt speak mischievous things, and meditate deceits all the day long.38:13 But I, as a deaf man, hear not; And I am like a mute man who opens not his mouth.38:14 Yes, I am as a man that hears not, and in whose mouth are no reproofs.38:15 For in you, O Yahweh, do I hope: You will answer, O Lord my God.38:16 For I said, Lest they rejoice over me: When my foot slips, they magnify themselves against me.38:17 For I am ready to fall, and my sorrow is continually before me.38:18 For I will declare my iniquity; I will be sorry for my sin.38:19 But my enemies are lively, and are strong; And those who hate me wrongfully are multiplied.38:20 They also who render evil for good Are adversaries to me, because I follow the thing that is good.38:21 Forsake me not, O Yahweh: O my God, be not far from me.38:22 Make haste to help me, O Lord, my salvation.Psalm 39For the Chief Musician, Jeduthun.  A Psalm of David.39:1 I said, I will take heed to my ways, That I sin not with my tongue: I will keep my mouth with a bridle, While the wicked is before me.39:2 I was mute in silence, I held my peace, even from good; And my sorrow was stirred.39:3 My heart was hot within me; While I was musing the fire burned: Then spoke I with my tongue:39:4 Yahweh, make me to know my end, and the measure of my days, what it is; Let me know how frail I am.39:5 Behold, you have made my days as handbreadths; And my life-time is as nothing before you: Surely every man at his best estate is altogether vanity.  Selah39:6 Surely every man walks in a vain show; Surely they are disquieted in vain: He heaps up riches, and knows not who shall gather them.39:7 And now, Lord, what wait I for?  My hope is in you.39:8 Deliver me from all my transgressions: Make me not the reproach of the foolish.39:9 I was mute, I opened not my mouth; Because you did it.39:10 Remove your stroke away from me: I am consumed by the blow of your hand.39:11 When you with rebukes do correct man for iniquity, You cause his beauty to consume away like a moth: Surely every man is vanity.  Selah39:12 Hear my prayer, O Yahweh, and give ear to my cry; Hold not your peace at my tears: For I am a stranger with you, a sojourner, as all my fathers were.39:13 Oh spare me, that I may recover strength, Before I go away from here, and be no more.Psalm 40For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.40:1 I waited patiently for Yahweh; And he inclined to me, and heard my cry.40:2 He brought me up also out of a horrible pit, out of the miry clay; And he set my feet upon a rock, and established my goings.40:3 And he has put a new song in my mouth, even praise to our God: Many shall see it, and fear, and shall trust in Yahweh.40:4 Blessed is the man that makes Yahweh his trust, and respects not the proud, nor such as turn aside to lies.40:5 Many, O Yahweh my God, are the wonderful works which you have done, and your thoughts which are to us-ward; They cannot be set in order for you.  If I would declare and speak of them, they would be more than can be numbered.40:6 Sacrifice and offering you have no delight in; My ears you have opened: Burnt-offering and sin offering you have not required.40:7 Then said I, Lo, I am come; In the roll of the book it is written of me:40:8 I delight to do your will, O my God; Yes, your law is within my heart.40:9 I have proclaimed glad tidings of righteousness in the great assembly; Lo, I will not refrain my lips, O Yahweh, you know.40:10 I have not hid your righteousness within my heart; I have declared your faithfulness and your salvation; I have not concealed your lovingkindness and your truth from the great assembly.40:11 Withhold not thou your tender mercies from me, O Yahweh; Let your lovingkindness and your truth continually preserve me.40:12 For innumerable evils have compassed me about; My iniquities have overtaken me, so that I am not able to look up; They are more than the hairs of my head; And my heart has failed me.40:13 Be pleased, O Yahweh, to deliver me: Make haste to help me, O Yahweh.40:14 Let them be put to shame and confounded together That seek after my soul to destroy it: Let them be turned backward and brought to dishonor Who delight in my hurt.40:15 Let them be desolate by reason of their shame That say to me, aha, aha.40:16 Let all those that seek you rejoice and be glad in you: Let such as love your salvation say continually, Yahweh be magnified.40:17 But I am poor and needy; Yet the Lord thinks upon me: You are my help and my deliverer; Make no tarrying, O my God.Psalm 41For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.41:1 Blessed is he that considers the poor: Yahweh will deliver him in the day of evil.41:2 Yahweh will preserve him, and keep him alive, and he shall be blessed upon the earth; And do not deliver him into the will of his enemies.41:3 Yahweh will support him upon the couch of languishing: You make all his bed in his sickness.41:4 I said, O Yahweh, have mercy upon me: Heal my soul; for I have sinned against you.41:5 My enemies speak evil against me, saying, When will he die, and his name perish?41:6 And if he comes to see me, he speaks falsehood; His heart gathers iniquity to itself: When he goes abroad, he tells it.41:7 All that hate me whisper together against me; Against me do they devise my hurt.41:8 An evil disease, say they, cleaves fast to him; And now that he lies he shall rise up no more.41:9 Yes, my own familiar friend, in whom I trusted, who did eat of my bread, has lifted up his heel against me.41:10 But you, O Yahweh, have mercy upon me, and raise me up, that I may repay them.41:11 By this I know that you delight in me, because my enemy does not triumph over me.41:12 And as for me, you uphold me in my integrity, and set me before your face for ever.41:13 Blessed be Yahweh, the God of Israel, From everlasting and to everlasting.  Amen, and Amen.Book IIPsalm 42For the Chief Musician.  Maschil of the sons of Korah.42:1 As the deer pants after the water brooks, so pants my soul after you, O God.42:2 My soul thirsts for God, for the living God: when shall I come and appear before God?42:3 My tears have been my food day and night, as they continually say to me, Where is your God?42:4 These things I remember, and pour out my soul within me, how I went with the throng, and led them to the house of God, with the voice of joy and praise, a multitude keeping holyday.42:5 Why are you cast down, O my soul?  why are you disquieted within me?  Hope thou in God; for I shall yet praise him for the help of his countenance.42:6 O my God, my soul is cast down within me: therefore do I remember you from the land of the Jordan, and the Hermons, from the hill Mizar.42:7 Deep calls unto deep at the noise of your waterfalls: all your waves and your billows are gone over me.42:8 Yet Yahweh will command his lovingkindness in the day-time; and in the night his song shall be with me, even a prayer to the God of my life.42:9 I will say to God my rock, Why have you forgotten me?  Why go I mourning because of the oppression of the enemy?42:10 As with a sword in my bones, my adversaries reproach me, as they continually say to me, Where is your God?42:11 Why are you cast down, O my soul?  And why are you disquieted within me?  Hope thou in God; for I shall yet praise him, who is the help of my countenance, and my God.Psalm 4343:1 Judge me, O God, and plead my cause against an ungodly nation: Oh deliver me from the deceitful and unjust man.43:2 For you are the God of my strength.  Why have you cast me off?  Why go I mourning because of the oppression of the enemy?43:3 Oh send out your light and your truth; let them lead me.  Let them bring me to your holy hill, and to your tabernacles.43:4 Then will I go to the altar of God, to God my exceeding joy.  And upon the harp will I praise you, O God, my God.43:5 Why are you cast down, O my soul?  And why are you disquieted within me?  Hope thou in God; for I shall yet praise him, Who is the help of my countenance, and my God.Psalm 44For the Chief Musician.  [A Psalm] of the sons of Korah.  Maschil.44:1 We have heard with our ears, O God; our fathers have told us, what work you did in their days, in the days of old.44:2 You did drive out the nations with your hand; but our fathers you did plant: You did afflict the peoples; but them you did spread abroad.44:3 For they got not the land in possession by their own sword.  Neither did their own arm save them; but rather by your right hand, and your arm, and the light of your countenance.  Because you were favorable to them.44:4 You are my King, O God: command deliverance for Jacob.44:5 Through you will we push down our adversaries: through your name will we tread them under who rise up against us.44:6 For I will not trust in my bow, neither shall my sword save me.44:7 Rather you have saved us from our adversaries, and have put those to shame who hate us.44:8 In God have we made our boast all the day long, and we will give thanks to your name for ever.  Selah44:9 But now you have cast us off, and brought us to dishonor, and do not go forth with our armies.44:10 You cause us to turn back from the adversary; and those that hate us take spoil for themselves.44:11 You have made us like sheep appointed for food, and scattered us among the nations.44:12 You sell your people for nothing, and not increased your wealth by their price.44:13 You make us a reproach to our neighbors, a scoffing and derision to those round about us.44:14 You make us a byword among the nations, a cause for shaking of the head among the peoples.44:15 All the day long is my dishonor before me, and the shame of my face has covered me,44:16 because of the voice of him that reproaches and blasphemes; by reason of the enemy and the avenger.44:17 All this is come upon us; yet we have not forgotten you, neither have we dealt falsely in your covenant.44:18 Our heart is not turned back, neither have our steps declined from your way 44:19 because you have sore broken us in the place of jackals, and covered us with the shadow of death.44:20 If we have forgotten the name of our God, or spread forth our hands to a strange god,44:21 will not God search this out?  For he knows the secrets of the heart.44:22 Yes, for your sake are we killed all the day long; we are accounted as sheep for the slaughter.44:23 Awake, why do you sleep, O Lord?  Arise, do not cast us off for ever.44:24 Why do you hide your face, and forget our affliction and our oppression?44:25 For our soul is bowed down to the dust.  Our body cleaves to the ground.44:26 Rise up as our help, and redeem us for your lovingkindness' sake.Psalm 45For the Chief Musician; set to Shoshannim.  [A Psalm] of the sons of Korah.  Maschil.  A Song of loves.45:1 My heart overflows with a goodly matter; I speak the things which I have made touching the king: my tongue is the pen of a ready writer.45:2 You are fairer than the children of men; Grace is poured into your lips: Therefore God has blessed you for ever.45:3 Gird your sword upon your thigh, O mighty one, Your glory and your majesty.45:4 And in your majesty ride on prosperously, Because of truth and meekness and righteousness: And your right hand shall teach you terrible things.45:5 Your arrows are sharp; The peoples fall under you; They are in the heart of the king's enemies.45:6 Your throne, O God, is for ever and ever: A sceptre of equity is the sceptre of your kingdom.45:7 You have loved righteousness, and hated wickedness: Therefore God, your God, has anointed you With the oil of gladness above your fellows.45:8 All your garments smell of myrrh, and aloes, and cassia; Out of ivory palaces stringed instruments have made you glad.45:9 Kings' daughters are among your honorable women: At your right hand does stand the queen in gold of Ophir.45:10 Hearken, O daughter, and consider, and incline your ear; Forget also your own people, and your father's house:45:11 So will the king desire your beauty; For he is your lord; and reverence you him.45:12 And the daughter of Tyre shall be there with a gift; The rich among the people shall entreat your favor.45:13 The king's daughter within the palace is all glorious: Her clothing is inwrought with gold.45:14 She shall be led to the king in broidered work: The virgins her companions that follow her Shall be brought to you.45:15 With gladness and rejoicing shall they be led: They shall enter into the king's palace.45:16 Instead of your fathers shall be your children, Whom you shall make princes in all the earth.45:17 I will make your name to be remembered in all generations: Therefore shall the peoples give you thanks for ever and ever.Psalm 46For the Chief Musician.  [A Psalm] of the sons of Korah; set to Alamoth.  A Song.46:1 God is our refuge and strength, a very present help in trouble.46:2 Therefore will we not fear, though the earth does change, and though the mountains be shaken into the heart of the seas;46:3 Though the waters thereof roar and be troubled, Though the mountains tremble with the swelling of it.  Selah 46:4 There is a river, the streams of which make glad the city of God, The holy place of the tabernacles of the Most High.46:5 God is in the midst of her; she shall not be moved: God will help her, and that right early.46:6 The nations raged, the kingdoms were moved: He uttered his voice, the earth melted.46:7 Yahweh of hosts is with us; The God of Jacob is our refuge.  Selah 46:8 Come, behold the works of Yahweh, What desolations he has made in the earth.46:9 He makes wars to cease to the end of the earth; He breaks the bow, and cuts the spear in sunder; He burns the chariots in the fire.46:10 Be still, and know that I am God: I will be exalted among the nations, I will be exalted in the earth.46:11 Yahweh of hosts is with us; The God of Jacob is our refuge.  SelahPsalm 47For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of the sons of Korah.47:1 Oh clap your hands, all ye peoples; Shout to God with the voice of triumph.47:2 For Yahweh Most High is fearsome; He is a great King over all the earth.47:3 He subdues peoples under us, and nations under our feet.47:4 He chooses our inheritance for us, The glory of Jacob whom he loved.  Selah47:5 God is gone up with a shout, Yahweh with the sound of a trumpet.47:6 Sing praise to God, sing praises: Sing praises to our King, sing praises.47:7 For God is the King of all the earth: Sing ye praises with understanding.47:8 God reigns over the nations: God sits upon his holy throne.47:9 The princes of the peoples are gathered together To be the people of the God of Abraham: For the shields of the earth belong to God; He is greatly exalted.Psalm 48A Song; a Psalm of the sons of Korah.48:1 Great is Yahweh, and greatly to be praised, In the city of our God, in his holy mountain.48:2 Beautiful in elevation, the joy of the whole earth, Is mount Zion, on the sides of the north, The city of the great King.48:3 God has made himself known in her citadels for a refuge.48:4 For, lo, the kings assembled themselves, They passed by together.48:5 They saw it, then were they amazed; They were dismayed, they hastened away.48:6 Trembling took hold of them there, Pain, as of a woman in labor.48:7 With the east wind You break the ships of Tarshish.48:8 As we have heard, so have we seen In the city of Yahweh of hosts, in the city of our God: God will establish it for ever.  Selah48:9 We have thought on your lovingkindness, O God, In the midst of your temple.48:10 As is your name, O God, So is your praise to the ends of the earth: Your right hand is full of righteousness.48:11 Let mount Zion be glad, Let the daughters of Judah rejoice, Because of your judgments.48:12 Walk about Zion, and go round about her; Number the towers thereof;48:13 Mark ye well her bulwarks; Consider her citadels: That ye may tell it to the generation following.48:14 For this God is our God for ever and ever: He will be our guide even unto death.Psalm 49For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of the sons of Korah.49:1 Hear this, all ye peoples; Give ear, all ye inhabitants of the world,49:2 Both low and high, Rich and poor together.49:3 My mouth shall speak wisdom; And the meditation of my heart shall be of understanding.49:4 I will incline my ear to a parable: I will open my dark saying upon the harp.49:5 Why should I fear in the days of evil, When iniquity at my heels compasses me about?49:6 They that trust in their wealth, and boast themselves in the multitude of their riches;49:7 None of them can by any means redeem his brother, Nor give to God a ransom for him;49:8 (For the redemption of their life is costly, and it fails for ever;)49:9 That he should still live alway, That he should not see corruption.49:10 For he shall see it.  Wise men die; The fool and the brutish alike perish, and leave their wealth to others.49:11 Their inward thought is, that their houses shall continue for ever, and their dwelling-places to all generations; They call their lands after their own names.49:12 But man being in honor abides not: He is like the beasts that perish.49:13 This their way is their folly: Yet after them men approve their sayings.  Selah49:14 They are appointed as a flock for Sheol; Death shall be their shepherd; And the upright shall have dominion over them in the morning; And their beauty shall be for Sheol to consume, That there be no habitation for it.49:15 But God will redeem my soul from the power of Sheol; For he will receive me.  Selah49:16 Be you not afraid when one is made rich, When the glory of his house is increased.49:17 For when he dies he shall carry nothing away; His glory shall not descend after him.49:18 Though while he lived he blessed his soul (And men praise you, when you do well for yourself,)49:19 He shall go to the generation of his fathers; They shall never see the light.49:20 Man that is in honor, and understands not, Is like the beasts that perish.Psalm 50A Psalm of Asaph.50:1 The Mighty One, God, Yahweh, has spoken, and called the earth from the rising of the sun to the going down thereof.50:2 Out of Zion, the perfection of beauty, God has shined forth.50:3 Our God comes, and does not keep silence: A fire devours before him, and it is very tempestuous round about him.50:4 He calls to the heavens above, and to the earth, that he may judge his people:50:5 Gather my saints together to me, Those that have made a covenant with me by sacrifice.50:6 And the heavens shall declare his righteousness; For God is judge himself.  Selah50:7 Hear, O my people, and I will speak; O Israel, and I will testify to you: I am God, even your God.50:8 I will not reprove you for your sacrifices; And your burnt offerings are continually before me.50:9 I will take no bullock out of your house, Nor he-goats out of your folds.50:10 For every beast of the forest is mine, and the cattle upon a thousand hills.50:11 I know all the birds of the mountains; And the wild beasts of the field are mine.50:12 If I were hungry, I would not tell you; For the world is mine, and the fulness thereof.50:13 Will I eat the flesh of bulls, Or drink the blood of goats?50:14 Offer to God the sacrifice of thanksgiving; And pay your vows to the Most High:50:15 And call upon me in the day of trouble; I will deliver you, and you shall glorify me.50:16 But to the wicked God says, What have you to do to declare my statutes, and that you have taken my covenant in your mouth,50:17 Seeing you hate instruction, and cast my words behind you?50:18 When you saw a thief, you consented with him, and have been partaker with adulterers.50:19 You give your mouth to evil, and your tongue frames deceit.50:20 You sit and speak against your brother; You slander your own mother's son.50:21 These things have you done, and I kept silence; You thought that I was altogether such a one as yourself: But I will reprove you, and set them in order before your eyes.50:22 Now consider this, ye that forget God, Lest I tear you in pieces, and there be none to deliver:50:23 Whoso offers the sacrifice of thanksgiving glorifies me; And to him that orders his way aright Will I show the salvation of God.Psalm 51For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David; when Nathan the prophet came to him, after he had gone in to Bathsheba.51:1 Have mercy upon me, O God, according to your lovingkindness: According to the multitude of your tender mercies blot out my transgressions.51:2 Wash me thoroughly from my iniquity, and cleanse me from my sin.51:3 For I know my transgressions; And my sin is ever before me.51:4 Against you, you only, have I sinned, and done that which is evil in your sight; That you may be justified when you speak, and be clear when you judge.51:5 Behold, I was brought forth in iniquity; And in sin did my mother conceive me.51:6  Behold, you desire truth in the inward parts; And in the hidden part you will make me to know wisdom.51:7 Purify me with hyssop, and I shall be clean: Wash me, and I shall be whiter than snow.51:8 Cause me to hear joy and gladness, That the bones which you have broken may rejoice.51:9 Hide your face from my sins, and blot out all my iniquities.51:10 Create in me a clean heart, O God; And renew a right spirit within me.51:11 Cast me not away from your presence; And take not your holy Spirit from me.51:12 Restore to me the joy of your salvation; And uphold me with a willing spirit.51:13 Then will I teach transgressors your ways; And sinners shall be converted to you.51:14 Deliver me from bloodguiltiness, O God, you God of my salvation; And my tongue shall sing aloud of your righteousness.51:15 O Lord, open thou my lips; And my mouth shall show forth your praise.51:16 For you delight not in sacrifice; else would I give it: You have no pleasure in burnt offering.51:17 The sacrifices of God are a broken spirit: A broken and contrite heart, O God, you will not despise.51:18 Do good in your good pleasure to Zion: Build thou the walls of Jerusalem.51:19 Then will you delight in the sacrifices of righteousness, In burnt offering and in whole burnt offering: Then will they offer bullocks upon your altar.Psalm 52For the Chief Musician.  Maschil of David; when Doeg the Edomite came and told Saul, and said to him, David is come to the house of Abimelech.52:1 Why do you boast yourself in mischief, O mighty man?  The lovingkindness of God endures continually.52:2 Your tongue devises very wickedness, Like a sharp razor, working deceitfully.52:3 You love evil more than good, and lying rather than to speak righteousness.  Selah52:4 You love all devouring words, you deceitful tongue.52:5 God will likewise destroy you for ever; He will take you up, and pluck you out of your tent, and root you out of the land of the living.  Selah52:6 The righteous also shall see it, and fear, and shall laugh at him, saying,52:7 Lo, this is the man that made not God his strength, But trusted in the abundance of his riches, and strengthened himself in his wickedness.52:8 But as for me, I am like a green olive-tree in the house of God: I trust in the lovingkindness of God for ever and ever.52:9 I will give you thanks for ever, because you have done it; And I will hope in your name, for it is good, in the presence of your saints.Psalm 53For the Chief Musician; set to Mahalath.  Maschil of David.53:1 The fool has said in his heart, There is no God.  Corrupt are they, and have done abominable iniquity; There is none that does good.53:2 God looked down from heaven upon the children of men, To see if there were any that did understand, That did seek after God.53:3 Every one of them is gone back; they are together become filthy; There is none that does good, no, not one.53:4 Have the workers of iniquity no knowledge, Who eat up my people as they eat bread, and call not upon God?53:5 There they were in great fear, where no fear was; For God has scattered the bones of him that encamps against you: You have put them to shame, because that God has rejected them.53:6 Oh that the salvation of Israel were come out of Zion! When God brings back the captivity of his people, Then shall Jacob rejoice, and Israel shall be glad.Psalm 54For the Chief Musician; on stringed instruments.  Maschil of David; when the Ziphites came and said to Saul, Does not David hide himself with us?54:1 Save me, O God, by your name, and judge me in your might.54:2 Hear my prayer, O God; Give ear to the words of my mouth.54:3 For strangers are risen up against me, and violent men have sought after my soul: They have not set God before them.  Selah54:4 Behold, God is my helper: The Lord is of them that uphold my soul.54:5 He will repay the evil to my enemies: Destroy thou them in your truth.54:6 With a freewill-offering will I sacrifice to you: I will give thanks to your name, O Yahweh, for it is good.54:7 For he has delivered me out of all trouble; And my eye has seen my desire upon my enemies.Psalm 55For the Chief Musician; on stringed instruments.  Maschil of David.55:1 Give ear to my prayer, O God; And hide not yourself from my supplication.55:2 Attend to me, and answer me: I am restless in my complaint, and moan,55:3 Because of the voice of the enemy, Because of the oppression of the wicked; For they cast iniquity upon me, and in anger they persecute me.55:4 My heart is sore pained within me: And the terrors of death are fallen upon me.55:5 Fearfulness and trembling are come upon me, and horror has overwhelmed me.55:6 And I said, Oh that I had wings like a dove! Then would I fly away, and be at rest.55:7 Lo, then would I wander far off, I would lodge in the wilderness.  Selah55:8 I would hasten me to a shelter, from the stormy wind and tempest.55:9 Destroy, O Lord, and divide their tongue; for I have seen violence and strife in the city.55:10 Day and night they go about it upon the walls thereof: Iniquity also and mischief are in the midst of it.55:11 Wickedness is in the midst of it: Oppression and guile depart not from its streets.55:12 For it was not an enemy that reproached me.  That I could have endured.  Neither was it he who hated me that magnified himself against me; then I would have hidden from him:55:13 But it was you, a man my peer, my companion, and my familiar friend.55:14 We took sweet counsel together; we walked in the house of God with the throng.55:15 Let death come suddenly upon them, Let them go down alive into Sheol; for wickedness is in their dwelling, in the midst of them.55:16 As for me, I will call upon God; and Yahweh will save me.55:17 Evening, and morning, and at noonday, will I complain, and moan; and He will hear my voice.55:18 He has redeemed my soul in peace from the battle that was against me; for they were many that strove with me.55:19 God will hear, and respond to them, even He that abides of old,  Selah  The men who make no changes, and who fear not God.55:20 He has put forth his hands against those who were at peace with him: he has profaned his covenant.55:21 His mouth was smooth as butter, but his heart was war: his words were softer than oil, yet they were drawn swords.55:22 Cast your burden upon Yahweh, and he will sustain you: He will never allow the righteous to be moved.55:23 But you, O God, will bring them down into the pit of destruction: Bloodthirsty and deceitful men shall not live out half their days; but I will trust in you.Psalm 56For the Chief Musician; set to Jonath elem rehokim.  [A Psalm] of David.  Michtam: when the Philistines took him in Gath.56:1 Be merciful to me, O God; for man would swallow me up: All the day long he with fighting oppresses me.56:2 My enemies would swallow me up all the day long; for they are many that fight proudly against me.56:3 What time I am afraid, I will put my trust in you.56:4 In God (I will praise his word), In God have I put my trust, I will not be afraid; What can flesh do to me?56:5 All the day long they twist my words: All their thoughts are against me for evil.56:6 They gather themselves together, they hide themselves, they mark my steps, even as they have waited for my soul.56:7 Shall they escape by iniquity?  In anger cast down the peoples, O God.56:8 You number my wanderings: Put thou my tears into your bottle; Are they not in your ledger?56:9 Then shall my enemies turn back in the day that I call.  This I know, that God is for me.56:10 In God (I will praise his word), In Yahweh (I will praise his word),56:11 In God have I put my trust, I will not be afraid; What can man do to me?56:12 Your vows are upon me, O God: I will render thank offerings to you.56:13 For you have delivered my soul from death: Have you not delivered my feet from falling, that I may walk before God in the light of the living?Psalm 57For the Chief Musician; [set to] Al-tash-heth.  [A Psalm] of David.  Michtam; when he fled from Saul, in the cave.57:1 Be merciful to me, O God, be merciful to me; For my soul takes refuge in you: Yes, in the shadow of your wings will I take refuge, Until these calamities be overpast.57:2 I will cry to God Most High, to God that performs all things for me.57:3 He will send from heaven, and save me, When he who would swallow me up reproaches;  Selah  God will send forth his lovingkindness and his truth.57:4 My soul is among lions; I lie among them that are set on fire, Even the sons of men, whose teeth are spears and arrows, and their tongue a sharp sword.57:5 Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens; Let your glory be above all the earth.57:6 They have prepared a net for my steps; My soul is bowed down: They have dug a pit before me; They are fallen into the midst of it themselves.  Selah57:7 My heart is fixed, O God, my heart is fixed: I will sing, yes, I will sing praises.57:8 Awake up, my glory; awake, harp and lyre: I myself will awake right early.57:9 I will give thanks to you, O Lord, among the peoples: I will sing praises to you among the nations.57:10 For your lovingkindness is great unto the heavens, and your truth unto the skies.57:11 Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens; Let your glory be above all the earth.Psalm 58For the Chief Musician; [set to] Al-tashheth.  [A Psalm] of David.  Michtam.58:1 Do ye indeed in silence speak righteousness?  Do ye judge uprightly, O ye sons of men?58:2 Nay, in heart ye work wickedness; Ye weigh out the violence of your hands in the earth.58:3 The wicked are estranged from the womb: They go astray as soon as they are born, speaking lies.58:4 Their poison is like the poison of a serpent: They are like the deaf adder that stops her ear,58:5 Which hearkens not to the voice of charmers, Charming never so wisely.58:6 Break their teeth, O God, in their mouth: Break out the great teeth of the young lions, O Yahweh.58:7 Let them melt away as water that runs apace: When he aims his arrows, let them be as though they were cut off.58:8 Let them be as a snail which melts and passes away, Like the untimely birth of a woman, that has not seen the sun.58:9 Before your pots can feel the thorns, He will take them away with a whirlwind, the green and the burning alike.58:10 The righteous shall rejoice when he sees the vengeance: He shall wash his feet in the blood of the wicked;58:11 So that men shall say, Truly there is a reward for the righteous: Truly there is a God that judges in the earth.Psalm 59For the Chief Musician; [set to] Al-tashheth.  [A Psalm] of David.  Michtam; when Saul sent, and they watched the house to kill him.59:1 Deliver me from my enemies, O my God: Set me on high from them that rise up against me.59:2 Deliver me from the workers of iniquity, and save me from the bloodthirsty men.59:3 For, lo, they lie in wait for my soul; The mighty gather themselves together against me: Not for my transgression, nor for my sin, O Yahweh.59:4 They run and prepare themselves without my fault: Awake thou to help me, and behold.59:5 Even you, O Yahweh God of hosts, the God of Israel, arise to visit all the nations: Be not merciful to any wicked transgressors.  Selah59:6 They return at evening, they howl like a dog, and go round about the city.59:7 Behold, they belch out with their mouth; Swords are in their lips: For who, say they, will hear?59:8 But you, O Yahweh, will laugh at them; You will have all the nations in derision.59:9 Because of his strength I will give heed to you; For God is my high tower.59:10 My God with his lovingkindness will meet me: God will let me see my desire upon my enemies.59:11 Slay them not, lest my people forget: Scatter them by your power, and bring them down, O Lord our shield.59:12 For the sin of their mouth, and the words of their lips, Let them even be taken in their pride, and for cursing and lying which they speak.59:13 Consume them in wrath, consume them, so that they shall be no more: And let them know that God rules in Jacob, To the ends of the earth.  Selah59:14 And at evening let them return, let them howl like a dog, and go round about the city.59:15 They shall wander up and down for food, and tarry all night if they be not satisfied.59:16 But I will sing of your strength; Yes, I will sing aloud of your lovingkindness in the morning: For you have been my high tower, and a refuge in the day of my distress.59:17 To you, O my strength, will I sing praises: For God is my high tower, the God of my mercy.Psalm 60For the Chief Musician; [set to] Shushan Eduth.  Michtam of David, to teach; and when he strove with Aram-naharaim and with Aram-zobah, and Joab returned, and smote of Edom in the Valley of Salt twelve thousand.60:1 O God you have cast us off, you have broken us down; You have been angry; oh restore us again.60:2 You have made the land to tremble; you have rent it: Heal the breaches thereof; for it shakes.60:3 You have shown your people hard things: You have made us to drink the wine of staggering.60:4 You have given a banner to them that fear you, That it may be displayed because of the truth.  Selah60:5 That your beloved may be delivered, Save with your right hand, and answer us.60:6 God has spoken in his holiness: I will exult; I will divide Shechem, and portion out the valley of Succoth.60:7 Gilead is mine, and Manasseh is mine; Ephraim also is the defence of my head; Judah is my sceptre.60:8 Moab is my washpot; Upon Edom will I cast my shoe: Philistia, shout you because of me.60:9 Who will bring me into the strong city?  Who has led me to Edom?60:10 Have not you, O God, cast us off?  And you go not forth, O God, with our hosts.60:11 Give us help against the adversary; For vain is the help of man.60:12 Through God we shall do valiantly; For he it is that will tread down our adversaries.Psalm 61For the Chief Musician; on a stringed instrument.  [A Psalm] of David.61:1 Hear my cry, O God; Attend to my prayer.61:2 From the end of the earth will I call to you, when my heart is overwhelmed: Lead me to the rock that is higher than I.61:3 For you have been a refuge for me, a strong tower from the enemy.61:4 I will dwell in your tabernacle for ever: I will take refuge in the cover of your wings.  Selah61:5 For you, O God, have heard my vows: You have given me the heritage of those that fear your name.61:6 You will prolong the king's life; His years shall be as many generations.61:7 He shall abide before God for ever: Oh prepare lovingkindness and truth, that they may preserve him.61:8 So will I sing praise to your name for ever, That I may daily perform my vows.Psalm 62For the Chief Musician; after the manner of Jeduthan.  A Psalm of David.62:1 My soul waits in silence for God only: From him comes my salvation.62:2 He only is my rock and my salvation: He is my high tower; I shall not be greatly moved.62:3 How long will ye set upon a man, That ye may slay him, all of you, Like a leaning wall, like a tottering fence?62:4 They only consult to thrust him down from his dignity; They delight in lies; They bless with their mouth, but they curse inwardly.  Selah62:5 My soul, wait thou in silence for God only; For my expectation is from him.62:6 He only is my rock and my salvation: He is my high tower; I shall not be moved.62:7 With God is my salvation and my glory.  The rock of my strength, and my refuge, is in God.62:8 Trust in him at all times, ye people; Pour out your heart before him: God is a refuge for us.  Selah62:9 Surely men of low degree are vanity, and men of high degree are a lie: In the balances they will go up; They are together lighter than a breath.62:10 Trust not in oppression, and become not vain in robbery: If riches increase, set not your heart upon it.62:11 God has spoken once, Twice have I heard this, That power belongs to God.62:12 Also to you, O Lord, belongs lovingkindness; For you render to every man according to his work.Psalm 63A Psalm of David when he was in the wilderness of Judah.63:1 O God, you are my God; earnestly will I seek you: My soul thirsts for you, my flesh longs for you, In a dry and weary land, where no water is.63:2 So have I looked upon you in the sanctuary, To see your power and your glory.63:3 Because your lovingkindness is better than life, My lips shall praise you.63:4 So will I bless you while I live: I will lift up my hands in your name.63:5 My soul shall be satisfied as with marrow and fatness; And my mouth shall praise you with joyful lips;63:6 When I remember you upon my bed, and meditate upon you in the night-watches.63:7 For you have been my help, and in the shadow of your wings will I rejoice.63:8 My soul follows hard after you: Your right hand upholds me.63:9 But those that seek my soul, to destroy it, Shall go into the lower parts of the earth.63:10 They shall be given over to the power of the sword: They shall be a portion for foxes.63:11 But the king shall rejoice in God: Every one that swears by him shall glory; For the mouth of them that speak lies shall be stopped.Psalm 64For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.64:1 Hear my voice, O God, in my complaint: Preserve my life from fear of the enemy.64:2 Hide me from the secret counsel of evil-doers, From the tumult of the workers of iniquity;64:3 Who have whet their tongue like a sword, and have aimed their arrows, even bitter words,64:4 That they may shoot in secret places at the perfect: Suddenly do they shoot at him, and fear not.64:5 They encourage themselves in an evil purpose; They commune of laying snares privily; They say, Who will see them?64:6 They search out iniquities; We have accomplished, say they, a diligent search: And the inward thought and the heart of every one is deep.64:7 But God will shoot at them; With an arrow suddenly shall they be wounded.64:8 So they shall be made to stumble, their own tongue being against them: All that see them shall wag the head.64:9 And all men shall fear; And they shall declare the work of God, and shall wisely consider of his doing.64:10 The righteous shall be glad in Yahweh, and shall take refuge in him; And all the upright in heart shall glory.Psalm 65For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm.  A song of David.65:1 Praise waits for you, O God, in Zion; And to you shall the vow be performed.65:2 O you that hear prayer, To you shall all flesh come.65:3 Iniquities prevail against me: As for our transgressions, you will forgive them.65:4 Blessed is the man whom you choose, and cause to approach you, That he may dwell in your courts: We shall be satisfied with the goodness of your house, Your holy temple.65:5 By terrible things you will answer us in righteousness, Oh God of our salvation, You that are the confidence of all the ends of the earth, and of them that are afar off upon the sea:65:6 Who by his strength sets fast the mountains, Being girded about with might;65:7 Who stills the roaring of the seas, The roaring of their waves, and the tumult of the peoples.65:8 They also that dwell in the uttermost parts are afraid at your tokens: You cause the outgoings of the morning and evening to rejoice.65:9 You visit the earth, and water it, You greatly enrich it; The river of God is full of water: You provide them grain, when you have so prepared the earth.65:10 You water its furrows abundantly; You settle the ridges thereof: You make it soft with showers; You bless the springing thereof.65:11 You crown the year with your goodness; And your paths drop fatness.65:12 They drop upon the pastures of the wilderness; And the hills are girded with joy.65:13 The pastures are clothed with flocks; The valleys also are covered over with grain; They shout for joy, they also sing.Psalm 66For the Chief Musician.  A song, a Psalm.66:1 Make a joyful noise to God, all the earth:66:2 Sing forth the glory of his name: Make his praise glorious.66:3 Say to God, How terrible are your works! Through the greatness of your power shall your enemies submit themselves to you.66:4 All the earth shall worship you, and shall sing to you; They shall sing to your name.  Selah66:5 Come, and see the works of God; He is terrible in his doing toward the children of men.66:6 He turned the sea into dry land; They went through the river on foot: There did we rejoice in him.66:7 He rules by his might for ever; His eyes observe the nations: Let not the rebellious exalt themselves.  Selah66:8 Oh bless our God, ye peoples, and make the voice of his praise to be heard;66:9 Who holds our soul in life, and permits not our feet to be moved.66:10 For you, O God, have proved us: You have tried us, as silver is tried.66:11 You brought us into the net; You layed a sore burden upon our loins.66:12 You did cause men to ride over our heads; We went through fire and through water; But you brought us out into a wealthy place.66:13 I will come into your house with burnt offerings; I will pay you my vows,66:14 Which my lips uttered, and my mouth spoke, when I was in distress.66:15 I will offer to you burnt offerings of fatlings, With the incense of rams; I will offer bullocks with goats.  Selah66:16 Come, and hear, all ye that fear God, and I will declare what he has done for my soul.66:17 I cried to him with my mouth, and he was extolled with my tongue.66:18 If I regard iniquity in my heart, The Lord will not hear:66:19 But verily God has heard; He has attended to the voice of my prayer.66:20 Blessed be God, Who has not turned away my prayer, Nor his lovingkindness from me.Psalm 67For the Chief Musician; on stringed instruments.  A Psalm, a song.67:1 God be merciful to us, and bless us, and cause his face to shine upon us;  Selah67:2 That your way may be known upon earth, Your salvation among all nations.67:3 Let the peoples praise you, O God; Let all the peoples praise you.67:4 Oh let the nations be glad and sing for joy; For you will judge the peoples with equity, and govern the nations upon earth.  Selah67:5 Let the peoples praise you, O God; Let all the peoples praise you.67:6 The earth has yielded its increase: God, even our own God, will bless us.67:7 God will bless us; And all the ends of the earth shall fear him.Psalm 68For the Chief Musician; A Psalm of David, a song.68:1 Let God arise, let his enemies be scattered; Let those also who hate him flee before him.68:2 As smoke is driven away, so drive them away: As wax melts before the fire, So let the wicked perish at the presence of God.68:3 But let the righteous be glad; let them exult before God: Yes, let them rejoice with gladness.68:4 Sing to God, sing praises to his name: Cast up a highway for him that rides through the deserts; His name is Yahweh; and exult ye before him.68:5 A father of the fatherless, and a judge of the widows, Is God in his holy habitation.68:6 God sets the solitary in families: He brings out the prisoners into prosperity; But the rebellious dwell in a parched land.68:7 O God, when you went forth before your people, When you did march through the wilderness;  Selah68:8 The earth trembled, The heavens also dropped rain at the presence of God: Yon Sinai trembled at the presence of God, the God of Israel.68:9 You, O God, did send a plentiful rain, You did confirm your inheritance, when it was weary.68:10 Your congregation dwelt therein: You, O God, did prepare of your goodness for the poor.68:11 The Lord gives the word: The women that publish the tidings are a great host.68:12 Kings of armies flee, they flee; And she that tarries at home divides the spoil.68:13 When ye lie among the sheepfolds, It is as the wings of a dove covered with silver, and her pinions with yellow gold.68:14 When the Almighty scattered kings therein, It was as when it snows in Zalmon.68:15 A mountain of God is the mountain of Bashan; A high mountain is the mountain of Bashan.68:16 Why look ye askance, ye high mountains, at the mountain which God has desired for his abode?  Yes, Yahweh will dwell in it for ever.68:17 The chariots of God are twenty thousand, even thousands upon thousands; The Lord is among them, as in Sinai, in the sanctuary.68:18 You have ascended on high, you have led away captives; You have distributed gifts among men, Yes, among the rebellious also, that Yahweh God might dwell with them.68:19 Blessed be the Lord, who daily bears our burden, Even the God who is our salvation.  Selah68:20 God is to us a God of deliverances; And to Yahweh the Lord belongs escape from death.68:21 But God will smite through the head of his enemies, The hairy scalp of such a one as goes on still in his guiltiness.68:22 The Lord said, I will bring back from Bashan, I will bring them back from the depths of the sea;68:23 That you may crush them, dipping your foot in blood, That the tongue of your dogs may have its portion from your enemies.68:24 They have seen your goings, O God, Even the goings of my God, my King, into the sanctuary.68:25 The singers went before, the minstrels followed after, In the midst of the damsels playing with timbrels.68:26 Bless ye God in the congregations, Even the Lord, ye that are of the fountain of Israel.68:27 There is little Benjamin their ruler, The princes of Judah and their council, The princes of Zebulun, the princes of Naphtali.68:28 Your God has commanded your strength: Strengthen, O God, that which you have wrought for us.68:29 Because of your temple at Jerusalem Kings shall bring presents to you.68:30 Rebuke the wild beast of the reeds, The multitude of the bulls, with the calves of the peoples, Trampling under foot the pieces of silver: He has scattered the peoples that delight in war.68:31 Princes shall come out of Egypt; Ethiopia shall haste to stretch out her hands to God.68:32 Sing to God, ye kingdoms of the earth; Oh sing praises to the Lord;  Selah68:33 To him that rides upon the heaven of heavens, which are of old; Lo, he utters his voice, a mighty voice.68:34 Ascribe ye strength to God: His excellency is over Israel, and his strength is in the skies.68:35 O God, you are terrible out of your holy places: The God of Israel, he gives strength and power to his people.  Blessed be God.Psalm 69For the Chief Musician; set to Shoshanim.  [A Psalm] of David.69:1 Save me, O God; For the waters are come in to my soul.69:2 I sink in deep mire, where there is no standing: I am come into deep waters, where the floods overflow me.69:3 I am weary with my crying; my throat is dried: My eyes fail while I wait for my God.69:4 They that hate me without a cause are more than the hairs of my head: They that would cut me off, being my enemies wrongfully, are mighty: That which I did not steal I have to restore.69:5 O God, you know my foolishness; And my sins are not hidden from you.69:6 Let not them that wait for you be put to shame through me, O Lord Yahweh of hosts: Let not those that seek you be brought to dishonor through me, O God of Israel.69:7 Because for your sake I have borne reproach; Shame has covered my face.69:8 I am become a stranger to my brethren, and an alien to my mother's children.69:9 For the zeal of your house has consumed me; And the reproaches of them that reproach you are fallen upon me.69:10 When I wept, and chastened my soul with fasting, That was to my reproach.69:11 When I made sackcloth my clothing, I became a byword to them.69:12 They that sit in the gate talk of me; And I am the song of the drunkards.69:13 But as for me, my prayer is to you, O Yahweh.  In an acceptable time, O God, in the abundance of your lovingkindness, answer me in the truth of your salvation.69:14 Deliver me out of the mire, and let me not sink: Let me be delivered from them that hate me, and out of the deep waters.69:15 Let not the waterflood overwhelm me, Neither let the deep swallow me up; And let not the pit shut its mouth upon me.69:16 Answer me, O Yahweh; for your lovingkindness is good: According to the multitude of your tender mercies turn thou to me.69:17 And hide not your face from your servant; For I am in distress; answer me speedily.69:18 Draw near to my soul, and redeem it: Ransom me because of my enemies.69:19 You know my reproach, and my shame, and my dishonor: My adversaries are all before you.69:20 Reproach has broken my heart; and I am full of heaviness: And I looked for some to take pity, but there was none; And for comforters, but I found none.69:21 They gave me also gall for my food; And in my thirst they gave me vinegar to drink.69:22 Let their table before them become a snare; And when they are in peace, let it become a trap.69:23 Let their eyes be darkened, so that they cannot see; And cause their loins continually to shake.69:24 Pour out your indignation upon them, and let the fierceness of your anger overtake them.69:25 Let their habitation be desolate; Let none dwell in their tents.69:26 For they persecute him whom you have smitten; And they tell of the sorrow of those whom you have wounded.69:27 Add iniquity to their iniquity; And let them not come into your righteousness.69:28 Let them be blotted out of the book of life, and not be written with the righteous.69:29 But I am poor and sorrowful: Let your salvation, O God, set me up on high.69:30 I will praise the name of God with a song, and will magnify him with thanksgiving.69:31 And it will please Yahweh better than an ox, Or a bullock that has horns and hoofs.69:32 The meek have seen it, and are glad: You that seek after God, let your heart live.69:33 For Yahweh hears the needy, and despises not his prisoners.69:34 Let heaven and earth praise him, The seas, and everything that moves therein.69:35 For God will save Zion, and build the cities of Judah; And they shall abide there, and have it in possession.69:36 The seed also of his servants shall inherit it; And those who love his name shall dwell therein.Psalm 70For the Chief Musician.  [A Psalm] of David; to bring to remembrance.70:1 Make haste, O God, to deliver me; Make haste to help me, O Yahweh.70:2 Let them be put to shame and confounded That seek after my soul: Let them be turned backward and brought to dishonor That delight in my hurt.70:3 Let them be turned back by reason of their shame That say, aha, aha.70:4 Let all those that seek you rejoice and be glad in you; And let such as love your salvation say continually, Let God be magnified.70:5 But I am poor and needy; Make haste to me, O God: You are my help and my deliverer; O Yahweh, make no tarrying.Psalm 7171:1 In you, O Yahweh, do I take refuge: Let me never be put to shame.71:2 Deliver me in your righteousness, and rescue me: Bow down your ear to me, and save me.71:3 Be to me a rock of habitation, to which I may continually resort: You have given commandment to save me; For you are my rock and my fortress.71:4 Rescue me, O my God, out of the hand of the wicked, Out of the hand of the unrighteous and cruel man.71:5 For you are my hope, O Lord Yahweh: You are my trust from my youth.71:6 By you have I been holden up since the womb; You are he that took me out of my mother's bowels: My praise shall be continually of you.71:7 I am as a wonder to many; But you are my strong refuge.71:8 My mouth shall be filled with your praise, and with your honor all the day.71:9 Cast me not off in the time of old age; Forsake me not when my strength fails.71:10 For my enemies speak concerning me; And they that watch for my soul take counsel together,71:11 Saying, God has forsaken him: Pursue and take him; for there is no one to deliver.71:12 O God, be not far from me; O my God, make haste to help me.71:13 Let them be put to shame and consumed that are adversaries to my soul; Let them be covered with reproach and dishonor that seek my hurt.71:14 But I will hope continually, and will praise you yet more and more.71:15 My mouth shall tell of your righteousness, and of your salvation all the day; For I know not the numbers thereof.71:16 I will come with the mighty acts of the Lord Yahweh: I will make mention of your righteousness, even of yours only.71:17 O God, you have taught me from my youth; And all this far have I declared your wondrous works.71:18 Yes, even when I am old and grayheaded, O God, forsake me not, Until I have declared your strength to the next generation, Your might to every one that is to come.71:19 Your righteousness also, O God, is very high; You who have done great things, O God, who is like you?71:20 You, who have shown us many and sore troubles, Will revive us again, and will bring us up again from the depths of the earth.71:21 Increase thou my greatness, and turn again and comfort me.71:22 I will also praise you with the psaltery, Even your truth, O my God: To you will I sing praises with the harp, O you Holy One of Israel.71:23 My lips shall shout for joy when I sing praises to you; And my soul, which you have redeemed.71:24 My tongue also shall talk of your righteousness all the day long; For they are put to shame, for they are confounded, that seek my hurt.Psalm 72[A Psalm] of Solomon.72:1 Give the king your judgments, O God, and your righteousness to the king's son.72:2 He will judge your people with righteousness, and your poor with justice.72:3 The mountains shall bring peace to the people, and the hills, in righteousness.72:4 He will judge the poor of the people, He will save the children of the needy, and will break in pieces the oppressor.72:5 They shall fear you while the sun remains, and so long as the moon, throughout all generations.72:6 He will come down like rain upon the mown grass, as showers that water the earth.72:7 In his days shall the righteous flourish, and abundance of peace, till the moon be no more.72:8 He shall have dominion also from sea to sea, and from the River to the ends of the earth.72:9 They that dwell in the wilderness shall bow before him; And his enemies shall lick the dust.72:10 The kings of Tarshish and of the isles shall render tribute: The kings of Sheba and Seba shall offer gifts.72:11 Yes, all kings shall fall down before him; All nations shall serve him.72:12 For he will deliver the needy when he cries, and the poor, that has no helper.72:13 He will have pity on the poor and needy, and the souls of the needy he will save.72:14 He will redeem their soul from oppression and violence; And precious will their blood be in his sight:72:15 And they shall live; and to him shall be given of the gold of Sheba: And men shall pray for him continually; They shall bless him all the day long.72:16 There shall be abundance of grain in the earth upon the top of the mountains; The fruit thereof shall shake like Lebanon: And they of the city shall flourish like grass of the earth.72:17 His name shall endure for ever; His name shall be continued as long as the sun: And men shall be blessed in him; All nations shall call him happy.72:18 Blessed be Yahweh God, the God of Israel, Who only does wondrous things:72:19 And blessed be his glorious name for ever; And let the whole earth be filled with his glory.  Amen, and Amen.72:20 The prayers of David the son of Jesse are ended.BOOK IIIPsalm 73A Psalm of Asaph.73:1 Surely God is good to Israel, even to such as are pure in heart.73:2 But as for me, my feet were almost gone; my steps had well near slipped.73:3 For I was envious at the arrogant, when I saw the prosperity of the wicked.73:4 For there are no pangs in their death; but their strength is firm.73:5 They are not in trouble as other men; neither are they plagued like other men.73:6 Therefore pride is as a chain about their neck; violence covers them as a garment.73:7 Their eyes stand out with fatness: they have more than heart could wish.73:8 They scoff, and in wickedness utter oppression: they speak loftily.73:9 They have set their mouth in the heavens, and their tongue walks through the earth. 73:10 Therefore his people return here: and waters of a full cup are drained by them.73:11 And they say, How does God know?  And is there knowledge in the Most High?73:12 Behold, these are the wicked; and, though always at ease, they increase in riches.73:13 Surely in vain have I cleansed my heart, and washed my hands in innocence;73:14 For all the day long have I been plagued, and chastened every morning.73:15 If I had said, I will speak thus; behold, I had dealt treacherously with the generation of your children.73:16 When I thought how I might understand this, it was too painful for me;73:17 Until I went into the sanctuary of God, and considered their latter end.73:18 Surely you set them in slippery places: you cast them down to destruction.73:19 How are they become a desolation in a moment! They are utterly consumed with terrors.73:20 As a dream when one awakes, so, O Lord, when you awake, you will despise their image.73:21 For my soul was grieved, and I was pricked in my heart:73:22 So brutish was I, and ignorant; I was as a beast before you.73:23 Nevertheless I am continually with you: you hold my right hand.73:24 You will guide me with your counsel, and afterward receive me to glory.73:25 Whom have I in heaven but you?  And there is none upon earth that I desire besides you.73:26 My flesh and my heart fails; but God is the strength of my heart, and my portion for ever.73:27 For, lo, they that are far from you shall perish: you have destroyed all them that play the harlot, departing from you.73:28 But it is good for me to draw near to God: I have made the Lord Yahweh my refuge, that I may tell of all your works.Psalm 74Maschil of Asaph.74:1 O God, why have you cast us off for ever?  Why does your anger smoke against the sheep of your pasture?74:2 Remember your congregation, which you have gotten of old, which you have redeemed to be the tribe of your inheritance; and mount Zion, in which you have dwelt.74:3 Lift up your feet to the perpetual ruins, all the evil that the enemy has done in the sanctuary.74:4 Your adversaries have roared in the midst of your assembly; They have set up their ensigns for signs.74:5 They seemed as men that lifted up Axes upon a thicket of trees.74:6 And now all the carved work thereof They break down with hatchet and hammers.74:7 They have set your sanctuary on fire; They have profaned the dwelling-place of your name by casting it to the ground.74:8 They said in their heart, Let us make havoc of them altogether: They have burned up all the synagogues of God in the land.74:9 We see not our signs: There is no more any prophet; Neither is there among us any that knows how long.74:10 How long, O God, shall the adversary reproach?  Shall the enemy blaspheme your name for ever?74:11 Why draw you back your hand, even your right hand?  Pluck it out of your bosom and consume them.74:12 Yet God is my King of old, Working salvation in the midst of the earth.74:13 You did divide the sea by your strength: You broke the heads of the sea-monsters in the waters.74:14 You broke the heads of leviathan in pieces; You gave him to be food to the people inhabiting the wilderness.74:15 You did split fountain and flood: You dried up mighty rivers.74:16 The day is yours, the night also is yours: You have prepared the light and the sun.74:17 You have set all the borders of the earth: You have made summer and winter.74:18 Remember this, that the enemy has reproached, O Yahweh, and that a foolish people has blasphemed your name.74:19 Oh deliver not the soul of your turtle-dove to the wild beast: Forget not the life of your poor for ever.74:20 Have respect to the covenant; For the dark places of the earth are full of the habitations of violence.74:21 Oh let not the oppressed return ashamed: Let the poor and needy praise your name.74:22 Arise, O God, plead your own cause: Remember how the foolish man reproaches you all the day.74:23 Forget not the voice of your adversaries: The tumult of those that rise up against you ascends continually.Psalm 75For the Chief Musician; [set to] Al-tash-heth.  A Psalm of Asaph; a song.75:1 We give thanks to you, O God; We give thanks, for your name is near: Men tell of your wondrous works.75:2 When I shall find the set time, I will judge uprightly.75:3 The earth and all the inhabitants thereof are dissolved: I have set up the pillars of it.  Selah75:4 I said to the arrogant, Deal not arrogantly; And to the wicked, Lift not up the horn:75:5 Lift not up your horn on high; Speak not with a stiff neck.75:6 For neither from the east, nor from the west, Nor yet from the south, comes lifting up.75:7 But God is the judge: He puts down one, and lifts up another.75:8 For in the hand of Yahweh there is a cup, and the wine foams; It is full of mixture, and he pours out of the same: Surely the dregs thereof, all the wicked of the earth shall drain them, and drink them.75:9 But I will declare for ever, I will sing praises to the God of Jacob.75:10 All the horns of the wicked also will I cut off; But the horns of the righteous shall be lifted up.Psalm 76For the Chief Musician; on stringed instruments.  A Psalm of Asaph, a song.76:1 In Judah is God known: His name is great in Israel.76:2 In Salem also is his tabernacle, and his dwelling-place in Zion.76:3 There he broke the arrows of the bow; The shield, and the sword, and the battle.  Selah76:4 Glorious are you and excellent, From the mountains of prey.76:5 The stouthearted are made a spoil, They have slept their sleep; And none of the men of might have found their hands.76:6 At your rebuke, O God of Jacob, Both chariot and horse are cast into a deep sleep.76:7 You, even you, are to be feared; And who may stand in your sight when once you are angry?76:8 You did cause sentence to be heard from heaven; The earth feared, and was still,76:9 When God arose to judgment, To save all the meek of the earth.  Selah76:10 Surely the wrath of man shall praise you: The residue of wrath shall you gird upon you.76:11 Vow, and pay to Yahweh your God: Let all that are round about him bring presents to him that ought to be feared.76:12 He will cut off the spirit of princes: He is terrible to the kings of the earth.Psalm 77For the Chief Musician; after the manner of Jeduthan.  A Psalm of Asaph.77:1 I will cry to God with my voice, Even to God with my voice; and he will give ear to me.77:2 In the day of my trouble I sought the Lord: My hand was stretched out in the night, and slacked not; My soul refused to be comforted.77:3 I remember God, and am disquieted: I complain, and my spirit is overwhelmed.  Selah 77:4 You hold my eyes watching: I am so troubled that I cannot speak.77:5 I have considered the days of old, The years of ancient times.77:6 I call to remembrance my song in the night: I commune with my own heart; And my spirit makes diligent search.77:7 Will the Lord cast off for ever?  And will he be favorable no more?77:8 Is his lovingkindness clean gone for ever?  Does his promise fail for evermore?77:9 Has God forgotten to be gracious?  Has he in anger shut up his tender mercies?  Selah77:10 And I said, This is my infirmity; But I will remember the years of the right hand of the Most High.77:11 I will make mention of the deeds of Yahweh; For I will remember your wonders of old.77:12 I will meditate also upon all your work, and muse on your doings.77:13 Your way, O God, is in the sanctuary: Who is a great god like to God?77:14 You are the God that do wonders: You have made known your strength among the peoples.77:15 You have with your arm redeemed your people, The sons of Jacob and Joseph.  Selah77:16 The waters saw you, O God; The waters saw you, they were afraid: The depths also trembled.77:17 The clouds poured out water; The skies sent out a sound: Your arrows also went abroad.77:18 The voice of your thunder was in the whirlwind; The lightnings lightened the world: The earth trembled and shook.77:19 Your way was in the sea, and your paths in the great waters, and your footsteps were not known.77:20 You led your people like a flock, By the hand of Moses and Aaron.Psalm 78Maschil of Asaph.78:1 Give ear, O my people, to my law: Incline your ears to the words of my mouth.78:2 I will open my mouth in a parable; I will utter dark sayings of old,78:3 Which we have heard and known, and our fathers have told us.78:4 We will not hide them from their children, Telling to the generation to come the praises of Yahweh, and his strength, and his wondrous works that he has done.78:5 For he established a testimony in Jacob, and appointed a law in Israel, Which he commanded our fathers, That they should make them known to their children;78:6 That the generation to come might know them, even the children that should be born; Who should arise and tell them to their children,78:7 That they might set their hope in God, and not forget the works of God, But keep his commandments,78:8 And might not be as their fathers, a stubborn and rebellious generation, a generation that set not their heart aright, and whose spirit was not stedfast with God.78:9 The children of Ephraim, being armed and carrying bows, Turned back in the day of battle.78:10 They kept not the covenant of God, and refused to walk in his law;78:11 And they forgat his doings, and his wondrous works that he had shown them.78:12 Marvellous things did he in the sight of their fathers, In the land of Egypt, in the field of Zoan.78:13 He split the sea, and caused them to pass through; And he made the waters to stand as a heap.78:14 In the day-time also he led them with a cloud, and all the night with a light of fire.78:15 He split rocks in the wilderness, and gave them drink abundantly as out of the depths.78:16 He brought streams also out of the rock, and caused waters to run down like rivers.78:17 Yet went they on still to sin against him, To rebel against the Most High in the desert.78:18 And they tempted God in their heart By asking food according to their desire.78:19 Yes, they spoke against God; They said, Can God prepare a table in the wilderness?78:20 Behold, he smote the rock, so that waters gushed out, and streams overflowed; Can he give bread also?  Will he provide flesh for his people?78:21 Therefore Yahweh heard, and was angry; And a fire was kindled against Jacob, and anger also went up against Israel;78:22 Because they believed not in God, and trusted not in his salvation.78:23 Yet he commanded the skies above, and opened the doors of heaven;78:24 And he rained down manna upon them to eat, and gave them food from heaven.78:25 Man did eat the bread of the mighty: He sent them food to the full.78:26 He caused the east wind to blow in the heavens; And by his power he guided the south wind.78:27 He rained flesh also upon them as the dust, and winged birds as the sand of the seas:78:28 And he let it fall in the midst of their camp, Round about their habitations.78:29 So they did eat, and were well filled; And he gave them their own desire.78:30 They were not estranged from that which they desired, Their food was yet in their mouths,78:31 When the anger of God went up against them, and slew of the fattest of them, and smote down the young men of Israel.78:32 For all this they sinned still, and believed not in his wondrous works.78:33 Therefore their days did he consume in vanity, and their years in terror.78:34 When he slew them, then they inquired after him; And they returned and sought God earnestly.78:35 And they remembered that God was their rock, and the Most High God their redeemer.78:36 But they flattered him with their mouth, and lied to him with their tongue.78:37 For their heart was not right with him, Neither were they faithful in his covenant.78:38 But he, being merciful, forgave their iniquity, and destroyed them not: Yes, many a time turned he his anger away, and did not stir up all his wrath.78:39 And he remembered that they were but flesh, a wind that passes away, and comes not again.78:40 How oft did they rebel against him in the wilderness, and grieve him in the desert!78:41 And they turned again and tempted God, and provoked the Holy One of Israel.78:42 They remember not his hand, Nor the day when he redeemed them from the adversary;78:43 How he set his signs in Egypt, and his wonders in the field of Zoan,78:44 And turned their rivers into blood, and their streams, so that they could not drink.78:45 He sent among them swarms of flies, which devoured them; And frogs, which destroyed them.78:46 He gave also their increase to the caterpillar, and their labor to the locust.78:47 He destroyed their vines with hail, and their sycomore-trees with frost.78:48 He gave over their cattle also to the hail, and their flocks to hot thunderbolts.78:49 He cast upon them the fierceness of his anger, Wrath, and indignation, and trouble, a band of angels of evil.78:50 He made a path for his anger; He spared not their soul from death, But gave their life over to the pestilence,78:51 And smote all the first-born in Egypt, The chief of their strength in the tents of Ham.78:52 But he led forth his own people like sheep, and guided them in the wilderness like a flock.78:53 And he led them safely, so that they feared not; But the sea overwhelmed their enemies.78:54 And he brought them to the border of his sanctuary, To this mountain, which his right hand had gotten.78:55 He drove out the nations also before them, and allotted them for an inheritance by line, and made the tribes of Israel to dwell in their tents.78:56 Yet they tempted and rebelled against the Most High God, and kept not his testimonies;78:57 But turned back, and dealt treacherously like their fathers: They were turned aside like a deceitful bow.78:58 For they provoked him to anger with their high places, and moved him to jealousy with their graven images.78:59 When God heard this, he was angry, and greatly abhorred Israel;78:60 So that he forsook the tabernacle of Shiloh, The tent which he placed among men;78:61 And delivered his strength into captivity, and his glory into the adversary's hand.78:62 He gave his people over also to the sword, and was angry with his inheritance.78:63 Fire devoured their young men; And their virgins had no marriage-song.78:64 Their priests fell by the sword; And their widows made no lamentation.78:65 Then the Lord awaked as one out of sleep, Like a mighty man that shouts by reason of wine.78:66 And he smote his adversaries backward: He put them to a perpetual reproach.78:67 Moreover he refused the tent of Joseph, and chose not the tribe of Ephraim,78:68 But chose the tribe of Judah, The mount Zion which he loved.78:69 And he built his sanctuary like the heights, Like the earth which he has established for ever.78:70 He chose David also his servant, and took him from the sheepfolds:78:71 From following the ewes that have their young he brought him, To be the shepherd of Jacob his people, and Israel his inheritance.78:72 So he was their shepherd according to the integrity of his heart, and guided them by the skilfulness of his hands.Psalm 79A Psalm of Asaph.79:1 O God, the nations are come into your inheritance; Your holy temple have they defiled; They have laid Jerusalem in heaps.79:2 The dead bodies of your servants have they given to be food to the birds of the heavens, The flesh of your saints to the beasts of the earth.79:3 Their blood have they shed like water round about Jerusalem; And there was no one to bury them.79:4 We are become a reproach to our neighbors, a scoffing and derision to them who are round about us.79:5 How long, O Yahweh?  will you be angry for ever?  Shall your jealousy burn like fire?79:6 Pour out your wrath upon the nations that know you not, and upon the kingdoms that call not upon your name.79:7 For they have devoured Jacob, and laid waste his habitation.79:8 Remember not against us the iniquities of our forefathers: Let your tender mercies speedily meet us; For we are brought very low.79:9 Help us, O God of our salvation, for the glory of your name; And deliver us, and forgive our sins, for your name's sake.79:10 Why should the nations say, Where is their God?  Let the avenging of the blood of your servants which is shed Be known among the nations in our sight.79:11 Let the sighing of the prisoner come before you: According to the greatness of your power preserve those that are appointed to death;79:12 And render to our neighbors sevenfold into their bosom Their reproach, with which they have reproached you, O Lord.79:13 So we your people and sheep of your pasture Will give you thanks for ever: We will show forth your praise to all generations.Psalm 80For the Chief Musician, set to Shoshanim Eduth..  A Psalm of Asaph.80:1 Give ear, O Shepherd of Israel, You that lead Joseph like a flock; You that sit above the cherubim, shine forth.80:2 Before Ephraim and Benjamin and Manasseh, stir up your might, and come to save us.80:3 Turn us again, O God; And cause your face to shine, and we shall be saved.80:4 O Yahweh God of hosts, how long will you be angry against the prayer of your people?80:5 You have fed them with the bread of tears, and given them tears to drink in large measure.80:6 You make us a strife to our neighbors; and our enemies laugh among themselves.80:7 Turn us again, O God of hosts; and cause your face to shine, and we shall be saved.80:8 You brought a vine out of Egypt: You drove out the nations, and planted it.80:9 You prepared room before it, and it took deep root, and filled the land.80:10 The mountains were covered with the shadow of it, and the boughs thereof were like cedars of God.80:11 It sent out its branches to the sea, and its shoots to the River.80:12 Why have you broken down its walls, So that all they that pass by the way do pluck it?80:13 The boar out of the wood ravages it, and the wild beasts of the field feed on it.80:14 Turn again, we beseech you, O God of hosts: Look down from heaven, and behold, and visit this vine,80:15 And the stock which your right hand planted, and the branch that you made strong for yourself.80:16 It is burned with fire, it is cut down: They perish at the rebuke of your countenance.80:17 Let your hand be upon the man of your right hand, Upon the son of man whom you made strong for yourself.80:18 So shall we not go back from you: Quicken us, and we will call upon your name.80:19 Turn us again, O Yahweh God of hosts; Cause your face to shine, and we shall be saved.Psalm 81For the Chief Musician; set to the Gittith.  [A Psalm] of Asaph.81:1 Sing aloud to God our strength: Make a joyful noise to the God of Jacob.81:2 Raise a song, and bring here the timbrel, The pleasant harp with the psaltery.81:3 Blow the trumpet at the new moon, at the full moon, on our feast-day.81:4 For it is a statute for Israel, an ordinance of the God of Jacob.81:5 He appointed it in Joseph for a testimony, When he went out over the land of Egypt, Where I heard a language that I knew not.81:6 I removed his shoulder from the burden: His hands were freed from the basket.81:7 You called in trouble, and I delivered you; I answered you in the secret place of thunder; I proved you at the waters of Meribah.  Selah81:8 Hear, O my people, and I will testify to you: O Israel, if you would hearken to me!81:9 There shall no strange god be among you; Neither shall you worship any foreign god.81:10 I am Yahweh your God, Who brought you up out of the land of Egypt: Open your mouth wide, and I will fill it.81:11 But my people hearkened not to my voice; And Israel would not submit to me.81:12 So I let them go after the stubbornness of their heart, That they might walk in their own counsels.81:13 Oh that my people would hearken to me, That Israel would walk in my ways!81:14 I would soon subdue their enemies, and turn my hand against their adversaries.81:15 The haters of Yahweh would cower themselves before him, and their doom would endure for ever.81:16 He would feed them also with the finest of the wheat; And with honey out of the rock would I satisfy you.Psalm 82A Psalm of Asaph.82:1 God stands in the congregation of God; He judges among the gods.82:2 How long will ye judge unjustly, and respect the persons of the wicked?  Selah 82:3 Judge the poor and fatherless: Do justice to the afflicted and destitute.82:4 Rescue the poor and needy: Deliver them out of the hand of the wicked.82:5 They know not, neither do they understand; They walk to and fro in darkness: All the foundations of the earth are shaken.82:6 I said, Ye are gods, and all of you sons of the Most High.82:7 Nevertheless ye shall die like men, and fall like one of the princes.82:8 Arise, O God, judge the earth; For you shall inherit all the nations.Psalm 83A song.  A Psalm of Asaph.83:1 O God, do not keep silence: Hold not your peace, and be not still, O God.83:2 For, lo, your enemies make a tumult; And they that hate you have lifted up the head.83:3 They take crafty counsel against your people, and consult together against your hidden ones.83:4 They have said, Come, and let us cut them off from being a nation; That the name of Israel may be no more in remembrance.83:5 For they have consulted together with one consent; Against you do they make a covenant:83:6 The tents of Edom  and the Ishmaelites;  Moab, and the Hagarenes;83:7 Gebal,  and Ammon,  and Amalek; Philistia  with the inhabitants of Tyre: 83:8 Assyria  also is joined with them; They have helped the children of Lot.  Selah83:9 Do to them as to Midian, as to Sisera, as to Jabin, at the river Kishon;83:10 Who perished at Endor, Who became as dung for the earth.83:11 Make their nobles like Oreb and Zeeb; Yes, all their princes like Zebah and Zalmunna;83:12 Who said, Let us take to ourselves in possession The habitations of God.83:13 O my God, make them like the whirling dust; As stubble before the wind.83:14 As the fire that burns the forest, and as the flame that sets the mountains on fire,83:15 So pursue them with your tempest, and terrify them with your storm.83:16 Fill their faces with confusion, That they may seek your name, O Yahweh.83:17 Let them be put to shame and dismayed for ever; Yes, let them be confounded and perish;83:18 That they may know that you alone, whose name is Yahweh, are the Most High over all the earth.Psalm 84For the Chief Musician; set to the Gittith.  A Psalm of the sons of Korah.84:1 How amiable are your tabernacles, O Yahweh of hosts!84:2 My soul longs, yes, even faints for the courts of Yahweh; My heart and my flesh cry out to the living God.84:3 Yes, the sparrow has found her a house, and the swallow a nest for herself, where she may lay her young, Even your altars, O Yahweh of hosts, My King, and my God.84:4 Blessed are they that dwell in your house: They will be still praising you.  Selah84:5 Blessed is the man whose strength is in you; In whose heart are the highways to Zion.84:6 Passing through the valley of Weeping they make it a place of springs; Yes, the early rain covers it with blessings.84:7 They go from strength to strength; Every one of them appears before God in Zion.84:8 O Yahweh God of hosts, hear my prayer; Give ear, O God of Jacob.  Selah84:9 Behold, O God our shield, and look upon the face of your anointed.84:10 For a day in your courts is better than a thousand elsewhere.  I would rather be a doorkeeper in the house of my God, Than to dwell in the tents of wickedness.84:11 For Yahweh God is a sun and a shield: Yahweh will give grace and glory; No good thing will he withhold from them that walk uprightly.84:12 O Yahweh of hosts, Blessed is the man that trusts in you.Psalm 85For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of the sons of Korah.85:1 Yahweh, you have been favorable to your land; You have brought back the captivity of Jacob.85:2 You have forgiven the iniquity of your people; You have covered all their sin.  Selah85:3 You have taken away all your wrath; You have turned yourself from the fierceness of your anger.85:4 Turn us, O God of our salvation, and cause your indignation toward us to cease.85:5 Will you be angry with us for ever?  Will you draw out your anger to all generations?85:6 Will you not quicken us again, That your people may rejoice in you?85:7 Show us your lovingkindness, O Yahweh, and grant us your salvation.85:8 I will hear what God Yahweh will speak; For he will speak peace to his people, and to his saints: But let them not turn again to folly.85:9 Surely his salvation is near them that fear him, That glory may dwell in our land.85:10 Mercy and truth are met together; Righteousness and peace have kissed each other.85:11 Truth springs out of the earth; And righteousness has looked down from heaven.85:12 Yes, Yahweh will give that which is good; And our land shall yield its increase.85:13 Righteousness shall go before him, and shall make his footsteps a way to walk in.Psalm 86A Prayer of David86:1 Bow down your ear, O Yahweh, and answer me; For I am poor and needy.86:2 Preserve my soul; for I am godly: O thou my God, save your servant that trusts in you.86:3 Be merciful to me, O Lord; For to you do I cry all the day long.86:4 Rejoice the soul of your servant; For to you, O Lord, do I lift up my soul.86:5 For you, Lord, are good, and ready to forgive, and abundant in loving-kindness to all them that call upon you.86:6 Give ear, O Yahweh, to my prayer; And hearken to the voice of my supplications.86:7 In the day of my trouble I will call upon you; For you will answer me.86:8 There is none like you among the gods, O Lord; Neither are there any works like your works.86:9 All nations whom you have made shall come and worship before you, O Lord; And they shall glorify your name.86:10 For you are great, and do wondrous things: You are God alone.86:11 Teach me your way, O Yahweh; I will walk in your truth: Unite my heart to fear your name.86:12 I will praise you, O Lord my God, with my whole heart; And I will glorify your name for evermore.86:13 For great is your lovingkindness toward me; And you have delivered my soul from the lowest Sheol.86:14 O God, the proud are risen up against me, and a company of violent men have sought after my soul, and have not set you before them.86:15 But you, O Lord, are a God merciful and gracious, Slow to anger, and abundant in lovingkindness and truth.86:16 Oh turn to me, and have mercy upon me; Give your strength to your servant, and save the son of your handmaid.86:17 Show me a token for good, That they who hate me may see it, and be put to shame, Because you, Yahweh, have helped me, and comforted me.Psalm 87A Psalm of the sons of Korah; a Song.87:1 His foundation is in the holy mountains.87:2 Yahweh loves the gates of Zion More than all the dwellings of Jacob.87:3 Glorious things are spoken of you, O city of God.  Selah87:4 I will make mention of Rahab and Babylon as among them that know me: Behold, Philistia, and Tyre, with Ethiopia: This one was born there.87:5 Yes, of Zion it shall be said, This one and that one was born in her; And the Most High himself will establish her.87:6 Yahweh will count, when he writes up the peoples, This one was born there.  Selah87:7 They that sing as well as they that dance shall say, all my fountains are in you.Psalm 88A Song, a Psalm of the sons of Korah; for the Chief Musician; set to Mahalath Leannoth.  Maschil of Heman the Ezrahite.88:1 O Yahweh, the God of my salvation, I have cried day and night before you.88:2 Let my prayer enter into your presence; Incline your ear to my cry.88:3 For my soul is full of troubles, and my life draws near to Sheol.88:4 I am reckoned with them that go down into the pit; I am as a man that has no help,88:5 Cast off among the dead, Like the slain that lie in the grave, Whom you remember no more, and they are cut off from your hand.88:6 You have laid me in the lowest pit, In dark places, in the deeps.88:7 Your wrath lies hard upon me, and you have afflicted me with all your waves.  Selah88:8 You have put my acquaintances far from me; You have made me an abomination to them: I am shut up, and I cannot come forth.88:9 My eye wastes away by reason of affliction: I have called daily upon you, O Yahweh; I have spread forth my hands to you.88:10 Will you show wonders to the dead?  Shall they that are deceased arise and praise you?  Selah88:11 Shall your lovingkindness be declared in the grave?  Or your faithfulness in Destruction?88:12 Shall your wonders be known in the dark?  And your righteousness in the land of forgetfulness?88:13 But to you, O Yahweh, have I cried; And in the morning shall my prayer come before you.88:14 Yahweh, why do you cast off my soul?  Why do you hide your face from me?88:15 I am afflicted and ready to die from my youth up: While I suffer your terrors I am distracted.88:16 Your fierce wrath is gone over me; Your terrors have cut me off.88:17 They came round about me like water all the day long; They compassed me about together.88:18 Lover and friend have you put far from me, and my acquaintance into darkness.Psalm 89Maschil of Ethan the Ezrahite.89:1 I will sing of the lovingkindness of Yahweh for ever: With my mouth will I make known your faithfulness to all generations.89:2 For I have said, Mercy shall be built up for ever; Your faithfulness will you establish in the very heavens.89:3 I have made a covenant with my chosen, I have sworn to David my servant:89:4 Your seed will I establish for ever, and build up your throne to all generations.  Selah89:5 And the heavens shall praise your wonders, O Yahweh; Your faithfulness also in the assembly of the holy ones.89:6 For who in the skies can be compared to Yahweh?  Who among the sons of the mighty is like Yahweh,89:7 A God very terrible in the council of the holy ones, and to be feared above all them that are round about him?89:8 O Yahweh God of hosts, Who is a mighty one, like unto you, O Yahweh?  And your faithfulness is round about you.89:9 You rule the pride of the sea: When the waves thereof arise, you still them.89:10 You have broken Rahab in pieces, as one that is slain; You have scattered your enemies with the arm of your strength.89:11 The heavens are yours, the earth also is yours: The world and the fulness thereof, you have founded them.89:12 The north and the south, you have created them: Tabor and Hermon rejoice in your name.89:13 You have a mighty arm; Strong is your hand, and high is your right hand.89:14 Righteousness and justice are the foundation of your throne: Lovingkindness and truth go before your face.89:15 Blessed is the people that know the joyful sound: They walk, O Yahweh, in the light of your countenance.89:16 In your name do they rejoice all the day; And in your righteousness are they exalted.89:17 For you are the glory of their strength; And in your favor our horn shall be exalted.89:18 For our shield belongs to Yahweh; And our king to the Holy One of Israel.89:19 Then you spoke in vision to your saints, and said, I have laid help upon one that is mighty; I have exalted one chosen out of the people.89:20 I have found David my servant; With my holy oil have I anointed him:89:21 With whom my hand shall be established; Mine arm also shall strengthen him.89:22 The enemy shall not exact from him, Nor the son of wickedness afflict him.89:23 And I will beat down his adversaries before him, and smite them that hate him.89:24 But my faithfulness and my lovingkindness shall be with him; And in my name shall his horn be exalted.89:25 I will set his hand also on the sea, and his right hand on the rivers.89:26 He shall cry to me, You are my Father, My God, and the rock of my salvation.89:27 I also will make him my first-born, The highest of the kings of the earth.89:28 My lovingkindness will I keep for him for evermore; And my covenant shall stand fast with him.89:29 His seed also will I make to endure for ever, and his throne as the days of heaven.89:30 If his children forsake my law, and walk not in my ordinances;89:31 If they break my statutes, and keep not my commandments;89:32 Then will I visit their transgression with the rod, and their iniquity with stripes.89:33 But my lovingkindness will I not utterly take from him, Nor allow my faithfulness to fail.89:34 My covenant will I not break, Nor alter the thing that is gone out of my lips.89:35  Once have I sworn by my holiness: I will not lie to David:89:36 His seed shall endure for ever, and his throne as the sun before me.89:37  It shall be established for ever as the moon, and as the faithful witness in the sky.  Selah89:38 But you have cast off and rejected, You have been angry with your anointed.89:39 You have abhorred the covenant of your servant: You have profaned his crown to the ground.89:40 You have broken down all his hedges; You have brought his strongholds to ruin.89:41 All that pass by the way rob him: He is become a reproach to his neighbors.89:42 You have exalted the right hand of his adversaries; You have made all his enemies to rejoice.89:43 Yes, you turn back the edge of his sword, and have not made him to stand in the battle.89:44 You have made his brightness to cease, and cast his throne down to the ground.89:45 The days of his youth have you shortened: You have covered him with shame.  Selah89:46 How long, O Yahweh?  will you hide yourself for ever?  How long shall your wrath burn like fire?89:47 Oh remember how short my time is: For what vanity have you created all the children of men!89:48 What man is he that shall live and not see death, That shall deliver his soul from the power of Sheol?  Selah89:49 Lord, where are your former lovingkindnesses, Which you swore to David in your faithfulness?89:50 Remember, Lord, the reproach of your servants; How I do bear in my bosom the reproach of all the mighty peoples,89:51 With which your enemies have reproached, O Yahweh, With which they have reproached the footsteps of your anointed.89:52 Blessed be Yahweh for evermore.  Amen, and Amen.BOOK IVPsalm 90A Prayer of Moses the man of God.90:1 Lord, you have been our dwelling-place In all generations.90:2 Before the mountains were brought forth, Or ever you had formed the earth and the world, even from everlasting to everlasting, you are God.90:3 You turn man to dust, and say, Return, ye children of Adam.90:4 For a thousand years in your sight are as but the day just gone past, and as a watch in the night.90:5 You carry them away as by a flood; they are like a dream: In the morning they are like grass which springs up-- 90:6 In the morning it flourishes and grows up, in the evening it fades and withers away.90:7 For we are destroyed by your anger, and by your wrath we are troubled.90:8 You have set our iniquities before you, our secret sins in the light of your presence.90:9 For all our days are passed away under your wrath: We finish our years as a sigh.90:10 The days of our years are seventy, or even by reason of strength eighty years; yet the best of them are but labor and sorrow.  For soon they are gone, and we fly away.90:11 Who knows the power of your anger, and your wrath according to the fear that is due you?90:12 So teach us to number our days,  that we may get us a heart of wisdom.90:13 Return, O Yahweh!  How long?  And may you feel sorry about your servants.90:14 Oh satisfy us in the morning with your lovingkindness, That we may rejoice and be glad all our days.90:15 Make us glad as many days as in which you have afflicted us, and as many years as in which we have seen evil.90:16 Let your work appear to your servants, and your glory show upon their children.90:17 And let the favor of the Lord our God be upon us; And establish the work of our hands upon us; Yes, the work of our hands, establish it.Psalm 9191:1 He that dwells in the secret place of the Most High shall abide under the shadow of the Almighty.91:2 I will say of Yahweh, He is my refuge and my fortress; My God, in whom I trust.91:3 For he will deliver you from the snare of the fowler, and from the deadly pestilence.91:4 He will cover you with his pinions, and under his wings shall you take refuge: His truth is a shield and a buckler.91:5 You shall not be afraid for the terror by night, nor for the arrow that flies by day;91:6 for the pestilence that walks in darkness, nor for the destruction that wastes at noonday.91:7 A thousand shall fall at your side, and ten thousand at your right hand; But it shall not come near to you.91:8 Only with your eyes shall you behold, and see the reward of the wicked.91:9 For you, O Yahweh, are my refuge! You have made the Most High your habitation;91:10 There shall no evil befall you, neither shall any plague come near your tent.91:11 For he shall give his angels charge over you, to keep you in all your ways.91:12 They shall bear you up in their hands, lest you dash your foot against a stone.91:13 You shall tread upon the lion and adder: The young lion and the serpent shall you trample underfoot.91:14 Because he has set his love upon me, therefore will I deliver him: I will set him on high, because he has known my name.91:15 He shall call upon me, and I will answer him; I will be with him in trouble: I will deliver him, and honor him.91:16 With long life will I satisfy him, and show him my salvation.Psalm 92A Psalm, a Song for the sabbath day.92:1 It is a good thing to give thanks to Yahweh, and to sing praises to your name, O Most High;92:2 To show forth your lovingkindness in the morning, and your faithfulness every night,92:3 With an instrument of ten strings, and with the psaltery; With a solemn sound upon the harp.92:4 For you, Yahweh, have made me glad through your work: I will triumph in the works of your hands.92:5 How great are your works, O Yahweh! Your thoughts are very deep.92:6 A brutish man knows not; Neither does a fool understand this:92:7 When the wicked spring as the grass, and when all the workers of iniquity do flourish; It is that they shall be destroyed for ever.92:8 But you, O Yahweh, are on high for evermore.92:9 For, lo, your enemies, O Yahweh, For, lo, your enemies shall perish; All the workers of iniquity shall be scattered.92:10 But my horn have you exalted like the horn of the wild-ox: I am anointed with fresh oil.92:11 My eye also has seen my desire on my enemies, My ears have heard my desire for the evil-doers that rise up against me.92:12 The righteous shall flourish like the palm-tree: He shall grow like a cedar in Lebanon.92:13 They are planted in the house of Yahweh; They shall flourish in the courts of our God.92:14 They shall still bring forth fruit in old age; They shall be full of sap and green:92:15 To show that Yahweh is upright; He is my rock, and there is no unrighteousness in him.Psalm 9393:1 Yahweh reigns; he is clothed with majesty; Yahweh is clothed with strength; he has girded himself with it: The world also is established, such that it cannot be moved.93:2 Your throne is established of old: You are from everlasting.93:3 The floods have lifted up, O Yahweh, The floods have lifted up their voice; The floods lift up their waves.93:4 Above the voices of many waters, the mighty breakers of the sea, Yahweh on high is mighty.93:5 Your testimonies are very sure: Holiness becomes your house, O Yahweh, for ever more.Psalm 9494:1 O Yahweh, you God to whom vengeance belongs, You God to whom vengeance belongs, shine forth.94:2 Lift up yourself, you judge of the earth: Render to the proud their desert.94:3 Yahweh, how long shall the wicked, How long shall the wicked triumph?94:4 They prate, they speak arrogantly: All the workers of iniquity boast themselves.94:5 They break in pieces your people, O Yahweh, and afflict your heritage.94:6 They slay the widow and the sojourner, and murder the fatherless.94:7 And they say, Yahweh will not see, Neither will the God of Jacob consider.94:8 Consider, ye brutish among the people.  And ye fools, when will ye be wise?94:9 He that planted the ear, shall he not hear?  He that formed the eye, shall he not see?94:10 He that chastises the nations, shall not he correct, Even he that teaches man knowledge?94:11 Yahweh knows the thoughts of man, That they are vanity.94:12 Blessed is the man whom you chasten, O Yahweh, and teach out of your law;94:13 That you may give him rest from the days of adversity, until the pit be dug for the wicked.94:14 For Yahweh will not cast off his people, Neither will he forsake his inheritance.94:15 For judgment shall return to righteousness; And all the upright in heart shall follow it.94:16 Who will rise up for me against the evil-doers?  Who will stand up for me against the workers of iniquity?94:17 Unless Yahweh had been my help, my soul had soon dwelt in silence.94:18 When I said, My foot slips; your lovingkindness, O Yahweh, held me up.94:19 In the multitude of my thoughts within me your comforts delight my soul.94:20 Shall the throne of wickedness have fellowship with you, which frames mischief by statute?94:21 They gather themselves together against the soul of the righteous, and condemn the innocent blood.94:22 But Yahweh has been my high tower, and my God the rock of my refuge.94:23 And he has brought upon them their own iniquity, and will cut them off in their own wickedness; Yahweh our God will cut them off.Psalm 9595:1 Oh come, let us sing to Yahweh; Let us make a joyful noise to the rock of our salvation.95:2 Let us come before his presence with thanksgiving; Let us make a joyful noise to him with psalms.95:3 For Yahweh is a great God, and a great King above all gods.95:4 In his hand are the deep places of the earth; The heights of the mountains are his as well.95:5 The sea is his, and he made it; And his hands formed the dry land.95:6 Come, let us worship and bow down; Let us kneel before Yahweh who is our Maker:95:7 For he is our God, and we are the people of his pasture, and the sheep of his hand.  Today, oh that ye would hear his voice!95:8 Harden not your heart, as at Meribah, as in the day of Massah in the wilderness;95:9 When your fathers tempted me, Proved me, and saw my work.95:10 Forty years long was I grieved with that generation, and said, It is a people that do err in their heart, and they have not known my ways:95:11 Wherefore I swore in my wrath, That they should not enter into my rest.Psalm 9696:1 Oh sing to Yahweh a new song: Sing to Yahweh, all the earth.96:2 Sing to Yahweh, bless his name; Show forth his salvation from day to day.96:3 Declare his glory among the nations, His marvellous works among all the peoples.96:4 For great is Yahweh, and greatly to be praised: He is to be feared above all gods.96:5 For all the gods of the peoples are idols; But Yahweh made the heavens.96:6 Honor and majesty are before him: Strength and beauty are in his sanctuary.96:7 Ascribe to Yahweh, ye kindreds of the peoples, ascribe to Yahweh glory and strength.96:8 Ascribe to Yahweh the glory due his name: Bring an offering, and come into his courts.96:9 Oh worship Yahweh in holy array: Tremble before him, all the earth.96:10 Say among the nations, Yahweh reigns: The world also is established that it cannot be moved: He will judge the peoples with equity.96:11 Let the heavens be glad, and let the earth rejoice; Let the sea roar, and the fulness thereof;96:12 Let the field exult, and all that is therein; Then shall all the trees of the wood sing for joy96:13 Before Yahweh; for he comes, For he comes to judge the earth: He will judge the world with righteousness, and the peoples with his truth.Psalm 9797:1 Yahweh reigns; let the earth rejoice; Let the multitude of isles be glad.97:2 Clouds and darkness are round about him: Righteousness and justice are the foundation of his throne.97:3 A fire goes before him, and burns up his adversaries round about.97:4 His lightnings lightened the world: The earth saw, and trembled.97:5 The mountains melted like wax at the presence of Yahweh, at the presence of the Lord of the whole earth.97:6 The heavens declare his righteousness, and all the peoples have seen his glory.97:7 Let all those be put to shame who serve graven images, That boast themselves of idols: Worship him, all ye gods.97:8 Zion heard and was glad, and the daughters of Judah rejoiced, Because of your judgments, O Yahweh.97:9 For you, Yahweh, are most high above all the earth: You are exalted far above all gods.97:10 O ye that love Yahweh, hate evil: He preserves the souls of his saints; He delivers them out of the hand of the wicked.97:11 Light is sown for the righteous, and gladness for the upright in heart.97:12 Be glad in Yahweh, ye righteous; And give thanks to his holy memorial name.Psalm 98A Psalm.98:1 Oh sing to Yahweh a new song; For he has done marvellous things: His right hand, and his holy arm, have wrought salvation for him.98:2 Yahweh has made known his salvation: His righteousness has he openly shown in the sight of the nations.98:3 He has remembered his lovingkindness and his faithfulness toward the house of Israel: All the ends of the earth have seen the salvation of our God.98:4 Make a joyful noise to Yahweh, all the earth: Break forth and sing for joy, yes, sing praises.98:5 Sing praises to Yahweh with the harp; With the harp and the voice of melody.98:6 With trumpets and sound of cornet Make a joyful noise before the King, Yahweh.98:7 Let the sea roar, and the fulness thereof; The world, and they that dwell therein;98:8 Let the floods clap their hands; Let the hills sing for joy together98:9 Before Yahweh; for he comes to judge the earth: He will judge the world with righteousness, and the peoples with equity.Psalm 9999:1 Yahweh reigns; let the peoples tremble: He sits above the cherubim; let the earth be moved.99:2 Yahweh is great in Zion; And he is high above all the peoples.99:3 Let them praise your great and terrible name: Holy is he.99:4 The king's strength also loves justice; You do establish equity; You execute justice and righteousness in Jacob.99:5 Exalt ye Yahweh our God, and worship at his footstool: Holy is he.99:6 Moses and Aaron among his priests, and Samuel among them that call upon his name; They called upon Yahweh, and he answered them.99:7 He spoke to them in the pillar of cloud: They kept his testimonies, and the statute that he gave them.99:8 You answered them, O Yahweh our God: You were a God that forgave them, Though you took vengeance of their doings.99:9 Exalt ye Yahweh our God, and worship at his holy hill; For Yahweh our God is holy.Psalm 100A Psalm of thanksgiving.100:1 Make a joyful noise to Yahweh, all ye lands.100:2 Serve Yahweh with gladness: Come before his presence with singing.100:3 Know ye that Yahweh, he is God: It is he that has made us, and we are his; We are his people, and the sheep of his pasture.100:4 Enter into his gates with thanksgiving, and into his courts with praise: Give thanks to him, and bless his name.100:5 For Yahweh is good; his lovingkindness endures for ever, and his faithfulness to all generations.Psalm 101A Psalm of David.101:1 I will sing of lovingkindness and justice: To you, O Yahweh, will I sing praises.101:2 I will behave myself wisely in a perfect way: Oh when will you come to me?  I will walk within my house with a perfect heart.101:3 I will set no base thing before my eyes: I hate the work of them that turn aside; It shall not cleave to me.101:4 A perverse heart shall depart from me: I will know no evil thing.101:5 Whoso privately slanders his neighbor, him will I destroy: Him that has a high look and a proud heart will I not endure.101:6 Mine eyes shall be upon the faithful of the land, that they may dwell with me: He that walks in a perfect way, he shall minister to me.101:7 He that works deceit shall not dwell within my house: He that speaks falsehood shall not be established before my eyes.101:8 Morning by morning will I destroy all the wicked of the land; To cut off all the workers of iniquity from the city of Yahweh.Psalm 102A Prayer of the afflicted, when he is overwhelmed, and pours out his complaint before Yahweh.102:1 Hear my prayer, O Yahweh, and let my cry come to you.102:2 Hide not your face from me in the day of my distress: Incline your ear to me; In the day when I call, answer me speedily.102:3 For my days consume away like smoke, and my bones are burned as a firebrand.102:4 My heart is smitten like grass, and withered; For I forget to eat my bread.102:5 By reason of the voice of my groaning My bones cleave to my flesh.102:6 I am like a pelican of the wilderness; I am become as an owl of the waste places.102:7 I watch, and am become like a sparrow that is alone upon the house-top.102:8 My enemies reproach me all the day; They that are mad against me do curse by me.102:9 For I have eaten ashes like bread, and mingled my drink with weeping,102:10 Because of your indignation and your wrath: For you have taken me up, and cast me away.102:11 My days are like a shadow that is declining; And I am withered like grass.102:12 But you, O Yahweh, will abide for ever; And your memorial name to all generations.102:13 You will arise, and have mercy upon Zion; For it is time to have pity upon her, Yes, the set time is come.102:14 For your servants take pleasure in her stones, and have pity upon her dust.102:15 So the nations shall fear the name of Yahweh, and all the kings of the earth your glory.102:16 For Yahweh has built up Zion; He has appeared in his glory.102:17 He has regarded the prayer of the destitute, and has not despised their prayer.102:18 This shall be written for the generation to come; And a people which shall be created shall praise Yahweh.102:19 For he has looked down from the height of his sanctuary; From heaven did Yahweh behold the earth;102:20 To hear the sighing of the prisoner; To set free those that are appointed to death;102:21 That men may declare the name of Yahweh in Zion, and his praise in Jerusalem;102:22 When the peoples are gathered together, and the kingdoms, to serve Yahweh.102:23 He weakened my strength in the way; He shortened my days.102:24 I said, O my God, take me not away in the midst of my days: Your years are throughout all generations.102:25 Of old did you lay the foundation of the earth; And the heavens are the work of your hands.102:26 They shall perish, but you shall endure; Yes, all of them shall grow old like a garment; As a vesture shall you change them, and they shall be changed:102:27 But you are the same, and your years shall have no end.102:28 The children of your servants shall continue, and their seed shall be established before you.Psalm 103[A Psalm] of David.103:1 Bless Yahweh, O my soul; And all that is within me, bless his holy name.103:2 Bless Yahweh, O my soul, and forget not all his benefits:103:3 Who forgives all your iniquities; Who heals all your diseases;103:4 Who redeems your life from destruction; Who crowns you with lovingkindness and tender mercies;103:5 Who satisfies your desire with good things, So that your youth is renewed like the eagle.103:6 Yahweh executes righteous acts, and judgments for all that are oppressed.103:7 He made known his ways to Moses, His doings to the children of Israel.103:8 Yahweh is merciful and gracious, Slow to anger, and abundant in lovingkindness.103:9 He will not always chide; Neither will he keep his anger for ever.103:10 He has not dealt with us according to our sins, Nor rewarded us according to our iniquities.103:11 For as the heavens are high above the earth, So great is his lovingkindness toward them that fear him.103:12 As far as the east is from the west, So far has he removed our transgressions from us.103:13 Like as a father pities his children, So Yahweh pities them that fear him.103:14 For he knows our frame; He remembers that we are dust.103:15 As for man, his days are as grass; As a flower of the field, so he flourishes.103:16 For the wind passes over it, and it is gone; And the place thereof shall know it no more.103:17 But the lovingkindness of Yahweh is from everlasting to everlasting upon them that fear him, and his righteousness to children's children;103:18 To such as keep his covenant, and to those that remember his precepts to do them.103:19 Yahweh has established his throne in the heavens; And his kingdom rules over all.103:20 Bless Yahweh, ye his angels, That are mighty in strength, that fulfil his word, Hearkening to the voice of his word.103:21 Bless Yahweh, all ye his hosts, You ministers of his, that do his pleasure.103:22 Bless Yahweh, all ye his works, In all places of his dominion: Bless Yahweh, O my soul.Psalm 104104:1 Bless Yahweh, O my soul.  O Yahweh my God, you are very great; You are clothed with honor and majesty:104:2 Who cover yourself with light as with a garment; Who stretch out the heavens like a curtain;104:3 Who lays the beams of his chambers in the waters; Who makes the clouds his chariot; Who walks upon the wings of the wind;104:4 Who makes winds his messengers; Flames of fire his ministers;104:5  Who laid the foundations of the earth, that it should not be moved for ever.104:6 You covered it with the deep as with a vesture; The waters stood above the mountains.104:7 At your rebuke they fled; At the voice of your thunder they hastened away104:8  (The mountains rose, the valleys sank down) To the place which you had founded for them.104:9 You have set a bound that they may not pass over; That they turn not again to cover the earth.104:10 He sends forth springs into the valleys; They run among the mountains;104:11 They give drink to every beast of the field; The wild asses quench their thirst.104:12 By them the birds of the heavens have their habitation; They sing among the branches.104:13 He waters the mountains from his chambers: The earth is filled with the fruit of your works.104:14 He causes the grass to grow for the cattle, and herb for the service of man; That he may bring forth food out of the earth,104:15 And wine that makes glad the heart of man, and oil to make his face to shine, and bread that strengthens man's heart.104:16 The trees of Yahweh are filled with moisture, The cedars of Lebanon, which he has planted;104:17 Where the birds make their nests: As for the stork, the fir trees are her house.104:18 The high mountains are for the wild goats; The rocks are a refuge for the badger.104:19 He appointed the moon for seasons: The sun knows his going down.104:20 You make darkness, and it is night, during which all the beasts of the forest creep forth.104:21 The young lions roar after their prey, and seek their food from God.104:22 The sun arises, they get them away, and lay themselves down in their dens.104:23 Man goes forth to his work And to his labor until the evening.104:24 O Yahweh, how manifold are your works! In wisdom have you made them all: The earth is full of your riches.104:25 Yonder is the sea, great and wide, in which are things creeping innumerable, both small and great beasts.104:26 There go the ships; There is leviathan, whom you have formed to play therein.104:27 These wait all for you, That you may give them their food in due season.104:28 You give to them, they gather; You open your hand, they are satisfied with good.104:29 You hide your face, they are troubled; You take away their breath, they die, and return to their dust.104:30 You send forth your Spirit, they are created; And you renew the face of the ground.104:31 Let the glory of Yahweh endure for ever; Let Yahweh rejoice in his works:104:32 Who looks on the earth, and it trembles; He touches the mountains, and they smoke.104:33 I will sing to Yahweh as long as I live: I will sing praise to my God while I have any being.104:34 Let your meditation be sweet to him: I will rejoice in Yahweh.104:35 Let sinners be consumed out of the earth.  And let the wicked be no more.  Bless Yahweh, O my soul.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 105 105:1 Oh give thanks to Yahweh, call upon his name; Make known among the peoples his doings.105:2 Sing to him, sing praises to him; Talk ye of all his marvelous works.105:3 Glory ye in his holy name: Let the heart of them rejoice that seek Yahweh.105:4 Seek ye Yahweh and his strength; Seek his face evermore.105:5 Remember his marvellous works that he has done, His wonders, and the judgments of his mouth,105:6 O ye seed of Abraham his servant, Ye children of Jacob, his chosen ones.105:7 He is Yahweh our God: His judgments are in all the earth.105:8 He has remembered his covenant for ever, The word which he commanded to a thousand generations,105:9 The covenant which he made with Abraham, and his oath to Isaac,105:10 And confirmed the same to Jacob for a statute, To Israel for an everlasting covenant,105:11 Saying, To you will I give the land of Canaan, The lot of your inheritance;105:12 When they were but a few men in number, Yes, very few, and sojourners in it.105:13 And they went about from nation to nation, From one kingdom to another people.105:14 He allowed no man to do them wrong; Yes, he reproved kings for their sakes,105:15 Saying, Touch not my anointed ones, and do my prophets no harm.105:16 And he called for a famine upon the land; He broke the whole staff of bread.105:17 He sent a man before them; Joseph was sold for a servant:105:18 His feet they hurt with fetters: He was laid in chains of iron,105:19 Until the time that his word came to pass, The word of Yahweh tried him.105:20 The king sent and released him; Even the ruler of peoples, and let him go free.105:21 He made him lord of his house, and ruler of all his substance;105:22 To bind his princes at his pleasure, and teach his elders wisdom.105:23 Israel also came into Egypt; And Jacob sojourned in the land of Ham.105:24 And he increased his people greatly, and made them stronger than their adversaries.105:25 He turned their heart to hate his people, To deal subtly with his servants.105:26 He sent Moses his servant, and Aaron whom he had chosen.105:27 They set among them his signs, and wonders in the land of Ham.105:28 He sent darkness, and made it dark; And they rebelled not against his words.105:29 He turned their waters into blood, and slew their fish.105:30 Their land swarmed with frogs In the chambers of their kings.105:31 He spoke, and there came swarms of flies, and lice in all their borders.105:32 He gave them hail for rain, and flaming fire in their land.105:33 He struck their vines also and their fig-trees, and broke the trees of their borders.105:34 He spoke, and the locust came, and the grasshopper, and that without number,105:35 And did eat up every herb in their land, and did eat up the fruit of their ground.105:36 He struck also all the first-born in their land, The chief of all their strength.105:37 And he brought them forth with silver and gold; And there was not one feeble person among his tribes.105:38 Egypt was glad when they departed; For the fear of them had fallen upon them.105:39 He spread a cloud for a covering, and fire to give light in the night.105:40 They asked, and he brought quails, and satisfied them with the bread of heaven.105:41 He opened the rock, and waters gushed out; They ran in the dry places like a river.105:42 For he remembered his holy word, and Abraham his servant.105:43 And he brought forth his people with joy, his chosen with singing.105:44 And he gave them the lands of the nations; And they took the labor of the peoples in possession:105:45 That they might keep his statutes, and observe his laws.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 106106:1  Praise ye Yahweh.  Oh give thanks to Yahweh; for he is good; For his lovingkindness endures forever.106:2 Who can utter the mighty acts of Yahweh, Or show forth all his praise?106:3 Blessed are they that keep justice, and he that does righteousness at all times.106:4 Remember me, O Yahweh, with the favor that you bear to your people; Oh visit me with your salvation,106:5 That I may see the prosperity of your chosen, That I may rejoice in the gladness of your nation, That I may glory with your inheritance.106:6 We have sinned along with our fathers, We have committed iniquity, we have done wickedly.106:7 Our fathers understood not your wonders in Egypt; They remembered not the multitude of your lovingkindnesses, But were rebellious at the sea, even at the Red Sea.106:8 Nevertheless he saved them for his name's sake, That he might make his mighty power to be known.106:9 He rebuked the Red Sea also, and it was dried up: So he led them through the depths, as through a wilderness.106:10 And he saved them from the hand of him that hated them, and redeemed them from the hand of the enemy.106:11 And the waters covered their adversaries; There was not one of them left.106:12 Then believed they his words; They sang his praise.106:13 They soon forgot his works; They waited not for his counsel,106:14 But lusted exceedingly in the wilderness, and tempted God in the desert.106:15 And he gave them their request, But sent leanness into their soul.106:16 They envied Moses also in the camp, and Aaron the saint of Yahweh.106:17 The earth opened and swallowed up Dathan, and covered the company of Abiram.106:18 And a fire was kindled in their company; The flame burned up the wicked.106:19 They made a calf in Horeb, and worshipped a molten image.106:20 Thus they exchanged their glory For the likeness of an ox that eats grass.106:21 They forgot God their Saviour, Who had done great things in Egypt,106:22 Wondrous works in the land of Ham, and terrible things by the Red Sea.106:23 Therefore he said that he would destroy them, Had not Moses his chosen stood before him in the breach, To turn away his wrath, lest he should destroy them.106:24 Yes, they despised the pleasant land, They believed not his word,106:25 But murmured in their tents, and hearkened not to the voice of Yahweh.106:26 Therefore he swore to them, That he would overthrow them in the wilderness,106:27 And that he would overthrow their seed among the nations, and scatter them in the lands.106:28 They joined themselves also to Baal-peor, and ate the sacrifices of the dead.106:29 Thus they provoked him to anger with their doings; And the plague broke in upon them.106:30 Then stood up Phinehas, and executed judgment; And so the plague was stayed.106:31 And that was reckoned to him for righteousness, To all generations for evermore.106:32 They angered him also at the waters of Meribah, So that it went ill with Moses on their account;106:33 Because they were rebellious against his spirit, and he spoke unadvisedly with his lips.106:34 They did not destroy the peoples, as Yahweh commanded them,106:35 But mingled themselves with the nations, and learned their works,106:36 And served their idols, Which became a snare to them.106:37 Yes, they sacrificed their sons and their daughters to demons,106:38 And shed innocent blood, Even the blood of their sons and of their daughters, Whom they sacrificed to the idols of Canaan; And the land was polluted with blood.106:39 Thus were they defiled with their works, and played the harlot in their doings.106:40 Therefore was the wrath of Yahweh kindled against his people, and he abhorred his inheritance.106:41 And he gave them into the hand of the nations; And they that hated them ruled over them.106:42 Their enemies also oppressed them, and they were brought into subjection under their hand.106:43 Many times did he deliver them; But they were rebellious in their counsel, and were brought low in their iniquity.106:44 Nevertheless he regarded their distress, When he heard their cry:106:45 And he remembered for them his covenant, and repented according to the multitude of his lovingkindnesses.106:46 He made them also to be pitied By all those that carried them captive.106:47 Save us, O Yahweh our God, and gather us from among the nations, To give thanks to your holy name, and to triumph in your praise.106:48 Blessed be Yahweh, the God of Israel, From everlasting even to everlasting.  And let all the people say, amen.  Praise ye Yahweh.BOOK VPsalm 107 107:1 O give thanks to Yahweh; for he is good; for his lovingkindness endures for ever.107:2 Let the redeemed of Yahweh say so, whom he has redeemed from the hand of the adversary,107:3 And gathered out of the lands, from the east and from the west, from the north and from the south.107:4 Some wandered in the wilderness in a desert way; they found no city of habitation.107:5 Hungry and thirsty, their soul fainted in them.107:6 Then they cried to Yahweh in their trouble, and he delivered them out of their distresses,107:7 He led them also by a straight way, that they might go to a city of habitation.107:8 Oh that men would praise Yahweh for his lovingkindness, and for his wonderful works to the children of men!107:9 For he satisfies the longing soul, and the hungry soul he fills with good.107:10 Some sat in darkness and in the shadow of death, being bound in affliction and iron,107:11 because they rebelled against the words of God, and spurned the counsel of the Most High:107:12 Therefore he brought down their heart with labor; they fell down, and there was no one to help.107:13 Then they cried to Yahweh in their trouble, and he saved them out of their distresses.107:14 He brought them out of darkness and the shadow of death, and broke their bonds asunder.107:15 Oh that men would praise Yahweh for his lovingkindness, and for his wonderful works to the children of men!107:16 For he has broken the gates of brass, and cut the bars of iron asunder.107:17 Some were fools because of their transgression, and because of their iniquities, they are afflicted.107:18 Their soul abhors any kind of food; and they draw near to the gates of death.107:19 Then they cry to Yahweh in their trouble, and he saves them out of their distresses.107:20 He sends his word, and heals them, and delivers them from their traps.107:21 Oh that men would praise Yahweh for his lovingkindness, and for his wonderful works to the children of men!107:22 And let them offer the sacrifices of thanksgiving, and declare his works with singing.107:23 Some, who go down to the sea in ships, who do business in great waters,107:24 These see the works of Yahweh, and his wonders in the deep.107:25 For he commands, and raises the stormy wind, which lifts up the waves of it.107:26 They mount up to the sky, they go back down to the depths: and their soul melts away from the trouble.107:27 They reel to and fro, and stagger like a drunken man, and are at their wits' end.107:28 Then they cry to Yahweh in their trouble, and he brings them out of their distresses.107:29 He makes the storm a calm, so that the waves of it are still.107:30 Then are they glad because they are quiet; so he brings them to their desired haven.107:31 Oh that men would praise Yahweh for his lovingkindness, and for his wonderful works to the children of men!107:32 Let them exalt him also in the assembly of the people, and praise him in the seat of the elders.107:33 He turns rivers into a wilderness, and watersprings into a thirsty ground;107:34 A fruitful land into a salt desert, because of the wickedness of those who dwell in it.107:35 He turns a wilderness into a pool of water, and a dry land into watersprings.107:36 And there he causes the hungry to dwell, that they may prepare a city of habitation,107:37 and sow fields, and plant vineyards, and get them fruits of increase.107:38 He blesses them also, so that they are multiplied greatly; and does not allow their cattle to decrease.107:39 Again, some are diminished and bowed down, through oppression, trouble, and sorrow.107:40 He pours contempt upon princes, and causes them to wander in the waste, where there is no way.107:41 Yet sets he the needy on high from affliction, and makes for him families like a flock.107:42 The upright shall see it, and be glad; and all iniquity shall shut her mouth.107:43 Whoso is wise will give heed to these things; and they will consider the lovingkindnesses of Yahweh.Psalm 108A Song, a Psalm of David.108:1 My heart is fixed, O God; I will sing, yes, I will sing praises, even with my glory.108:2 Awake, psaltery and harp: I myself will awake right early.108:3 I will give thanks to you, O Yahweh, among the peoples; And I will sing praises to you among the nations.108:4 For your lovingkindness is great above the heavens; And your truth reaches to the skies.108:5 Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens, and your glory above all the earth.108:6 That your beloved may be delivered, Save with your right hand, and answer us.108:7 God has spoken in his holiness: I will exult; I will divide Shechem, and portion out the valley of Succoth.108:8 Gilead is mine; Manasseh is mine; Ephraim also is the defense of my head; Judah is my sceptre.108:9 Moab is my washpot; Upon Edom will I cast my shoe; Over Philistia will I shout.108:10 Who will bring me into the fortified city?  Who has led me to Edom?108:11  Have you not cast us off, O God?  And you do not go forth, O God, with our hosts.108:12 Give us help against the adversary; For vain is the help of man.108:13 Through God we shall do valiantly: For he it is that will tread down our adversaries.Psalm 109For the Chief Musicion.  A Psalm of David.109:1 Hold not your peace, O God of my praise;109:2 For the mouth of the wicked and the mouth of deceit have they opened against me: They have spoken to me with a lying tongue.109:3 They have compassed me about also with words of hatred, and fought against me without a cause.109:4 For my love they are my adversaries: But I give myself to prayer.109:5 And they have rewarded me evil for good, and hatred for my love.109:6 Set a wicked man over him; And let an adversary stand at his right hand.109:7 When he is judged, let him come forth guilty; And let his prayer be turned into sin.109:8 Let his days be few; And let another take his office.109:9 Let his children be fatherless, and his wife a widow.109:10 Let his children be vagabonds, and beg; And let them seek their bread out of their desolate places.109:11 Let the extortioner catch all that he has; And let strangers make spoil of his labor.109:12 Let there be none to extend kindness to him; Neither let there be any to have pity on his fatherless children.109:13 Let his posterity be cut off; In the generation following let their name be blotted out.109:14 Let the iniquity of his fathers be remembered with Yahweh; And let not the sin of his mother be blotted out.109:15 Let them be before Yahweh continually, That he may cut off the memory of them from the earth;109:16 Because he remembered not to show kindness, But persecuted the poor and needy man, and the broken in heart, to slay them.109:17 Yes, he loved cursing, and it came to him; And he delighted not in blessing, and it was far from him.109:18 He clothed himself also with cursing as with his garment, and it came into his inward parts like water, and like oil into his bones.109:19 Let it be to him as the raiment with which he covers himself, and for the girdle with which he is girded continually.109:20 This is the reward of my adversaries from Yahweh, and of those who speak evil against my soul.109:21 But deal thou with me, O Yahweh the Lord, for your name's sake: Because your lovingkindness is good, deliver me;109:22 For I am poor and needy, and my heart is wounded within me.109:23 I am gone like the shadow when it declines: I am tossed up and down as the locust.109:24 My knees are weak through fasting; And my flesh fails of fatness.109:25 I am become also a reproach to them: When they see me, they shake their head.109:26 Help me, O Yahweh my God; Oh save me according to your lovingkindness:109:27 That they may know that this is your hand; That you, Yahweh, have done it.109:28 Let them curse, but bless you: When they arise, they shall be put to shame, But your servant shall rejoice.109:29  Let my adversaries be clothed with dishonor, and let them cover themselves with their own shame as with a robe.109:30 I will give great thanks to Yahweh with my mouth; Yes, I will praise him among the multitude.109:31 For he will stand at the right hand of the needy, To save him from those who judge his soul.Psalm 110A Psalm of David.110:1 Yahweh says to my Lord, Sit at my right hand, Until I make your enemies your footstool.110:2 Yahweh will send forth the rod of your strength out of Zion: Rule thou in the midst of your enemies.110:3 Your people offer themselves willingly In the day of your power, in holy array: Out of the womb of the morning You have the dew of your youth.110:4 Yahweh has sworn, and will not repent: You are a priest for ever After the order of Melchizedek.110:5 The Lord at your right hand Will strike through kings in the day of his wrath.110:6 He will judge among the nations, He will fill the places with dead bodies; He will strike through the head in many countries.110:7 He will drink of the brook in the way: Therefore will he lift up the head.Psalm 111111:1  Praise ye Yahweh.  I will give thanks to Yahweh with my whole heart, In the council of the upright, and in the congregation.111:2 The works of Yahweh are great, Sought out of all them that have pleasure therein.111:3 His work is honor and majesty; And his righteousness endures for ever.111:4 He has made his wonderful works to be remembered: Yahweh is gracious and merciful.111:5 He has given food to them that fear him: He will ever be mindful of his covenant.111:6 He has shown his people the power of his works, In giving them the heritage of the nations.111:7 The works of his hands are truth and justice; All his precepts are sure.111:8 They are established for ever and ever; They are done in truth and uprightness.111:9 He has sent redemption to his people; He has commanded his covenant for ever: Holy and reverend is his name.111:10 The fear of Yahweh is the beginning of wisdom; A good understanding have all they that do his commandments: His praise endures for ever.Psalm 112 112:1  Praise ye Yahweh.  Blessed is the man that fears Yahweh, That delights greatly in his commandments.112:2 His seed shall be mighty upon earth: The generation of the upright shall be blessed.112:3 Wealth and riches are in his house; And his righteousness endures for ever.112:4 To the upright there arises light in the darkness: He is gracious, and merciful, and righteous.112:5 Well is it with the man that deals graciously and lends; He shall maintain his cause in judgment.112:6 For he shall never be moved; The righteous shall be had in everlasting remembrance.112:7 He shall not be afraid of evil tidings: His heart is fixed, trusting in Yahweh.112:8 His heart is established, he shall not be afraid, Until he see his desire upon his adversaries.112:9 He has dispersed, he has given to the needy; His righteousness endures for ever: His horn shall be exalted with honor.112:10 The wicked shall see it, and be grieved; He shall gnash with his teeth, and melt away: The desire of the wicked shall perish.Psalm 113 113:1 Praise ye Yahweh.  Praise, O ye servants of Yahweh, Praise the name of Yahweh.113:2 Blessed be the name of Yahweh From this time forth and for evermore.113:3 From the rising of the sun to the going down of the same Yahweh's name is to be praised.113:4 Yahweh is high above all nations, and his glory above the heavens.113:5 Who is like Yahweh our God, That has his seat on high,113:6 That humbles himself to behold The things that are in heaven and in the earth?113:7 He raises up the poor out of the dust, and lifts up the needy from the dunghill;113:8 That he may set him with princes, Even with the princes of his people.113:9 He makes the barren woman to keep house, and to be a joyful mother of children.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 114 114:1 When Israel went forth out of Egypt, The house of Jacob from a people of strange language;114:2 Judah became his sanctuary, Israel his dominion.114:3 The sea saw it, and fled; The Jordan was driven back.114:4 The mountains skipped like rams, The little hills like lambs.114:5 What ails you, O sea, that you flee?  You Jordan, that you turn back?114:6 You mountains, that ye skip like rams; You little hills, like lambs?114:7 Tremble, you earth, at the presence of the Lord, at the presence of the God of Jacob,114:8 Who turned the rock into a pool of water, The flint into a fountain of waters.Psalm 115 115:1 Not to us, O Yahweh, not to us, But to your name give glory, For your lovingkindness, and for your truth's sake.115:2 Why should the nations say, Where is now their God?115:3 But our God is in the heavens: He has done whatsoever he pleased.115:4 Their idols are silver and gold, The work of men's hands.115:5 They have mouths, but they speak not; Eyes have they, but they see not;115:6 They have ears, but they hear not; Noses have they, but they smell not;115:7 They have hands, but they handle not; Feet have they, but they walk not; Neither speak they through their throat.115:8 They that make them shall be like to them; Yes, every one that trusts in them.115:9 O Israel, trust in Yahweh: He is their help and their shield.115:10 O house of Aaron, trust ye in Yahweh: He is their help and their shield.115:11 You that fear Yahweh, trust in Yahweh: He is their help and their shield.115:12 Yahweh has been mindful of us; he will bless us: He will bless the house of Israel; He will bless the house of Aaron.115:13 He will bless them that fear Yahweh, Both small and great.115:14 May Yahweh increase you more and more, You and your children.115:15 Blessed are ye of Yahweh, Who made heaven and earth.115:16 The heavens are the heavens of Yahweh; But the earth he has given to the children of men.115:17 The dead praise not Yahweh, Neither any that go down into silence;115:18 But we will bless Yahweh From this time forth and for evermore.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 116 116:1 I love Yahweh, because he hears My voice and my supplications.116:2 Because he has inclined his ear to me, Therefore will I call upon him as long as I live.116:3 The cords of death compassed me, and the pains of Sheol got hold upon me: I found trouble and sorrow.116:4 Then called I upon the name of Yahweh: O Yahweh, I beseech you, deliver my soul.116:5 Gracious is Yahweh, and righteous; Yes, our God is merciful.116:6 Yahweh preserves the simple: I was brought low, and he saved me.116:7 Return to your rest, O my soul; For Yahweh has dealt bountifully with you.116:8 For you have delivered my soul from death, My eyes from tears, and my feet from falling.116:9 I will walk before Yahweh In the land of the living.116:10 I believe, for I will speak: I was greatly afflicted:116:11 I said in my haste, all men are liars.116:12 What shall I render to Yahweh for all his benefits toward me?116:13 I will take the cup of salvation, and call upon the name of Yahweh.116:14 I will pay my vows to Yahweh, Yes, in the presence of all his people.116:15 Precious in the sight of Yahweh Is the death of his saints.116:16 O Yahweh, truly I am your servant: I am your servant, the son of your handmaid; You have loosed my bonds.116:17 I will offer to you the sacrifice of thanksgiving, and will call upon the name of Yahweh.116:18 I will pay my vows to Yahweh, Yes, in the presence of all his people,116:19 In the courts of Yahweh's house, In the midst of you, O Jerusalem.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 117 117:1 O praise Yahweh, all ye nations; Laud him, all ye peoples.117:2 For his lovingkindness is great toward us; And the truth of Yahweh endures for ever.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 118 118:1 Oh give thanks to Yahweh; for he is good; For his lovingkindness endures for ever.118:2 Let Israel now say, That his lovingkindness endures for ever.118:3 Let the house of Aaron now say, That his lovingkindness endures for ever.118:4 Let them now that fear Yahweh say, That his lovingkindness endures for ever.118:5 Out of my distress I called upon Yahweh: Yahweh answered me and set me in a large place.118:6 Yahweh is on my side; I will not fear: What can man do to me?118:7 Yahweh is on my side among them that help me: Therefore shall I see my desire upon them that hate me.118:8 It is better to take refuge in Yahweh Than to put confidence in man.118:9 It is better to take refuge in Yahweh Than to put confidence in princes.118:10 All nations surrounded me: In the name of Yahweh I will cut them off.118:11 They surrounded me; yes, they surrounded me: In the name of Yahweh I will cut them off.118:12 They surrounded me like bees; They are quenched as the fire of thorns: In the name of Yahweh I will cut them off.118:13 You did thrust hard at me that I might fall; But Yahweh helped me.118:14 Yahweh is my strength and my song; And is become my salvation.118:15 The voice of rejoicing and salvation is in the tents of the righteous: The right hand of Yahweh does valiantly.118:16 The right hand of Yahweh is exalted: The right hand of Yahweh does valiantly.118:17 I shall not die, but live, and declare the works of Yahweh.118:18  Yahweh has chastened me severely; But he has not given me over to death.118:19 Open to me the gates of righteousness: I will enter into them, I will give thanks to Yahweh.118:20 This is the gate of Yahweh; The righteous shall enter into it.118:21 I will give thanks to you; for you have answered me, and are become my salvation.118:22 The stone which the builders rejected is become the head of the corner.118:23 This is Yahweh's doing; It is marvellous in our eyes.118:24 This is the day which Yahweh has made; We will rejoice and be glad in it.118:25 Save now, we beseech you, O Yahweh: O Yahweh, we beseech you, send now prosperity.118:26 Blessed be he that comes in the name of Yahweh: We have blessed you out of the house of Yahweh.118:27 Yahweh is God, and he has given us light: Bind the sacrifice with cords, even to the horns of the altar.118:28 You are my God, and I will give thanks to you: You are my God, I will exalt you.118:29 Oh give thanks to Yahweh; for he is good.  His lovingkindness endures for ever.Psalm 119ALEPH - ?119:1 Blessed are they that are perfect in the way, Who walk in the law of Yahweh.119:2 Blessed are they that keep his testimonies, That seek him with the whole heart.119:3 Yes, they do no unrighteousness; They walk in his ways.119:4 You have commanded us your precepts, That we should observe them diligently.119:5 Oh that my ways were established To observe your statutes!119:6 Then I shall not be put to shame, When I have respect unto all your commandments.119:7 I will give thanks to you with uprightness of heart, When I learn your righteous judgments.119:8 I will observe your statutes: Oh forsake me not utterly.BETH - ?119:9 With what shall a young man cleanse his way?  By taking heed thereto according to your word.119:10 With my whole heart have I sought you: Oh let me not wander from your commandments.119:11 Your word have I laid up in my heart, That I might not sin against you.119:12 Blessed are you, O Yahweh: Teach me your statutes.119:13 With my lips have I declared All the ordinances of your mouth.119:14 I have rejoiced in the way of your testimonies, as much as in all riches.119:15 I will meditate on your precepts, and have respect unto your ways.119:16 I will delight myself in your statutes: I will not forget your word.GIMEL - ?119:17 Deal bountifully with your servant, that I may live; So will I observe your word.119:18 Open thou my eyes, that I may behold Wondrous things out of your law.119:19 I am a sojourner in the earth: Hide not your commandments from me.119:20 My soul breaks for the longing that it has unto your ordinances at all times.119:21 You have rebuked the proud that are cursed, That do wander from your commandments.119:22 Take away from me reproach and contempt; For I have kept your testimonies.119:23 Princes also sat and talked against me; But your servant did meditate on your statutes.119:24 Your testimonies also are my delight And my counsellors.DALETH - ?119:25 My soul cleaves to the dust: Quicken thou me according to your word.119:26 I declared my ways, and you answered me: Teach me your statutes.119:27 Make me to understand the way of your precepts: So shall I meditate on your wondrous works.119:28 My soul melts for heaviness: Strengthen thou me according to your word.119:29 Remove from me the way of falsehood; And grant me your law graciously.119:30 I have chosen the way of faithfulness: Your ordinances have I set before me.119:31 I cleave to your testimonies: O Yahweh, put me not to shame.119:32 I will run the way of your commandments, When you shall enlarge my heart.HE - ?119:33 Teach me, O Yahweh, the way of your statutes; And I shall keep it to the end.119:34 Give me understanding, and I shall keep your law; Yes, I shall observe it with my whole heart.119:35 Make me to go in the path of your commandments; For therein do I delight.119:36 Incline my heart to your testimonies, and not to covetousness.119:37 Turn away my eyes from beholding vanity, and give me life in your ways.119:38 Confirm to your servant your word, which is so you may be feared.119:39 Turn away my reproach of which I am afraid; For your ordinances are good.119:40 Behold, I have longed after your precepts: Give me life in your righteousness.VAV - ?119:41 Let your lovingkindnesses also come to me, O Yahweh, Even your salvation, according to your word.119:42 So shall I have an answer for him who reproaches me; For I trust in your word.119:43 And take not the word of truth utterly out of my mouth; For I have hoped in your ordinances.119:44 So shall I observe your law continually For ever and ever.119:45 And I shall walk at liberty; For I have sought your precepts.119:46 I will also speak of your testimonies before kings, and shall not be put to shame.119:47 And I will delight myself in your commandments, Which I have loved.119:48 I will lift up my hands also to your commandments, which I have loved; And I will meditate on your statutes.ZAYIN - ?119:49 Remember the word to your servant, Because you have made me to hope.119:50 This is my comfort in my affliction; For your word has given me life.119:51 The proud have had me greatly in derision: Yet I have not swerved from your law.119:52 I have remembered your ordinances of old, O Yahweh, and have comforted myself.119:53 Hot indignation has taken hold on me, Because of the wicked that forsake your law.119:54 Your statutes have been my songs In the house of my pilgrimage.119:55 I have remembered your name, O Yahweh, in the night, and have observed your law.119:56 This I have had, Because I have kept your precepts.HETH - ?119:57  Yahweh is my portion: I have said that I would observe your words.119:58 I entreated your favor with my whole heart: Be merciful to me according to your word.119:59 I thought on my ways, and turned my feet toward your testimonies.119:60 I made haste, and delayed not, to observe your commandments.119:61 The cords of the wicked have wrapped me round; But I have not forgotten your law.119:62 At midnight I will rise to give thanks to you Because of your righteous ordinances.119:63 I am a companion of all them that fear you, and of them that observe your precepts.119:64 The earth, O Yahweh, is full of your lovingkindness: Teach me your statutes.TETH - ?119:65 You have dealt well with your servant, O Yahweh, according to your word.119:66 Teach me good judgment and knowledge; For I have believed in your commandments.119:67 Before I was afflicted I went astray; But now I observe your word.119:68 You are good, and do good; Teach me your statutes.119:69 The proud have forged a lie against me: With my whole heart will I keep your precepts.119:70 Their heart is as fat as grease; But I delight in your law.119:71 It is good for me that I have been afflicted; That I may learn your statutes.119:72 The law of your mouth is better to me Than thousands of gold and silver.YODH - ?119:73 Your hands have made me and fashioned me: Give me understanding, that I may learn your commandments.119:74 They that fear you shall see me and be glad, Because I have hoped in your word.119:75 I know, O Yahweh, that your judgments are righteous, and that in faithfulness you have afflicted me.119:76 Let, I pray you, your lovingkindness be for my comfort, according to your word to your servant.119:77 Let your tender mercies come to me, that I may live; For your law is my delight.119:78 Let the proud be put to shame; For they have overthrown me wrongfully: But I will meditate on your precepts.119:79 Let those that fear you turn to me; And they shall know your testimonies.119:80 Let my heart be perfect in your statutes, That I be not put to shame.KAPH - ?119:81 My soul faints for your salvation; But I hope in your word.119:82 My eyes fail for your word, While I say, When will you comfort me?119:83 For I am become like a wine-skin in the smoke; Yet I do not forget your statutes.119:84 How many are the days of your servant?  When will you execute judgment on them that persecute me?119:85 The proud have dug pits for me, who are not according to your law.119:86 All your commandments are faithful: They persecute me wrongfully; help thou me.119:87 They had almost consumed me upon earth; But I forsook not your precepts.LAMEDH - ?119:88 Give me life in your lovingkindness; So shall I observe the testimony of your mouth.119:89 For ever, O Yahweh, Your word is settled in heaven.119:90 Your faithfulness is to all generations: You have established the earth, and it abides.119:91  They abide this day according to your ordinances; For all things are your servants.119:92 Unless your law had been my delight, I should then have perished in my affliction.119:93 I will never forget your precepts; For with them you have given me life.119:94 I am yours, save me; For I have sought your precepts.119:95 The wicked have waited for me, to destroy me; But I will consider your testimonies.MEM - ?119:96 I have seen an end of all perfection; But your commandment is exceedingly broad.119:97 Oh how love I your law! It is my meditation all the day.119:98  Your commandments make me wiser than my enemies; For they are ever with me.119:99 I have more understanding than all my teachers; For your testimonies are my meditation.119:100 I understand more than the aged, Because I have kept your precepts.119:101 I have refrained my feet from every evil way, That I might observe your word.119:102 I have not turned aside from your ordinances; For you have taught me.119:103 How sweet are your words to my taste! Yes, sweeter than honey to my mouth!119:104 Through your precepts I get understanding: Therefore I hate every false way.NUN - ?119:105 Your word is a lamp to my feet, and light to my path.119:106 I have sworn, and have confirmed it, That I will observe your righteous ordinances.119:107 I am afflicted very much: Give me life, O Yahweh, according to your word.119:108 Accept, I beseech you, the freewill-offerings of my mouth, O Yahweh, and teach me your ordinances.119:109 My soul is continually in my hand; Yet I do not forget your law.119:110 The wicked have laid a snare for me; Yet I have not gone astray from your precepts.119:111 Your testimonies I have taken as a heritage for ever; For they are the rejoicing of my heart.119:112 I have inclined my heart to perform your statutes For ever, even to the end.SAMEKH - ?119:113 I hate them that are of a double mind; But your law do I love.119:114 You are my hiding-place and my shield: I hope in your word.119:115 Depart from me, ye evil-doers, That I may keep the commandments of my God.119:116 Uphold me according to your word, that I may live; And let me not be ashamed of my hope.119:117 Hold me up, and I shall be safe, and shall have respect for your statutes continually.119:118 You have set at nought all them that go astray from your statutes; For their deceit is falsehood.119:119 You put away all the wicked of the earth like dross: Therefore I love your testimonies.119:120 My flesh trembles for fear of you; And I am afraid of your judgments.AYIN - ?119:121 I have done justice and righteousness: Leave me not to my oppressors.119:122 Be surety for your servant for good: Let not the proud oppress me.119:123 My eyes fail for your salvation, and for your righteous word.119:124 Deal with your servant according to your lovingkindness, and teach me your statutes.119:125 I am your servant; give me understanding, That I may know your testimonies.119:126 It is time for Yahweh to work; For they have made void your law.119:127 Therefore I love your commandments Above gold, yes, above fine gold.119:128 Therefore I esteem all your precepts concerning all things to be right; And I hate every false way.PE - ?119:129 Your testimonies are wonderful; Therefore does my soul keep them.119:130 The opening of your words gives light; It gives understanding to the simple.119:131 I opened wide my mouth, and panted; For I longed for your commandments.119:132 Turn thou to me, and have mercy upon me, as is your way with those that love your name.119:133 Establish my footsteps in your word; And let not any iniquity have dominion over me.119:134 Redeem me from the oppression of man: So will I observe your precepts.119:135 Make your face to shine upon your servant; And teach me your statutes.119:136 Streams of water run down my eyes, Because they observe not your law.TSADHE - ?119:137 Righteous are you, O Yahweh, and upright are your judgments.119:138 You have appointed your testimonies in righteousness And all faithfulness.119:139 My zeal has consumed me, Because my adversaries have forgotten your words.119:140 Your word is very pure; Therefore your servant loves it.119:141 I am small and despised; Yet I do not forget your precepts.119:142 Your righteousness is an everlasting righteousness, and your law is truth.119:143 Trouble and anguish have taken hold on me; Yet your commandments are my delight.119:144 Your testimonies are righteous for ever: Give me understanding, and I shall live.QOPH - ?119:145 I have called with my whole heart; answer me, O Yahweh: I will keep your statutes.119:146 I have called to you; save me, and I shall observe your testimonies.119:147 I anticipated the dawning of the morning, and cried: I hoped in your words.119:148 My eyes anticipated the night-watches, That I might meditate on your word.119:149 Hear my voice according to your lovingkindness: Make me alive, O Yahweh, according to your ordinances.119:150 They draw near that follow after wickedness; They are far from your law.119:151 You are near, O Yahweh; And all your commandments are truth.119:152 Of old have I known from your testimonies, That you have founded them for ever.RESH - ?119:153 Consider my affliction, and deliver me; For I do not forget your law.119:154 Plead thou my cause, and redeem me: Quicken me according to your word.119:155 Salvation is far from the wicked; For they seek not your statutes.119:156 Great are your tender mercies, O Yahweh: Give me life according to your ordinances.119:157 Many are my persecutors and my adversaries; Yet I have not swerved from your testimonies.119:158 I beheld the treacherous, and was grieved, Because they observe not your word.119:159 Consider how I love your precepts: Give me life, O Yahweh, according to your lovingkindness.119:160 The sum of your word is truth; And every one of your righteous ordinances endures for ever.SHIN - ?119:161 Princes have persecuted me without a cause; But my heart stands in awe of your words.119:162 I rejoice at your word, as one that finds great spoil.119:163 I hate and abhor falsehood; But your law do I love.119:164 Seven times a day do I praise you, Because of your righteous ordinances.119:165 Great peace have they that love your law; And they have no occasion of stumbling.119:166 I have hoped for your salvation, O Yahweh, and have done your commandments.119:167 My soul has observed your testimonies; And I love them exceedingly.119:168 I have observed your precepts and your testimonies; For all my ways are before you.TAV - ?119:169 Let my cry come near before you, O Yahweh: Give me understanding according to your word.119:170 Let my supplication come before you: Deliver me according to your word.119:171 Let my lips utter praise; For you teach me your statutes.119:172 Let my tongue sing of your word; For all your commandments are righteousness.119:173 Let your hand be ready to help me; For I have chosen your precepts.119:174 I have longed for your salvation, O Yahweh; And your law is my delight.119:175 Let my soul live, and it shall praise you; And let your ordinances help me.119:176 I have gone astray like a lost sheep; Seek your servant; For I do not forget your commandments.Psalm 120A Song of Ascents.120:1 In my distress I cried to Yahweh, and he answered me.120:2 Deliver my soul, O Yahweh, from lying lips, and from a deceitful tongue.120:3 What shall be given to you, and what shall be done more to you, You deceitful tongue?120:4  Sharp arrows of the mighty, With coals of juniper.120:5 Woe is me, that I sojourn in Meshech, That I dwell among the tents of Kedar!120:6 My soul has long had her dwelling With him that hates peace.120:7 I am for peace: But when I speak, they are for war.Psalm 121A Song of Ascents.121:1 I will lift up my eyes to the hills: From where shall my help come?121:2 My help comes from Yahweh, who made heaven and earth.121:3  He will not let your foot be moved: he who keeps you will not slumber.121:4 Behold, he who keeps Israel will neither slumber nor sleep.121:5 Yahweh he is your keeper: Yahweh is your shade at your right hand.121:6 The sun will not smite you by day, nor the moon by night.121:7 Yahweh will keep you from all evil; he will keep your life.121:8 Yahweh will keep your going out and your coming in from this time forth and for evermore.Psalm 122A Song of Ascents; of David.122:1 I was glad when they said to me, Let us go to the house of Yahweh.122:2 And now our feet are standing within your gates, O Jerusalem.122:3 Jerusalem, you are built as a city compact together;122:4 To which the tribes go up, even the tribes of Yahweh; it is an ordinance for Israel, to give thanks to the name of Yahweh.122:5 For there, thrones for judgment are set, the thrones of the house of David.122:6  Pray for the peace of Jerusalem:  They shall prosper who love you.122:7 Peace be within your walls, and security within your towers.122:8 For my brethren and companions' sakes, I will now say, Peace be within you.122:9 For the sake of the house of Yahweh our God I will seek your welfare.Psalm 123A Song of Ascents.123:1 To you do I lift up my eyes, O you sitting in the heavens.123:2 Behold, as the eyes of servants look to the hand of their master, as the eyes of a maid to the hand of her mistress; so our eyes look to Yahweh our God, till he has mercy upon us.123:3 Have mercy upon us, O Yahweh, have mercy upon us.  For we have had more than our fill of contempt.123:4 Our soul has had more than its fill of the scoffing of those who are at ease, and of the contempt of the proud.Psalm 124A Song of Ascents; of David.124:1 If it had not been Yahweh who was on our side, Let Israel now say,124:2 If it had not been Yahweh who was on our side, when men rose up against us;124:3 Then they would have swallowed us up alive, when their wrath was kindled against us;124:4 Then the waters would have overwhelmed us, the stream gone over our soul;124:5 The proud waters then would have gone over our soul.124:6 Blessed be Yahweh, who has not given us as prey to their teeth.124:7 Our soul is escaped as a bird out of the snare of the fowlers: The snare is broken, and we have escaped.124:8 Our help is in the name of Yahweh, who made heaven and earth.Psalm 125A Song of Ascents.125:1 They that trust in Yahweh are as mount Zion, which cannot be moved, but remains for ever.125:2 As the mountains are all around Jerusalem, so Yahweh is around his people from this time forth and for evermore.125:3 For the sceptre of wickedness shall not rest upon the lot of the righteous; That the righteous put not forth their hands toward iniquity.125:4 Do good, O Yahweh, to those that are good, and to them that are upright in their hearts.125:5 But as for such as turn aside to their crooked ways, Yahweh will lead them forth with the workers of iniquity.  Peace be upon Israel.Psalm 126A Song of Ascents.126:1 When Yahweh brought back those that returned to Zion, we were similar to people dreaming.126:2 Then was our mouth filled with laughter, and our tongue with singing: Then they were saying among the nations, Yahweh has done great things for them.126:3 Yahweh has done great things for us, for which we are glad.126:4 Turn aback our captivity, O Yahweh, as the streams in the South.126:5 Those who sow in tears shall reap in joy.126:6 He who goes forth and weeps, bearing seed for sowing, shall doubtless return again with joy, bringing his sheaves along with him.Psalm 127A Song of Ascents; of Solomon.127:1 Unless Yahweh builds the house, they labor in vain who build it.  Unless Yahweh keeps the city, the watchman stays awake all in vain.127:2 In vain you rise up early, and get your rest late, to eat the bread of toil.  For He gives to his beloved in sleep.127:3 Lo, children are a heritage from Yahweh.  The fruit of the womb is a reward.127:4 As arrows in the hand of a mighty man, so are the children out of youth.127:5 Happy is the man who has his quiver full of them: They shall not be put to shame, when they speak with their enemies in the gate.Psalm 128A Song of Ascents.128:1 Blessed is every one who has fear of Yahweh, who walks in his ways.128:2 For you shall eat the labor of your hands.  Happy shall you be, and it shall be well with you.128:3 Your wife shall be like a fruitful vine, in the innermost parts of your house; your children like olive plants, round about your table.128:4 Behold, thus shall that man be blessed who has fear for Yahweh.128:5 May Yahweh bless you out of Zion; and may you see the good of Jerusalem all the days of your life.128:6 Yes, may you see your children's children.  Peace be upon Israel.Psalm 129A Song of Ascents.129:1  Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth up, Let Israel now say,129:2 Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth up: Yet they have not prevailed against me.129:3 The plowers plowed upon my back; They made long their furrows.129:4 Yahweh is righteous: He has cut asunder the cords of the wicked.129:5 Let them be put to shame and turned backward, all they who hate Zion.129:6 Let them be as the grass upon the housetops, which withers before it grows up;129:7 With which the reaper fills not his hand, nor he that binds sheaves, his bosom.129:8 Neither do they who pass by say, The blessing of Yahweh be upon you; We bless you in the name of Yahweh.Psalm 130A Song of Ascents.130:1 Out of the depths have I cried to you, O Yahweh.130:2 O Lord, hear my voice:  Let your ears be attentive to the voice of my supplications.130:3 If you, Yahweh, should mark iniquities, O Lord, who could stand?130:4 But there is forgiveness with you, that you may be feared.130:5 I wait for Yahweh, my soul does wait, and in his word do I hope.130:6 My soul waits for the Lord more than watchmen wait for the morning; Yes, more than watchmen do for the morning.130:7 O Israel, hope in Yahweh; for with Yahweh there is lovingkindness, and with Him there is plenteous redemption.130:8 And He will redeem Israel From all his iniquities.Psalm 131A Song of Ascents; of David.131:1 Yahweh, my heart is not haughty, nor my eyes lofty; neither do I exercise myself in great matters, or in things too wonderful for me.131:2 Surely I have stilled and quieted my soul; like a weaned child with his mother, like a weaned child is my soul within me.131:3 O Israel, hope in Yahweh from this time forth and for evermore.Psalm 132A Song of Ascents.132:1 Yahweh, remember for David all his affliction;132:2 How he swore to Yahweh, and vowed to the Mighty One of Jacob:132:3 Surely I will not come into the tabernacle of my house, nor go up into my bed;132:4 I will not give sleep to my eyes, or slumber to my eyelids, 132:5 Until I find out a place for Yahweh, a tabernacle for the Mighty One of Jacob.132:6 Lo, we heard about it in Ephrathah: we found it in the field of the wood.132:7 We will go into his tabernacles; we will worship at his footstool.132:8 Arise, O Yahweh, into your resting place; you, and the ark of your strength.132:9 Let your priest be clothed with righteousness; and your saints shout for joy.132:10 For your servant David's sake turn not away the face of your anointed.132:11 Yahweh has sworn to David in truth; He will not turn from it: "Someone from the fruit of your body will I set upon your throne."132:12 If your children will keep my covenant, and my testimony that I shall teach them, their children also shall sit upon your throne for evermore.132:13 For Yahweh has chosen Zion; He has desired it for his habitation.132:14 This is my resting place for ever: Here will I dwell; for I have desired it.132:15 I will abundantly bless her provision: I will satisfy her poor with bread.132:16 Her priests also will I clothe with salvation; And her saints shall shout aloud for joy.132:17 There will I make the horn of David to bud: I have ordained a lamp for my anointed.132:18 His enemies I will clothe with shame; But upon himself his crown will flourish.Psalm 133A Song of Ascents; of David.133:1 Behold, how good and how pleasant it is for brethren to dwell together in unity!133:2 It is like the precious oil upon the head, that ran down upon the beard, even Aaron's beard; that came down upon the skirt of his garments;133:3 Like the dew of Hermon, that comes down upon the mountains of Zion:  For there Yahweh commanded the blessing, even everlasting life.Psalm 134A Song of Ascents.134:1 Behold, bless ye Yahweh, all ye servants of Yahweh, who by night stand in the house of Yahweh.134:2 Lift up your hands to the sanctuary, and bless ye Yahweh.134:3 May Yahweh bless you out of Zion; even He who made heaven and earth.Psalm 135135:1 Praise ye Yahweh.  Praise ye the name of Yahweh; Praise him, O ye servants of Yahweh,135:2 Ye that stand in the house of Yahweh, In the courts of the house of our God.135:3 Praise ye Yahweh; for Yahweh is good: Sing praises to his name; for it is pleasant.135:4 For Yahweh has chosen Jacob to himself, and Israel for his own possession.135:5 For I know that Yahweh is great, and that our Lord is above all gods.135:6 Whatsoever Yahweh pleased, that has he done, In heaven and in earth, in the seas and in all deeps;135:7 Who causes the vapors to ascend from the ends of the earth; Who makes lightnings for the rain; Who brings forth the wind out of his treasuries;135:8 Who smote the first-born of Egypt, Both of man and beast;135:9 Who sent signs and wonders into the midst of you, O Egypt, Upon Pharaoh, and upon all his servants;135:10 Who smote many nations, and slew mighty kings,135:11 Sihon king of the Amorites, and Og king of Bashan, and all the kingdoms of Canaan,135:12 And gave their land for a heritage, a heritage to Israel his people.135:13 Your name, O Yahweh, endures for ever; Your memorial name, O Yahweh, throughout all generations.135:14 For Yahweh will judge his people, and repent himself concerning his servants.135:15 The idols of the nations are silver and gold, The work of men's hands.135:16 They have mouths, but they speak not; Eyes have they, but they see not;135:17 They have ears, but they hear not; Neither is there any breath in their mouths.135:18 Those who make them shall be like to them; Yes, every one that trusts in them.135:19 O house of Israel, bless ye Yahweh: O house of Aaron, bless ye Yahweh:135:20 O house of Levi, bless ye Yahweh: You that fear Yahweh, bless ye Yahweh.135:21 Blessed be Yahweh out of Zion, Who dwells at Jerusalem.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 136136:1 Oh give thanks to Yahweh; for he is good; For his lovingkindness endures for ever.136:2 Oh give thanks to the God of gods; For his lovingkindness endures for ever.136:3 Oh give thanks to the Lord of lords; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:4 To him who alone does great wonders; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:5 To him that by understanding made the heavens; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:6 To him that spread forth the earth above the waters; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:7 To him that made great lights; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:8 The sun to rule by day; For his lovingkindness endures for ever;136:9 The moon and stars to rule by night; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:10 To him that smote Egypt in their first-born; For his lovingkindness endures for ever;136:11 And brought out Israel from among them; For his lovingkindness endures for ever;136:12 With a strong hand, and with an outstretched arm; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:13 To him that divided the Red Sea in sunder; For his lovingkindness endures for ever;136:14 And made Israel to pass through the midst of it; For his lovingkindness endures for ever;136:15 But overthrew Pharaoh and his host in the Red Sea; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:16 To him that led his people through the wilderness; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:17 To him that smote great kings; For his lovingkindness endures for ever;136:18 And slew famous kings; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:19 Sihon king of the Amorites; For his lovingkindness endures forever;136:20 And Og king of Bashan; For his lovingkindness endures for ever;136:21 And gave their land for a heritage; For his lovingkindness endures for ever;136:22 Even a heritage to Israel his servant; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:23 Who remembered us in our low estate; For his lovingkindness endures for ever;136:24 And has delivered us from our adversaries; For his lovingkindness endures for ever:136:25 Who gives food to all flesh; For his lovingkindness endures for ever.136:26 Oh give thanks to the God of heaven; For his lovingkindness endures for ever.Psalm 137137:1 By the rivers of Babylon, There we sat down, yes, we wept, When we remembered Zion.137:2 Upon the willows in the midst thereof We hung up our harps.137:3 For there those who led us captive required of us songs, and they who wasted us required of us mirth, saying, Sing us one of the songs of Zion.137:4 How shall we sing Yahweh's song In a foreign land?137:5 If I forget you, O Jerusalem, Let my right hand forget her skill.137:6 Let my tongue cleave to the roof of my mouth, If I remember you not; If I prefer not Jerusalem Above my chiefest joy.137:7 Remember, O Yahweh, against the children of Edom The day of Jerusalem; Who said, Raze it, raze it, Even to the foundation thereof.137:8 O daughter of Babylon, that are to be destroyed, Happy shall he be, that rewards you As you have served to us.137:9 Happy shall he be, that takes and dashes your little ones Against the rock.Psalm 138A [Psalm] of David.138:1 I will give you thanks with my whole heart: Before the gods will I sing praises to you.138:2 I will worship toward your holy temple, and give thanks to your name for your lovingkindness and for your truth: For you have magnified above all else your word and your name.138:3 In the day that I called, you answered me, You did encourage me with strength in my soul.138:4 All the kings of the earth shall give you thanks, O Yahweh, For they have heard the words of your mouth.138:5 Yes, they shall sing of the ways of Yahweh; For great is the glory of Yahweh.138:6 For though Yahweh is high, yet he has regard to the lowly; But the haughty he knows from afar.138:7 Though I walk in the midst of trouble, you will revive me; You will stretch forth your hand against the wrath of my enemies, and your right hand will save me.138:8 Yahweh will perfect that which concerns me: Your lovingkindness, O Yahweh, endures for ever; Forsake not the works of your own hands.Psalm 139For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.139:1 O Yahweh, you have searched me, and known me.139:2 You know my sitting down and my rising up; You understand my thought afar off.139:3 You search out my path and my lying down, and are acquainted with all my ways.139:4 For there is not a word in my tongue, But, lo, O Yahweh, you know it altogether.139:5 You have beset me behind and before, and laid your hand upon me.139:6 Such knowledge is too wonderful for me; It is high, I cannot attain to it.139:7 To where shall I go from your Spirit?  Or where shall I flee from your presence?139:8 If I ascend up into heaven, you are there: If I make my bed in Sheol, behold, you are there.139:9 If I take the wings of the morning, and dwell in the uttermost parts of the sea;139:10 Even there shall your hand lead me, and your right hand shall hold me.139:11 If I say, Surely the darkness shall overwhelm me, and the light about me shall be night;139:12 Even the darkness hides not from you, But the night shines as the day: The darkness and the light are both alike to you.139:13 For you did form my inward parts: You did cover me in my mother's womb.139:14 I will give thanks to you; for I am fearfully and wonderfully made: Wonderful are your works; And that my soul knows right well.139:15 My frame was not hidden from you, When I was made in secret, and curiously wrought in the lowest parts of the earth.139:16 Your eyes did see my unformed substance; And in your book they were all written, Even the days that were ordained for me, When as yet there was none of them.139:17 How precious also are your thoughts to me, O God! How great is the sum of them!139:18 If I should count them, they are more in number than the sand: When I awake, I am still with you.139:19 Surely you will slay the wicked, O God: Depart from me therefore, ye bloodthirsty men.139:20 For they speak against you wickedly, and your enemies take your nam in vain.139:21 Do I not hate them, O Yahweh, that hate you?  And am I not grieved with those that rise up against you?139:22 I hate them with perfect hatred: They are become my enemies.139:23 Search me, O God, and know my heart: Try me, and know my thoughts;139:24 And see if there be any wicked way in me, and lead me in the way everlasting.Psalm 140For the Chief Musician.  A Psalm of David.140:1 Deliver me, O Yahweh, from the evil man; Preserve me from the violent man:140:2 Those who devise mischiefs in their heart; Continually do they gather themselves together for war.140:3 They have sharpened their tongue like a serpent; Adders' poison is under their lips.  Selah140:4 Keep me, O Yahweh, from the hands of the wicked; Preserve me from the violent man: Who have purposed to thrust aside my steps.140:5 The proud have hid a snare for me, and cords; They have spread a net beside the way; They have set snares for me.  Selah140:6 I said to Yahweh, You are my God: Give ear to the voice of my supplications, O Yahweh.140:7 O Yahweh the Lord, the strength of my salvation, You have covered my head in the day of battle.140:8 Grant not, O Yahweh, the desires of the wicked; Further not his evil device, lest they exalt themselves.  Selah140:9 As for the head of those that compass me about, Let the mischief of their own lips cover them.140:10 Let burning coals fall upon them: Let them be cast into the fire, Into deep pits, from where they shall not rise.140:11 An evil speaker shall not be established in the earth: Evil shall hunt the violent man to overthrow him.140:12 I know that Yahweh will maintain the cause of the afflicted, and justice for the needy.140:13 Surely the righteous shall give thanks to your name: The upright shall dwell in your presence.Psalm 141A Psalm of David.141:1 Yahweh, I have called upon you; make haste to me: Give ear to my voice, when I call to you.141:2 Let my prayer be set forth as incense before you; The lifting up of my hands as the evening sacrifice.141:3 Set a watch, O Yahweh, before my mouth; Keep the door of my lips.141:4 Incline not my heart to any evil thing, To practice deeds of wickedness With men that work iniquity: And let me not eat of their dainties.141:5 Let the righteous smite me, it shall be a kindness; And let him reprove me, it shall be as oil upon the head; Let not my head refuse it: For even in their wickedness shall my prayer continue.141:6 Their judges are thrown down by the sides of the rock; And they shall hear my words; for they are sweet.141:7 As when one plows and separates the earth, Our bones are scattered at the mouth of Sheol.141:8 For my eyes are toward you, O Yahweh the Lord: In you do I take refuge; leave not my soul defenseless.141:9 Keep me from the trap which they have laid for me, and from the snares of the workers of iniquity.141:10 Let the wicked fall into their own nets, While I pass on by safely.Psalm 142Maschil of David, when he was in the cave;  a Prayer.142:1 I cry with my voice to Yahweh; With my voice to Yahweh do I make supplication.142:2 I pour out my complaint before him; I show before him my trouble.142:3 When my spirit was overwhelmed within me, You knew my path.  In the way in which I walk They have hidden a snare for me.142:4 Look on m right hand, and see; For there is no man that knows me: Refuge has failed me; No man cares for my soul.142:5 I cried to you, O Yahweh; I said, You are my refuge, My portion in the land of the living.142:6 Attend to my cry; For I am brought very low: Deliver me from my persecutors; For they are stronger than I.142:7 Bring my soul out of prison, That I may give thanks to your name: The righteous shall surround me; For you will deal bountifully with me.Psalm 143A Psalm of David.143:1 Hear my prayer, O Yahweh; give ear to my supplications: In your faithfulness answer me, and in your righteousness.143:2 And enter not into judgment with your servant; For in your sight no man living is righteous.143:3 For the enemy has persecuted my soul; He has smitten my life down to the ground: He has made me to dwell in dark places, as those that have been long dead.143:4 Therefore is my spirit overwhelmed within me; My heart within me is desolate.143:5 I remember the days of old; I meditate on all your doings; I muse on the work of your hands.143:6 I spread forth my hands to you: My soul thirsts after you, as a weary land.  Selah143:7 Make haste to answer me, O Yahweh; my spirit fails: Hide not your face from me, Lest I become like them that go down into the pit.143:8 Cause me to hear your lovingkindness in the morning; For in you do I trust: Cause me to know the way in which I should walk; For I lift up my soul to you.143:9 Deliver me, O Yahweh, from my enemies: I flee to you to hide me.143:10 Teach me to do your will; For you are my God: Your Spirit is good; Lead me in the land of uprightness.143:11 Give me life, O Yahweh, for your name's sake: In your righteousness bring my soul out of trouble.143:12 And in your lovingkindness cut off my enemies, and destroy all them that afflict my soul; For I am your servant.Psalm 144[A Psalm] of David.144:1 Blessed be Yahweh my rock, Who teaches my hands to war, and my fingers to fight:144:2 My lovingkindness, and my fortress, My high tower, and my deliverer; My shield, and he in whom I take refuge; Who subdues my people under me.144:3 Yahweh, what is man, that you take knowledge of him?  Or the son of man, that you make account of him?144:4 Man is like to vanity: His days are as a shadow that passes away.144:5 Bow your heavens, O Yahweh, and come down: Touch the mountains, and they shall smoke.144:6 Cast forth lightning, and scatter them; Send out your arrows, and discomfit them.144:7 Stretch forth your hand from above; Rescue me, and deliver me out of great waters, Out of the hand of aliens;144:8 Whose mouth speaks deceit, and whose right hand is a right hand of falsehood.144:9 I will sing a new song to you, O God: Upon a psaltery of ten strings will I sing praisesto you.144:10 You are he that gives salvation to kings; Who rescues David his servant from the hurtful sword.144:11 Rescue me, and deliver me out of the hand of aliens, Whose mouth speaks deceit, and whose right hand is a right hand of falsehood.144:12 When our sons shall be as plants grown up in their youth, and our daughters as corner-stones hewn after the fashion of a palace;144:13 When our garners are full, affording all manner of store, and our sheep bring forth thousands and ten thousands in our fields;144:14 When our oxen are well laden; When there is no breaking in, and no going forth, and no outcry in our streets:144:15 Happy is the people that is in such a case; Yes, happy is the people whose God is Yahweh.Psalm 145[A Psalm of] praise;  of David.145:1 I will extol you, my God, O King; And I will bless your name for ever and ever.145:2 Every day will I bless you; And I will praise your name for ever and ever.145:3 Great is Yahweh, and greatly to be praised; And his greatness is unsearchable.145:4 One generation shall laud your works to another, and shall declare your mighty acts.145:5 Of the glorious majesty of your honor, and of your wondrous works, will I meditate.145:6 And men shall speak of the might of your terrible acts; And I will declare your greatness.145:7 They shall utter the memory of your great goodness, and shall sing of your righteousness.145:8 Yahweh is gracious, and merciful; Slow to anger, and of great lovingkindness.145:9 Yahweh is good to all; And his tender mercies are over all his works.145:10 All your works shall give thanks to you, O Yahweh; And your saints shall bless you.145:11 They shall speak of the glory of your kingdom, and talk of your power;145:12 To make known to the sons of men his mighty acts, and the glory of the majesty of his kingdom.145:13 Your kingdom is an everlasting kingdom, and your dominion endures throughout all generations.145:14 Yahweh upholds all that fall, and raises up all those that are bowed down.145:15 The eyes of all wait for you; And you give them their food in due season.145:16 You open your hand, and satisfy the desire of every living thing.145:17 Yahweh is righteous in all his ways, and gracious in all his works.145:18 Yahweh is near to all them that call upon him, To all that call upon him in truth.145:19 He will fulfil the desire of those that fear him; He also will hear their cry and will save them.145:20 Yahweh preserves all them that love him; But all the wicked will he destroy.145:21 My mouth shall speak the praise of Yahweh; And let all flesh bless his holy name for ever and ever.Psalm 146146:1 Praise ye Yahweh.  Praise Yahweh, O my soul.146:2 While I live I will praise Yahweh: I will sing praises to my God while I have any being.146:3 Put not your trust in princes, nor in the son of man,  in whom there is no help.146:4 When his breath departs, he returns to the earth; in that very day his thoughts will perish.146:5 Happy is he who has the God of Jacob for his help, whose hope is in Yahweh his God:146:6 He who made heaven and earth, the sea, and all that in them is; who keeps truth for ever;146:7 who executes justice for the oppressed; who gives food to the hungry.  Yahweh releases the prisoners;146:8 Yahweh opens the eyes of the blind; Yahweh raises up those that are bowed down; Yahweh loves the righteous;146:9 Yahweh preserves the sojourners; He upholds the fatherless and widow; but the way of the wicked he turns upside down.146:10 Yahweh will reign for ever; your God, O Zion, to all generations.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 147147:1 Praise ye Yahweh; For it is good to sing praises to our God; For it is pleasant, and praise is comely.147:2 Yahweh does build up Jerusalem; He gathers together the outcasts of Israel.147:3 He heals the broken in heart, and binds up their wounds.147:4 He counts the number of the stars; He calls them all by their names.147:5 Great is our Lord, and mighty in power; His understanding is infinite.147:6 Yahweh upholds the meek: He brings the wicked down to the ground.147:7 Sing to Yahweh with thanksgiving; Sing praises upon the harp to our God,147:8 Who covers the heavens with clouds, Who prepares rain for the earth, Who makes grass to grow upon the mountains.147:9 He gives to the beast his food, and to the young ravens which cry out.147:10 He delights not in the strength of the horse: He takes no pleasure in the legs of a man.147:11 Yahweh takes pleasure in them that fear him, In those that hope in his lovingkindness.147:12 Praise Yahweh, O Jerusalem; Praise your God, O Zion.147:13 For he has strengthened the bars of your gates; He has blessed your children within you.147:14 He makes peace in your borders; He fills you with the finest of the wheat.147:15 He sends out his commandment upon earth; His word runs very swiftly.147:16 He gives snow like wool; He scatters the hoar-frost like ashes.147:17 He casts forth his ice like morsels: Who can stand before his cold?147:18 He sends out his word, and melts them: He causes his wind to blow, and the waters flow.147:19 He shows his word to Jacob, His statutes and his ordinances to Israel.147:20 He has not dealt so with any other nation; And as for his ordinances, they have not known them.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 148148:1 Praise ye Yahweh.  Praise ye Yahweh from the heavens: Praise him in the heights.148:2 Praise ye him, all his angels: Praise ye him, all his host.148:3 Praise ye him, sun and moon: Praise him, all ye stars of light.148:4 Praise him, ye heavens of heavens, and ye waters that are above the heavens.148:5 Let them praise the name of Yahweh; For he commanded, and they were created.148:6 He has also established them for ever and ever: He has made a decree which shall not pass away.148:7 Praise Yahweh from the earth, You sea-monsters, and all deeps.148:8 Fire and hail, snow and vapor; Stormy wind, fulfilling his word;148:9 Mountains and all hills; Fruitful trees and all cedars;148:10 Beasts and all cattle; Creeping things and flying birds;148:11 Kings of the earth and all peoples; Princes and all judges of the earth;148:12 Both young men and virgins; Old men and children:148:13 Let them praise the name of Yahweh; For his name alone is exalted; His glory is above the earth and the heavens.148:14 And he has lifted up the horn of his people, The praise of all his saints; Even of the children of Israel, a people near to him.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 149149:1  Praise ye Yahweh.  Sing to Yahweh a new song, and his praise in the assembly of the saints.149:2 Let Israel rejoice in him that made him: Let the children of Zion be joyful in their King.149:3 Let them praise his name in the dance: Let them sing praises to him with timbrel and harp.149:4 For Yahweh takes pleasure in his people: He will adorn the meek with salvation.149:5 Let the saints exult in glory: Let them sing for joy upon their beds.149:6 Let the high praises of God be in their mouth, and a two-edged sword in their hand;149:7 To execute vengeance upon the nations, and punishments upon the peoples;149:8 To bind their kings with chains, and their nobles with fetters of iron;149:9 To execute upon them the judgment written: This honor have all his saints.  Praise ye Yahweh.Psalm 150150:1 Praise ye Yahweh.  Praise God in his sanctuary: Praise him in the firmament of his power.150:2 Praise him for his mighty acts: Praise him according to his excellent greatness.150:3 Praise him with trumpet sound: Praise him with psaltery and harp.150:4 Praise him with timbrel and dance: Praise him with stringed instruments and pipe.150:5 Praise him with loud cymbals: Praise him with high sounding cymbals.150:6 Let everything that has breath praise Yahweh.  Praise ye Yahweh.End of PsalmsProverbsChapter 11:1 The proverbs of Solomon the son of David, king of Israel:1:2 To know wisdom and instruction; to discern the words of understanding;1:3 To receive instruction in wise dealing, in righteousness and justice and equity;1:4 To give prudence to the simple, to the young man knowledge and discretion:1:5 That the wise man may hear, and increase in learning; and that the man of understanding may attain to sound counsels:1:6 To understand a proverb, and a figure, the words of the wise, and their dark sayings.1:7 The fear of Yahweh is the beginning of knowledge; but the foolish despise wisdom and instruction.1:8 My son, hear the instruction of your father, and forsake not the law of your mother:1:9 For they shall be a chaplet of grace to your head, and chains about your neck.1:10 My son, if sinners entice you, do not consent.1:11 If they say, Come with us, let us lay wait for blood; let us lurk secretly for the innocent without cause;1:12 Let us swallow them up alive as Sheol, and whole, as those that go down into the pit;1:13 We shall find all precious substance; we shall fill our houses with spoil;1:14 You shall cast your lot among us; we will have one common purse:1:15 My son, walk not in the way with them; refrain your foot from their path:1:16 For their feet run to evil, and they make haste to shed blood.1:17 For in vain is the net spread in the sight of any bird:1:18 And these lay wait for their own blood; they lurk stealthily for their own lives.1:19 Such are the ways of every one that is greedy for gain; it takes away the life of the owners thereof.1:20 Wisdom cries aloud in the street; she utters her voice in the broad places;1:21 She cries in the chief place of concourse; at the entrance of the gates, In the city, she utters her words:1:22 How long, ye simple ones, will ye love simplicity?  And scoffers delight themselves in scoffing, and fools hate knowledge?1:23 Turn yourselves at my reproof: Behold, I will pour out my spirit upon you; I will make known my words to you.1:24 For I have before called, and ye have refused.  I have stretched out my hand, and no one regarded;1:25 But rather ye have set at nought all my counsel, and wanted none of my reproof, 1:26 I then will laugh in the day of your calamity; I will mock when comes what you fear;1:27 when your fear comes as a storm, and your calamity comes on as a whirlwind; when distress and anguish come upon you.1:28 Then will they call upon me, but I will not answer; They will seek me diligently, but they shall not find me; 1:29 because they hated knowledge, and did not choose the fear of Yahweh:1:30 They would have none of my counsel; they despised all my reproof.1:31 Therefore shall they eat of the fruit of their own way, and be filled with the result of their own counsel.1:32 For the backsliding of the simple shall slay them, and the careless ease of fools shall destroy them.1:33 But whoso hearkens to me shall dwell securely, and be tranquil without fear of evil.Chapter 22:1 My son, if you will receive my words, and lay up my commandments with you;2:2 So as to incline your ear to wisdom, and apply your heart to understanding;2:3 Yes, if you cry after discernment, and lift up your voice for understanding;2:4 If you seek her as silver, and search for her as for hidden treasures:2:5 Then shall you understand the fear of Yahweh, and find the knowledge of God.2:6 For Yahweh gives wisdom; out of his mouth comes knowledge and understanding:2:7 He lays up sound wisdom for the upright; He is a shield to them that walk in integrity;2:8 That he may guard the paths of justice, and preserve the way of his saints.2:9 Then shall you understand righteousness and justice, and equity;  yes, every good path.2:10 For wisdom shall enter into your heart, and knowledge shall be pleasant to your soul;2:11 Discretion shall watch over you; understanding shall keep you:2:12 To deliver you from the way of the evil, from the men that speak perverse things;2:13 Who forsake the paths of uprightness, to walk in the ways of darkness;2:14 Who rejoice to do evil, and delight in the perverseness of evil;2:15 Who are crooked in their ways, and wayward in their paths:2:16 To deliver you from the prostitute, from the adulteress that flatters with her words;2:17 That forsakes the friend of her youth, and forgets the covenant of her God:2:18 For her house inclines toward death, and her paths to the dead;2:19 None that go to her ever return, Neither do they attain to the paths of life:2:20 That you may walk in the way of good men, and keep the paths of the righteous.2:21 For the upright shall dwell in the land, and the perfect shall remain in it.2:22 But the wicked shall be cut off from the land, and the treacherous shall be rooted out of it.Chapter 33:1 My son, forget not my law; But let your heart keep my commandments:3:2 For length of days, and years of life, and peace, will they add to you.3:3 Let not kindness and truth forsake you: Bind them about your neck; Write them upon the tablet of your heart:3:4 So shall you find favor and good understanding In the sight of God and man.3:5 Trust in Yahweh with all your heart, and lean not upon your own understanding:3:6 In all your ways acknowledge him, and he will direct your paths.3:7 Be not wise in your own eyes; Fear Yahweh, and depart from evil:3:8 It will be health to your navel, and marrow to your bones.3:9 Honor Yahweh with your substance, and with the first-fruits of all your increase:3:10 So shall your barns be filled with plenty, and your vats overflow with new wine.3:11 My son, despise not the chastening of Yahweh; neither be weary of his reproof:3:12 For whom Yahweh loves he reproves; just as a father the son in whom he delights.3:13 Happy is the man that finds wisdom, and the man that gets understanding.3:14 For the gaining of it is better than the gaining of silver, and the profit from it than fine gold.3:15 She is more precious than rubies: and none of the things you can desire are to be compared to her.3:16 Length of days is in her right hand; in her left hand are riches and honor.3:17 Her ways are ways of pleasantness, and all her paths are peace.3:18 She is a tree of life to them that lay hold upon her: and happy is every one that retains her.3:19 Yahweh by wisdom founded the earth.  By understanding he established the heavens.3:20 By his knowledge the depths were broken up, and the skies drop down the dew.3:21 My son, let them not depart from your eyes.  Keep sound wisdom and discretion:3:22 So shall they be life to your soul, and grace to your neck.3:23 Then shall you walk in your way securely, and your foot shall not stumble.3:24 When you lie down, you shall not be afraid.  Yes, you shall lie down, and your sleep shall be sweet.3:25 Be not afraid of sudden fear, neither of the desolation of the wicked, when it comes:3:26 For Yahweh will be your confidence, and keep your foot from being taken.3:27 Withhold not good from them to whom it is due, when it is in the power of your hand to do it.3:28 Say not to your neighbor, "Go, and come again, and tomorrow I will give," when you have it by you.3:29 Devise not evil against your neighbor, seeing he dwells securely by you.3:30 Strive not with a man without cause, if he has done you no harm.3:31 Envy not the man of violence, and choose none of his ways.3:32 For the perverse man is an abomination to Yahweh, but His friendship is with the upright.3:33 The curse of Yahweh is in the house of the wicked; but he blesses the habitation of the righteous.3:34 Surely He scoffs at the scoffers; but He gives grace to the lowly.3:35 The wise shall inherit glory; but shame shall be the promotion of fools.Chapter 44:1 Hear, my sons, the instruction of a father, and pay attention to know understanding:4:2 For I give you good doctrine; forsake ye not my law.4:3 For I was a son to my father, Tender and only beloved in the sight of my mother.4:4 And he taught me, and said to me: Let your heart retain my words; Keep my commandments, and live;4:5 Get wisdom, get understanding; Forget not, neither decline from the words of my mouth;4:6 Forsake her not, and she will preserve you; Love her, and she will keep you.4:7 Wisdom is the principal thing; therefore get wisdom; Yes, with all your getting get understanding.4:8 Exalt her, and she will promote you; She will bring you to honor, when you do embrace her.4:9 She will give to your head a chaplet of grace; A crown of beauty will she deliver to you.4:10 Hear, O my son, and receive my sayings; And the years of your life shall be many.4:11 I have taught you in the way of wisdom; I have led you in paths of uprightness.4:12 When you go, your steps shall not be straitened; And if you runnest, you shall not stumble.4:13 Take fast hold of instruction; let her not go: Keep her; for she is your life.4:14 Enter not into the path of the wicked, and walk not in the way of evil men.4:15 Avoid it, pass not by it; Turn from it, and pass on.4:16 For they sleep not, without first doing evil; and their sleep is taken away, unless they cause someone to fall.4:17 For they eat the bread of wickedness, and drink the wine of violence.4:18 But the path of the righteous is as the dawning light, that shines more and more to the perfect day.4:19 The way of the wicked is as darkness: they know not by what they stumble.4:20 My son, attend to my words; incline your ear to my sayings.4:21 Let them not depart from your eyes; keep them in the midst of your heart.4:22 For they are life to those that find them, and health to all their flesh.4:23 Keep your heart with all diligence; For out of it are the issues of life.4:24 Put away from you a wayward mouth, and perverse lips put far from you.4:25 Let your eyes look right on, and let your eyelids look straight before you.4:26 Make level the path of your feet, and let all your ways be established.4:27 Turn not to the right hand nor to the left: Remove your foot from evil.Chapter 55:1 My son, attend to my wisdom; incline your ear to my understanding:5:2 That you may preserve discretion, and your lips may keep knowledge.5:3 For the lips of a prostitute drop honey, and her mouth is smoother than oil:5:4 But in the end she is bitter as wormwood, sharp as a two-edged sword.5:5 Her feet go down to death; her steps take hold of Sheol;5:6 So that she finds not the level path of life: her ways are unstable, and she does not know it.5:7 Now therefore, my sons, hearken to me, and do not depart from the words of my mouth.5:8 Remove your way far from her, and come not near the door of her house;5:9 Lest you give your honor to others, and your years to the cruel;5:10 Lest strangers be filled with your wealth, and your labors go to the house of an alien,5:11 And you mourn at your latter end, when your flesh and your body are consumed,5:12 And say, How I hated instruction, and my heart despised reproof;5:13 Neither have I obeyed the voice of my teachers, nor inclined my ear to those who instructed me!5:14 I was almost in utter ruin in the midst of the assembly and congregation.5:15 Drink waters out of your own cistern, and running waters out of your own well.5:16 Should your springs be dispersed abroad, and streams of water in the streets?5:17 Let them be for yourself alone, and not for strangers with you.5:18 Let your fountain be blessed; and rejoice in the wife of your youth.5:19 as a loving deer and a pleasant doe, let her breasts satisfy you at all times; and be captivated always by her love.5:20 For why should you, my son, be captivated by a prostitute, and embrace the bosom of an adulteress?5:21 For the ways of man are before the eyes of Yahweh; and he consders all their paths.5:22 His own iniquities shall take the wicked, and he shall be holden with the cords of his sin.5:23 He shall die for lack of instruction; And in the greatness of his folly he shall go astray.Chapter 66:1 My son, if you are become surety for your neighbor, If you have stricken your hands for a stranger;6:2 You are snared with the words of your mouth, You are taken with the words of your mouth.6:3 Do this now, my son, and deliver yourself, Seeing you are come into the hand of your neighbor: Go, humble yourself, and importune your neighbor;6:4 Give not sleep to your eyes, Nor slumber to your eyelids;6:5 Deliver yourself as a roe from the hand of the hunter, and as a bird from the hand of the fowler.6:6 Go to the ant, you sluggard; Consider her ways, and be wise:6:7 Which having no chief, Overseer, or ruler,6:8 Provides her bread in the summer, and gathers her food in the harvest.6:9 How long will you sleep, O sluggard?  When will you arise out of your sleep?6:10 A little more sleep, a little more slumber, a little more folding of the hands to sleep:6:11 So shall your poverty come as a robber, and your want as an armed man.6:12 A worthless person, a man of iniquity, Is he that walks with a perverse mouth;6:13 That winks with his eyes, that speaks with his feet, That makes signs with his fingers;6:14 In whose heart is perverseness, who devises evil continually, who sows discord.6:15 Therefore shall his calamity come suddenly; On a sudden shall he be broken, and that without remedy.6:16 There are six things which Yahweh hates; Yes, seven which are an abomination to him:6:17 Haughty eyes, a lying tongue, and hands that shed innocent blood;6:18 A heart that devises wicked purposes, Feet that are swift in running to mischief,6:19 A false witness that utters lies, and he that sows discord among brethren.6:20 My son, keep the commandment of your father, and forsake not the law of your mother:6:21 Bind them continually upon your heart; Tie them about your neck.6:22 When you walk, it shall lead you; When you are sleeping, it shall watch over you; and when you are awake, it shall talk with you.6:23 For the commandment is a lamp; and the law is light; And reproofs of instruction are the way of life:6:24 To keep you from the evil woman, From the flattery of the foreigner's tongue.6:25 Lust not after her beauty in your heart; Neither let her take you with her eyelids.6:26 For on account of a harlot a man is reduced to a piece of bread; And the adulteress hunts for the precious life.6:27 Can a man take fire in his bosom, and his clothes not be burned?6:28 Or can one walk upon hot coals, and his feet not be scorched?6:29 So he that goes in to his neighbor's wife; Whosoever touches her shall not be unpunished.6:30 Men do not despise a thief, if he steal To satisfy himself when he is hungry:6:31 But if he be found, he shall restore sevenfold; He shall give all the substance of his house.6:32 He that commits adultery with a woman is void of understanding: He does it who would destroy his own soul.6:33 Wounds and dishonor shall he get; And his reproach shall not be wiped away.6:34 For jealousy is the rage of a man; And he will not spare in the day of vengeance.6:35 He will not regard any ransom; Neither will he rest content, though you give many gifts.Chapter 77:1 My son, keep my words, and lay up my commandments with you.7:2 Keep my commandments and live; And my law as the apple of your eye.7:3 Bind them upon your fingers; Write them upon the tablet of your heart.7:4 Say to wisdom, You are my sister; And call understanding your kinswoman:7:5 That they may keep you from the strange woman, From the foreigner that flatters with her words.7:6 For at the window of my house I looked forth through my lattice;7:7 And I beheld among the simple ones, I discerned among the youths, a young man void of understanding,7:8 Passing through the street near her corner; And he went the way to her house,7:9 In the twilight, in the evening of the day, In the middle of the night and in the darkness.7:10 And, behold, there met him a woman With the attire of a harlot, and wily of heart.7:11 She is clamorous and wilful; Her feet abide not in her house:7:12 Now she is in the streets, now in the broad places, and lies in wait at every corner.7:13 So she caught him, and kissed him, and with an impudent face she said to him:7:14 Sacrifices of peace offerings are with me; This day have I paid my vows.7:15 Therefore came I forth to meet you, Diligently to seek your face, and I have found you.7:16 I have spread my couch with carpets of tapestry, With striped cloths of the yarn of Egypt.7:17 I have perfumed my bed With myrrh, aloes, and cinnamon.7:18 Come, let us take our fill of love until the morning; Let us solace ourselves with loves.7:19 For the man is not at home; He is gone a long journey:7:20 He has taken a bag of money with him; He will come home at the full moon.7:21 With her much fair speech she causes him to yield; With the flattering of her lips she forces him along.7:22 He goes after her straightway, as an ox goes to the slaughter, Or as one in fetters to the correction of the fool;7:23 Till an arrow strike through his liver; As a bird rushes to the snare, and knows not that it is for his life.7:24 Now therefore, my sons, hearken to me, and attend to the words of my mouth.7:25 Let not your heart decline to her ways; Go not astray in her paths.7:26 For she has cast down many wounded: Yes, all her slain are a vast array.7:27 Her house is the way to Sheol, Going down to the chambers of death.Chapter 88:1 Does not wisdom cry, and understanding put forth her voice?8:2 On the top of high places by the way, Where the paths meet, she stands;8:3 Beside the gates, at the entry of the city, at the coming in at the doors, she cries aloud:8:4 To you, O men, I call; And my voice is to the sons of men.8:5 O ye simple, understand prudence; And, ye fools, be of an understanding heart.8:6 Hear, for I will speak excellent things; And the opening of my lips shall be right things.8:7 For my mouth shall utter truth; And wickedness is an abomination to my lips.8:8 All the words of my mouth are in righteousness; There is nothing crooked or perverse in them.8:9 They are all plain to him that understands, and right to them that find knowledge.8:10 Receive my instruction, and not silver; And knowledge rather than choice gold.8:11 For wisdom is better than rubies; And all the things that may be desired are not to be compared to it.8:12 I wisdom have made prudence my dwelling, and find out knowledge and discretion.8:13 The fear of Yahweh is to hate evil: Pride, and arrogancy, and the evil way, and the perverse mouth, do I hate.8:14 Counsel is mine, and sound knowledge: I am understanding; I have might.8:15 By me kings reign, and princes decree justice.8:16 By me princes rule, and nobles, even all the judges of the earth.8:17 I love them that love me; And those that seek me diligently shall find me.8:18 Riches and honor are with me; Yes, durable wealth and righteousness.8:19 My fruit is better than gold, yes, than fine gold; And my revenue than choice silver.8:20 I walk in the way of righteousness, In the midst of the paths of justice;8:21 That I may cause those that love me to inherit substance, and that I may fill their treasuries.8:22 Yahweh possessed me in the beginning of his way, Before his works of old.8:23 I was set up from everlasting, from the beginning, Before the earth was.8:24 When there were no depths, I was brought forth, When there were no fountains abounding with water.8:25 Before the mountains were settled, Before the hills was I brought forth;8:26 While as yet he had not made the earth, nor the fields, Nor the beginning of the dust of the world.8:27 When he established the heavens, I was there: When he set a circle upon the face of the deep,8:28 When he made firm the skies above, When the fountains of the deep became strong,8:29 When he gave to the sea its bound, That the waters should not transgress his commandment, When he marked out the foundations of the earth;8:30 Then I was by him, as a master workman; And I was daily his delight, Rejoicing always before him,8:31 Rejoicing in his habitable earth; And my delight was with the sons of men.8:32 Now therefore, my sons, hearken to me; For blessed are they that keep my ways.8:33 Hear instruction, and be wise, and refuse it not.8:34 Blessed is the man that hears me, Watching daily at my gates, Waiting at the posts of my doors.8:35 For whoso finds me finds life, and shall obtain favor of Yahweh.8:36 But he that sins against me wrongs his own soul: All they that hate me love death.Chapter 99:1 Wisdom has built her house; She has hewn out her seven pillars:9:2 She has killed her beasts; She has mingled her wine; She has also furnished her table:9:3 She has sent forth her maidens; She cries upon the highest places of the city:9:4 Whoso is simple, let him turn in here: As for him that is void of understanding, she says to him,9:5 Come, eat ye of my bread, and drink of the wine which I have mingled.9:6 Leave off, ye simple ones, and live; And walk in the way of understanding.9:7 He who corrects a scoffer gains for himself reviling, and who reproves a wicked man, a blot.9:8 Reprove not a scoffer, lest he hate you: Reprove a wise man, and he will love you.9:9 Give instruction to a wise man, and he will be yet wiser: Teach a righteous man, and he will increase in learning.9:10 The fear of Yahweh is the beginning of wisdom; And the knowledge of the Holy One is understanding.9:11 For by me your days shall be multiplied, and the years of your life shall be increased.9:12 If you are wise, you are wise for yourself; And if you scoffest, you alone shall bear it.9:13 The foolish woman is clamorous; She is simple, and knows nothing.9:14 And she sits at the door of her house, On a seat in the high places of the city,9:15 To call to them that pass by, Who go right on their ways:9:16 Whoso is simple, let him turn in here; And as for him that is void of understanding, she says to him,9:17 Stolen waters are sweet, and bread eaten in secret is pleasant.9:18 But he knows not that the dead are there; That her guests are in the depths of Sheol.Chapter 1010:1 The proverbs of Solomon.  A wise son makes a glad father; But a foolish son is the heaviness of his mother.10:2 Treasures of wickedness profit nothing; But righteousness delivers from death.10:3 Yahweh will not allow the soul of the righteous to famish; But he thrusts away the desire of the wicked.10:4 He becomes poor that works with a slack hand; But the hand of the diligent makes rich.10:5 He that gathers in summer is a wise son; But he that sleeps in harvest is a son that causes shame.10:6 Blessings are upon the head of the righteous; But violence covers the mouth of the wicked.10:7 The memory of the righteous is blessed; But the name of the wicked shall rot.10:8 The wise in heart will receive commandments; But a prating fool shall fall.10:9 He that walks uprightly walks surely; But he that perverts his ways shall be known.10:10 He that winks with the eye causes sorrow; But a prating fool shall fall.10:11 The mouth of the righteous is a fountain of life; But violence covers the mouth of the wicked.10:12 Hatred stirs up strifes; But love covers all transgressions.10:13 In the lips of him that has discernment wisdom is found; But a rod is for the back of him that is void of understanding.10:14 Wise men lay up knowledge; But the mouth of the foolish is a present destruction.10:15 The rich man's wealth is his strong city: The destruction of the poor is their poverty.10:16 The labor of the righteous tends to life; The increase of the wicked, to sin.10:17 He is in the way of life that heeds correction; But he that forsakes reproof errs.10:18 He that hides hatred is of lying lips; And he that utters a slander is a fool.10:19 In the multitude of words there lacks not transgression; But he that refrains his lips does wisely.10:20 The tongue of the righteous is as choice silver: The heart of the wicked is little worth.10:21 The lips of the righteous feed many; But the foolish die for lack of understanding.10:22 The blessing of Yahweh, it makes rich; And he adds no sorrow with it.10:23 It is as sport to a fool to do wickedness; And so is wisdom to a man of understanding.10:24 The fear of the wicked, it shall come upon him; And the desire of the righteous shall be granted.10:25 When the whirlwind passes, the wicked is no more; But the righteous is an everlasting foundation.10:26 As vinegar to the teeth, and as smoke to the eyes, So is the sluggard to them that send him.10:27 The fear of Yahweh prolongs days; But the years of the wicked shall be shortened.10:28 The hope of the righteous shall be gladness; But the expectation of the wicked shall perish.10:29 The way of Yahweh is a stronghold to the upright; But it is a destruction to the workers of iniquity.10:30 The righteous shall never be removed; But the wicked shall not dwell in the land.10:31 The mouth of the righteous brings forth wisdom; But the perverse tongue shall be cut off.10:32 The lips of the righteous know what is acceptable; But the mouth of the wicked speaks perverseness.Chapter 1111:1 A false balance is an abomination to Yahweh; But a just weight is his delight.11:2 When pride comes, then comes shame; But with the lowly is wisdom.11:3 The integrity of the upright shall guide them; But the perverseness of the treacherous shall destroy them.11:4 Riches profit not in the day of wrath; But righteousness delivers from death.11:5 The righteousness of the perfect shall direct his way; But the wicked shall fall by his own wickedness.11:6 The righteousness of the upright shall deliver them; But the treacherous shall be taken in their own iniquity.11:7 When a wicked man dies, his expectation shall perish; And the hope of iniquity perishes.11:8 The righteous is delivered out of trouble, and the wicked comes in his stead.11:9 With his mouth the godless man destroys his neighbor; But through knowledge shall the righteous be delivered.11:10 When it goes well with the righteous, the city rejoices; And when the wicked perish, there is shouting.11:11 By the blessing of the upright the city is exalted; but it is overthrown by the mouth of the wicked.11:12 He that despises his neighbor is void of wisdom; but a man of understanding holds his peace.11:13 He that goes about as a tale-bearer reveals secrets; but he that is of a faithful spirit conceals a matter.11:14 Where no wise guidance is, the people falls; but in the multitude of counsellors there is safety.11:15 He that is surety for a stranger shall smart for it; but he that hates suretyship is secure.11:16 A gracious woman obtains honor; And violent men obtain riches.11:17 The merciful man does good to his own soul; But he that is cruel troubles his own flesh.11:18 The wicked earns deceitful wages; But he that sows righteousness has a sure reward.11:19 He that is stedfast in righteousness shall attain to life; And he that pursues evil does it to his own death.11:20 They that are perverse in heart are an abomination to Yahweh; But such as are perfect in their way are his delight.11:21 Though hand join in hand, the evil man shall not be unpunished; But the seed of the righteous shall be delivered.11:22 as a ring of gold in a swine's snout, So is a fair woman that is without discretion.11:23 The desire of the righteous is only good; But the expectation of the wicked is wrath.11:24 There is that scatters, and increases yet more; And there is that withholds more than is proper, but it tends only to want.11:25 The liberal soul shall be made fat; And he that waters shall be watered also himself.11:26 He that withholds grain, the people shall curse him; But blessing shall be upon the head of him that sells it.11:27 He that diligently seeks good seeks favor; But he that searches after evil, it shall come to him.11:28 He that trusts in his riches shall fall; But the righteous shall flourish as the green leaf.11:29 He that troubles his own house shall inherit the wind; And the foolish shall be servant to the wise of heart.11:30 The fruit of the righteous is a tree of life; And he that is wise wins souls.11:31 Behold, the righteous shall be recompensed in the earth: How much more the wicked and the sinner!Chapter 1212:1 Whoso loves correction loves knowledge; But he that hates reproof is brutish.12:2 A good man shall obtain favor of Yahweh; But a man of wicked devices will he condemn.12:3 A man shall not be established by wickedness; But the root of the righteous shall not be moved.12:4 A worthy woman is the crown of her husband; But she that makes ashamed is as rottenness in his bones.12:5 The thoughts of the righteous are just; But the counsels of the wicked are deceit.12:6 The words of the wicked are of lying in wait for blood; But the mouth of the upright shall deliver them.12:7 The wicked are overthrown, and are not; But the house of the righteous shall stand.12:8 A man shall be commended according to his wisdom; But he that is of a perverse heart shall be despised.12:9 Better is he that is lightly esteemed, and has a servant, Than he that honors himself, and lacks bread.12:10 A righteous man regards the life of his beast; But the tender mercies of the wicked are cruel.12:11 He that tills his land shall have plenty of bread; But he that follows after vain persons is void of understanding.12:12 The wicked desires the net of evil men; But the root of the righteous yields fruit.12:13 In the transgression of the lips is a snare to the evil man; But the righteous shall come out of trouble.12:14 A man shall be satisfied with good by the fruit of his mouth; And the doings of a man's hands shall be rendered to him.12:15 The way of a fool is right in his own eyes; But he that is wise hearkens to counsel.12:16 A fool's vexation is presently known; But a prudent man conceals shame.12:17 He that utters truth shows forth righteousness; But a false witness, deceit.12:18 There is that speaks rashly like the piercings of a sword; But the tongue of the wise is health.12:19 The lip of truth shall be established for ever; But a lying tongue is but for a moment.12:20 Deceit is in the heart of them that devise evil; But to the counsellors of peace is joy.12:21 There shall no mischief happen to the righteous; But the wicked shall be filled with evil.12:22 Lying lips are an abomination to Yahweh; But they that deal truly are his delight.12:23 A prudent man conceals knowledge; But the heart of fools proclaims foolishness.12:24 The hand of the diligent shall bear rule; But the slothful shall be put under taskwork.12:25 Heaviness in the heart of a man makes it stoop; But a good word makes it glad.12:26 The righteous is a guide to his neighbor; But the way of the wicked causes them to err.12:27 The slothful man roasts not that which he took in hunting; But the precious substance of men is to the diligent.12:28 In the way of righteousness is life; And in the pathway thereof there is no death.Chapter 1313:1 A wise son listens to his father's instruction; But a scoffer hears not rebuke.13:2 A man shall eat good by the fruit of his mouth; But the soul of the treacherous shall eat violence.13:3 He that guards his mouth keeps his life; But he that opens wide his lips shall have destruction.13:4 The soul of the sluggard desires, and has nothing; But the soul of the diligent shall be made fat.13:5 A righteous man hates lying; But a wicked man is loathsome, and comes to shame.13:6 Righteousness guards him that is upright in the way; But wickedness overthrows the sinner.13:7 There is that makes himself rich, yet has nothing: There is that makes himself poor, yet has great wealth.13:8 The ransom of a man's life is his riches; But the poor hears no threatening.13:9 The light of the righteous rejoices; But the lamp of the wicked shall be put out.13:10 By pride comes only contention; But with the well-advised is wisdom.13:11 Wealth gotten by vanity shall be diminished; But he that gathers by labor shall have increase.13:12 Hope deferred makes the heart sick; But when the desire comes, it is a tree of life.13:13 Whoso despises the word brings destruction on himself; But he that fears the commandment shall be rewarded.13:14 The law of the wise is a fountain of life, That one may depart from the snares of death.13:15 Good understanding gives favor; But the way of the transgressor is hard.13:16 Every prudent man works with knowledge; But a fool flaunts his folly.13:17 A wicked messenger falls into evil; But a faithful ambassador is health.13:18 Poverty and shame shall be to him that refuses correction; But he that regards reproof shall be honored.13:19 The desire accomplished is sweet to the soul; But it is an abomination to fools to depart from evil.13:20 Walk with wise men, and you shall be wise; But the companion of fools shall smart for it.13:21 Evil pursues sinners; But the righteous shall be recompensed with good.13:22 A good man leaves an inheritance to his children's children; And the wealth of the sinner is laid up for the righteous.13:23 Much food is in the tillage of the poor; But there is that is destroyed by reason of injustice.13:24 He that spares his rod hates his son; But he that loves him chastens him betimes.13:25 The righteous person eats to the satisfying of his soul; But the belly of the wicked shall want.Chapter 1414:1 Every wise woman builds her house; But the foolish plucks it down with her own hands.14:2 He that walks in his uprightness fears Yahweh; But he that is perverse in his ways despises him.14:3 In the mouth of the foolish is a rod for his pride; But the lips of the wise shall preserve them.14:4 Where no oxen are, the crib is clean; But much increase is by the strength of the ox.14:5 A faithful witness will not lie; But a false witness utters lies.14:6 A scoffer seeks wisdom, and finds it not; But knowledge is easy to him that has understanding.14:7 Go into the presence of a foolish man, and you shall not perceive in him the lips of knowledge.14:8 The wisdom of the prudent is to understand his way; But the folly of fools is deceit.14:9 A trespass offering mocks fools; But among the upright there is good will.14:10 The heart knows its own bitterness; And a stranger does not intermeddle with its joy.14:11 The house of the wicked shall be overthrown; But the tent of the upright shall flourish.14:12 There is a way which seems right to a man; But the end thereof are the ways of death.14:13 Even in laughter the heart is sorrowful; and the end of mirth is heaviness.14:14 The backslider in heart shall be filled with his own ways; And a good man shall be satisfied from himself.14:15 The simple believes every word; But the prudent man looks well to his going.14:16 A wise man fears, and departs from evil; But the fool bears himself insolently, and is confident.14:17 He that is soon angry will deal foolishly; And a man of wicked devices is hated.14:18 The simple inherit folly; But the prudent are crowned with knowledge.14:19 The evil bow down before the good; And the wicked, at the gates of the righteous.14:20 The poor is hated even of his own neighbor; But the rich has many friends.14:21 He that despises his neighbor sins; But he that has pity on the poor, happy is he.14:22 Do they not err that devise evil?  But mercy and truth shall be to them that devise good.14:23 In all labor there is profit; But the talk of the lips tends only to penury.14:24 The crown of the wise is their riches; But the folly of fools is only folly.14:25 A true witness delivers souls; But he that utters lies causes deceit.14:26 In the fear of Yahweh is strong confidence; And his children shall have a place of refuge.14:27 The fear of Yahweh is a fountain of life, That one may depart from the snares of death.14:28 In the multitude of people is the king's glory; But in the want of people is the destruction of the prince.14:29 He that is slow to anger is of great understanding; But he that is hasty of spirit exalts folly.14:30 A tranquil heart is the life of the flesh; but envy is the rottenness of the bones.14:31 He that oppresses the poor reproaches his Maker; But he that has mercy on the needy honors him.14:32 The wicked is thrust down in his evil-doing; But the righteous has a refuge in his death.14:33 Wisdom rests in the heart of him that has understanding; But that which is in the inward part of fools is made known.14:34 Righteousness exalts a nation; But sin is a reproach to any people.14:35 The king's favor is toward a servant that deals wisely; But his wrath will be against him that causes shame.Chapter 1515:1 A soft answer turns away wrath; But a grievous word stirs up anger.15:2 The tongue of the wise utters knowledge aright; But the mouth of fools pours out folly.15:3 The eyes of Yahweh are in every place, Keeping watch upon the evil and the good.15:4 A gentle tongue is a tree of life; But perverseness in it is a breaking of the spirit.15:5 A fool despises his father's correction; But he that regards reproof gains prudence.15:6 In the house of the righteous is much treasure; But in the revenues of the wicked is trouble.15:7 The lips of the wise disperse knowledge; But the heart of the foolish not so.15:8 The sacrifice of the wicked is an abomination to Yahweh; But the prayer of the upright is his delight.15:9 The way of the wicked is an abomination to Yahweh; But he loves him that follows after righteousness.15:10 There is grievous correction for him that forsakes the way; And he that hates reproof shall die.15:11 Sheol and Abaddon are before Yahweh: How much more then the hearts of the children of men!15:12 A scoffer loves not to be reproved; He will not go to the wise.15:13 A glad heart makes a cheerful countenance; But by sorrow of heart the spirit is broken.15:14 The heart of him that has understanding seeks knowledge; But the mouth of fools feeds on folly.15:15 All the days of the afflicted are evil; But he that is of a cheerful heart has a continual feast.15:16 Better is little, with the fear of Yahweh, Than great treasure and trouble along with it.15:17 Better is a dinner of herbs, where love is, Than a stalled ox and hatred with it.15:18 A wrathful man stirs up contention; But he that is slow to anger appeases strife.15:19 The way of the sluggard is like a hedge of thorns; But the path of the upright is made a highway.15:20 A wise son makes a glad father; But a foolish man despises his mother.15:21 Folly is joy to him that is void of wisdom;  But a man of understanding makes straight his going.15:22 Where there is no counsel, plans are disappointed; But in the multitude of counsellors they are established.15:23 A man has joy in the answer of his mouth; And a word in due season, how good it is!15:24 To the wise the way of life goes upward, That he may depart from Sheol beneath.15:25 Yahweh will root up the house of the proud; But he will establish the border of the widow.15:26 Evil devices are an abomination to Yahweh; But pleasant words are pure.15:27 He that is greedy of gain troubles his own house; But he that hates bribes shall live.15:28 The heart of the righteous studies to answer; But the mouth of the wicked pours out evil things.15:29 Yahweh is far from the wicked; But he hears the prayer of the righteous.15:30 The light of the eyes rejoices the heart; And good tidings make the bones fat.15:31 The ear that hearkens to the reproof of life Shall abide among the wise.15:32 He that refuses correction despises his own soul; But he that hearkens to reproof gains understanding.15:33 The fear of Yahweh is the instruction of wisdom; And before honor goes humility.Chapter 1616:1 The plans of the heart belong to man; But the answer of the tongue is from Yahweh.16:2 All the ways of a man are clean in his own eyes; But Yahweh weighs the spirits.16:3 Commit your works to Yahweh, and your purposes shall be established.16:4 Yahweh has made everything for its own end; Yes, even the wicked for the day of evil.16:5 Every one that is proud in heart is an abomination to Yahweh: Though hand join in hand, he shall not be unpunished.16:6 By mercy and truth iniquity is atoned for; And by the fear of Yahweh men depart from evil.16:7 When a man's ways please Yahweh, He makes even his enemies to be at peace with him.16:8 Better is a little, with righteousness, Than great revenues with injustice.16:9 A man's heart devises his way; But Yahweh directs his steps.16:10 A divine sentence is in the lips of the king; His mouth shall not transgress in judgment.16:11 A just balance and scales are Yahweh's; All the weights of the bag are his work.16:12 It is an abomination to kings to commit wickedness; For the throne is established by righteousness.16:13 Righteous lips are the delight of kings; And they love the one who speaks right.16:14 The wrath of a king is as messengers of death; But a wise man will pacify it.16:15 In the light of the king's countenance is life; And his favor is as a cloud of the latter rain.16:16 How much better is it to get wisdom than gold! Yes, to get understanding is rather to be chosen than silver.16:17 The highway of the upright is to depart from evil: He that keeps his way preserves his soul.16:18 Pride comes before destruction, and a haughty spirit before a fall.16:19 Better it is to be of a lowly spirit with the poor, Than to divide the spoil with the proud.16:20 He that gives heed to the word shall find good; And whoever trusts in Yahweh, happy is he.16:21 The wise in heart shall be called prudent; And the sweetness of the lips increases learning.16:22 Understanding is a well-spring of life to the one who has it; But the correction of fools is their folly.16:23 The heart of the wise instructs his mouth, and adds learning to his lips.16:24 Pleasant words are as a honeycomb, Sweet to the soul, and health to the bones.16:25 There is a way which seems right to a man, But the end thereof are the ways of death.16:26 The appetite of the laboring man labors for him; For his mouth urges him to it.16:27 A worthless man devises mischief; And in his lips there is as a scorching fire.16:28 A perverse man scatters abroad strife; And a whisperer separates best friends.16:29 A man of violence entices his neighbor, and leads him in a way that is not good.16:30 He that shuts his eyes, it is to devise perverse things: He that compresses his lips brings evil to pass.16:31 The gray head is a crown of glory; It shall be found in the way of righteousness.16:32 He that is slow to anger is better than the mighty; And he that rules his spirit, than he that takes a city.16:33 The lot is cast into the lap; But the whole disposing thereof is of Yahweh.Chapter 1717:1 Better is a dry morsel, and quietness with it, Than a house full of feasting with strife.17:2 A servant that deals wisely shall have rule over a son that causes shame, and shall have part in the inheritance among the brethren.17:3 The refining pot is for silver, and the furnace for gold; But Yahweh tries the hearts.17:4 An evil-doer gives heed to wicked lips; And a liar gives ear to a mischievous tongue.17:5 Whoso mocks the poor reproaches his Maker; And he that is glad at calamity shall not be unpunished.17:6 Children's children are the crown of old men; And the glory of children are their fathers.17:7 Excellent speech does not fit a fool; Much less do lying lips a prince.17:8 A bribe is as a precious stone in the eyes of him that has it; Wherever it turns, it prospers.17:9 He that covers a transgression seeks love; But he that harps on a matter separates best friends.17:10 A rebukeenters deeper into one that has understanding Than a hundred stripes into a fool.17:11 An evil man seeks only rebellion; Therefore a cruel messenger shall be sent against him.17:12 Let a bear robbed of her cubs meet a man, Rather than a fool in his folly.17:13 Whoso rewards evil for good, Evil shall not depart from his house.17:14 The beginning of strife is as when one lets out water: Therefore leave off contention, before there is quarrelling.17:15 He that justifies the wicked, and he that condemns the righteous, Both of them alike are an abomination to Yahweh.17:16 Why is there a price in the hand of a fool to buy wisdom, Seeing he has no understanding?17:17 A friend loves at all times; And a brother is born for adversity.17:18 A man void of understanding srikes hands, and becomes surety in the presence of his neighbor.17:19 He loves transgression that loves strife: He that raises high his gate seeks destruction.17:20 He that has a wayward heart finds no good; And he that has a perverse tongue falls into mischief.17:21 He that begets a fool does it to his sorrow; And the father of a fool has no joy.17:22 A cheerful heart is a good medicine; But a broken spirit dries up the bones.17:23 A wicked man receives a bribe in secret, To pervert the ways of justice.17:24 Wisdom is before the face of him that has understanding; But the eyes of a fool are in the ends of the earth.17:25 A foolish son is a grief to his father, and bitterness to her that bore him.17:26 Also to punish the righteous is not good, Nor to strike the noble for their uprightness.17:27 He who restrains his words has knowledge; and he who has a cool spirit is a man of understanding.17:28 Even a fool, when he keeps silent, is counted wise.  When he closes his lips, he is considered intelligent.Chapter 1818:1 He that separates himself seeks his own desire, and rages against all sound wisdom.18:2 A fool has no delight in understanding, But only that his heart may reveal itself.18:3 When the wicked comes, there comes also contempt, and with ignominy comes reproach.18:4 The words of a man's mouth are as deep waters; The wellspring of wisdom is as a flowing brook.18:5 To respect the person of the wicked is not good, Nor to turn aside the righteous in judgment.18:6 A fool's lips enter into contention, and his mouth calls for stripes.18:7 A fool's mouth is his destruction, and his lips are the snare of his soul.18:8 The words of a whisperer are as dainty morsels, and they go down into the innermost parts.18:9 He also that is slack in his work Is brother to him that is a destroyer.18:10 The name of Yahweh is a strong tower; The righteous runs into it, and is safe.18:11 The rich man's wealth is his strong city, and as a high wall in his own imagination.18:12 Before destruction the heart of man is haughty; And before honor goes humility.18:13 He that gives answer before he hears, It is folly and shame to him.18:14 The spirit of a man will sustain his infirmity; But a broken spirit who can bear?18:15 The heart of the prudent gets knowledge; And the ear of the wise seeks knowledge.18:16 A man's gift makes room for him, and brings him before great men.18:17 He that pleads his cause first seems just; But his neighbor comes and searches him out.18:18 The lot causes contentions to cease, and parts between the mighty.18:19 A brother offended is harder to be won than a strong city; And such contentions are like the bars of a castle.18:20 A man's belly shall be filled with the fruit of his mouth; With the increase of his lips shall he be satisfied.18:21 Death and life are in the power of the tongue; And they that love it shall eat the fruit thereof.18:22 Whoso finds a wife finds a good thing, and obtains favor from Yahweh.18:23 The poor uses entreaties; But the rich answers roughly.18:24 He that makes many friends does it to his own destruction; But there is a friend that sticks closer than a brother.Chapter 1919:1 Better is the poor person who walks in his integrity than he who is perverse in his lips and is a fool.19:2 Also, that enthusiasm without knowledge is not good; and he that rushes with his feet will err.19:3 The foolishness of man subverts his way; And his heart frets against Yahweh.19:4 Wealth adds many friends; But the poor is separated from his friend.19:5 A false witness shall not be unpunished; And he that utters lies shall not escape.19:6 Many will entreat the favor of the liberal man; And every man is a friend to him that gives gifts.19:7 All the brethren of the poor do hate him: How much more do his friends go far from him! He pursues them with words, but they are gone.19:8 He that obtains wisdom loves his own soul: He that keeps understanding shall find good.19:9 A false witness shall not be unpunished; And he that utters lies shall perish.19:10 Delicate living is not seemly for a fool; Much less for a servant to have rule over princes.19:11 The discretion of a man makes him slow to anger; And it is his glory to pass over a transgression.19:12 The king's wrath is as the roaring of a lion; But his favor is as dew upon the grass.19:13 A foolish son is the calamity of his father; And the contentions of a wife are a continual dropping.19:14 House and riches are an inheritance from fathers; But a prudent wife is from Yahweh.19:15 Slothfulness casts into a deep sleep; And the idle soul shall suffer hunger.19:16 He that keeps the commandment keeps his soul; But he that is careless of his ways shall die.19:17 He that has pity upon the poor lends to Yahweh, and his good deed will he pay him again.19:18 Chasten your son, seeing there is hope;  nd set not your heart on his destruction.19:19 A man of great wrath shall bear the penalty; For if you deliver him, you must do it yet again.19:20 Hear counsel, and receive instruction, That you may be wise in your latter end.19:21 There are many devices in a man's heart; But the counsel of Yahweh, that shall stand.19:22 That which makes a man to be desired is his kindness; And a poor man is better than a liar.19:23 The fear of Yahweh tends to life; And he that has it shall abide satisfied; He shall not be visited with evil.19:24 The sluggard buries his hand in the dish, and will not so much as bring it to his mouth again.19:25 Smite a scoffer, and the simple will learn prudence; And reprove one that has understanding, and he will understand knowledge.19:26 He that does violence to his father, and chases away his mother, Is a son that causes shame and brings reproach.19:27 Cease, my son, to hear instruction Only to err from the words of knowledge.19:28 A worthless witness mocks at justice; And the mouth of the wicked swallows iniquity.19:29 Judgments are prepared for scoffers, and stripes for the back of fools.Chapter 2020:1 Wine is a mocker, strong drink a brawler; And whosoever errs thereby is not wise.20:2 The terror of a king is as the roaring of a lion: He that provokes him to anger sins against his own life.20:3 It is an honor for a man to keep aloof from strife; But every fool will be quarrelling.20:4 The sluggard will not plow by reason of the winter; Therefore he shall beg in harvest, and have nothing.20:5 Counsel in the heart of man is like deep water; But a man of understanding will draw it out.20:6 Most men will proclaim every one his own kindness; But a faithful man who can find?20:7 A righteous man that walks in his integrity, Blessed are his children after him.20:8 A king that sits on the throne of judgment Scatters away all evil with his eyes.20:9 Who can say, I have made my heart clean, I am pure from my sin?20:10 Differing weights, and differing measures, Both of them alike are an abomination to Yahweh.20:11 Even a child makes himself known by his doings, Whether his work be pure, and whether it is right.20:12 The hearing ear, and the seeing eye, Yahweh has made even both of them.20:13 Love not sleep, let you come to poverty; Open your eyes, and you shall be satisfied with bread.20:14 It is bad, it is bad, says the buyer; But when he is gone his way, then he boasts.20:15 There is gold, and abundance of rubies; But the lips of knowledge are a precious jewel.20:16 Take his garment that is surety for a stranger; And hold him in pledge that is surety for foreigners.20:17 Bread of falsehood is sweet to a man; But afterwards his mouth shall be filled with gravel.20:18 Every purpose is established by counsel; And by wise guidance should you make war.20:19 He who goes around as a tale-bearer reveals secrets; Therefore keep not company with him who opens wide his lips.20:20 Whoso curses his father or his mother, His lamp shall be put out in blackness of darkness.20:21 An inheritance may be gotten hastily at the beginning; But the end thereof shall not be blessed.20:22 Say not you, I will recompense evil: Wait for Yahweh, and he will save you.20:23 Diverse weights are an abomination to Yahweh; And a false balance is not good.20:24 A man's goings are of Yahweh; How then can man understand his way?20:25 It is a snare to a man rashly to say, It is holy, and after vows to make inquiry.20:26 A wise king winnows the wicked, and brings the threshing-wheel over them.20:27 The spirit of man is the lamp of Yahweh, Searching all his innermost parts.20:28 Kindness and truth preserve the king; And his throne is upholden by kindness.20:29 The glory of young men is their strength; And the beauty of old men is the gray head.20:30 Stripes that wound cleanse away evil; And strokes reach the innermost parts.Chapter 2121:1 The king's heart is in the hand of Yahweh as the watercourses: He turns it wherever he will.21:2 Every way of a man is right in his own eyes; But Yahweh weighs the hearts.21:3 To do righteousness and justice Is more acceptable to Yahweh than sacrifice.21:4 A high look, and a proud heart, even the lamp of the wicked, is sin.21:5 The thoughts of the diligent tend only to plenteousness; But every one that is hasty speeds only to want.21:6 The getting of treasures by a lying tongue Is a vapor driven to and fro by them that seek death.21:7 The violence of the wicked shall sweep them away, Because they refuse to do justice.21:8 The way of him that is laden with guilt is exceedingly crooked; But as for the pure, his work is right.21:9 It is better to dwell in the corner of the housetop, Than with a contentious woman in a wide house.21:10 The soul of the wicked desires evil: His neighbor finds no favor in his eyes.21:11 When the scoffer is punished, the simple is made wise; And when the wise is instructed, he receives knowledge.21:12 The righteous man considers the house of the wicked, How the wicked are overthrown to their ruin.21:13 Whoso stops his ears at the cry of the poor, He also shall cry, but shall not be heard.21:14 A gift in secret pacifies anger; And a present in the bosom, strong wrath.21:15 It is joy to the righteous to do justice; But it is a destruction to the workers of iniquity.21:16 The man that wanders out of the way of understanding Shall rest in the assembly of the dead.21:17 He that loves pleasure shall be a poor man: He that loves wine and oil shall not be rich.21:18 The wicked are a ransom for the righteous; And the treacherous come in the stead of the upright.21:19 It is better to dwell in a desert land, Than with a contentious and fretful woman.21:20 There is precious treasure and oil in the dwelling of the wise; But a foolish man swallows it up.21:21 He that follows after righteousness and kindness finds life, righteousness, and honor.21:22 A wise man scales the city of the mighty, and brings down the stronghold that inspires its confidence.21:23 Whoso keeps his mouth and his tongue keeps his soul from troubles.21:24 The proud and haughty man, scoffer is his name; He works in the arrogance of pride.21:25 The desire of the sluggard kills him; For his hands refuse to labor.21:26 There is that covets greedily all the day long; But the righteous gives and withholds not.21:27 The sacrifice of the wicked is an abomination: How much more, when he brings it with a wicked mind!21:28 A false witness shall perish; But the man that hears shall speak so as to endure.21:29 A wicked man hardens his face; But as for the upright, he establishes his ways.21:30 There is no wisdom nor understanding Nor counsel against Yahweh.21:31 The horse is prepared against the day of battle; But victory is of Yahweh.Chapter 2222:1 A good name is rather to be chosen than great riches, and loving favor rather than silver and gold.22:2 The rich and the poor meet together: Yahweh is the maker of them all.22:3 A prudent man sees the evil, and hides himself; But the simple pass on, and suffer for it.22:4 The reward of humility and the fear of Yahweh is riches, and honor, and life.22:5 Thorns and snares are in the way of the perverse: He that keeps his soul shall be far from them.22:6 Train up a child in the way he should go, and even when he is old he will not depart from it.22:7 The rich rule over the poor; And the borrower is servant to the lender.22:8 He that sows iniquity shall reap calamity; And the rod of his wrath shall fail.22:9 He that has a bountiful eye shall be blessed; For he gives of his bread to the poor.22:10 Cast out the scoffer, and contention will go out; Yes, strife and ignominy will cease.22:11 He that loves pureness of heart, For the grace of his lips the king will be his friend.22:12 The eyes of Yahweh preserve him that has knowledge; But he overthrows the words of the treacherous man.22:13 The sluggard says, There is a lion outside: I shall be slain in the streets.22:14 The mouth of a strange woman is a deep pit: He that is abhorred of Yahweh shall fall in it.22:15 Foolishness is bound up in the heart of a child; But the rod of correction shall drive it far from him.22:16 He that oppresses the poor to increase his gain, and he that gives to the rich, shall come only to want.22:17 Incline your ear, and hear the words of the wise, and apply your heart to my knowledge.22:18 For it is a pleasant thing if you keep them within you, If they be established together upon your lips.22:19 That your trust may be in Yahweh, I have made them known to you this day, even to you.22:20 Have not I written to you excellent things Of counsels and knowledge,22:21 To make you know the certainty of the words of truth, That you may carry back words of truth to them that send you?22:22 Rob not the poor, because he is poor; Neither oppress the afflicted in the gate:22:23 For Yahweh will plead their cause, and despoil of life those that despoil them.22:24 Make no friendship with a man that is given to anger; And with a wrathful man you shall not go:22:25 Lest you learn this ways, and get a snare to your soul.22:26 Be you not one of them that strike hands, Or of them that are sureties for debts.22:27 If you have not with which to pay, Why should he take away your bed from under you?22:28 Remove not the ancient landmark, Which your fathers have set.22:29 See you a man diligent in his business?  he shall stand before kings; He shall not stand before mean men.Chapter 2323:1 When you sit to eat with a ruler, Consider diligently him that is before you;23:2 And put a knife to your throat, If you be a man given to appetite.23:3 Be not desirous of his dainties; Seeing they are deceitful food.23:4 Weary not yourself to be rich; Cease from your own wisdom.23:5 Will you set your eyes upon that which is not?  For riches certainly make themselves wings, Like an eagle that flies toward heaven.23:6 Eat you not the bread of him that has an evil eye, Neither desire you his dainties:23:7 For as he thinks within himself, so is he: Eat and drink, says he to you; but his heart is not with you.23:8 The morsel which you have eaten shall you vomit up, and lose your sweet words.23:9 Speak not in the hearing of a fool; For he will despise the wisdom of your words.23:10 Remove not the ancient landmark; And enter not into the fields of the fatherless:23:11 For their Redeemer is strong; He will plead their cause against you.23:12 Apply your heart to instruction, and your ears to the words of knowledge.23:13 Withhold not correction from the child; For if you beat him with the rod, he will not die.23:14 You shall beat him with the rod, and shall deliver his soul from Sheol.23:15 My son, if your heart be wise, My heart will be glad, even mine:23:16 Yes, my heart will rejoice, When your lips speak right things.23:17 Let not your heart envy sinners; But be in the fear of Yahweh all the day long:23:18 For surely there is a reward; And your hope shall not be cut off.23:19 Hear you, my son, and be wise, and guide your heart in the way.23:20 Be not among winebibbers, among gluttonous eaters of flesh:23:21 For the drunkard and the glutton shall come to poverty; And drowsiness will clothe a man with rags.23:22 Hearken to your father that begat you, and despise not your mother when she is old.23:23 Buy the truth, and sell it not; Yes, wisdom, and instruction, and understanding.23:24 The father of the righteous will greatly rejoice; And he that begets a wise child will have joy of him.23:25 Let your father and your mother be glad, and let her that bore you rejoice.23:26 My son, give me your heart; And let your eyes delight in my ways.23:27 For a harlot is a deep ditch; And a foreign woman is a narrow pit.23:28 Yes, she lies in wait as a robber, and increases the treacherous among men.23:29 Who has woe?  who has sorrow?  who has contentions?  Who has complaining?  who has wounds without cause?  Who has redness of eyes?23:30 Those who tarry long at the wine; Those who go to seek out mixed wine.23:31 Look not upon the wine when it is red, When it sparkles in the cup, When it goes down smoothly:23:32 In the end it bites like a serpent, and stings like an adder.23:33 Your eyes shall behold strange things, and your heart shall utter perverse things.23:34 Yes, you shall be as he that lies down in the midst of the sea, Or as he that lies upon the top of a mast.23:35 They have stricken me, shall you say, and I was not hurt; They have beaten me, and I felt it not: When shall I awake?  I will seek it yet again.Chapter 2424:1 Be not you envious against evil men; Neither desire to be with them:24:2 For their heart studies oppression, and their lips talk of mischief.24:3 Through wisdom is a house built; And by understanding it is established;24:4 And by knowledge are the chambers filled With all precious and pleasant riches.24:5 A wise man is strong; Yes, a man of knowledge increases might 24:6 For by wise guidance you shall make your war;  And in the multitude of counsellors there is safety.24:7 Wisdom is too high for a fool: He opens not his mouth in the gate.24:8 He that devises to do evil, Men shall call him a mischief-maker.24:9 The thought of foolishness is sin; And the scoffer is an abomination to men.24:10 If you faint in the day of adversity, Your strength is small.24:11 Deliver them that are carried away to death, and those that are ready to be slain see that you hold back.24:12 If you say, Behold, we knew not this; Does not he that weighs the hearts consider it?  And he that keeps your soul, does not he know it?  And shall not he render to every man according to his work?24:13 My son, eat you honey, for it is good; And the droppings of the honeycomb, which are sweet to your taste:24:14 So shall you know wisdom to be to your soul; If you have found it, then shall there be a reward, and your hope shall not be cut off.24:15 Lay not wait, O wicked man, against the habitation of the righteous; Destroy not his resting-place:24:16 For a righteous man falls seven times, and rises up again; But the wicked are overthrown by calamity.24:17 Rejoice not when your enemy falls, and let not your heart be glad when he is overthrown;24:18 Lest Yahweh see it, and it displease him, and he turn away his wrath from him.24:19 Fret not yourself because of evil-doers; Neither be you envious at the wicked:24:20 For there shall be no reward to the evil man; The lamp of the wicked shall be put out.24:21 My son, fear you Yahweh and the king; And company not with them that are given to change:24:22 For their calamity shall rise suddenly; And the destruction from them both, who knows it?24:23 These also are sayings of the wise.  To have respect of persons in judgment is not good.24:24 He that says to the wicked, You are righteous; Peoples shall curse him, nations shall abhor him:24:25 But to them that rebuke him shall be delight, and a good blessing shall come upon them.24:26 He kisses the lips who gives a right answer.24:27 Prepare your work outside, and make things ready for you in the field; and only afterwards build your house.24:28 Be not a witness against your neighbor without cause; and deceive not with your lips.24:29 Say not, I will do the same to him as he has done to me; I will render to the man according to his work.24:30 I went by the field of the sluggard, and by the vineyard of the man void of understanding;24:31 And, lo, it was all grown over with thorns, the face of it was covered with nettles, and the stone wall for it was broken down.24:32 Then I beheld, and considered well; I saw, and received instruction:24:33 that a little more sleep, a little more slumber, a little more folding of the hands to sleep;24:34 so shall your poverty come as a robber, and your want as an armed man.Chapter 2525:1 These also are proverbs of Solomon, which the men of Hezekiah king of Judah copied out.25:2 It is the glory of God to conceal a thing; but the glory of kings is to search out a matter.25:3 As the heavens for height, and the earth for depth, so the heart of kings is unsearchable.25:4 Take away the dross from the silver, and there comes forth a vessel for the refiner:25:5 Take away the wicked from before the king, and his throne shall be established in righteousness.25:6 Put not yourself forward in the presence of the king, and stand not in the place of great men:25:7 For better it is that it be said to you, Come up here, than that you should be put lower in the presence of the prince, whom your eyes have seen.25:8 Do not go forth hastily to strive, in case you know not what to do in the end thereof, when your neighbor has put you to shame.25:9 Debate your cause with your neighbor himself, and disclose not the secret of another;25:10 lest he who hears it reviles you, and your infamy turns not away.25:11 A word fitly spoken is like apples of gold in network of silver.25:12 As an ear-ring of gold, and an ornament of fine gold, so is a wise reprover upon an obedient ear.25:13 As the cold of snow in the time of harvest, so is a faithful messenger to those who send him; for he refreshes the soul of his masters.25:14 As clouds and wind without rain, so is he that boasts himself of his gifts falsely.25:15 By long forbearing, is a ruler persuaded, and a soft tongue breaks the bone.25:16 Have you found honey?  Eat just as much as is sufficient for you, or you may be filled with it, and vomit it.25:17 Let your foot be seldom in your neighbor's house, so he not become weary of you, and hate you.25:18 A man that bears false witness against his neighbor is a maul, and a sword, and a sharp arrow.25:19 Confidence in an unfaithful man in time of trouble is like a broken tooth, and a foot out of joint.25:20 As one that takes off a garment in cold weather, and as vinegar upon soda, so is he that sings songs to a heavy heart.25:21 If your enemy is hungry, give him bread to eat; and if he is thirsty, give him water to drink:25:22 For you will heap coals of fire upon his head, and Yahweh will reward you.25:23 The north wind brings forth rain: so does a backbiting tongue an angry countenance.25:24 It is better to dwell in the corner of an attic, than with a contentious woman in a spacious house.25:25 As cold waters to a thirsty soul, so is good news from a far country.25:26 As a troubled fountain, and a polluted spring, so is a righteous man that gives way before the wicked.25:27 It is not good to eat much honey: so also it is grievous for men to search out their own glory.25:28 He whose spirit is without restraint is like a city that is broken down and lacking walls.Chapter 2626:1 As snow in summer, and as rain in harvest, honor is not seemly for a fool.26:2 As the sparrow in her wandering, as the swallow in her flying, the curse that is causeless alights not.26:3 A whip for the horse, a bridle for the donkey, and a rod for the back of fools.26:4 Answer not a fool according to his folly, lest you also be like him.26:5 Answer a fool according to his folly, lest he be wise in his own conceit.26:6 He that sends a message by the hand of a fool cuts off his own feet, and drinks in damage.26:7 The legs of the lame hang loose: so is a parable in the mouth of fools.26:8 As one that binds a stone in a sling, So is he that gives honor to a fool.26:9 as a thorn that goes up into the hand of a drunkard, So is a parable in the mouth of fools.26:10 as an archer that wounds all, So is he that hires a fool and he that hires them that pass by.26:11 As a dog that returns to his vomit, So is a fool that repeats his folly.26:12 See you a man wise in his own conceit?  There is more hope of a fool than of him.26:13 The sluggard says, There is a lion in the way; A lion is in the streets.26:14 as the door turns upon its hinges, So does the sluggard upon his bed.26:15 The sluggard buries his hand in the dish; It wearies him to bring it again to his mouth.26:16 The sluggard is wiser in his own conceit Than seven men that can render a reason.26:17 He that passes by, and vexes himself with strife belonging not to him, Is like one that takes a dog by the ears.26:18 As a madman who casts firebrands, arrows, and death,26:19 So is the man that deceives his neighbor, and says, am not I in sport?26:20 For lack of wood the fire goes out; and where there is no whisperer, contention ceases.26:21 As coals are to hot embers, and wood to fire, so is a contentious man to inflame strife.26:22 The words of a whisperer are as dainty morsels, and they go down to the innermost parts.26:23 Fervent lips and a wicked heart are like an earthen vessel overlaid with silver dross.26:24 He that hates dissembles with his lips; but he lays up deceit within him:26:25 When he speaks fair, believe him not; for there are seven abominations in his heart:26:26 Though his hatred covers itself with guile, his wickedness shall be shown openly before the assembly.26:27 Whoever digs a pit shall fall into it; and he that rolls a stone, it shall roll back onto him.26:28 A lying tongue hates those whom it has wounded; and a flattering mouth works ruin.Chapter 2727:1 Boast not yourself about tomorrow; for you know not what a day may bring forth.27:2 Let another man praise you, and not your own mouth; a stranger, and not your own lips.27:3 A stone is heavy, and sand is weighty; but a fool's vexation is heavier than them both.27:4 Wrath is cruel, and anger is overwhelming; but who is able to stand before jealousy?27:5 Better is open rebuke than love that is hidden.27:6 Faithful are the wounds of a friend; but the kisses of an enemy are profuse.27:7 The full soul loathes a honeycomb; but to the hungry soul every bitter thing is sweet.27:8 As a bird that wanders from her nest, so is a man that wanders from his place.27:9 Oil and perfume rejoice the heart; so does the sweetness of a man's friend that comes of hearty counsel.27:10 Your own friend, and your father's friend, forsake not; and go not to your brother's house in the day of your calamity: better is a neighbor that is near than a brother afar off.27:11 My son, be wise, and make my heart glad, so I may answer him that reproaches me.27:12 A prudent man sees the evil, and hides himself; but the simple go on, and suffer for it.27:13 Take his garment that is surety for a stranger; and hold him in pledge that is surety for a foreign woman.27:14 He that blesses his friend with a loud voice, rising early in the morning, it shall be counted a curse to him.27:15 A continual dripping in a very rainy day and a contentious woman these are alike:27:16 He that would restrain her restrains the wind; and his right hand encounters oil.27:17 Iron sharpens iron; so a man sharpens the countenance of his friend.27:18 Whoso tends the fig tree shall eat the fruit thereof; and he that regards his master shall be honored.27:19 As in water face answers to face, so also the heart of man to man.27:20 Sheol and Abaddon are never satisfied; and the eyes of man are never satisfied.27:21 The refining pot is for silver, and the furnace for gold; and a man is tried by his praise.27:22 Even if you bray a fool in a mortar with a pestle along with bruised grain, still his foolishness will not depart from him.27:23 Be diligent to know the state of your flocks, and look well to your herds:27:24 For riches are not for ever: nor does the crown endure to all generations?27:25 The hay is carried, and the tender grass shows itself, and the herbs of the mountains are gathered in.27:26 The lambs are for your clothing, and the goats are the price of the field;27:27 And there will be goats' milk enough for your food, for the food of your household, and maintenance for your maidens.Chapter 2828:1 The wicked flee when no man pursues; But the righteous are as bold as a lion.28:2 For the transgression of a land, many are the princes thereof; But by men of understanding and knowledge the state thereof shall be prolonged.28:3 A needy man who oppresses the poor is like a sweeping rain that leaves no food.28:4 They who forsake the law praise the wicked, whereas such as keep the law contend with them.28:5 Evil men understand not justice; but they that seek Yahweh understand all things.28:6 Better is the poor that walks in his integrity, than he that is perverse in his ways, though he be rich.28:7 Whoso keeps the law is a wise son; but he that is a companion of gluttons shames his father.28:8 He that augments his substance by interest and increase, gathers it for him that has pity on the poor.28:9 He that turns his ear away from hearing the law, even his prayer is an abomination.28:10 Whoso causes the upright to go astray in an evil way, shall fall himself into his own pit; but the perfect shall inherit good.28:11 The rich man is wise in his own conceit; but the poor that has understanding searches him out.28:12 When the righteous triumph, there is great glory; but when the wicked rise, men hide themselves.28:13 He that covers his transgressions shall not prosper: but whoso confesses and forsakes them shall obtain mercy.28:14 Happy is the man that fears always; but he that hardens his heart shall fall into mischief.28:15 As a roaring lion, and a ranging bear, is a wicked ruler over a poor people.28:16 The prince that lacks understanding is also a great oppressor; but he that hates covetousness shall prolong his days.28:17 A man that is laden with the blood of any person shall flee to the pit; let no man stop him.28:18 Whoso walks uprightly shall be delivered; but he that is perverse in his ways shall fall at once.28:19 He that tills his land shall have plenty of bread; but he that follows after vain things shall have poverty enough.28:20 A faithful man shall abound with blessings; but he that makes haste to be rich shall not be unpunished.28:21 To have respect of persons is not good; neither that a man should transgress for a piece of bread.28:22 He that has an evil eye rushes after riches, and knows not that lack shall come upon him.28:23 He that rebukes a man shall afterward find more favor than he that flatters with the tongue.28:24 Whoso robs his father or his mother, and says, It is no transgression, the same is the companion of a destroyer.28:25 He that is of a greedy spirit stirs up strife; but he that puts his trust in Yahweh shall be made fat.28:26 He that trusts in his own heart is a fool; but whoso walks wisely, he shall be delivered.28:27 He that gives to the poor shall not lack; but he that hides his eyes shall have many a curse.28:28 When the wicked rise, men hide themselves; But when they perish, the righteous increase.Chapter 2929:1 He that being often reproved hardens his neck Shall suddenly be destroyed, and that without remedy.29:2 When the righteous are increased, the people rejoice; But when a wicked man bears rule, the people sigh.29:3 Whoso loves wisdom rejoices his father; But he that keeps company with harlots wastes his substance.29:4 The king by justice establishes the land; But he that exacts gifts overthrows it.29:5 A man that flatters his neighbor Spreads a net for his steps.29:6 In the transgression of an evil man there is a snare; but the righteous does sing and rejoice.29:7 The righteous takes knowledge of the cause of the poor; The wicked has not understanding to know it.29:8 Scoffers set a city in a flame; But wise men turn away wrath.29:9 If a wise man has a controversy with a foolish man, Whether he be angry or laugh, there will be no rest.29:10 The bloodthirsty hate him that is perfect; and as for the upright, they seek his life.29:11 A fool utters all his anger; but a wise man keeps it back and stills it.29:12 If a ruler hearkens to falsehood, all his servants are wicked.29:13 The poor man and the oppressor meet together; Yahweh lightens the eyes of them both.29:14 The king that faithfully judges the poor, his throne shall be established for ever.29:15 The rod and reproof give wisdom; but a child left to himself causes shame to his mother.29:16 When the wicked are increased, transgression increases; but the righteous shall look upon their fall.29:17 Correct your son, and he will give you rest; yes, he will give delight to your soul.29:18 Where there is no vision, the people cast off restraint; but he that keeps the law, happy is he.29:19 A servant will not be corrected by words; for though he understand, he will not give heed.29:20 Do you see a man that is hasty in his words?  There is more hope for a fool than for him.29:21 He that delicately brings up his servant from a child shall have him become a son in the end.29:22 An angry man stirs up strife, and a wrathful man abounds in transgression.29:23 A man's pride shall bring him low; but he that is of a lowly spirit shall obtain honor.29:24 Whoso is partner with a thief hates his own soul; he hears the adjuration and utters nothing.29:25 The fear of man brings a snare; but whoso puts his trust in Yahweh shall be safe.29:26 Many seek the ruler's favor; But a man's judgment comes from Yahweh.29:27 An unjust man is an abomination to the righteous; And he that is upright in the way is an abomination to the wicked.Chapter 3030:1 The words of Agur the son of Jakeh; The oracle.  The man says to Ithiel, to Ithiel and Ucal:30:2 Surely I am more brutish than any man, and have not the understanding of a man;30:3 And I have not learned wisdom, Neither have I the knowledge of the Holy One.30:4 Who has ascended up into heaven, and descended?  Who has gathered the wind in his fists?  Who has bound the waters in his garment?  Who has established all the ends of the earth?  What is his name, and what is his son's name, if you know?30:5 Every word of God is tried: He is a shield to them that take refuge in him.30:6 Add you not to his words, Lest he reprove you, and you be found a liar.30:7 Two things have I asked of you; Deny me them not before I die:30:8 Remove far from me falsehood and lies; Give me neither poverty nor riches; Feed me with the food that is needful for me:30:9 Lest I be full, and deny you, and say, Who is Yahweh?  Or lest I be poor, and steal, and use profanely the name of my God.30:10 Slander not a servant to his master, Lest he curse you, and you be held guilty.30:11 There is a generation that curse their father, and bless not their mother.30:12 There is a generation that are pure in their own eyes, and yet are not washed from their filthiness.30:13 There is a generation, oh how lofty are their eyes! And their eyelids are lifted up.30:14 There is a generation whose teeth are as swords, and their jaw teeth as knives, To devour the poor from off the earth, and the needy from among men.30:15 The leech has two daughters: Give, give.  There are three things that are never satisfied, Yes, four that never say, "Enough":30:16 Sheol; and the barren womb; The earth that is not satisfied with water; And the fire that does not say, "Enough."30:17 The eye that mocks at his father, and despises to obey his mother, The ravens of the valley shall pick it out, and the young eagles shall eat it.30:18 There are three things which are too wonderful for me, Yes, four which I know not:30:19 The way of an eagle in the air; The way of a serpent upon a rock; The way of a ship in the midst of the sea; And the way of a man with a maiden.30:20 This is the way of an adulterous woman: She eats, and wipes her mouth, and says, I have done nothing wrong.30:21 For three things the earth does tremble, and for four, which it cannot bear:30:22 For a servant when he is king;  And a fool when he is filled with food;30:23 For an odious woman when she is married; And a handmaid that is heir to her mistress.30:24 There are four things which are little upon the earth, But they are exceedingly wise:30:25 The ants are a people not strong, Yet they provide their food in the summer;30:26 The conies are but a feeble folk, Yet make they their houses in the rocks;30:27 The locusts have no king, Yet go they forth all of them by bands; 30:28 The lizard takes hold with her hands, Yet is she in kings' palaces.30:29 There are three things which are stately in their march, Yes, four which are stately in going:30:30 The lion, which is mightiest among beasts, and turns not away for any;30:31 The greyhound; the he-goat also; And the king against whom there is no rising up.30:32 If you have done foolishly in lifting up yourself, Or if you have thought evil, Lay your hand upon your mouth.30:33 For the churning of milk brings forth butter, and the wringing of the nose brings forth blood; So the forcing of wrath brings forth strife.Chapter 3131:1 The words of king Lemuel; the oracle which his mother taught him.31:2 What, my son?  and what, O son of my womb?  And what, O son of my vows?31:3 Give not your strength to women, Nor your ways to that which destroys kings.31:4 It is not for kings, O Lemuel, it is not for kings to drink wine; Nor for princes to say, Where is strong drink?31:5 Lest they drink, and forget the law, and pervert the justice due to any that is afflicted.31:6 Give strong drink to him that is ready to perish, and wine to the bitter in soul:31:7 Let him drink, and forget his poverty, and remember his misery no more.31:8 Open your mouth for the mute, In the cause of all such as are left desolate.31:9 Open your mouth, judge righteously, and minister justice to the poor and needy.31:10 A worthy woman who can find?  For her price is far above rubies.31:11 The heart of her husband trusts in her, and he shall have no lack of gain.31:12 She does him good and not evil All the days of her life.31:13 She seeks wool and flax, and works willingly with her hands.31:14 She is like the merchant-ships; She brings her bread from afar.31:15 She rises also while it is yet night, and gives food to her household, and their task to her maidens.31:16 She considers a field, and buys it; With the fruit of her hands she plants a vineyard.31:17 She girds her loins with strength, and makes strong her arms.31:18 She perceives that her merchandise is profitable: Her lamp goes not out by night.31:19 She lays her hands to the distaff, and her hands hold the spindle.31:20 She stretches out her hand to the poor; Yes, she reaches forth her hands to the needy.31:21 She is not afraid of the snow for her household; For all her household are clothed with scarlet.31:22 She makes for herself carpets of tapestry; Her clothing is fine linen and purple.31:23 Her husband is known in the gates, When he sits among the elders of the land.31:24 She makes linen garments and sells them, and delivers girdles to the merchant.31:25 Strength and dignity are her clothing; And she laughs at the time to come.31:26 She opens her mouth with wisdom; And the law of kindness is on her tongue.31:27 She looks well to the ways of her household, and eats not the bread of idleness.31:28 Her children rise up, and call her blessed; Her husband also, and he praises her, saying:31:29 Many daughters have done worthily, But you excellest them all.31:30 Grace is deceitful, and beauty is vain; But a woman that fears Yahweh, she shall be praised.31:31 Give her of the fruit of her hands; And let her works praise her in the gates.End of ProverbsEcclesiastesEcclesiastes or, The PreacherChapter 11:1 The words of the Preacher, the son of David, king in Jerusalem.1:2 Vanity of vanities, says the Preacher; vanity of vanities, all is vanity.1:3 What profit has man from all his labor in which he labors under the sun?1:4 One generation goes, and another generation comes; but the earth abides for ever.1:5 The sun also rises, and the sun goes down, and hastens to its place where it rises.1:6 The wind goes toward the south, and turns about to the north; it turns about continually in its course, and the wind returns again to its circuits.1:7 All the rivers run into the sea, yet the sea is not full; to the place where the rivers go, there they go again.1:8 All things are full of weariness; man cannot utter it: the eye is not satisfied with seeing, nor the ear filled with hearing.1:9 That which has been, is that which shall be; and that which has been done is that which shall be done: and there is nothing new under the sun.1:10 Is there anything of which it may be said, See, this is new?  It has already been, long ago, in the ages which were before us.1:11 There is no remembrance of the former generations; neither shall there be any remembrance of the latter generations that are to come, among those that shall come after.1:12 I the Preacher was king over Israel in Jerusalem.1:13 And I applied my heart to seek and to search out by wisdom concerning all that is done under heaven: it is a sore travail that God has given to the sons of men to be exercised with it.1:14 I have seen all the works that are done under the sun; and, behold, all is vanity and a striving after wind.1:15 That which is crooked cannot be made straight; and that which is wanting cannot be numbered.1:16 I communed with my own hear, saying, Lo, I have gotten me great wisdom more than all that were before me in Jerusalem; yes, my heart has had great experience of wisdom and knowledge.1:17 And I applied my heart to know wisdom, and to know madness and folly.  I perceived that this also was a striving after wind.1:18 For in much wisdom is much grief; and he that increases knowledge increases sorrow.Chapter 22:1 I said in my heart, Come now, I will test you with mirth; therefore enjoy pleasure. And, behold, this also was vanity.2:2 I said of laughter, It is mad; and of mirth, What does it accomplish?2:3 I searched in my heart how to cheer my flesh with wine, my heart still guiding me with wisdom, and how to lay hold on folly, till I might see what good thing it was for the sons of men to do under heaven all the days of their life.2:4 I made me great works; I built me houses; I planted me vineyards;2:5 I made me gardens and parks, and I planted trees in them of all kinds of fruit;2:6 I made me pools of water, with which to water the forest where trees were growing;2:7 I bought men-servants and maid-servants, and had servants born in my house; also I had great possessions of herds and flocks, more than all that were before me in Jerusalem;2:8 I gathered me also silver and gold, and the treasure of kings and of the provinces; I got me men-singers and women-singers, and the delights of the sons of men, musical instruments, and that of all sorts.2:9 So I was great, and increased more than all that were before me in Jerusalem: also my wisdom remained with me.2:10 And whatever my eyes desired I kept not from them; I withheld not my heart from any joy; for my heart rejoiced because of all my labor; and this was my reward from all my labor.2:11 Then I looked on all the works that my hands had wrought, and on the labor that I had labored to do; and, behold, all was vanity and a striving after wind, and there was no profit under the sun.2:12 And I turned myself to behold wisdom, and madness, and folly: for what can the man do that comes after the king?  even that which has been done long ago.2:13 Then I saw that wisdom excels folly, as far as light excels darkness.2:14 The wise man's eyes are in his head, and the fool walks in darkness: and yet I perceived that the same event happens to them all.2:15 Then said I in my heart, as it happens to the fool, so will it happen even to me; and why was I then more wise?  Then I said in my heart, this also is vanity.2:16 For of the wise man, even as of the fool, there is no remembrance for ever; seeing that in the days to come all will have been long forgotten.  And how does the wise man die even as the fool!2:17 So I hated life, because the work that is wrought under the sun was grievous to me; for all is vanity and a striving after wind.2:18 And I hated all my labor in which I labored under the sun, seeing that I must leave it to the man that shall be after me.2:19 And who knows whether he will be a wise man or a fool?  Yet he will have rule over all my labor in which I have labored, and in which I have shown myself wise under the sun.  This also is vanity.2:20 Therefore I turned about to cause my heart to despair concerning all the labor in which I had labored under the sun.2:21 For there is a man whose labor is with wisdom, and with knowledge, and with skilfulness; yet to a man that has not labored therein shall he leave it for his portion.  This also is vanity and a great evil.2:22 For what has a man from all his labor, and of the striving of his heart, in which he labors under the sun?2:23 For all his days are but sorrows, and his travail is grief; yes, even in the night his heart takes no rest.  This also is vanity.2:24 There is nothing better for a man than to eat and drink, and make his soul enjoy good in his labor.  This also I saw, that it is from the hand of God.2:25 For who can eat, or who can have enjoyment, more than I?2:26 For to the man that pleases him God gives wisdom, and knowledge, and joy; but to the sinner he gives travail, to gather and to heap up, that he may give to him that pleases God.  This also is vanity and a striving after wind.Chapter 33:1 There is a season for everything, and a time for very purpose under heaven:3:2 a time to be born, and a time to die; a time to plant, and a time to pluck up that which is planted;3:3 a time to kill, and a time to heal; a time to break down, and a time to build up;3:4 a time to weep, and a time to laugh; a time to mourn, and a time to dance;3:5 a time to cast away stones, and a time to gather stones together; a time to embrace, and a time to refrain from embracing;3:6 a time to seek, and a time to lose; a time to keep, and a time to cast away;3:7 a time to rend, and a time to sew; a time to keep silence, and a time to speak;3:8 a time to love, and a time to hate; a time for war, and a time for peace.3:9 What profit has he that works in that in which he labors?3:10 I have seen the travail which God has given to the sons of men to be exercised with it.3:11 He has made everything beautiful in its time: also he has set eternity in their hearts, yet such that man cannot find out the work that God has done from the beginning even to the end.3:12 I know that there is nothing better for them, than to rejoice, and to do good so long as they live.3:13 And also that every man should eat and drink, and enjoy good in all his labor, is the gift of God.3:14 I know that, whatsoever God does, it shall be for ever: nothing can be put to it, nor anything taken from it; and God has done it, that men should fear before him.3:15 That which is has been long ago; and that which is to be has long ago been: and God seeks again that which is passed away.3:16 And moreover I saw under the sun, that in the place of justice, wickedness was there; and in the place of righteousness, wickedness was there.3:17 I said in my heart, God will judge the righteous and the wicked; for there is a time there for every purpose and for every work.3:18 I said in my heart, It is because of the sons of men, that God may prove them, and that they may see that they themselves are but as beasts.3:19 For that which befalls the sons of men befalls beasts; even one thing befalls them: as the one dies, so dies the other; yes, they have all one breath; and man has no preeminence above the beasts: for all is vanity.3:20 All go to one place; all are of the dust, and all turn to dust again.3:21 Who knows the spirit of man, whether it goes upward, and the spirit of the beast, whether it goes downward to the earth?3:22 Wherefore I saw that there is nothing better, than that a man should rejoice in his works; for that is his portion: for who shall bring him back to see what shall be after him?Chapter 44:1 Then I returned and saw all the oppressions that are done under the sun: and, behold, the tears of such as were oppressed, and they had no comforter; and on the side of their oppressors there was power; but they had no comforter.4:2 Wherefore I praised the dead that have been long dead more than the living that are yet alive;4:3 yes, better than them both did I esteem him that has not yet been, who has not seen the evil work that is done under the sun.4:4 Then I saw all labor and every skilful work, that for this a man is envied of his neighbor.  This also is vanity and a striving after wind.4:5 The fool folds his hands together, and eats his own flesh.4:6 Better is a handful, with quietness, than two handfuls with labor and striving after wind.4:7 Then I returned and saw vanity under the sun.4:8 There is one that is alone, and he has not a second; yes, he has neither son nor brother; yet is there no end of all his labor, neither are his eyes satisfied with riches.  For whom then, says he, do I labor, and deprive my soul of good?  This also is vanity, yes, it is a sore travail.4:9 Two are better than one, because they have a good reward for their labor.4:10 For if they fall, the one will lift up his fellow; but woe to him that is alone when he falls, and has not another to lift him up.4:11 Again, if two lie together, then they have warmth; but how can one be warm alone?4:12 And a man that prevails against him that is alone, two shall withstand him; and a threefold cord is not quickly broken.4:13 Better is a poor and wise youth than an old and foolish king, who knows not how to receive admonition any more.4:14 For out of prison he came forth to be king; yes, even in his kingdom he was born poor.4:15 I saw all the living that walk under the sun, that they were with the youth, the second, that stood up in his stead.4:16 There was no end of all the people, even of all them over whom he was: yet they that come after shall not rejoice in him.  Surely this also is vanity and a striving after wind.Chapter 55:1 Keep your foot when you go to the house of God; for to draw near to hear is better than to give the sacrifice of fools: for they know not that they do evil.5:2 Be not rash with your mouth, and let not your heart be hasty to utter anything before God; for God is in heaven, and you upon earth: therefore let your words be few.5:3 For a dream comes with a multitude of business, and a fool's voice with a multitude of words.5:4 When you vow a vow to God, defer not to pay it; for he has no pleasure in fools: pay that which you vowest.5:5 Better is it that you should not vow, than that you should vow and not pay.5:6 Allow not your mouth to cause your flesh to sin; neither say before the angel, that it was an error: why should God be angry at your voice, and destroy the work of your hands?5:7 For in the multitude of dreams there are vanities, and in many words: but fear you God.5:8 If you see the oppression of the poor, and the violent taking away of justice and righteousness in a province, marvel not at the matter: for one higher than the high regards; and there are higher than they.5:9 Moreover the profit of the earth is for all: the king himself is served by the field.5:10 He that loves silver shall not be satisfied with silver; nor he that loves abundance, with increase: this also is vanity.5:11 When goods increase, they are increased that eat them; and what advantage is there to the owner thereof, save the beholding of them with his eyes?5:12 The sleep of a laboring man is sweet, whether he eat little or much; but the fulness of the rich will not allow him to sleep.5:13 There is a grievous evil which I have seen under the sun, namely, riches kept by the owner thereof to his hurt:5:14 and those riches perish by evil adventure; and if he has begotten a son, there is nothing in his hand.5:15 As he came forth from his mother's womb, naked shall he go again as he came, and shall take nothing for his labor, which he may carry away in his hand.5:16 And this also is a grievous evil, that in all points as he came, so shall he go: and what profit has he that he labors for the wind?5:17 All his days also he eats in darkness, and he is sore vexed, and has sickness and wrath.5:18 Behold, that which I have seen to be good and to be comely is for one to eat and to drink, and to enjoy good in all his labor, in which he labors under the sun, all the days of his life which God has given him: for this is his portion.5:19 Every man also to whom God has given riches and wealth, and has given him power to eat thereof, and to take his portion, and to rejoice in his labor-this is the gift of God.5:20 For he shall not much remember the days of his life; because God answers him in the joy of his heart.Chapter 66:1 There is an evil which I have seen under the sun, and it is heavy upon men:6:2 a man to whom God gives riches, wealth, and honor, so that he lacks nothing for his soul of all that he desires, yet God gives him not power to eat thereof, but an alien eats it; this is vanity, and it is an evil disease.6:3 If a man beget a hundred children, and live many years, so that the days of his years are many, but his soul be not filled with good, and moreover he have no burial; I say, that an untimely birth is better than he:6:4 for it comes in vanity, and departs in darkness, and the name thereof is covered with darkness;6:5 moreover it has not seen the sun nor known it; this has rest rather than the other:6:6 yes, though he live a thousand years twice told, and yet enjoy no good, do not all go to one place?6:7 All the labor of man is for his mouth, and yet the appetite is not filled.6:8 For what advantage has the wise more than the fool?  or what has the poor man, that knows how to walk before the living?6:9 Better is the sight of the eyes than the wandering of the desire: this also is vanity and a striving after wind.6:10 Whatsoever has been, the name thereof was given long ago; and it is know what man is; neither can he contend with him that is mightier than he.6:11 Seeing there are many things that increase vanity, what is man the better?6:12 For who knows what is good for man in his life, all the days of his vain life which he spends as a shadow?  for who can tell a man what shall be after him under the sun?Chapter 77:1 A good name is better than precious oil; and the day of death, than the day of one's birth.7:2 It is better to go to the house of mourning than to go to the house of feasting: for that is the end of all men; and the living will lay it to his heart.7:3 Sorrow is better than laughter; for by the sadness of the countenance the heart is made glad.7:4 The heart of the wise is in the house of mourning; but the heart of fools is in the house of mirth.7:5 It is better to hear the rebuke of the wise, than for a man to hear the song of fools.7:6 For as the crackling of thorns under a pot, so is the laughter of the fool: this also is vanity.7:7 Surely extortion makes the wise man foolish; and a bribe destroys the understanding.7:8 Better is the end of a thing than the beginning thereof; and the patient in spirit is better than the proud in spirit.7:9 Be not hasty in your spirit to be angry; for anger rests in the bosom of fools.7:10 Say not you, What is the cause that the former days were better than these?  for you do not inquire wisely concerning this.7:11 Wisdom is as good as an inheritance; yes, more excellent is it for them that see the sun.7:12 For wisdom is a defence, even as money is a defence; but the excellency of knowledge is, that wisdom preserves the life of him that has it.7:13 Consider the work of God: for who can make that straight, which he has made crooked?7:14 In the day of prosperity be joyful, and in the day of adversity consider; yes, God has made the one side by side with the other, to the end that man should not find out anything that shall be after him.7:15 All this have I seen in my days of vanity: there is a righteous man that perishes in his righteousness, and there is a wicked man that prolongs his life in his evil-doing.7:16 Be not righteous overmuch; neither make yourself overwise: why should you destroy yourself?7:17 Be not overmuch wicked, neither be you foolish: why should you die before your time?7:18 It is good that you should take hold of this; yes, also from that withdraw not your hand: for he that fears God shall come forth from them all.7:19 Wisdom is a strength to the wise man more than ten rulers that are in a city.7:20 Surely there is not a righteous man upon earth, that does good, and sins not.7:21 Also take not heed to all words that are spoken, lest you hear your servant curse you;7:22 for oftentimes also your own heart knows that you yourself likewise have cursed others.7:23 All this have I proved in wisdom: I said, I will be wise; but it was far from me.7:24 That which is, is far off and exceedingly deep; who can find it out?7:25 I turned about, and my heart was set to know and to search out, and to seek wisdom and the reason of things, and to know that wickedness is folly, and that foolishness is madness.7:26 And I find more bitter than death the woman whose heart is traps and nets, and whose hands are shackles.  Whoso pleases God shall elude her; but the sinner shall be captured by her.7:27 Behold, this have I found, says the Preacher, laying one thing to another, to find out the scheme.7:28 Something my soul still seeks, but I have not found: One man among a thousand have I found; but a woman among all those I have not found:7:29 behold, this only have I found: that God made man upright, but they have sought out many inventions.Chapter 88:1 Who is as the wise man?  and who knows the interpretation of a thing?  A man's wisdom makes his face to shine, and the hardness of his face is changed.8:2 I counsel you, Keep the king's command, and that in regard of the oath of God.8:3 Be not hasty to go out of his presence; persist not in an evil thing: for he does whatsoever pleases him.8:4 For the king's word has power; and who may say to him, What do you?8:5 Whoso keeps the commandment shall know no evil thing; and a wise man's heart discerns time and judgment:8:6 for to every purpose there is a time and judgment; because the misery of man is great upon him:8:7 for he knows not that which shall be; for who can tell him how it shall be?8:8 There is no man that has power over the spirit to retain the spirit; neither has he power over the day of death; and there is no discharge in war: neither shall wickedness deliver him that is given to it.8:9 All this have I seen, and applied my heart to every work that is done under the sun: there is a time in which one man has power over another to his hurt.8:10 So I saw the wicked buried, and they came to the grave; and they that had done right went away from the holy place, and were forgotten in the city: this also is vanity.8:11 Because sentence against an evil deed is not executed speedily, the heart of the sons of men is emboldened in them to do evil.8:12 Though a sinner do evil a hundred times, and prolong his days, yet surely I know that it shall be well with them that fear God, that fear before him:8:13 but it shall not be well with the wicked, neither shall he prolong his days, which are as a shadow; because he fears not before God.8:14 There is a vanity which is done upon the earth, that there are righteous men to whom it happens according to the work of the wicked; again, there are wicked men to whom it happens according to the work of the righteous: I said that this also is vanity.8:15 Then I commended mirth, because a man has no better thing under the sun, than to eat, and to drink, and to be joyful: for that shall abide with him in his labor all the days of his life which God has given him under the sun.8:16 When I applied my heart to know wisdom, and to see the business that is done upon the earth (for also there is that neither day nor night sees sleep with his eyes),8:17 then I beheld all the work of God, that man cannot find out the work that is done under the sun: because however much a man labor to seek it out, yet he shall not find it; yes moreover, though a wise man think to know it, yet shall he not be able to find it.Chapter 99:1 For all this I laid to my heart, even to explore all this: that the righteous, and the wise, and their works, are in the hand of God; whether it be love or hatred, man knows it not; all is before them.9:2 All things come alike to all: there is one event to the righteous and to the wicked; to the good and to the clean and to the unclean; to him that sacrifices and to him that sacrifices not; as is the good, so is the sinner; and he that swears, as he that fears an oath.9:3 This is an evil in all that is done under the sun, that there is one event to all: yes also, the heart of the sons of men is full of evil, and madness is in their heart while they live, and after that they go to the dead.9:4 For to him that is joined with all the living there is hope; for a living dog is better than a dead lion.9:5 For the living know that they shall die: but the dead know not anything, neither have they any more a reward; for the memory of them is forgotten.9:6 As well their love, as their hatred and their envy, is perished long ago; neither have they any more a portion for ever in anything that is done under the sun.9:7 Go your way, eat your bread with joy, and drink your wine with a merry heart; for God has already accepted your works.9:8 Let your garments be always white; and let not your head lack oil.9:9 Live joyfully with the wife whom you love all the days of your life of vanity, which he has given you under the sun, all your days of vanity: for that is your portion in life, and in your labor in which you labor under the sun.9:10 Whatever your hand finds to do, do it with all your might.  For there is no work, nor device, nor knowledge, nor wisdom, in Sheol, where you will be going.9:11 I returned, and I saw under the sun, that the race is not to the swift, nor the battle to the strong, neither yet bread to the wise, nor yet riches to the men of understanding, nor yet favor to only men of skill; but instead, time and chance happen to them all.9:12 For a man does not know when his time is.  Like the fishes that are captured in an evil net, or as the birds that are caught in the snare, so also are the sons of men snared in a calamitous time, when it falls suddenly upon them.9:13 I have also seen wisdom under the sun on this wise, and it seemed great to me:9:14 There was a small city, and only few men within it; and there came a great king against it, and besieged it, and built great bulwarks against it.9:15 Now there was found in it a poor wise man, and he by his wisdom saved the city; yet no man remembered that poor man.9:16 Then said I, Wisdom is better than strength: nevertheless the poor man's wisdom is despised, and his words are not heard.9:17 The words of the wise heard in quiet are better than the cry of him that rules among fools.9:18 Wisdom is better than weapons of war; but one sinner destroys much good.Chapter 1010:1 Dead flies cause the oil of the perfumer to send forth an evil odor; so does a little folly outweigh wisdom and honor.10:2 A wise man's heart is at his right hand; but a fool's heart at his left.10:3 Yes also, when the fool walks by the way, his understanding fails him, and he says to every one that he is a fool.10:4 If the spirit of the ruler rise up against you, leave not your place; for gentleness allays great offences.10:5 There is an evil which I have seen under the sun, as it were an error which proceeds from the ruler:10:6 folly is set in great dignity, and the rich sit in a low place.10:7 I have seen servants upon horses, and princes walking like servants upon the earth.10:8 He that digs a pit shall fall into it; and whoso breaks through a wall, a serpent shall bite him.10:9 Whoso hews out stones shall be hurt thereby; and he that splits wood is endangered by it.10:10 If the iron be blunt, and one does not whet the edge, then must he apply more strength: but wisdom is profitable to direct.10:11 If the serpent bite before it is charmed, then is there no advantage in the charmer.10:12 The words of a wise man's mouth are gracious; but the lips of a fool will swallow up himself.10:13 The beginning of the words of his mouth is foolishness; and the end of his talk is mischievous madness.10:14 A fool also multiplies words: yet man knows not what shall be; and that which shall be after him, who can tell him?10:15 The labor of fools wearies every one of them; for he knows not how to go to the city.10:16 Woe to you, O land, when your king is a child, and your princes eat in the morning!10:17 Happy are you, O land, when your king is the son of nobles, and your princes eat in due season, for strength, and not for drunkenness!10:18 By slothfulness the roof sinks in; and through idleness of the hands the house leaks.10:19 A feast is made for laughter, and wine makes life glad; and money answers everything.10:20 Revile not the king, no, not in your thought; and revile not the rich in your bedchamber: for a bird of the heavens shall carry the voice, and that which has wings shall tell the matter.Chapter 1111:1 Cast your bread upon the waters; for you shall find it after many days.11:2 Give a portion to seven, yes, even to eight; for you know not what evil shall be upon the earth.11:3 If the clouds be full of rain, they empty themselves upon the earth; and if a tree fall toward the south, or toward the north, in the place where the tree falls, there shall it be.11:4 He that observes the wind shall not sow; and he that regards the clouds shall not reap.11:5 As you know not what is the way of the wind, nor how the bones do grow in the womb of her that is with child; even so you know not the work of God who does all.11:6 In the morning sow your seed, and in the evening withhold not your hand; for you know not which shall prosper, whether this or that, or whether they both shall be alike good.11:7 Truly the light is sweet, and a pleasant thing it is for the eyes to behold the sun.11:8 Yes, if a man live many years, let him rejoice in them all; but let him remember the days of darkness, for they shall be many.  All that comes is vanity.11:9 Rejoice, O young man, in your youth, and let your heart cheer you in the days of your youth, and walk in the ways of your heart, and in the sight of your eyes; but know you, that for all these things God will bring you into judgment.11:10 Therefore remove sorrow from your heart, and put away evil from your flesh; for youth and the dawn of life are vanity.Chapter 1212:1 Remember also your Creator in the days of your youth, before the evil days come, and the years draw near, when you shall say, I have no pleasure in them;12:2 before the sun, and the light, and the moon, and the stars, are darkened, and the clouds return after the rain;12:3 in the day when the keepers of the house shall tremble, and the strong men shall bow themselves, and the grinders cease because they are few, and those that look out of the windows shall be darkened,12:4 and the doors shall be shut in the street; when the sound of the grinding is low, and one shall rise up at the voice of a bird, and all the daughters of music shall be brought low;12:5 yes, they shall be afraid of that which is high, and terrors shall be in the way; and the almond-tree shall blossom, and the grasshopper shall be a burden, and desire shall fail; because man goes to his everlasting home, and the mourners go about the streets:12:6 before the silver cord is loosed, or the golden bowl is broken, or the pitcher is broken at the fountain, or the wheel broken at the cistern,12:7 and the dust returns to the earth as it was, and the spirit returns to God who gave it.12:8 Vanity of vanities, says the Preacher; all is vanity.12:9 And further, because the Preacher was wise, he still taught the people knowledge; yes, he pondered, and sought out, and set in order many proverbs.12:10 The Preacher sought to find out acceptable words, and that which was written uprightly, even words of truth.12:11 The words of the wise are as goads; and as nails well fastened are the words of the masters of assemblies, which are given from one shepherd.12:12 And furthermore, my son, be admonished: of making many books there is no end; and much study is a weariness of the flesh.12:13 This is the end of the matter; all has been heard: fear God, and keep his commandments; for this is the whole duty of man.12:14 For God will bring every work into judgment, with every hidden thing, whether it be good, or whether it be evil.End of EcclesiastesSong of Solomon1:1 The Song of songs, which is Solomon's.1:2 Let him kiss me with the kisses of his mouth; For your love is better than wine.1:3 Your oils have a goodly fragrance; Your name is as oil poured forth; Therefore do the virgins love you.1:4 Draw me; we will run after you: The king has brought me into his chambers; We will be glad and rejoice in you; We will make mention of your love more than of wine: Rightly do they love you.1:5 I am black, but comely, Oh ye daughters of Jerusalem, as the tents of Kedar, as the curtains of Solomon.1:6 Look not upon me, because I am swarthy, Because the sun has scorched me.  My mother's sons were incensed against me; They made me keeper of the vineyards; But my own vineyard have I not kept.1:7 Tell me, O you whom my soul loves, Where you feed your flock, Where you cause it to rest at noon: For why should I be as one that is veiled Beside the flocks of your companions?1:8 If you know not, O you fairest among women, Go your way forth by the footsteps of the flock, and feed your kids beside the shepherds' tents.1:9 I have compared you, O my love, To a steed in Pharaoh's chariots.1:10 Your cheeks are comely with plaits of hair, Your neck with strings of jewels.1:11 We will make you plaits of gold With studs of silver.1:12 While the king sat at his table, My spikenard sent forth its fragrance.1:13 My beloved is to me as a bundle of myrrh, That lies between my breasts.1:14 My beloved is to me as a cluster of henna-flowers In the vineyards of En-gedi.1:15 Behold, you are fair, my love; Behold you are fair; Your eyes are as doves.1:16 Behold, you are fair, my beloved, yes, pleasant: Also our couch is green.1:17 The beams of our house are cedars, and our rafters are firs.2:1 I am a rose of Sharon, a lily of the valleys.2:2 As a lily among thorns, So is my love among the daughters.2:3 As the apple-tree among the trees of the wood, So is my beloved among the sons.  I sat down under his shadow with great delight, and his fruit was sweet to my taste.2:4 He brought me to the banqueting-house, and his banner over me was love.2:5 Stay ye me with raisins, refresh me with apples; For I am sick from love.2:6 His left hand is under my head, and his right hand does embrace me.2:7 I adjure you, O daughters of Jerusalem, By the roes, or by the hinds of the field, That ye stir not up, nor awake my love, Until he please.2:8 The voice of my beloved! behold, he comes, Leaping upon the mountains, Skipping upon the hills.2:9 My beloved is like a roe or a young deer: Behold, he stands behind our wall; He looks in at the windows; He glances through the lattice.2:10 My beloved spoke, and said to me, Rise up, my love, my fair one, and come away.2:11 For, lo, the winter is past; The rain is over and gone;2:12 The flowers appear on the earth; The time of the singing of birds is come, and the voice of the turtle-dove is heard in our land;2:13 The fig-tree ripens her green figs, and the vines are in blossom; They give forth their fragrance.  Arise, my love, my fair one, and come away.2:14 O my dove, that are in the clefts of the rock, In the covert of the steep place, Let me see your countenance, Let me hear your voice; For sweet is your voice, and your countenance is comely.2:15 Take us the foxes, the little foxes, That spoil the vineyards; For our vineyards are in blossom.2:16 My beloved is mine, and I am his: He feeds his flock among the lilies.2:17 Until the day be cool, and the shadows flee away, Turn, my beloved, and be you like a roe or a young deer Upon the mountains of Bether.3:1 By night on my bed I sought him whom my soul loves: I sought him, but I found him not.3:2 I said, I will rise now, and go about the city; In the streets and in the broad ways I will seek him whom my soul loves: I sought him, but I found him not.3:3 The watchmen that go about the city found me; To whom I said, Saw ye him whom my soul loves?3:4 It was but a little that I passed from them, When I found him whom my soul loves: I held him, and would not let him go, Until I had brought him into my mother's house, and into the chamber of her that conceived me.3:5 I adjure you, O daughters of Jerusalem, By the roes, or by the hinds of the field, That ye stir not up, nor awake my love, Until he please.3:6 Who is this that comes up from the wilderness Like pillars of smoke, Perfumed with myrrh and frankincense, With all powders of the merchant?3:7 Behold, it is the litter of Solomon; Sixty mighty men are around it, Of the mighty men of Israel.3:8 They all handle the sword, and are expert in war: Every man has his sword upon his thigh, Because of fear in the night.3:9 King Solomon made himself a palanquin Of the wood of Lebanon.3:10 He made the pillars thereof of silver, The bottom thereof of gold, the seat of it of purple, The midst thereof being paved with love, From the daughters of Jerusalem.3:11 Go forth, O ye daughters of Zion, and behold king Solomon, With the crown with which his mother has crowned him In the day of his espousals, and in the day of the gladness of his heart.4:1 Behold, you are fair, my love; behold, you are fair; Your eyes are as doves behind your veil.  Your hair is as a flock of goats, That lie along the side of mount Gilead.4:2 Your teeth are like a flock of ewes that are newly shorn, Which are come up from the washing, Whereof every one has twins, and none is bereaved among them.4:3 Your lips are like a thread of scarlet, and your mouth is comely.  Your temples are like a piece of a pomegranate Behind your veil.4:4 Your neck is like the tower of David built for an armory, Whereon there hang a thousand bucklers, all the shields of the mighty men.4:5 Your two breasts are like two fawns That are twins of a roe, Which feed among the lilies.4:6 Until the day be cool, and the shadows flee away, I will get me to the mountain of myrrh, and to the hill of frankincense.4:7 You are all fair, my love; And there is no spot in you.4:8 Come with me from Lebanon, my bride, With me from Lebanon: Look from the top of Amana, From the top of Senir and Hermon, From the lions' dens, From the mountains of the leopards.4:9 You have ravished my heart, my sister, my bride; You have ravished my heart with one of your eyes, With one chain of your neck.4:10 How fair is your love, my sister, my bride! How much better is your love than wine! And the fragrance of your oils than all manner of spices!4:11 Your lips, O my bride, drop as the honeycomb: Honey and milk are under your tongue; And the smell of your garments is like the smell of Lebanon.4:12 A garden shut up is my sister, my bride; A spring shut up, a fountain sealed.4:13 Your shoots are an orchard of pomegranates, with precious fruits; Henna with spikenard plants,4:14 Spikenard and saffron, Calamus and cinnamon, with all trees of frankincense; Myrrh and aloes, with all the chief spices.4:15 You are a fountain of gardens, a well of living waters, and flowing streams from Lebanon.4:16 Awake, O north wind; and come, you south; Blow upon my garden, that the spices thereof may flow out.  Let my beloved come into his garden, and eat his precious fruits.5:1 I am come into my garden, my sister, my bride: I have gathered my myrrh with my spice; I have eaten my honeycomb with my honey; I have drunk my wine with my milk.  Eat, O friends; Drink, yes, drink abundantly, O beloved.5:2 I was asleep, but my heart waked: It is the voice of my beloved that knocks, saying, Open to me, my sister, my love, my dove, my undefiled; For my head is filled with dew, My locks with the drops of the night.5:3 I have put off my garment; how shall I put it on?  I have washed my feet; how shall I defile them?5:4 My beloved put in his hand by the hole of the door, and my heart was moved for him.5:5 I rose up to open to my beloved; And my hands drops with myrrh, and my fingers with liquid myrrh, Upon the handles of the bolt.5:6 I opened to my beloved; But my beloved had withdrawn himself, and was gone.  My soul had failed me when he spoke: I sought him, but I could not find him; I called him, but he gave me no answer.5:7 The watchmen that go about the city found me, They smote me, they wounded me; The keepers of the walls took away my mantle from me.5:8 I adjure you, O daughters of Jerusalem, If ye find my beloved, That ye tell him, that I am sick from love.5:9 What is your beloved more than another beloved, O you fairest among women?  What is your beloved more than another beloved, That you do so adjure us?5:10 My beloved is white and ruddy, The chiefest among ten thousand.5:11 His head is as the most fine gold; His locks are bushy, and black as a raven.5:12 His eyes are like doves beside the water-brooks, Washed with milk, and fitly set.5:13 His cheeks are as a bed of spices, as banks of sweet herbs: His lips are as lilies, dropping liquid myrrh.5:14 His hands are as rings of gold set with beryl: His body is as ivory work overlaid with sapphires.5:15 His legs are as pillars of marble, set upon sockets of fine gold: His aspect is like Lebanon, excellent as the cedars.5:16 His mouth is most sweet; Yes, he is altogether lovely.  This is my beloved, and this is my friend, O daughters of Jerusalem.6:1 Whither is your beloved gone, O you fairest among women?  Whither has your beloved turned him, That we may seek him with you?6:2 My beloved is gone down to his garden, To the beds of spices, To feed in the gardens, and to gather lilies.6:3 I am my beloved's, and my beloved is mine; He feeds his flock among the lilies, 6:4 You are fair, O my love, as Tirzah, Comely as Jerusalem, Terrible as an army with banners.6:5 Turn away your eyes from me, For they have overcome me.  Your hair is as a flock of goats, That lie along the side of Gilead.6:6 Your teeth are like a flock of ewes, Which are come up from the washing; Whereof every one has twins, and none is bereaved among them.6:7 Your temples are like a piece of a pomegranate behind your veil.6:8 There are sixty queens, and eighty concubines, and virgins without number.6:9 My dove, my undefiled, is but one; She is the only one of her mother; She is the choice one of her that bore her.  The daughters saw her, and called her blessed; Yes, the queens and the concubines, and they praised her.6:10 Who is she that looks forth as the morning, Fair as the moon, Clear as the sun, Terrible as an army with banners?6:11 I went down into the garden of nuts, To see the green plants of the valley, To see whether the vine budded, and the pomegranates were in flower.6:12 Before I was aware, my soul set me Among the chariots of my princely people.6:13 Return, return, O Shulammite; Return, return, that we may look upon you.  Why will ye look upon the Shulammite, as upon the dance of Mahanaim?7:1 How beautiful are your feet in sandals, O prince's daughter! Your rounded thighs are like jewels, The work of the hands of a skilful workman.7:2 Your body is like a round goblet, In which no mingled wine is wanting: Your waist is like a heap of wheat Set about with lilies.7:3 Your two breasts are like two fawns That are twins of a roe.7:4 Your neck is like the tower of ivory; Your eyes as the pools in Heshbon, By the gate of Bath-rabbim; Your nose is like the tower of Lebanon Which looks toward Damascus.7:5 Your head upon you is like Carmel, and the hair of your head like purple; The king is held captive in its tresses.7:6 How fair and how pleasant are you, O love, for delights!7:7 This your stature is like to a palm-tree, and your breasts to its clusters.7:8 I said, I will climb up into the palm-tree, I will take hold of the branches thereof: Let your breasts be as clusters of the vine, and the smell of your breath like apples,7:9 And your mouth like the best wine, That goes down smoothly for my beloved, Gliding through the lips of those that are asleep.7:10 I am my beloved's; And his desire is toward me.7:11 Come, my beloved, let us go forth into the field; Let us lodge in the villages.7:12 Let us get up early to the vineyards; Let us see whether the vine has budded, and its blossom is open, and the pomegranates are in flower: There will I give you my love.7:13 The mandrakes give forth fragrance; And at our doors are all manner of precious fruits, new and old, Which I have laid up for you, O my beloved.8:1 Oh that you wert as my brother, That sucked the breasts of my mother! When I should find you without, I would kiss you; Yes, and none would despise me.8:2 I would lead you, and bring you into my mother's house, Who would instruct me; I would cause you to drink of spiced wine, Of the juice of my pomegranate.8:3 His left hand should be under my head, and his right hand should embrace me.8:4 I adjure you, O daughters of Jerusalem, That ye stir not up, nor awake my love, Until he please.8:5 Who is this that comes up from the wilderness, Leaning upon her beloved?  Under the apple-tree I awakened you: There your mother was in travail with you, There was she in travail that brought you forth.8:6 Set me as a seal upon your heart, as a seal upon your arm: For love is strong as death; Jealousy is cruel as Sheol; The flashes thereof are flashes of fire, a very flame of Yahweh.8:7 Many waters cannot quench love, Neither can floods drown it: If a man would give all the substance of his house for love, He would utterly be despised.8:8 We have a little sister, and she has no breasts: What shall we do for our sister In the day when she shall be spoken for?8:9 If she be a wall, We will build upon her a turret of silver: And if she be a door, We will inclose her with boards of cedar.8:10 I am a wall, and my breasts like the towers of it. Then was I in his eyes as one that found peace.8:11 Solomon had a vineyard at Baal-hamon; He let out the vineyard to keepers; Every one for the fruit thereof was to bring a thousand pieces of silver.8:12 My vineyard, which is mine, is before me: You, O Solomon, shall have the thousand, and those that keep the fruit thereof two hundred.8:13 You that dwell in the gardens, The companions hearken for your voice: Cause me to hear it.8:14 Make haste, my beloved, and be you like to a roe or to a young deer Upon the mountains of spices.End of Song of SolomonIsaiah1:1 The vision of Isaiah the son of Amoz, which he saw concerning Judah and Jerusalem, in the days of Uzziah, Jotham, ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah.1:2 Hear, O heavens, and give ear, O earth; for Yahweh has spoken: I have nourished and brought up children, and they have rebelled against me.1:3 The ox knows his owner, and the donkey his master's crib; but Israel does not know, my people does not consider.1:4 Ah sinful nation, a people laden with iniquity, a seed of evil-doers, children that deal corruptly! they have forsaken Yahweh, they have despised the Holy One of Israel, they are estranged and gone backward.1:5 Why would ye be still stricken, that ye revolt more and more?  the whole head is sick, and the whole heart faint.1:6 From the sole of the foot even to the head there is no soundness in it; but wounds, and bruises, and fresh stripes: they have not been closed, neither bound up, neither mollified with oil.1:7 Your country is desolate; your cities are burned with fire; your land, strangers devour it in your presence, and it is desolate, as overthrown by strangers.1:8 And the daughter of Zion is left like a booth in a vineyard, as a lodge in a garden of cucumbers, as a besieged city.1:9 Unless Yahweh of hosts had left to us a very small remnant, we would have been as Sodom, we would have been like Gomorrah.1:10 Hear the word of Yahweh, ye rulers of Sodom; give ear to the law of our God, ye people of Gomorrah.1:11 What to me is the multitude of your sacrifices?  says Yahweh: I have had enough of the burnt offerings of rams, and the fat of fed beasts; and I delight not in the blood of bullocks, or of lambs, or of he-goats.1:12 When ye come to appear before me, who has required this at your hand, to trample my courts?1:13 Bring no more vain oblations; incense is an abomination to me; new moon and sabbath, the calling of assemblies,- I cannot endure iniquity and then the solemn meeting.1:14 Your new moons and your appointed feasts my soul hates; they are a trouble to me; I am weary of bearing them.1:15 And when ye spread forth your hands, I will hide my eyes from you; yes, when ye make many prayers, I will not hear: your hands are full of blood.1:16 Wash yourselves, make yourselves clean; put away the evil of your doings from before my eyes; cease to do evil;1:17 learn to do good; seek justice, relieve the oppressed, adjudicate the cause of the fatherless, plead for the widow.1:18 Come now, and let us reason together, says Yahweh: though your sins be as scarlet, they shall be as white as snow; though they be red like crimson, they shall be as wool.1:19 If ye be willing and obedient, ye shall eat the good of the land:1:20 but if ye refuse and rebel, ye shall be devoured with the sword; for the mouth of Yahweh has spoken it.1:21 How is the faithful city become a harlot! she that was full of justice! righteousness lodged in her, but now murderers.1:22 Your silver is become dross, your wine mixed with water.1:23 Your princes are rebellious, and companions of thieves; every one of them loves bribes, and follows after rewards: they adjudicate not for the fatherless, neither does the cause of the widow come to them.1:24 Therefore says the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, the Mighty One of Israel, ah, I will relieve myself of my adversaries, and avenge myself on my enemies;1:25 and I will turn my hand upon you, and thoroughly purge away your dross, and will take away all your tin;1:26 and I will restore your judges to how it was at the first, and your counsellors as at the beginning: afterward you shall be called The city of righteousness, a faithful town.1:27 Zion shall be redeemed with justice, and her converts with righteousness.1:28 But the destruction of transgressors and sinners shall be together, and they that forsake Yahweh shall be consumed.1:29 For they shall be ashamed of the oaks which ye have desired, and ye shall be confounded for the gardens that ye have chosen.1:30 For ye shall be as an oak whose leaf fades, and as a garden that has no water.1:31 And the strong shall be as tinder, and his work as a spark; and they shall both alike burn together, and no one shall quench them.2:1 The word that Isaiah the son of Amoz saw concerning Judah and Jerusalem.2:2 And it shall come to pass in the latter days, that the mountain of Yahweh's house shall be established on the top of the mountains, and shall be exalted above the hills; and all nations shall flow to it.2:3 And many peoples shall go and say, Come ye, and let us go up to the mountain of Yahweh, to the house of the God of Jacob; and he will teach us of his ways, and we will walk in his paths: for out of Zion shall go forth the law, and the word of Yahweh from Jerusalem.2:4 And he will judge between the nations, and will decide concerning many peoples; and they shall beat their swords into plowshares, and their spears into pruning-hooks; nation shall not lift up sword against nation, neither shall they learn war any more.2:5 O house of Jacob, come ye, and let us walk in the light of Yahweh.2:6 For you have forsaken your people the house of Jacob, because they are filled with customs from the east, and are soothsayers like the Philistines, and they strike hands with the children of foreigners.2:7 And their land is full of silver and gold, neither is there any end of their treasures; their land also is full of horses, neither is there any end of their chariots.2:8 Their land also is full of idols; they worship the work of their own hands, that which their own fingers have made.2:9 And the mean man is bowed down, and the great man is brought low: therefore forgive them not.2:10 Enter into the rock, and hide you in the dust, from before the terror of Yahweh, and from the glory of his majesty.2:11 The lofty looks of man shall be brought low, and the haughtiness of men shall be bowed down, and Yahweh alone shall be exalted in that day.2:12 For there shall be a day of Yahweh of hosts upon all that is proud and haughty, and upon all that is lifted up; and it shall be brought low;2:13 and upon all the cedars of Lebanon, that are high and lifted up, and upon all the oaks of Bashan,2:14 and upon all the high mountains, and upon all the hills that are lifted up,2:15 and upon every lofty tower, and upon every fortified wall,2:16 and upon all the ships of Tarshish, and upon all pleasant imagery.2:17 And the loftiness of man shall be bowed down, and the haughtiness of men shall be brought low; and Yahweh alone shall be exalted in that day.2:18 And the idols shall utterly pass away.2:19 And men shall go into the caves of the rocks, and into the holes of the earth, from before the terror of Yahweh, and from the glory of his majesty, when he arises to shake mightily the earth.2:20 In that day men shall cast away their idols of silver, and their idols of gold, which have been made for them to worship, to the moles and to the bats;2:21 to go into the caverns of the rocks, and into the clefts of the ragged rocks, from before the terror of Yahweh, and from the glory of his majesty, when he arises to shake mightily the earth.2:22 Cease ye from man, whose breath is in his nostrils; for in what way is he to be accounted of?3:1 For, behold, the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, does take away from Jerusalem and from Judah stay and staff, the whole stay of bread, and the whole stay of water;3:2 the mighty man, and the man of war; the judge, and the prophet, and the diviner, and the elder;3:3 the captain of fifty, and the honorable man, and the counsellor, and the expert artificer, and the skilful enchanter.3:4 And I will give children to be their princes, and babes shall rule over them.3:5 And the people shall be oppressed, every one by another, and every one by his neighbor: the child shall behave himself proudly against the old man, and the base against the honorable.3:6 When a man shall take hold of his brother in the house of his father, saying, You have clothing, be you our ruler, and let this ruin be under your hand;3:7 in that day shall he lift up his voice, saying, I will not be a healer; for in my house is neither bread nor clothing: ye shall not make me ruler of the people.3:8 For Jerusalem is ruined, and Judah is fallen; because their tongue and their doings are against Yahweh, to provoke the eyes of his glory.3:9 The show of their countenance does witness against them; and they declare their sin as Sodom, they hide it not.  Woe to their soul! for they have done evil to themselves.3:10 Say ye of the righteous, that it shall be well with him; for they shall eat the fruit of their doings.3:11 Woe to the wicked! it shall be ill with him; for what his hands have done shall be done to him.3:12 As for my people, children are their oppressors, and women rule over them.  O my people, they that lead you cause you to err, and destroy the way of your paths.3:13 Yahweh stands up to contend, and stands to judge the peoples.3:14 Yahweh will enter into judgment with the elders of his people, and the princes thereof: It is ye that have eaten up the vineyard; the spoil of the poor is in your houses:3:15 what mean ye that ye crush my people, and grind the face of the poor?  says the Lord, Yahweh of hosts.3:16 Moreover Yahweh said, Because the daughters of Zion are haughty, and walk with outstretched necks and wanton eyes, walking and mincing as they go, and making a tinkling with their feet;3:17 therefore the Lord will smite with a scab the crown of the head of the daughters of Zion, and Yahweh will lay bare their secret parts.3:18 In that day the Lord will take away the beauty of their anklets, and the lobes, and the crescents;3:19 the pendants, and the bracelets, and the mufflers;3:20 the headtires, and the ankle chains, and the sashes, and the perfume-boxes, and the amulets;3:21 the rings, and the nose-jewels;3:22 the festival robes, and the mantles, and the shawls, and the satchels;3:23 the hand-mirrors, and the fine linen, and the turbans, and the veils.3:24 And it shall come to pass, that instead of sweet spices there shall be rottenness; and instead of a girdle, a rope; and instead of well set hair, baldness; and instead of a robe, a girding of sackcloth; branding instead of beauty.3:25 Your men shall fall by the sword, and your mighty in the war.3:26 And her gates shall lament and mourn; and she shall be desolate and sit upon the ground.4:1 And seven women shall take hold of one man in that day, saying, We will eat our own bread, and wear our own apparel: only let us be called by your name; take you away our reproach.4:2 In that day shall the branch of Yahweh be beautiful and glorious, and the fruit of the land shall be excellent and comely for them that are escaped of Israel.4:3 And it shall come to pass, that he that is left in Zion, and he that remains in Jerusalem, shall be called holy, even every one that is written among the living in Jerusalem;4:4 when the Lord shall have washed away the filth of the daughters of Zion, and shall have purged the blood of Jerusalem from the midst thereof, by the spirit of justice, and by the spirit of burning.4:5 And Yahweh will create over the whole habitation of mount Zion, and over her assemblies, a cloud and smoke by day, and the shining of a flaming fire by night; for over all the glory shall be spread a covering.4:6 And there shall be a pavilion for a shade in the day-time from the heat, and for a refuge and for a covert from storm and from rain.5:1 Let me sing for my wellbeloved a song of my beloved touching his vineyard.  My wellbeloved had a vineyard in a very fruitful hill:5:2 and he dug it, and gathered out the stones thereof, and planted it with the choicest vine, and built a tower in the midst of it, and also hewed out a winepress therein: and he looked that it should bring forth grapes, and it brought forth wild grapes.5:3 And now, O inhabitants of Jerusalem and men of Judah, judge, I pray you, between me and my vineyard.5:4 What could have been done more to my vineyard, that I have not done in it?  why, when I looked that it should bring forth grapes, brought it forth wild grapes?5:5 And now I will tell you what I will do to my vineyard: I will take away the hedge thereof, and it shall be eaten up; I will break down the wall thereof, and it shall be trodden down:5:6 and I will lay it waste; it shall not be pruned nor hoed; but there shall come up briers and thorns: I will also command the clouds that they rain no rain upon it.5:7 For the vineyard of Yahweh of hosts is the house of Israel, and the men of Judah his pleasant plant: and he looked for justice, but, behold, oppression; for righteousness, but, behold, a cry.5:8 Woe to them that join house to house, that lay field to field, till there be no room, and ye be made to dwell alone in the midst of the land!5:9 In my ears says Yahweh of hosts, Of a truth many houses shall be desolate, even great and fair, without inhabitant.5:10 For ten acres of vineyard shall yield one bath, and a homer of seed shall yield but an ephah.5:11 Woe to them that rise up early in the morning, that they may follow strong drink; that tarry late into the night, till wine inflame them!5:12 And the harp and the lute, the tabret and the pipe, and wine, are in their feasts; but they regard not the work of Yahweh, neither have they considered the operation of his hands.5:13 Therefore my people are gone into captivity for lack of knowledge; and their honorable men are famished, and their multitude are parched with thirst.5:14 Therefore Sheol has enlarged its desire, and opened its mouth without measure; and their glory, and their multitude, and their pomp, and he that rejoices among them, descend into it.5:15 And the mean man is bowed down, and the great man is humbled, and the eyes of the lofty are humbled:5:16 but Yahweh of hosts is exalted in justice, and God the Holy One is sanctified in righteousness.5:17 Then shall the lambs feed as in their pasture, and the waste places of the fat ones shall wanderers eat.5:18 Woe to them that draw iniquity with cords of falsehood, and sin as it were with a cart rope;5:19 that say, Let him make speed, let him hasten his work, that we may see it; and let the counsel of the Holy One of Israel draw near and come, that we may know it!5:20 Woe to them that call evil good, and good evil; that put darkness for light, and light for darkness; that put bitter for sweet, and sweet for bitter!5:21 Woe to them that are wise in their own eyes, and prudent in their own sight!5:22 Woe to them that are mighty to drink wine, and men of strength to mingle strong drink;5:23 that justify the wicked for a bribe, and take away the righteousness of the righteous from him!5:24 Therefore as the tongue of fire devours the stubble, and as the dry grass sinks down in the flame, so their root shall be as rottenness, and their blossom shall go up as dust; because they have rejected the law of Yahweh of hosts, and despised the word of the Holy One of Israel.5:25 Therefore is the anger of Yahweh kindled against his people, and he has stretched forth his hand against them, and has smitten them; and the mountains tremble, and their dead bodies are as refuse in the midst of the streets.  For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still.5:26 And he will lift up an ensign to the nations from far, and will hiss for them from the end of the earth; and, behold, they shall come with speed swiftly.5:27 None shall be weary nor stumble among them; none shall slumber nor sleep; neither shall the girdle of their loins be loosed, nor the latchet of their shoes be broken:5:28 whose arrows are sharp, and all their bows bent; their horses' hoofs shall be accounted as flint, and their wheels as a whirlwind:5:29 their roaring shall be like a lioness, they shall roar like young lions; yes, they shall roar, and lay hold of the prey, and carry it away safe, and there shall be none to deliver.5:30 And they shall roar against them in that day like the roaring of the sea: and if one look to the land, behold, darkness and distress; and the light is darkened in the clouds thereof.6:1 In the year that king Uzziah died I saw the Lord sitting upon a throne, high and lifted up; and his train filled the temple.6:2 Above him stood the seraphim: each one had six wings; with twain he covered his face, and with twain he covered his feet, and with twain he did fly.6:3 And one cried to another, and said, Holy, holy, holy, is Yahweh of hosts: the whole earth is full of his glory.6:4 And the foundations of the thresholds shook at the voice of him that cried, and the house was filled with smoke.6:5 Then said I, Woe is me! for I am undone; because I am a man of unclean lips, and I dwell in the midst of a people of unclean lips: for my eyes have seen the King, Yahweh of hosts.6:6 Then flew one of the seraphim to me, having a live coal in his hand, which he had taken with the tongs from off the altar:6:7 and he touched my mouth with it, and said, Lo, this has touched your lips; and your iniquity is taken away, and your sin forgiven.6:8 And I heard the voice of the Lord, saying, Whom shall I send, and who will go for us?  Then I said, Here am I; send me.6:9 And he said, Go, and tell this people, Hear ye indeed, but understand not; and see ye indeed, but perceive not.6:10 Make the heart of this people fat, and make their ears heavy, and shut their eyes; lest they sea with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their heart, and turn again, and be healed.6:11 Then said I, Lord, how long?  And he answered, Until cities be waste without inhabitant, and houses without man, and the land become utterly waste,6:12 and Yahweh have removed men far away, and the forsaken places be many in the midst of the land.6:13 And if there be yet a tenth in it, it also shall in turn be eaten up: as a terebinth, and as an oak, whose stock remains, when they are felled; so the holy seed is the stock thereof.7:1 And it came to pass in the days of Ahaz the son of Jotham, the son of Uzziah, king of Judah, that Rezin the king of Syria, and Pekah the son of Remaliah, king of Israel, went up to Jerusalem to war against it, but could not prevail against it.7:2 And it was told the house of David, saying, Syria is confederate with Ephraim.  And his heart trembled, and the heart of his people, as the trees of the forest tremble with the wind.7:3 Then said Yahweh to Isaiah, Go forth now to meet Ahaz, you, and Shear-jashub your son, at the end of the conduit of the upper pool, in the highway of the fuller's field;7:4 and say to him, Take heed, and be quiet; fear not, neither let your heart be faint, because of these two tails of smoking firebrands, for the fierce anger of Rezin and Syria, and of the son of Remaliah.7:5 Because Syria, Ephraim, and the son of Remaliah, have purposed evil against you, saying,7:6 Let us go up against Judah, and vex it, and let us make a breach therein for us, and set up a king in the midst of it, even the son of Tabeel;7:7 Thus says the Lord Yahweh, It shall not stand, neither shall it come to pass.7:8 For the head of Syria is Damascus, and the head of Damascus is Rezin; and within sixty-five years shall Ephraim be broken in pieces, so that is shall not be a people:7:9 and the head of Ephraim is Samaria, and the head of Samaria is Remaliah's son.  If ye will not believe, surely ye shall not be established.7:10 And Yahweh spoke again to Ahaz, saying,7:11 Ask you a sign of Yahweh your God; ask it either in the depth, or in the height above.7:12 But Ahaz said, I will not ask, neither will I tempt Yahweh.7:13 And he said, Hear ye now, O house of David: Is it a small thing for you to weary men, that ye will weary my God also?7:14 Therefore the Lord himself will give you a sign: behold, a virgin shall conceive, and bear a son, and shall call his name Immanuel.7:15 Butter and honey shall he eat, when he knows to refuse the evil, and choose the good.7:16 For before the child shall know to refuse the evil, and choose the good, the land whose two kings you abhor shall be forsaken.7:17 Yahweh will bring upon you, and upon your people, and upon your father's house, days that have not come, from the day that Ephraim departed from Judah-even the king of Assyria.7:18 And it shall come to pass in that day, that Yahweh will hiss for the fly that is in the uttermost part of the rivers of Egypt, and for the bee that is in the land of Assyria.7:19 And they shall come, and shall rest all of them in the desolate valleys, and in the clefts of the rocks, and upon all thorn-hedges, and upon all pastures.7:20 In that day will the Lord shave with a razor that is hired in the parts beyond the River, even with the king of Assyria, the head and the hair of the feet; and it shall also consume the beard.7:21 And it shall come to pass in that day, that a man shall keep alive a young cow, and two sheep;7:22 and it shall come to pass, that because of the abundance of milk which they shall give he shall eat butter: for butter and honey shall every one eat that is left in the midst of the land.7:23 And it shall come to pass in that day, that every place, where there were a thousand vines at a thousand silverlings, shall be for briers and thorns.7:24 With arrows and with bow shall one come there, because all the land shall be briers and thorns.7:25 And all the hills that were dug with the mattock, you shall not come there for fear of briers and thorns; but it shall be for the sending forth of oxen, and for the treading of sheep.8:1 And Yahweh said to me, Take you a great tablet, and write upon it with the pen of a man, For Maher-shalal-hash-baz;8:2 and I will take to me faithful witnesses to record, Uriah the priest, and Zechariah the son of Jeberechiah.8:3 And I went to the prophetess; and she conceived, and bore a son.  Then said Yahweh to me, Call his name Maher-shalal-hash-baz.8:4 For before the child shall have knowledge to cry, My father, and, My mother, the riches of Damascus and the spoil of Samaria shall be carried away before the king of Assyria.8:5 And Yahweh spoke to me yet again, saying,8:6 Forasmuch as this people have refused the waters of Shiloah that go softly, and rejoice in Rezin and Remaliah's son;8:7 now therefore, behold, the Lord brings up upon them the waters of the River, strong and many, even the king of Assyria and all his glory: and it shall come up over all its channels, and go over all its banks;8:8 and it shall sweep onward into Judah; it shall overflow and pass through; it shall reach even to the neck; and the stretching out of its wings shall fill the breadth of your land, O Immanuel.8:9 Make an uproar, O ye peoples, and be broken in pieces; and give ear, all ye of far countries: gird yourselves, and be broken in pieces; gird yourselves, and be broken in pieces.8:10 Take counsel together, and it shall be brought to nought; speak the word, and it shall not stand: for God is with us.8:11 For Yahweh spoke thus to me with a strong hand, and instructed me not to walk in the way of this people, saying,8:12 Say ye not, a conspiracy, concerning all whereof this people shall say, a conspiracy; neither fear ye their fear, nor be in dread of it.8:13 Yahweh of hosts, him shall ye sanctify; and let him be your fear, and let him be your dread.8:14 And he shall be for a sanctuary; but for a stone of stumbling and for a rock of offence to both the houses of Israel, for a gin and for a snare to the inhabitants of Jerusalem.8:15 And many shall stumble upon it, and fall, and be broken, and be snared, and be taken.8:16 Bind you up the testimony, seal the law among my disciples.8:17 And I will wait for Yahweh, that hides his face from the house of Jacob, and I will look for him.8:18 Behold, I and the children whom Yahweh has given me are for signs and for wonders in Israel from Yahweh of hosts, who dwells in mount Zion.8:19 And when they shall say to you, Seek to them that have familiar spirits and to the wizards, that chirp and that mutter: should not a people seek to their God?  on behalf of the living should they seek to the dead?8:20 To the law and to the testimony! if they speak not according to this word, surely there is no morning for them.8:21 And they shall pass through it, sore distressed and hungry; and it shall come to pass that, when they shall be hungry, they shall fret themselves, and curse by their king and by their God, and turn their faces upward:8:22 and they shall look to the earth, and behold, distress and darkness, the gloom of anguish; and into thick darkness they shall be driven away.9:1 But there shall be no gloom to her that was in anguish.  In the former time he brought into contempt the land of Zebulun and the land of Naphtali; but in the latter time has he made it glorious, by the way of the sea, beyond the Jordan, Galilee of the nations.9:2 The people that walked in darkness have seen a great light: they that dwelt in the land of the shadow of death, upon them has the light shined.9:3 You have multiplied the nation, you have increased their joy: they joy before you according to the joy in harvest, as men rejoice when they divide the spoil.9:4 For the yoke of his burden, and the staff of his shoulder, the rod of his oppressor, you have broken as in the day of Midian.9:5 For all the armor of the armed man in the tumult, and the garments rolled in blood, shall be for burning, for fuel of fire.9:6 For to us a child is born, to us a son is given; and the government shall be upon his shoulder: and his name shall be called Wonderful, Counsellor, Mighty God, Everlasting Father, Prince of Peace.9:7 Of the increase of his government and of peace there shall be no end, upon the throne of David, and upon his kingdom, to establish it, and to uphold it with justice and with righteousness from from now on even for ever.  The zeal of Yahweh of hosts will perform this.9:8 The Lord sent a word into Jacob, and it has lighted upon Israel.9:9 And all the people shall know, even Ephraim and the inhabitant of Samaria, that say in pride and in stoutness of heart,9:10 The bricks are fallen, but we will build with hewn stone; the sycamores are cut down, but we will put cedars in their place. 9:11 Therefore Yahweh will set up on high against him the adversaries of Rezin, and will stir up his enemies,9:12 the Syrians before, and the Philistines behind; and they shall devour Israel with open mouth.  For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still.9:13 Yet the people have not turned to him that smote them, neither have they sought Yahweh of hosts.9:14 Therefore Yahweh will cut off from Israel head and tail, palm-branch and rush, in one day.9:15 The elder and the honorable man, he is the head; and the prophet that teaches lies, he is the tail.9:16 For they that lead this people cause them to err; and they that are led of them are destroyed.9:17 Therefore the Lord will not rejoice over their young men, neither will he have compassion on their fatherless and widows; for every one is profane and an evil-doer, and every mouth speaks folly.  For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still.9:18 For wickedness burns as the fire; it devours the briers and thorns; yes, it kindles in the thickets of the forest, and they roll upward in a column of smoke.9:19 Through the wrath of Yahweh of hosts is the land burnt up; and the people are as the fuel of fire: no man spares his brother.9:20 And one shall snatch on the right hand, and be hungry; and he shall eat on the left hand, and they shall not be satisfied: they shall eat every man the flesh of his own arm:9:21 Manasseh, Ephraim; and Ephraim, Manasseh; and they together shall be against Judah.  For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still.10:1 Woe to them that decree unrighteous decrees, and to the writers that write oppressive statutes;10:2 to turn aside the needy from justice, and to rob the poor of my people of their right, that widows may be their spoil, and that they may make the fatherless their prey!10:3 And what will ye do in the day of visitation, and in the desolation which shall come from far?  to whom will ye flee for help?  and where will ye leave your glory?10:4 They shall only bow down under the prisoners, and shall fall under the slain.  For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still.10:5 Ho Assyrian, the rod of my anger, the staff in whose hand is my indignation!10:6 I will send him against a profane nation, and against the people of my wrath will I give him a charge, to take the spoil, and to take the prey, and to tread them down like the mire of the streets.10:7 Though he intends not so, neither does his heart think so; but it is in his heart to destroy, and to cut off nations not a few.10:8 For he says, are not my princes all of them kings?10:9 Is not Calno as Carchemish?  is not Hamath as Arpad?  is not Samaria as Damascus?10:10 As my hand has found the kingdoms of the idols, whose graven images did excel them of Jerusalem and of Samaria;10:11 shall I not, as I have done to Samaria and her idols, so do to Jerusalem and her idols?10:12 Wherefore it shall come to pass, that, when the Lord has performed his whole work upon mount Zion and on Jerusalem, I will punish the fruit of the stout heart of the king of Assyria, and the glory of his high looks.10:13 For he has said, By the strength of my hand I have done it, and by my wisdom; for I have understanding: and I have removed the bounds of the peoples, and have robbed their treasures, and like a valiant man I have brought down them that sit on thrones:10:14 and my hand has found as a nest the riches of the peoples; and as one gathers eggs that are forsaken, have I gathered all the earth: and there was none that moved the wing, or that opened the mouth, or chirped.10:15 Shall the axe boast itself against him that hews with it?  shall the saw magnify itself against him that wields it?  as if a rod should wield them that lift it up, or as if a staff should lift up him that is not wood.10:16 Therefore will the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, send among his fat ones leanness; and under his glory there shall be kindled a burning like the burning of fire.10:17 And the light of Israel will be for a fire, and his Holy One for a flame; and it will burn and devour his thorns and his briers in one day.10:18 And he will consume the glory of his forest, and of his fruitful field, both soul and body: and it shall be as when a standard-bearer faints.10:19 And the remnant of the trees of his forest shall be few, so that a child may write them.10:20 And it shall come to pass in that day, that the remnant of Israel, and they that are escaped of the house of Jacob, shall no more again lean upon him that smote them, but shall lean upon Yahweh, the Holy One of Israel, in truth.10:21 A remnant shall return, even the remnant of Jacob, to the mighty God.10:22 For though your people, Israel, be as the sand of the sea, only a remnant of them shall return: a destruction is determined, overflowing with righteousness.10:23 For a full end, and that determined, will the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, make in the midst of all the earth.10:24 Therefore thus says the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, O my people that dwell in Zion, be not afraid of the Assyrian, though he smite you with the rod, and lift up his staff against you, after the manner of Egypt.10:25 For yet a very little while, and the indignation against you shall be accomplished, and my anger shall be directed to his destruction.10:26 And Yahweh of hosts will stir up against him a scourge, as in the slaughter of Midian at the rock of Oreb: and his rod will be over the sea, and he will lift it up after the manner of Egypt.10:27 And it shall come to pass in that day, that his burden shall depart from off your shoulder, and his yoke from off your neck, and the yoke shall be destroyed by reason of fatness.10:28 He is come to Aiath, he is passed through Migron; at Michmash he lays up his baggage;10:29 they are gone over the pass; they have taken up their lodging at Geba; Ramah trembles; Gibeah of Saul is fled.10:30 Cry aloud with your voice, O daughter of Gallim! hearken, O Laishah! O you poor Anathoth!10:31 Madmenah is a fugitive; the inhabitants of Gebim flee for safety.10:32 This very day shall he halt at Nob: he shakes his hand at the mount of the daughter of Zion, the hill of Jerusalem.10:33 Behold, the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, will lop the boughs with terror: and the high of stature shall be hewn down, and the lofty shall be brought low.10:34 And he will cut down the thickets of the forest with iron, and Lebanon shall fall by a mighty one.11:1 And there shall come forth a shoot out of the stock of Jesse, and a branch out of his roots shall bear fruit.11:2 And the Spirit of Yahweh shall rest upon him, the spirit of wisdom and understanding, the spirit of counsel and might, the spirit of knowledge and of the fear of Yahweh.11:3 And his delight shall be in the fear of Yahweh; and he shall not judge after the sight of his eyes, neither decide after the hearing of his ears;11:4 but with righteousness shall he judge the poor, and decide with equity for the meek of the earth; and he shall smite the earth with the rod of his mouth; and with the breath of his lips shall he slay the wicked.11:5 And righteousness shall be the girdle of his waist, and faithfulness the girdle of his loins.11:6 And the wolf shall dwell with the lamb, and the leopard shall lie down with the kid; and the calf and the young lion and the fatling together; and a little child shall lead them.11:7 And the cow and the bear shall feed; their young ones shall lie down together; and the lion shall eat straw like the ox.11:8 And the sucking child shall play on the hole of the asp, and the weaned child shall put his hand on the adder's den.11:9 They shall not hurt nor destroy in all my holy mountain; for the earth shall be full of the knowledge of Yahweh, as the waters cover the sea.11:10 And it shall come to pass in that day, that the root of Jesse, that stands for an ensign of the peoples, to him shall the nations seek; and his resting-place shall be glorious.11:11 And it shall come to pass in that day, that the Lord will set his hand again the second time to recover the remnant of his people, that shall remain, from Assyria, and from Egypt, and from Pathros, and from Cush, and from Elam, and from Shinar, and from Hamath, and from the islands of the sea.11:12 And he will set up an ensign for the nations, and will assemble the outcasts of Israel, and gather together the dispersed of Judah from the four corners of the earth.11:13 The envy also of Ephraim shall depart, and they that vex Judah shall be cut off: Ephraim shall not envy Judah, and Judah shall not vex Ephraim.11:14 And they shall fly down upon the shoulder of the Philistines on the west; together shall they despoil the children of the east: they shall put forth their hand upon Edom and Moab; and the children of Ammon shall obey them.11:15 And Yahweh will utterly destroy the tongue of the Egyptian sea; and with his scorching wind will he wave his hand over the River, and will smite it into seven streams, and cause men to march over dryshod.11:16 And there shall be a highway for the remnant of his people, that shall remain, from Assyria; like as there was for Israel in the day that he came up out of the land of Egypt.12:1 And in that day you shall say, I will give thanks to you, O Yahweh; for though you were angry with me, your anger is turned away and you comfort me.12:2 Behold, God is my salvation; I will trust, and will not be afraid; for Yahweh, even Yahweh, is my strength and song; and he is become my salvation.12:3 Therefore with joy shall ye draw water out of the wells of salvation.12:4 And in that day shall ye say, Give thanks to Yahweh, call upon his name, declare his doings among the peoples, make mention that his name is exalted.12:5 Sing to Yahweh; for he has done excellent things: let this be known in all the earth.12:6 Cry aloud and shout, you inhabitant of Zion; for great in the midst of you is the Holy One of Israel.13:1 The burden concerning Babylon, which Isaiah the son of Amoz did see.13:2 Set ye up an ensign upon the bare mountain, lift up the voice to them, wave the hand, that they may go into the gates of the nobles.13:3 I have commanded my consecrated ones, yes, I have called my mighty men for my anger, even my proudly exulting ones.13:4 The noise of a multitude in the mountains, as of a great people! the noise of a tumult of the kingdoms of the nations gathered together! Yahweh of hosts is mustering the host for the battle.13:5 They come from a far country, from the uttermost part of heaven, even Yahweh, and the weapons of his indignation, to destroy the whole land.13:6 Wail ye; for the day of Yahweh is at hand; as destruction from the Almighty shall it come.13:7 Therefore shall all hands be feeble, and every heart of man shall melt:13:8 and they shall be dismayed; pangs and sorrows shall take hold of them; they shall be in pain as a woman in travail: they shall look in amazement one at another; their faces shall be faces of flame.13:9 Behold, the day of Yahweh comes, cruel, with wrath and fierce anger; to make the land a desolation, and to destroy the sinners thereof out of it.13:10 For the stars of heaven and the constellations thereof shall not give their light; the sun shall be darkened in its going forth, and the moon shall not cause its light to shine.13:11 And I will punish the world for their evil, and the wicked for their iniquity: and I will cause the arrogance of the proud to cease, and will lay low the haughtiness of the terrible.13:12 I will make a man more rare than fine gold, even a man than the pure gold of Ophir.13:13 Therefore I will make the heavens to tremble, and the earth shall be shaken out of its place, in the wrath of Yahweh of hosts, and in the day of his fierce anger.13:14 And it shall come to pass, that as the chased roe, and as sheep that no man gathers, they shall turn every man to his own people, and shall flee every man to his own land.13:15 Every one that is found shall be thrust through; and every one that is taken shall fall by the sword.13:16 Their infants also shall be dashed in pieces before their eyes; their houses shall be rifled, and their wives ravished.13:17 Behold, I will stir up the Medes against them, who shall not regard silver, and as for gold, they shall not delight in it.13:18 And their bows shall dash the young men in pieces; and they shall have no pity on the fruit of the womb; their eye shall not spare children.13:19 And Babylon, the glory of kingdoms, the beauty of the Chaldeans' pride, shall be as when God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah.13:20 It shall never be inhabited, neither shall it be dwelt in from generation to generation: neither shall the Arab pitch a tent there; neither shall shepherds make their flocks to lie down there.13:21 But wild beasts of the desert shall lie there; and their houses shall be full of doleful creatures; and ostriches shall dwell there, and wild goats shall dance there.13:22 And wolves shall cry in their castles, and jackals in the pleasant palaces: and her time is near to come, and her days shall not be prolonged.14:1 For Yahweh will have compassion on Jacob, and will yet choose Israel, and set them in their own land: and the sojourner shall join himself with them, and they shall cleave to the house of Jacob.14:2 And the peoples shall take them, and bring them to their place; and the house of Israel shall possess them in the land of Yahweh for servants and for handmaids: and they shall take them captive whose captives they were; and they shall rule over their oppressors.14:3 And it shall come to pass in the day that Yahweh shall give you rest from your sorrow, and from your trouble, and from the hard service in which you were made to serve,14:4 that you shall take up this parable against the king of Babylon, and say, How has the oppressor ceased! the golden city ceased!14:5 Yahweh has broken the staff of the wicked, the sceptre of the rulers;14:6 that smote the peoples in wrath with a continual stroke, that ruled the nations in anger, with a persecution that none restrained.14:7 The whole earth is at rest, and is quiet: they break forth into singing.14:8 Yes, the fir-trees rejoice at you, and the cedars of Lebanon, saying, Since you are laid low, no hewer is come up against us.14:9 Sheol from beneath is moved for you to meet you at your coming; it stirs up the dead for you, even all the chief ones of the earth; it has raised up from their thrones all the kings of the nations.14:10 All they shall answer and say to you, are you also become weak as we?  are you become like to us?14:11 Your pomp is brought down to Sheol, and the noise of your viols: the worm is spread under you, and worms cover you.14:12 How are you fallen from heaven, O morning star, son of the dawn! how are you cut down to the ground, that did lay low the nations!14:13 And you said in your heart, I will ascend into heaven, I will exalt my throne above the stars of God; and I will sit upon the mount of congregation, in the uttermost parts of the north;14:14 I will ascend above the heights of the clouds; I will make myself like the Most High.14:15 Yet you shall be brought down to Sheol, to the uttermost parts of the pit.14:16 They that see you shall gaze at you, they shall consider you, saying, Is this the man that made the earth to tremble, that did shake kingdoms;14:17 that made the world as a wilderness, and overthrew the cities thereof; that let not loose his prisoners to their home?14:18 All the kings of the nations, all of them, sleep in glory, every one in his own house.14:19 But you are cast forth away from your sepulchre like an abominable branch, clothed with the slain, that are thrust through with the sword, that go down to the stones of the pit; as a dead body trodden under foot.14:20 You shall not be joined with them in burial, because you have destroyed your land, you have slain your people; the seed of evil-doers shall not be named for ever.14:21 Prepare ye slaughter for his children for the iniquity of their fathers, that they rise not up, and possess the earth, and fill the face of the world with cities.14:22 And I will rise up against them, says Yahweh of hosts, and cut off from Babylon name and remnant, and son and son's son, says Yahweh.14:23 I will also make it a possession for the porcupine, and pools of water: and I will sweep it with the besom of destruction, says Yahweh of hosts.14:24 Yahweh of hosts has sworn, saying, Surely, as I have thought, so shall it come to pass; and as I have purposed, so shall it stand:14:25 that I will break the Assyrian in my land, and upon my mountains tread him under foot: then shall his yoke depart from off them, and his burden depart from off their shoulder.14:26 This is the purpose that is purposed upon the whole earth; and this is the hand that is stretched out upon all the nations.14:27 For Yahweh of hosts has purposed, and who shall annul it?  and his hand is stretched out, and who shall turn it back?14:28 In the year that king Ahaz died was this burden.14:29 Rejoice not, O Philistia, all of you, because the rod that smote you is broken; for out of the serpent's root shall come forth an adder, and his fruit shall be a fiery flying serpent.14:30 And the first-born of the poor shall feed, and the needy shall lie down in safety; and I will kill your root with famine, and your remnant shall be slain.14:31 Howl, O gate; cry, O city; you are melted away, O Philistia, all of you; for there comes a smoke out of the north, and there is no straggler in his ranks.14:32 What then shall one answer the messengers of the nation?  That Yahweh has founded Zion, and in her shall the afflicted of his people take refuge.15:1 The burden concerning Moab.  For in a night Ar of Moab is laid waste, and brought to nought; for in a night Kir of Moab is laid waste, and brought to nought.15:2 They are gone up to Bayith, and to Dibon, to the high places, to weep: Moab wails over Nebo, and over Medeba; on all their heads is baldness, every beard is cut off.15:3 In their streets they gird themselves with sackcloth; on their housetops, and in their broad places, every one wails, weeping abundantly.15:4 And Heshbon cries out, and Elealeh; their voice is heard even to Jahaz: therefore the armed men of Moab cry aloud; his soul trembles within him.15:5 My heart cries out for Moab; her nobles flee to Zoar, to Eglath-shelishi-yah: for by the ascent of Luhith with weeping they go up; for in the way of Horonaim they raise up a cry of destruction.15:6 For the waters of Nimrim shall be desolate; for the grass is withered away, the tender grass fails, there is no green thing.15:7 Therefore the abundance they have gotten, and that which they have laid up, shall they carry away over the brook of the willows.15:8 For the cry is gone round about the borders of Moab; the wailing thereof to Eglaim, and the wailing thereof to Beer-elim.15:9 For the waters of Dimon are full of blood; for I will bring yet more upon Dimon, a lion upon them of Moab that escape, and upon the remnant of the land.16:1 Send ye the lambs for the ruler of the land from Selah to the wilderness, to the mount of the daughter of Zion.16:2 For it shall be that, as wandering birds, as a scattered nest, so shall the daughters of Moab be at the fords of the Arnon.16:3 Give counsel, execute justice; make your shade as the night in the midst of the noonday; hide the outcasts; betray not the fugitive.16:4 Let my outcasts dwell with you; as for Moab, be you a covert to him from the face of the destroyer.  For the extortioner is brought to nought, destruction ceases, the oppressors are consumed out of the land.16:5 And a throne shall be established in lovingkindness; and one shall sit upon it in truth, in the tent of David, judging, and seeking justice, and swift to do righteousness.16:6 We have heard of the pride of Moab, that he is very proud; even of his arrogancy, and his pride, and his wrath; his boastings are nought.16:7 Therefore shall Moab wail for Moab, every one shall wail: for the raisin-cakes of Kir-hareseth shall ye mourn, utterly stricken.16:8 For the fields of Heshbon languish, and the vine of Sibmah; the lords of the nations have broken down the choice branches thereof, which reached even to Jazer, which wandered into the wilderness; its shoots were spread abroad, they passed over the sea.16:9 Therefore I will weep with the weeping of Jazer for the vine of Sibmah; I will water you with my tears, O Heshbon, and Elealeh: for upon your summer fruits and upon your harvest the battle shout is fallen.16:10 And gladness is taken away, and joy out of the fruitful field; and in the vineyards there shall be no singing, neither joyful noise: no treader shall tread out wine in the presses; I have made the vintage shout to cease.16:11 Wherefore my heart sounds like a harp for Moab, and my inward parts for Kir-heres.16:12 And it shall come to pass, when Moab presents himself, when he wearies himself upon the high place, and shall come to his sanctuary to pray, that he shall not prevail.16:13 This is the word that Yahweh spoke concerning Moab in time past.16:14 But now Yahweh has spoken, saying, Within three years, as the years of a hireling, the glory of Moab shall be brought into contempt, with all his great multitude; and the remnant shall be very small and of no account.17:1 The burden concerning Damascus.  Behold, Damascus is taken away from being a city, and it shall be a ruinous heap.17:2 The cities of Aroer are forsaken; they shall be for flocks, which shall lie down, and none shall make them afraid.17:3 And the fortress shall cease from Ephraim, and the kingdom from Damascus, and the remnant of Syria; they shall be as the glory of the children of Israel, says Yahweh of hosts.17:4 And it shall come to pass in that day, that the glory of Jacob shall be made thin, and the fatness of his flesh shall grow lean.17:5 And it shall be as when the harvestman gathers the standing grain, and his arm reaps the ears; yes, it shall be as when one gleans ears in the valley of Rephaim.17:6 Yet there shall be left therein gleanings, as the shaking of an olive-tree, two or three berries in the top of the uppermost bough, four or five in the outmost branches of a fruitful tree, says Yahweh, the God of Israel.17:7 In that day shall men look to their Maker, and their eyes shall have respect to the Holy One of Israel.17:8 And they shall not look to the altars, the work of their hands; neither shall they have respect to that which their fingers have made, either the Asherim, or the sun-images.17:9 In that day shall their strong cities be as the forsaken places in the wood and on the mountain top, which were forsaken from before the children of Israel; and it shall be a desolation.17:10 For you have forgotten the God of your salvation, and have not been mindful of the rock of your strength; therefore you plant pleasant plants, and set it with strange slips.17:11 In the day of your planting you hedge it in, and in the morning you cause your seed to blossom; but the harvest flees away in the day of grief and of desperate sorrow.17:12 Ah, the uproar of many peoples, that roar like the roaring of the seas; and the rushing of nations, that rush like the rushing of mighty waters!17:13 The nations shall rush like the rushing of many waters: but he shall rebuke them, and they shall flee far off, and shall be chased as the chaff of the mountains before the wind, and like the whirling dust before the storm.17:14 At eventide, behold, terror; and before the morning they are not.  This is the portion of them that despoil us, and the lot of them that rob us.18:1 Ah, the land of the rustling of wings, which is beyond the rivers of Ethiopia;18:2 that sends ambassadors by the sea, even in vessels of papyrus upon the waters, saying, Go, ye swift messengers, to a nation tall and smooth, to a people terrible from their beginning onward, a nation that metes out and treads down, whose land the rivers divide!18:3 All ye inhabitants of the world, and ye dwellers on the earth, when an ensign is lifted up on the mountains, see ye; and when the trumpet is blown, hear ye.18:4 For thus has Yahweh said to me, I will be still, and I will behold in my dwelling-place, like clear heat in sunshine, like a cloud of dew in the heat of harvest.18:5 For before the harvest, when the blossom is over, and the flower becomes a ripening grape, he will cut off the sprigs with pruning-hooks, and the spreading branches will he take away and cut down.18:6 They shall be left together to the ravenous birds of the mountains, and to the beasts of the earth; and the ravenous birds shall summer upon them, and all the beasts of the earth shall winter upon them.18:7 In that time shall a present be brought to Yahweh of hosts from a people tall and smooth, even from a people terrible from their beginning onward, a nation that metes out and treads down, whose land the rivers divide, to the place of the name of Yahweh of hosts, the mount Zion.19:1 The burden concerning Egypt.  Behold, Yahweh rides upon a swift cloud, and comes to Egypt: and the idols of Egypt shall tremble at his presence; and the heart of Egypt shall melt in the midst of it.19:2 And I will stir up the Egyptians against the Egyptians: and they shall fight every one against his brother, and every one against his neighbor; city against city, and kingdom against kingdom.19:3 And the spirit of Egypt shall fail in the midst of it; and I will destroy the counsel thereof: and they shall seek to the idols, and to the charmers, and to them that have familiar spirits, and to the wizards.19:4 And I will give over the Egyptians into the hand of a cruel lord; and a fierce king shall rule over them, says the Lord, Yahweh of hosts.19:5 And the waters shall fail from the sea, and the river shall be wasted and become dry.19:6 And the rivers shall become foul; the streams of Egypt shall be diminished and dried up; the reeds and flags shall wither away.19:7 The meadows by the Nile, by the brink of the Nile, and all the sown fields of the Nile, shall become dry, be driven away, and be no more.19:8 And the fishers shall lament, and all they that cast angle into the Nile shall mourn, and they that spread nets upon the waters shall languish.19:9 Moreover they that work in combed flax, and they that weave white cloth, shall be confounded.19:10 And they that are the pillars of Egypt shall be broken in pieces, and all they that work for hire shall be grieved in soul.19:11 The princes of Zoan are utterly foolish; the counsel of the wisest counsellors of Pharaoh is become brutish: how say ye to Pharaoh, I am the son of the wise, the son of ancient kings?19:12 Where then are your wise men?  and let them tell you now; and let them know what Yahweh of hosts has purposed concerning Egypt.19:13 The princes of Zoan are become fools, the princes of Memphis are deceived; they have caused Egypt to go astray, that are the corner-stone of her tribes.19:14 Yahweh has mingled a spirit of perverseness in the midst of her; and they have caused Egypt to go astray in every work thereof, as a drunken man staggers in his vomit.19:15 Neither shall there be for Egypt any work, which head or tail, palm-branch or rush, may do.19:16 In that day shall the Egyptians be like to women; and they shall tremble and fear because of the shaking of the hand of Yahweh of hosts, which he shakes over them.19:17 And the land of Judah shall become a terror to Egypt; every one to whom mention is made thereof shall be afraid, because of the purpose of Yahweh of hosts, which he purposes against it.19:18 In that day there shall be five cities in the land of Egypt that speak the language of Canaan, and swear to Yahweh of hosts; one shall be called The city of destruction.19:19 In that day shall there be an altar to Yahweh in the midst of the land of Egypt, and a pillar at the border thereof to Yahweh.19:20 And it shall be for a sign and for a witness to Yahweh of hosts in the land of Egypt; for they shall cry to Yahweh because of oppressors, and he will send them a saviour, and a defender, and he will deliver them.19:21 And Yahweh shall be known to Egypt, and the Egyptians shall know Yahweh in that day; yes, they shall worship with sacrifice and oblation, and shall vow a vow to Yahweh, and shall perform it.19:22 And Yahweh will smite Egypt, smiting and healing; and they shall return to Yahweh, and he will be entreated of them, and will heal them.19:23 In that day shall there be a highway out of Egypt to Assyria, and the Assyrian shall come into Egypt, and the Egyptian into Assyria; and the Egyptians shall worship with the Assyrians.19:24 In that day shall Israel be the third with Egypt and with Assyria, a blessing in the midst of the earth;19:25 for that Yahweh of hosts has blessed them, saying, Blessed be Egypt my people, and Assyria the work of my hands, and Israel my inheritance.20:1 In the year that Tartan came to Ashdod, when Sargon the king of Assyria sent him, and he fought against Ashdod and took it;20:2 at that time Yahweh spoke by Isaiah the son of Amoz, saying, Go, and loose the sackcloth from off your loins, and put your shoe from off your foot.  And he did so, walking naked and barefoot.20:3 And Yahweh said, Like as my servant Isaiah has walked naked and barefoot three years for a sign and a wonder concerning Egypt and concerning Ethiopia;20:4 so shall the king of Assyria lead away the captives of Egypt, and the exiles of Ethiopia, young and old, naked and barefoot, and with buttocks uncovered, to the shame of Egypt.20:5 And they shall be dismayed and confounded, because of Ethiopia their expectation, and of Egypt their glory.20:6 And the inhabitant of this coast-land shall say in that day, Behold, such is our expectation, whither we fled for help to be delivered from the king of Assyria: and we, how shall we escape?21:1 The burden concerning the wilderness of the sea.  As whirlwinds in the South sweep through, it comes from the wilderness, from a terrible land.21:2 A grievous vision is declared to me; the treacherous man deals treacherously, and the destroyer destroys.  Go up, O Elam; besiege, O Media; all the sighing thereof have I made to cease.21:3 Therefore are my loins filled with anguish; pangs have taken hold upon me, as the pangs of a woman in travail: I am pained so that I cannot hear; I am dismayed so that I cannot see.21:4 My heart flutters, horror has affrighted me; the twilight that I desired has been turned into trembling to me.21:5 They prepare the table, they set the watch, they eat, they drink: rise up, ye princes, anoint the shield.21:6 For thus has the Lord said to me, Go, set a watchman: let him declare what he sees:21:7 and when he sees a troop, horsemen in pairs, a troop of asses, a troop of camels, he shall hearken diligently with much heed.21:8 And he cried as a lion: O Lord, I stand continually upon the watch-tower in the day-time, and am set in my ward whole nights;21:9 and, behold, here comes a troop of men, horsemen in pairs.  And he answered and said, Fallen, fallen is Babylon; and all the graven images of her gods are broken to the ground.21:10 O you my threshing, and the grain of my floor! that which I have heard from Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, have I declared to you.21:11 The burden concerning Dumah.  One calls to me out of Seir, Watchman, what of the night?  Watchman, what of the night?21:12 The watchman said, The morning comes, and also the night: if ye will inquire, inquire ye: turn ye, come.21:13 The burden upon Arabia.  In the forest in Arabia shall ye lodge, O ye caravans of Dedanites.21:14 To him that was thirsty they brought water; the inhabitants of the land of Tema did meet the fugitives with their bread.21:15 For they fled away from the swords, from the drawn sword, and from the bent bow, and from the grievousness of war.21:16 For thus has the Lord said to me, Within a year, according to the years of a hireling, all the glory of Kedar shall fail;21:17 and the residue of the number of the archers, the mighty men of the children of Kedar, shall be few; for Yahweh, the God of Israel, has spoken it.22:1 The burden concerning the valley of vision.  What ails you now, that you are wholly gone up to the housetops?22:2 O you that are full of shoutings, a tumultuous city, a joyous town; your slain are not slain with the sword, neither are they dead in battle.22:3 All your rulers fled away together, they were bound by the archers; all that were found of you were bound together; they fled afar off.22:4 Therefore said I, Look away from me, I will weep bitterly; labor not to comfort me for the destruction of the daughter of my people.22:5 For it is a day of discomfiture, and of treading down, and of perplexity, from the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, in the valley of vision; a breaking down of the walls, and a crying to the mountains.22:6 And Elam bore the quiver, with chariots of men and horsemen; and Kir uncovered the shield.22:7 And it came to pass, that your choicest valleys were full of chariots, and the horsemen set themselves in array at the gate.22:8 And he took away the covering of Judah; and you did look in that day to the armor in the house of the forest.22:9 And ye saw the breaches of the city of David, that they were many; and ye gathered together the waters of the lower pool;22:10 and ye numbered the houses of Jerusalem, and ye broke down the houses to fortify the wall;22:11 ye made also a reservoir between the two walls for the water of the old pool.  But ye looked not to him that had done this, neither had ye respect to him that purposed it long ago.22:12 And in that day did the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, call to weeping, and to mourning, and to baldness, and to girding with sackcloth:22:13 and behold, joy and gladness, slaying oxen and killing sheep, eating flesh and drinking wine: let us eat and drink, for tomorrow we shall die.22:14 And Yahweh of hosts revealed himself in my ears, Surely this iniquity shall not be forgiven you till ye die, says the Lord, Yahweh of hosts.22:15 Thus says the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, Go, get yourself to this steward, even to Shebna, who is over the house, and say,22:16 What do you here?  and whom has you here, that you have hewed you out here a sepulchre?  hewing him out a sepulchre on high, graving a habitation for himself in the rock!22:17 Behold, Yahweh, like a strong man, will hurl you away violently; yes, he will wrap you up closely.22:18 He will surely wind you round and round, and toss you like a ball into a large country; there shall you die, and there shall be the chariots of your glory, you shame of your lord's house.22:19 And I will thrust you from your office; and from your station shall you be pulled down.22:20 And it shall come to pass in that day, that I will call my servant Eliakim the son of Hilkiah:22:21 and I will cloth him with your robe, and strengthen him with your girdle, and I will commit your government into his hand; and he shall be a father to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and to the house of Judah.22:22 And the key of the house of David will I lay upon his shoulder; and he shall open, and none shall shut; and he shall shut, and none shall open.22:23 And I will fasten him as a nail in a sure place; and he shall be for a throne of glory to his father's house.22:24 And they shall hang upon him all the glory of his father's house, the offspring and the issue, every small vessel, from the cups even to all the flagons.22:25 In that day, says Yahweh of hosts, shall the nail that was fastened in a sure place give way; and it shall be hewn down, and fall; and the burden that was upon it shall be cut off; for Yahweh has spoken it.23:1 The burden concerning Tyre.  Howl, ye ships of Tarshish; for it is laid waste, so that there is no house, no entering in: from the land of Kittim it is revealed to them.23:2 Be still, ye inhabitants of the coast, you whom the merchants of Sidon, that pass over the sea, have replenished.23:3 And on great waters the seed of the Shihor, the harvest of the Nile, was her revenue; and she was the mart of nations.23:4 Be you ashamed, O Sidon; for the sea has spoken, the stronghold of the sea, saying, I have not travailed, nor brought forth, neither have I nourished young men, nor brought up virgins.23:5 When the report comes to Egypt, they shall be sorely pained at the report of Tyre.23:6 Pass ye over to Tarshish; wail, ye inhabitants of the coast.23:7 Is this your joyous city, whose antiquity is of ancient days, whose feet carried her afar off to sojourn?23:8 Who has purposed this against Tyre, the bestower of crowns, whose merchants are princes, whose traffickers are the honorable of the earth?23:9 Yahweh of hosts has purposed it, to stain the pride of all glory, to bring into contempt all the honorable of the earth.23:10 Pass through your land as the Nile, O daughter of Tarshish; there is no restraint any more.23:11 He has stretched out his hand over the sea, he has shaken the kingdoms: Yahweh has given commandment concerning Canaan, to destroy the strongholds thereof.23:12 And he said, You shall no more rejoice, O you oppressed virgin daughter of Sidon: arise, pass over to Kittim; even there shall you have no rest.23:13 Behold, the land of the Chaldeans: this people was not; the Assyrian founded it for them that dwell in the wilderness; they set up their towers; they overthrew the palaces thereof; they made it a ruin.23:14 Howl, ye ships of Tarshish; for your stronghold is laid waste.23:15 And it shall come to pass in that day, that Tyre shall be forgotten seventy years, according to the days of one king: after the end of seventy years it shall be to Tyre as in the song of the harlot.23:16 Take a harp, go about the city, you harlot that have been forgotten; make sweet melody, sing many songs, that you may be remembered.23:17 And it shall come to pass after the end of seventy years, that Yahweh will visit Tyre, and she shall return to her wages, and shall play the harlot with all the kingdoms of the world upon the face of the earth.23:18 And her merchandise and her wages shall be holiness to Yahweh: it shall not be treasured nor laid up; for her merchandise shall be for them that dwell before Yahweh, to eat sufficiently, and for durable clothing.24:1 Behold, Yahweh makes the earth empty, and makes it waste, and turns it upside down, and scatters abroad the inhabitants thereof.24:2 And it shall be, as with the people, so with the priest; as with the servant, so with his master; as with the maid, so with her mistress; as with the buyer, so with the seller; as with the creditor, so with the debtor; as with the taker of interest, so with the giver of interest to him.24:3 The earth shall be utterly emptied, and utterly laid waste; for Yahweh has spoken this word.24:4 The earth mourns and fades away, the world languishes and fades away, the lofty people of the earth do languish.24:5 The earth also is polluted under the inhabitants thereof; because they have transgressed the laws, violated the statutes, broken the everlasting covenant.24:6 Therefore has the curse devoured the earth, and they that dwell therein are found guilty: therefore the inhabitants of the earth are burned, and few men left.24:7 The new wine mourns, the vine languishes, all the merry-hearted do sigh.24:8 The mirth of tabrets ceases, the noise of them that rejoice ends, the joy of the harp ceases.24:9 They shall not drink wine with a song; strong drink shall be bitter to them that drink it.24:10 The waste city is broken down; every house is shut up, that no man may come in.24:11 There is a crying in the streets because of the wine; all joy is darkened, the mirth of the land is gone.24:12 In the city is left desolation, and the gate is smitten with destruction.24:13 For thus shall it be in the midst of the earth among the peoples, as the shaking of an olive-tree, as the gleanings when the vintage is done.24:14 These shall lift up their voice, they shall shout; for the majesty of Yahweh they cry aloud from the sea.24:15 Wherefore glorify ye Yahweh in the east, even the name of Yahweh, the God of Israel, in the isles of the sea.24:16 From the uttermost part of the earth have we heard songs: Glory to the righteous.  But I said, I pine away, I pine away, woe is me! the treacherous have dealt treacherously; yes, the treacherous have dealt very treacherously.24:17 Fear, and the pit, and the snare, are upon you, O inhabitant of the earth.24:18 And it shall come to pass, that he who flees from the noise of the fear shall fall into the pit; and he that comes up out of the midst of the pit shall be taken in the snare: for the windows on high are opened, and the foundations of the earth tremble.24:19 The earth is utterly broken, the earth is rent asunder, the earth is shaken violently.24:20 The earth shall stagger like a drunken man, and shall sway to and fro like a hammock; and the transgression thereof shall be heavy upon it, and it shall fall, and not rise again.24:21 And it shall come to pass in that day, that Yahweh will punish the host of the high ones on high, and the kings of the earth upon the earth.24:22 And they shall be gathered together, as prisoners are gathered in the pit, and shall be shut up in the prison; and after many days shall they be visited.24:23 Then the moon shall be confounded, and the sun ashamed; for Yahweh of hosts will reign in mount Zion, and in Jerusalem; and before his elders shall be glory.25:1 O Yahweh, you are my God; I will exalt you, I will praise your name; for you have done wonderful things, even counsels of old, in faithfulness and truth.25:2 For you have made of a city a heap, of a fortified city a ruin, a palace of strangers to be no city; it shall never be built.25:3 Therefore shall a strong people glorify you; a city of terrible nations shall fear you.25:4 For you have been a stronghold to the poor, a stronghold to the needy in his distress, a refuge from the storm, a shade from the heat, when the blast of the terrible ones is as a storm against the wall.25:5 As the heat in a dry place will you bring down the noise of strangers; as the heat by the shade of a cloud, the song of the terrible ones shall be brought low.25:6 And in this mountain will Yahweh of hosts make to all peoples a feast of fat things, a feast of wines on the lees, of fat things full of marrow, of wines on the lees well refined.25:7 And he will destroy in this mountain the face of the covering that covers all peoples, and the veil that is spread over all nations.25:8 He has swallowed up death for ever; and the Lord Yahweh will wipe away tears from off all faces; and the reproach of his people will he take away from off all the earth: for Yahweh has spoken it.25:9 And it shall be said in that day, Lo, this is our God; we have waited for him, and he will save us: this is Yahweh; we have waited for him, we will be glad and rejoice in his salvation.25:10 For in this mountain will the hand of Yahweh rest; and Moab shall be trodden down in his place, even as straw is trodden down in the water of the dung-hill.25:11 And he shall spread forth his hands in the midst thereof, as he that swims spreads forth his hands to swim; but Yahweh will lay low his pride together with the craft of his hands.25:12 And the high fortress of your walls has he brought down, laid low, and brought to the ground, even to the dust.26:1 In that day shall this song be sung in the land of Judah: we have a strong city; salvation will he appoint for walls and bulwarks.26:2 Open ye the gates, that the righteous nation which keeps faith may enter in.26:3 You will keep him in perfect peace whose mind is stayed on you; because he trusts in you.26:4 Trust ye in Yahweh for ever; for in Yahweh, even Yahweh, is an everlasting rock.26:5 For he has brought down them that dwell on high, the lofty city: he lays it low, he lays it low even to the ground; he brings it even to the dust.26:6 The foot shall tread it down; even the feet of the poor, and the steps of the needy.26:7 The way of the just is uprightness: you that are upright do direct the path of the just.26:8 Yes, in the way of your judgments, O Yahweh, have we waited for you; to your name, even to your memorial name, is the desire of our soul.26:9 With my soul have I desired you in the night; yes, with my spirit within me will I seek you earnestly: for when your judgments are in the earth, the inhabitants of the world learn righteousness.26:10 Let favor be shown to the wicked, yet will he not learn righteousness; in the land of uprightness will he deal wrongfully, and will not behold the majesty of Yahweh.26:11 Yahweh, your hand is lifted up, yet they see not: but they shall see your zeal for the people, and be put to shame; yes, fire shall devour your adversaries.26:12 Yahweh, you will ordain peace for us; for you have also wrought all our works for us.26:13 O Yahweh our God, other lords besides you have had dominion over us; but by you only will we make mention of your name.26:14 They are dead, they shall not live; they are deceased, they shall not rise: therefore have you visited and destroyed them, and made all remembrance of them to perish.26:15 You have increased the nation, O Yahweh, you have increased the nation; you are glorified; you have enlarged all the borders of the land.26:16 Yahweh, in trouble have they visited you; they poured out a prayer when your chastening was upon them.26:17 Like as a woman with child, that draws near the time of her delivery, is in pain and cries out in her pangs; so we have been before you, O Yahweh.26:18 We have been with child, we have been in pain, we have as it were brought forth wind; we have not wrought any deliverance in the earth; neither have the inhabitants of the world fallen.26:19 Your dead shall live; my dead bodies shall arise.  Awake and sing, ye that dwell in the dust; for your dew is as the dew of herbs, and the earth shall cast forth the dead.26:20 Come, my people, enter you into your chambers, and shut your doors about you: hide yourself for a little moment, until the indignation be overpast.26:21 For, behold, Yahweh comes forth out of his place to punish the inhabitants of the earth for their iniquity: the earth also shall disclose her blood, and shall no more cover her slain.27:1 In that day Yahweh with his hard and great and strong sword will punish leviathan the swift serpent, and leviathan the crooked serpent; and he will slay the monster that is in the sea.27:2 In that day: A vineyard of wine, sing ye to it.27:3 I Yahweh am its keeper; I will water it every moment: lest any hurt it, I will keep it night and day.27:4 Wrath is not in me: would that the briers and thorns were against me in battle! I would march upon them, I would burn them together.27:5 Or else let him take hold of my strength, that he may make peace with me; yes, let him make peace with me.27:6 In days to come shall Jacob take root; Israel shall blossom and bud; and they shall fill the face of the world with fruit.27:7 Has he smitten them as he smote those that smote them?  or are they slain according to the slaughter of them that were slain by them?27:8 In measure, when you send them away, you do contend with them; he has removed them with his rough blast in the day of the east wind.27:9 Therefore by this shall the iniquity of Jacob be forgiven, and this is all the fruit of taking away his sin: that he makes all the stones of the altar as chalkstones that are beaten in sunder, so that the Asherim and the sun-images shall rise no more.27:10 For the fortified city is solitary, a habitation deserted and forsaken, like the wilderness: there shall the calf feed, and there shall he lie down, and consume the branches thereof.27:11 When the boughs thereof are withered, they shall be broken off; the women shall come, and set them on fire; for it is a people of no understanding: therefore he that made them will not have compassion upon them, and he that formed them will show them no favor.27:12 And it shall come to pass in that day, that Yahweh will beat off his fruit from the flood of the River to the brook of Egypt; and ye shall be gathered one by one, O ye children of Israel.27:13 And it shall come to pass in that day, that a great trumpet shall be blown; and they shall come that were ready to perish in the land of Assyria, and they that were outcasts in the land of Egypt; and they shall worship Yahweh in the holy mountain at Jerusalem.28:1 Woe to the crown of pride of the drunkards of Ephraim, and to the fading flower of his glorious beauty, which is on the head of the fat valley of them that are overcome with wine!28:2 Behold, the Lord has a mighty and strong one; as a tempest of hail, a destroying storm, as a tempest of mighty waters overflowing, will he cast down to the earth with the hand.28:3 The crown of pride of the drunkards of Ephraim shall be trodden under foot:28:4 and the fading flower of his glorious beauty, which is on the head of the fat valley, shall be as the first-ripe fig before the summer; which when he that looks upon it sees, while it is yet in his hand he eats it up.28:5 In that day will Yahweh of hosts become a crown of glory, and a diadem of beauty, to the residue of his people;28:6 and a spirit of justice to him that sits in judgment, and strength to them that turn back the battle at the gate.28:7 And even these reel with wine, and stagger with strong drink; the priest and the prophet reel with strong drink, they are swallowed up of wine, they stagger with strong drink; they err in vision, they stumble in judgment.28:8 For all tables are full of vomit and filthiness, so that there is no place clean.28:9 Whom will he teach knowledge?  and whom will he make to understand the message?  them that are weaned from the milk, and drawn from the breasts?28:10 For it is precept upon precept, precept upon precept; line upon line, line upon line; here a little, there a little.28:11 Nay, but by men of strange lips and with another tongue will he speak to this people;28:12 to whom he said, This is the rest, give ye rest to him that is weary; and this is the refreshing: yet they would not hear.28:13 Therefore shall the word of Yahweh be to them precept upon precept, precept upon precept; line upon line, line upon line; here a little, there a little; that they may go, and fall backward, and be broken, and snared, and taken.28:14 Wherefore hear the word of Yahweh, ye scoffers, that rule this people that is in Jerusalem:28:15 Because ye have said, We have made a covenant with death, and with Sheol are we at agreement; when the overflowing scourge shall pass through, it shall not come to us; for we have made lies our refuge, and under falsehood have we hid ourselves:28:16 therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh, Behold, I lay in Zion for a foundation a stone, a tried stone, a precious corner-stone of sure foundation: he that believes shall not be in haste.28:17 And I will make justice the line, and righteousness the plummet; and the hail shall sweep away the refuge of lies, and the waters shall overflow the hiding-place.28:18 And your covenant with death shall be annulled, and your agreement with Sheol shall not stand; when the overflowing scourge shall pass through, then ye shall be trodden down by it.28:19 As often as it passes though, it shall take you; for morning by morning shall it pass through, by day and by night: and it shall be nought but terror to understand the message.28:20 For the bed is shorter than that a man can stretch himself on it; and the covering narrower than that he can wrap himself in it.28:21 For Yahweh will rise up as in mount Perazim, he will be angry as in the valley of Gibeon; that he may do his work, his strange work, and bring to pass his act, his strange act.28:22 Now therefore be ye not scoffers, lest your bonds be made strong; for a decree of destruction have I heard from the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, upon the whole earth.28:23 Give ye ear, and hear my voice; hearken, and hear my speech.28:24 Does he that plows to sow plow continually?  does he continually open and harrow his ground?28:25 When he has levelled the face thereof, does he not cast abroad the fitches, and scatter the cummin, and put in the wheat in rows, and the barley in the appointed place, and the spelt in the border thereof?28:26 For his God does instruct him aright, and does teach him.28:27 For the dill is not threshed with a sharp threshing instrument, neither is a cart wheel turned about upon the cummin; but the dill is beaten out with a staff, and the cummin with a rod.28:28 Bread grain is ground; for he will not be always threshing it: and though the wheel of his cart and his horses scatter it, he does not grind it.28:29 This also comes forth from Yahweh of hosts, who is wonderful in counsel, and excellent in wisdom.29:1 Ho Ariel, ariel, the city where David encamped! add ye year to year; let the feasts come round:29:2 then will I distress Ariel, and there shall be mourning and lamentation; and she shall be to me as Ariel.29:3 And I will encamp against you round about, and will lay siege against you with posted troops, and I will raise siege works against you.29:4 And you shall be brought down, and shall speak out of the ground, and your speech shall be low out of the dust; and your voice shall be as of one that has a familiar spirit, out of the ground, and your speech shall whisper out of the dust.29:5 But the multitude of your foes shall be like small dust, and the multitude of the terrible ones as chaff that passes away: yes, it shall be in an instant suddenly.29:6 She shall be visited of Yahweh of hosts with thunder, and with earthquake, and great noise, with whirlwind and tempest, and the flame of a devouring fire.29:7 And the multitude of all the nations that fight against Ariel, even all that fight against her and her stronghold, and that distress her, shall be as a dream, a vision of the night.29:8 And it shall be as when a hungry man dreams, and, behold, he eats; but he awakes, and his soul is empty: or as when a thirsty man dreams, and, behold, he drinks; but he awakes, and, behold, he is faint, and his soul has appetite: so shall the multitude of all the nations be, that fight against mount Zion.29:9 Tarry ye and wonder; take your pleasure and be blind: they are drunken, but not with wine; they stagger, but not with strong drink.29:10 For Yahweh has poured out upon you the spirit of deep sleep, and has closed your eyes, the prophets; and your heads, the seers, has he covered.29:11 And all vision is become to you as the words of a book that is sealed, which men deliver to one that is learned, saying, Read this, I pray you; and he says, I cannot, for it is sealed:29:12 and the book is delivered to him that is not learned, saying, Read this, I pray you; and he says, I am not learned.29:13 And the Lord said, Forasmuch as this people draw near to me, and with their mouth and with their lips to honor me, but have removed their heart far from me, and their fear of me is a commandment of men which has been taught them;29:14 therefore, behold, I will proceed to do a marvellous work among this people, even a marvellous work and a wonder; and the wisdom of their wise men shall perish, and the understanding of their prudent men shall be hid.29:15 Woe to them that hide deep their counsel from Yahweh, and whose works are in the dark, and that say, Who sees us?  and who knows us?29:16 You turn things upside down! Shall the potter be esteemed as clay; that the thing made should say of him that made it, He made me not; or the thing formed say of him that formed it, He has no understanding?29:17 Is it not yet a very little while, and Lebanon shall be turned into a fruitful field, and the fruitful field shall be esteemed as a forest?29:18 And in that day shall the deaf hear the words of the book, and the eyes of the blind shall see out of obscurity and out of darkness.29:19 The meek also shall increase their joy in Yahweh, and the poor among men shall rejoice in the Holy One of Israel.29:20 For the terrible one is brought to nought, and the scoffer ceases, and all they that watch for iniquity are cut off;29:21 that make a man an offender in his cause, and lay a snare for him that reproves in the gate, and turn aside the just with a thing of nought.29:22 Therefore thus says Yahweh, who redeemed Abraham, concerning the house of Jacob: Jacob shall not now be ashamed, neither shall his face now grow pale.29:23 But when he sees his children, the work of my hands, in the midst of him, they shall sanctify my name; yes, they shall sanctify the Holy One of Jacob, and shall stand in awe of the God of Israel.29:24 They also that err in spirit shall come to understanding, and they that murmur shall receive instruction.30:1 Woe to the rebellious children, says Yahweh, that take counsel, but not of me; and that make a league, but not of my Spirit, that they may add sin to sin,30:2 that set out to go down into Egypt, and have not asked at my mouth; to strengthen themselves in the strength of Pharaoh, and to take refuge in the shadow of Egypt!30:3 Therefore shall the strength of Pharaoh be your shame, and the refuge in the shadow of Egypt your confusion.30:4 For their princes are at Zoan, and their ambassadors are come to Hanes.30:5 They shall all be ashamed because of a people that cannot profit them, that are not a help nor profit, but a shame, and also a reproach.30:6 The burden concerning the beasts of the South.  Through the land of trouble and anguish, from which place come the lioness and the lion, the viper and fiery flying serpent, they carry their riches upon the shoulders of young asses, and their treasures upon the humps of camels, to a people that shall not profit them.30:7 For Egypt helps in vain, and to no purpose: therefore have I called her Rahab that sits still.30:8 Now go, write it before them on a tablet, and inscribe it in a book, that it may be for the time to come for ever and ever.30:9 For it is a rebellious people, lying children, children that will not hear the law of Yahweh;30:10 that say to the seers, See not; and to the prophets, Prophesy not to us right things, speak to us smooth things, prophesy deceits,30:11 get yourself out of the way, turn aside out of the path, cause the Holy One of Israel to cease from before us.30:12 Wherefore thus says the Holy One of Israel, Because ye despise this word, and trust in oppression and perverseness, and rely upon it;30:13 therefore this iniquity shall be to you as a breach ready to fall, swelling out in a high wall, whose breaking comes suddenly in an instant.30:14 And he shall break it as a potter's vessel is broken, breaking it in pieces without sparing; so that there shall not be found among the pieces thereof a sherd with which to take fire from the hearth, or to dip up water out of the cistern.30:15 For thus said the Lord Yahweh, the Holy One of Israel, In returning and rest shall ye be saved; in quietness and in confidence shall be your strength.  And ye would not:30:16 but ye said, No, for we will flee upon horses; therefore shall ye flee: and, We will ride upon the swift; therefore shall they that pursue you be swift.30:17 One thousand shall flee at the threat of one; at the threat of five shall ye flee: till ye be left as a beacon upon the top of a mountain, and as an ensign on a hill.30:18 And therefore will Yahweh wait, that he may be gracious to you; and therefore will he be exalted, that he may have mercy upon you: for Yahweh is a God of justice; blessed are all they that wait for him.30:19 For the people shall dwell in Zion at Jerusalem; you shall weep no more; he will surely be gracious to you at the voice of your cry; when he shall hear, he will answer you.30:20 And though the Lord give you the bread of adversity and the water of affliction, yet shall not your teachers be hidden anymore, but your eyes shall see your teachers;30:21 and your ears shall hear a word behind you, saying, This is the way, walk ye in it; when ye turn to the right hand, and when ye turn to the left.30:22 And ye shall defile the overlaying of your graven images of silver, and the plating of your molten images of gold: you shall cast them away as an unclean thing; you shall say to it, Get yourself away from here.30:23 And he will give the rain for your seed, with which you shall sow the ground; and bread of the increase of the ground, and it shall be fat and plenteous.  In that day shall your cattle feed in large pastures;30:24 the oxen likewise and the young asses that till the ground shall eat savory provender, which has been winnowed with the shovel and with the fork.30:25 And there shall be upon every lofty mountain, and upon every high hill, brooks and streams of waters, in the day of the great slaughter, when the towers fall.30:26 Moreover the light of the moon shall be as the light of the sun, and the light of the sun shall be sevenfold, as the light of seven days, in the day that Yahweh binds up the hurt of his people, and heals the stroke of their wound.30:27 Behold, the name of Yahweh comes from far, burning with his anger, and in thick rising smoke: his lips are full of indignation, and his tongue is as a devouring fire;30:28 and his breath is as an overflowing stream, that reaches even to the neck, to sift the nations with the sieve of destruction: and a bridle that causes to err shall be in the jaws of the peoples.30:29 You shall have a song as in the night when a holy feast is kept; and gladness of heart, as when one goes with a pipe to come to the mountain of Yahweh, to the Rock of Israel.30:30 And Yahweh will cause his glorious voice to be heard, and will show the lighting down of his arm, with the indignation of his anger, and the flame of a devouring fire, with a blast, and tempest, and hailstones.30:31 For through the voice of Yahweh shall the Assyrian be dismayed; with his rod will he smite him.30:32 And every stroke of the appointed staff, which Yahweh shall lay upon him, shall be with the sound of tabrets and harps; and in battles with the brandishing of his arm will he fight with them.30:33 For a Topheth is prepared of old; yes, for the king it is made ready; he has made it deep and large; the pile thereof is fire and much wood; the breath of Yahweh, like a stream of brimstone, does kindle it.31:1 Woe to them that go down to Egypt for help, and rely on horses, and trust in chariots because they are many, and in horsemen because they are very strong, but they look not to the Holy One of Israel, neither seek Yahweh!31:2 Yet he also is wise, and will bring evil, and will not call back his words, but will arise against the house of the evil-doers, and against the help of them that work iniquity.31:3 Now the Egyptians are men, and not God; and their horses flesh, and not spirit: and when Yahweh shall stretch out his hand, both he that helps shall stumble, and he that is helped shall fall, and they all shall be consumed together.31:4 For thus says Yahweh to me, as the lion and the young lion growling over his prey, if a multitude of shepherds be called forth against him, will not be dismayed at their voice, nor abase himself for the noise of them: so will Yahweh of hosts come down to fight upon mount Zion, and upon the hill thereof.31:5 As birds hovering, so will Yahweh of hosts protect Jerusalem; he will protect and deliver it, he will pass over and preserve it.31:6 Turn ye to him from whom ye have deeply revolted, O children of Israel.31:7 For in that day they shall cast away every man his idols of silver, and his idols of gold, which your own hands have made to you for a sin.31:8 And the Assyrian shall fall by the sword, not of man; and the sword, not of men, shall devour him; and he shall flee from the sword, and his young men shall become subject to taskwork.31:9 And his rock shall pass away by reason of terror, and his princes shall be dismayed at the ensign, says Yahweh, whose fire is in Zion, and his furnace in Jerusalem.32:1 Behold, a king shall reign in righteousness, and princes shall rule in justice.32:2 And a man shall be as a hiding-place from the wind, and a covert from the tempest, as streams of water in a dry place, as the shade of a great rock in a weary land.32:3 And the eyes of them that see shall not be dim, and the ears of them that hear shall hearken.32:4 And the heart of the rash shall understand knowledge, and the tongue of the stammerers shall be ready to speak plainly.32:5 The fool shall be no more called noble, nor the churl said to be bountiful.32:6 For the fool will speak folly, and his heart will work iniquity, to practise profaneness, and to utter error against Yahweh, to make empty the soul of the hungry, and to cause the drink of the thirsty to fail.32:7 And the instruments of the scoundrel are evil: he devises wicked devices to destroy the meek with lying words, even when the needy speaks right.32:8 But the noble devises noble things; and in noble things shall he continue.32:9 Rise up, ye women that are at ease, and hear my voice; ye careless daughters, give ear to my speech.32:10 For days beyond a year shall ye be troubled, ye careless women; for the vintage shall fail, the ingathering shall not come.32:11 Tremble, ye women that are at ease; be troubled, ye careless ones; strip you, and make you bare, and gird sackcloth upon your loins.32:12 They shall smite upon the breasts for the pleasant fields, for the fruitful vine.32:13 Upon the land of my people shall come up thorns and briers; yes, upon all the houses of joy in the joyous city.32:14 For the palace shall be forsaken; the populous city shall be deserted; the hill and the watch-tower shall be for dens for ever, a joy of wild asses, a pasture of flocks;32:15 until the Spirit be poured upon us from on high, and the wilderness become a fruitful field, and the fruitful field be esteemed as a forest.32:16 Then justice shall dwell in the wilderness; and righteousness shall abide in the fruitful field.32:17 And the work of righteousness shall be peace; and the effect of righteousness, quietness and confidence for ever.32:18 And my people shall abide in a peaceable habitation, and in safe dwellings, and in quiet resting-places.32:19 But it shall hail in the downfall of the forest; and the city shall be utterly laid low.32:20 Blessed are yet that sow beside all waters, that send forth the feet of the ox and the donkey.33:1 Woe to you that destroyest, and you were not destroyed; and deal treacherously, and they dealt not treacherously with you! When you have ceased to destroy, you shall be destroyed; and when you have made an end of dealing treacherously, they shall deal treacherously with you.33:2 O Yahweh, be gracious to us; we have waited for you: be you our arm every morning, our salvation also in the time of trouble.33:3 At the noise of the tumult the peoples are fled; at the lifting up of yourself the nations are scattered.33:4 And your spoil shall be gathered as the caterpillar gathers: as locusts leap shall men leap upon it.33:5 Yahweh is exalted; for he dwels on high: he has filled Zion with justice and righteousness.33:6 And there shall be stability in your times, abundance of salvation, wisdom, and knowledge: the fear of Yahweh is your treasure.33:7 Behold, their valiant ones cry without; the ambassadors of peace weep bitterly.33:8 The highways lie waste, the wayfaring man ceases: the enemy has broken the covenant, he has despised the cities, he regards not man.33:9 The land mourns and languishes; Lebanon is confounded and withers away; Sharon is like a desert; and Bashan and Carmel shake off their leaves.33:10 Now will I arise, says Yahweh; now will I lift up myself; now will I be exalted.33:11 You shall conceive chaff, ye shall bring forth stubble: your breath is a fire that shall devour you.33:12 And the peoples shall be as the burnings of lime, as thorns cut down, that are burned in the fire.33:13 Hear, ye that are far off, what I have done; and, ye that are near, acknowledge my might.33:14 The sinners in Zion are afraid; trembling has seized the godless ones: Who among us can dwell with the devouring fire?  who among us can dwell with everlasting burnings?33:15 He that walks righteously, and speaks uprightly; he that despises the gain of oppressions, that shakes his hands from taking a bribe, that stops his ears from hearing of blood, and shuts his eyes from looking upon evil:33:16 He shall dwell on high; his place of defence shall be the munitions of rocks; his bread shall be given him; his waters shall be sure.33:17 Your eyes shall see the king in his beauty: they shall behold a land that reaches afar.33:18 Your heart shall muse on the terror: Where is he that counted, where is he that weighed the tribute?  where is he that counted the treasures?33:19 No longer will you see these arrogant people, a people of a deep speech that you cannot comprehend, of a strange tongue that you cannot understand.33:20 Look upon Zion, the city of our solemnities: your eyes shall see Jerusalem a quiet habitation, a tent that shall not be removed, the stakes of which shall never be plucked up, neither shall any of the cords of it be broken.33:21 But there Yahweh will be with us in majesty, a place of broad rivers and streams, on which shall go no galley with oars, neither shall gallant ship pass thereby.33:22 For Yahweh is our judge, Yahweh is our lawgiver, Yahweh is our king; he will save us.33:23 Your tacklings are loosed; they could not strengthen the foot of their mast, they could not spread the sail: then was the prey of a great spoil divided; the lame took the prey.33:24 And the inhabitant shall not say, I am sick: the people that dwell therein shall be forgiven their iniquity.34:1 Come near, ye nations, to hear; and hearken, ye peoples: let the earth hear, and the fulness thereof; the world, and all things that come forth from it.34:2 For Yahweh has indignation against all the nations, and wrath against all their host: he has utterly destroyed them, he has delivered them to the slaughter.34:3 Their slain also shall be cast out, and the stench of their dead bodies shall come up; and the mountains shall be melted with their blood.34:4 And all the host of heaven shall be dissolved, and the heavens shall be rolled together as a scroll; and all their host shall fade away, as the leaf fades from off the vine, and as a fading leaf from the fig-tree.34:5 For my sword has drunk its fill in heaven: behold, it shall come down upon Edom, and upon the people of my curse, to judgment.34:6 The sword of Yahweh is filled with blood, it is made fat with fatness, with the blood of lambs and goats, with the fat of the kidneys of rams; for Yahweh has a sacrifice in Bozrah, and a great slaughter in the land of Edom. 34:7 And the wild-oxen shall come down with them, and the bullocks with the bulls: and their land shall be drunken with blood, and their dust made fat with fatness.34:8 For Yahweh has a day of vengeance, a year of recompense for the cause of Zion.34:9 And the streams of Edom shall be turned into pitch, and the dust thereof into brimstone, and the land thereof shall become burning pitch.34:10 It shall not be quenched night nor day; the smoke thereof shall go up for ever; from generation to generation it shall lie waste; none shall pass through it for ever and ever.34:11 But the pelican and the porcupine shall possess it; and the owl and the raven shall dwell therein: and he will stretch over it the line of confusion, and the plummet of emptiness.34:12 They shall call the nobles thereof to the kingdom, but none shall be there; and all its princes shall be nothing.34:13 And thorns shall come up in its palaces, nettles and thistles in the fortresses thereof; and it shall be a habitation of jackals, a court for ostriches.34:14 And the wild beasts of the desert shall meet with the wolves, and the wild goat shall cry to his fellow; yes, the night-monster shall settle there, and shall find her a place of rest.34:15 There shall the dart-snake make her nest, and lay, and hatch, and gather under her shade; yes, there shall the kites be gathered, every one with her mate.34:16 Seek ye out of the book of Yahweh, and read: no one of these shall be missing, none shall want her mate; for my mouth, it has commanded, and his Spirit, it has gathered them.34:17 And he has cast the lot for them, and his hand has divided it to them by line: they shall possess it for ever; from generation to generation shall they dwell therein.35:1 The wilderness and the dry land shall be glad; and the desert shall rejoice, and blossom as the rose.35:2 It shall blossom abundantly, and rejoice even with joy and singing; the glory of Lebanon shall be given to it, the excellency of Carmel and Sharon: they shall see the glory of Yahweh, the excellency of our God.35:3 Strengthen ye the weak hands, and confirm the feeble knees.35:4 Say to them that are of a fearful heart, Be strong, fear not: behold, your God will come with vengeance, with the recompense of God; he will come and save you.35:5 Then the eyes of the blind shall be opened, and the ears of the deaf shall be unstopped.35:6 Then shall the lame man leap as a deer, and the tongue of the dumb shall sing; for in the wilderness shall waters break out, and streams in the desert.35:7 And the glowing sand shall become a pool, and the thirsty ground springs of water: in the habitation of jackals, where they lay, shall be grass with reeds and rushes.35:8 And a highway shall be there, and a way, and it shall be called The way of holiness; the unclean shall not pass over it; but it shall be for the redeemed: the wayfaring men, yes fools, shall not err therein.35:9 No lion shall be there, nor shall any ravenous beast go up on it; they shall not be found there; but the redeemed shall walk there:35:10 and the ransomed of Yahweh shall return, and come with singing to Zion; and everlasting joy shall be upon their heads: they shall obtain gladness and joy, and sorrow and sighing shall flee away.36:1 Now it came to pass in the fourteenth year of king Hezekiah, that Sennacherib king of Assyria came up against all the fortified cities of Judah, and took them.36:2 And the king of Assyria sent Rabshakeh from Lachish to Jerusalem to king Hezekiah with a great army.  And he stood by the conduit of the upper pool in the highway of the fuller's field.36:3 Then came forth to him Eliakim the son of Hilkiah, who was over the household, and Shebna the scribe, and Joah, the son of Asaph, the recorder.36:4 And Rabshakeh said to them, Say ye now to Hezekiah, Thus says the great king, the king of Assyria, What confidence is this in which you trust?36:5 I say, your counsel and strength for the war are but vain words: now on whom do you trust, that you have rebelled against me?36:6 Behold, you trust upon the staff of this bruised reed, even upon Egypt, whereon if a man lean, it will go into his hand, and pierce it: so is Pharaoh king of Egypt to all that trust on him.36:7 But if you say to me, We trust in Yahweh our God: is not that he, whose high places and whose altars Hezekiah has taken away, and has said to Judah and to Jerusalem, You shall worship before this altar?36:8 Now therefore, I pray you, give pledges to my master the king of Assyria, and I will give you two thousand horses, if you be able on your part to set riders upon them.36:9 How then can you turn away the face of one captain of the least of my master's servants, and put your trust on Egypt for chariots and for horsemen?36:10 And am I now come up without Yahweh against this land to destroy it?  Yahweh said to me, Go up against this land, and destroy it.36:11 Then said Eliakim and Shebna and Joah to Rabshakeh, Speak, I pray you, to your servants in the Syrian language; for we understand it: and do not speak to us in the Jews' language, in the hearing of the people that are on the wall.36:12 But Rabshakeh said, Has my master sent me to your master, and to you, to speak these words?  has he not sent me to the men that sit upon the wall, to eat their own dung, and to drink their own water along with you?36:13 Then Rabshakeh stood, and cried with a loud voice in the Jews' language, and said, Hear ye the words of the great king, the king of Assyria.36:14 Thus says the king, Let not Hezekiah deceive you; for he will not be able to deliver you:36:15 neither let Hezekiah make you trust in Yahweh, saying, Yahweh will surely deliver us; this city shall not be given into the hand of the king of Assyria.36:16 Hearken not to Hezekiah: for thus says the king of Assyria, Make your peace with me, and come out to me; and eat ye every one from his vine, and every one from his fig-tree, and drink ye every one the waters of his own cistern;36:17 until I come and take you away to a land like your own land, a land of grain and new wine, a land of bread and vineyards.36:18 Beware lest Hezekiah persuade you, saying, Yahweh will deliver us.  Has any of the gods of the nations delivered his land out of the hand of the king of Assyria?36:19 Where are the gods of Hamath and Arpad?  where are the gods of Sepharvaim?  and have they delivered Samaria out of my hand?36:20 Who are they among all the gods of these countries, that have delivered their country out of my hand, that Yahweh should deliver Jerusalem out of my hand?36:21 But they held their peace, and answered him not a word; for the king's commandment was, saying, answer him not.36:22 Then came Eliakim the son of Hilkiah, that was over the household, and Shebna the scribe, and Joah, the son of Asaph, the recorder, to Hezekiah with their clothes rent, and told him the words of Rabshakeh.37:1 And it came to pass, when king Hezekiah heard it, that he rent his clothes, and covered himself with sackcloth, and went into the house of Yahweh.37:2 And he sent Eliakim, who was over the household, and Shebna the scribe, and the elders of the priests, covered with sackcloth, to Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz.37:3 And they said to him, Thus says Hezekiah, This day is a day of trouble, and of rebuke, and of disgrace; for the children are come to the birth, and there is not strength to bring forth.37:4 It may be Yahweh your God will hear the words of Rabshakeh, whom the king of Assyria his master has sent to defy the living God, and will rebuke the words which Yahweh your God has heard: therefore lift up your prayer for the remnant that is left.37:5 So the servants of king Hezekiah came to Isaiah.37:6 And Isaiah said to them, Thus shall ye say to your master, Thus says Yahweh, Be not afraid of the words that you have heard, with which the servants of the king of Assyria have blasphemed me.37:7 Behold, I will put a spirit in him, and he shall hear reports, and shall return to his own land; and I will cause him to fall by the sword in his own land.37:8 So Rabshakeh returned, and found the king of Assyria warring against Libnah; for he had heard that he was departed from Lachish.37:9 And he heard say concerning Tirhakah king of Ethiopia, He is come out to fight against you.  And when he heard it, he sent messengers to Hezekiah, saying,37:10 Thus shall ye speak to Hezekiah king of Judah, saying, Let not your God in whom you trust deceive you, saying, Jerusalem shall not be given into the hand of the king of Assyria.37:11 Behold, you have heard what the kings of Assyria have done to all lands, by destroying them utterly: yet you shall be delivered?37:12 Have the gods of the nations delivered them, which my fathers have destroyed, Gozan, and Haran, and Rezeph, and the children of Eden that were in Telassar?37:13 Where is the king of Hamath, and the king of Arpad, and the king of the city of Sepharvaim, of Hena, and Ivvah?37:14 And Hezekiah received the letter from the hand of the messengers, and read it; and Hezekiah went up to the house of Yahweh, and spread it before Yahweh.37:15 And Hezekiah prayed to Yahweh, saying,37:16 O Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, that sits above the cherubim, you are the God, even you alone, of all the kingdoms of the earth; you have made heaven and earth.37:17 Incline your ear, O Yahweh, and hear; open your eyes, O Yahweh, and see; and hear all the words of Sennacherib, who has sent to defy the living God.37:18 Of a truth, Yahweh, the kings of Assyria have laid waste all the countries, and their land,37:19 and have cast their gods into the fire: for they were no gods, but rather the work of men's hands, wood and stone; therefore they have destroyed them.37:20 Now therefore, O Yahweh our God, save us from his hand, that all the kingdoms of the earth may know that you are Yahweh, even you only.37:21 Then Isaiah the son of Amoz sent to Hezekiah, saying, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Whereas you have prayed to me against Sennacherib king of Assyria,37:22 this is the word which Yahweh has spoken concerning him: The virgin daughter of Zion has despised you and laughed you to scorn; the daughter of Jerusalem has shaken her head at you.37:23 Whom have you defied and blasphemed?  and against whom have you exalted your voice and lifted up your eyes on high?  even against the Holy One of Israel.37:24 By your servants have you defied the Lord, and have said, With the multitude of my chariots am I come up to the height of the mountains, to the innermost parts of Lebanon; and I will cut down the tall cedars thereof, and the choice fir-trees thereof; and I will enter into its farthest height, the forest of its fruitful field;37:25 I have dug and drunk water, and with the sole of my feet will I dry up all the rivers of Egypt.37:26 Have you not heard how I have done it long ago, and formed it of ancient times?  now have I brought it to pass, that it should be yours to lay waste fortified cities into ruinous heaps.37:27 That is the reason their inhabitants were of small power, they were dismayed and confounded; they were as the grass of the field, and as the green herb, as the grass on the housetops, and as a field of grain before it is grown up.37:28 But I know your sitting down, and your going out, and your coming in, and your raging against me.37:29 Because of your raging against me, and because your arrogance is come up into my ears, therefore will I put my hook in your nose, and my bridle in your lips, and I will turn you back by the way by which you came.37:30 And this shall be the sign to you: ye shall eat this year that which grows of itself, and in the second year that which springs of the same; and in the third year sow ye, and reap, and plant vineyards, and eat the fruit thereof.37:31 And the remnant that is escaped of the house of Judah shall again take root downward, and bear fruit upward.37:32 For out of Jerusalem shall go forth a remnant, and out of mount Zion they that shall escape.  The zeal of Yahweh of hosts will perform this.37:33 Therefore thus says Yahweh concerning the king of Assyria, He shall not come to this city, nor shoot an arrow there, neither shall he come before it with shield, nor cast up a mound against it.37:34 By the way that he came, by the same shall he return, and he shall not come to this city, says Yahweh.37:35 For I will defend this city to save it, for my own sake, and for my servant David's sake.37:36 And the angel of Yahweh went forth, and struck in the camp of the Assyrians a hundred and eighty-five thousand; and when men arose early in the morning, behold, these were all dead bodies.37:37 So Sennacherib king of Assyria departed, and went and returned, and dwelt at Nineveh.37:38 And it came to pass, as he was worshipping in the house of Nisroch his god, that Adrammelech and Sharezer his sons smote him with the sword; and they escaped into the land of Ararat.  And Esar-haddon his son reigned in his stead.38:1 In those days was Hezekiah sick to death.  And Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz came to him, and said to him, Thus says Yahweh, Set your house in order; for you shall die, and not live.38:2 Then Hezekiah turned his face to the wall, and prayed to Yahweh,38:3 and said, Remember now, O Yahweh, I beseech you, how I have walked before you in truth and with a perfect heart, and have done that which is good in your sight.  And Hezekiah wept sorely.38:4 Then came the word of Yahweh to Isaiah, saying,38:5 Go, and say to Hezekiah, Thus says Yahweh, the God of David your father, I have heard your prayer, I have seen your tears: behold, I will add to your days fifteen years.38:6 And I will deliver you and this city out of the hand of the king of Assyria; and I will defend this city.38:7 And this shall be the sign to you from Yahweh, that Yahweh will do this thing that he has spoken:38:8 behold, I will cause the shadow on the steps, which is gone down on the dial of Ahaz with the sun, to return backward ten steps.  So the sun returned ten steps on the dial whereon it was gone down.38:9 The writing of Hezekiah king of Judah, when he had been sick, and was recovered of his sickness.38:10 I said, In the noontide of my days I shall go into the gates of Sheol: I am deprived of the residue of my years.38:11 I said, I shall not see Yahweh, even Yahweh in the land of the living: I shall behold man no more with the inhabitants of the world.38:12 My dwelling is removed, and is carried away from me as a shepherd's tent: I have rolled up, like a weaver, my life; he will cut me off from the loom: From day even to night will you make an end of me.38:13 I quieted myself until morning; as a lion, so he breaks all my bones: From day even to night will you make an end of me.38:14 Like a swallow or a crane, so did I chatter; I did moan as a dove; my eyes fail with looking upward: O Lord, I am oppressed, be you my surety.38:15 What shall I say?  he has both spoken to me, and himself has done it: I shall go softly all my years because of the bitterness of my soul.38:16 O Lord, by these things men live; And wholly therein is the life of my spirit: Wherefore recover thou me, and make me to live.38:17 Behold, it was for my peace that I had great bitterness: But you have in love to my soul delivered it from the pit of corruption; For you have cast all my sins behind your back.38:18 For Sheol cannot praise you, death cannot celebrate you: They that go down into the pit cannot hope for your truth.38:19 The living, the living man, he shall praise you, as I do this day: The father to the children shall make known your truth.38:20 Yahweh is ready to save me: Therefore we will sing my songs with stringed instruments All the days of our life in the house of Yahweh.38:21 Now Isaiah had said, Let them take a cake of figs, and lay it for a plaster upon the boil, and he shall recover.38:22 Hezekiah also had said, What is the sign that I shall go up to the house of Yahweh?39:1 At that time Merodach-baladan the son of Baladan, king of Babylon, sent letters and a present to Hezekiah; for he heard that he had been sick, and was recovered.39:2 And Hezekiah was glad of them, and showed them the house of his precious things, the silver, and the gold, and the spices, and the precious oil, and all the house of his armor, and all that was found in his treasures: there was nothing in his house, nor in all his dominion, that Hezekiah showed them not.39:3 Then came Isaiah the prophet to king Hezekiah, and said to him, What said these men?  and from whence came they to you?  And Hezekiah said, They are come from a far country to me, even from Babylon.39:4 Then said he, What have they seen in your house?  And Hezekiah answered, all that is in my house have they seen: there is nothing among my treasures that I have not shown them.39:5 Then said Isaiah to Hezekiah, Hear the word of Yahweh of hosts:39:6 Behold, the days are coming, when all that is in your house, and that which your fathers have laid up in store until this day, shall be carried to Babylon: nothing shall be left, says Yahweh.39:7 And of your sons that shall issue from you, whom you shall beget, shall they take away; and they shall be eunuchs in the palace of the king of Babylon.39:8 Then said Hezekiah to Isaiah, Good is the word of Yahweh which you have spoken.  He said moreover, For there shall be peace and truth in my days.40:1 Comfort ye, comfort ye my people, says your God.40:2 Speak ye comfortably to Jerusalem; and cry to her, that her warfare is accomplished, that her iniquity is pardoned, that she has received of Yahweh's hand double for all her sins.40:3 The voice of one that cries, Prepare ye in the wilderness the way of Yahweh; make level in the desert a highway for our God.40:4 Every valley shall be exalted, and every mountain and hill shall be made low; and the uneven shall be made level, and the rough places a plain:40:5 and the glory of Yahweh shall be revealed, and all flesh shall see it together; for the mouth of Yahweh has spoken it.40:6 The voice of one saying, Cry.  And one said, What shall I cry?  All flesh is grass, and all the goodliness thereof is as the flower of the field.40:7 The grass withers, the flower fades, because the breath of Yahweh blows upon it; surely the people is grass.40:8 The grass withers, the flower fades; but the word of our God shall stand forever.40:9 O you that tell good tidings to Zion, get yourself up on a high mountain; O you that tell good tidings to Jerusalem, lift up your voice with strength; lift it up, be not afraid; say to the cities of Judah, Behold, your God!40:10 Behold, the Lord Yahweh will come as a mighty one, and his arm will rule for him: Behold, his reward is with him, and his recompense before him.40:11 He will feed his flock like a shepherd, he will gather the lambs in his arm, and carry them in his bosom, and will gently lead those that have their young.40:12 Who has measured the waters in the hollow of his hand, and meted out heaven with the span, and comprehended the dust of the earth in a measure, and weighed the mountains in scales, and the hills in a balance?40:13 Who has directed the Spirit of Yahweh, or being his counsellor has taught him?40:14 With whom took he counsel, and who instructed him, and taught him in the path of justice, and taught him knowledge, and shown to him the way of understanding?40:15 Behold, the nations are as a drop of a bucket, and are accounted as the small dust of the balance: Behold, he takes up the isles as a very little thing.40:16 And Lebanon is not sufficient to burn, nor the beasts thereof sufficient for a burnt offering.40:17 All the nations are as nothing before him; they are accounted by him as less than nothing, and vanity.40:18 To whom then will ye liken God?  or what likeness will ye compare to him?40:19 The image, a workman has cast it, and the goldsmith overlays it with gold, and casts for it silver chains.40:20 He that is too impoverished for such an oblation chooses a tree that will not rot; he seeks to him a skilful workman to set up a graven image, that shall not be moved.40:21 Have ye not known?  have yet not heard?  has it not been told you from the beginning?  have ye not understood from the foundations of the earth?40:22 It is he that sits above the circle of the earth, and the inhabitants thereof are like grasshoppers; He stretches out the heavens as a curtain, and spreads them out as a tent to dwell in;40:23 that brings princes to nothing; that makes the judges of the earth as vanity.40:24 Yes, they have not been planted; yes, they have not been sown; yes, their stock has not taken root in the earth: moreover he blows upon them, and they wither, and the whirlwind takes them away as stubble.40:25 To whom then will ye liken me, that I should be equal to him?  says the Holy One.40:26 Lift up your eyes on high, and see who has created these, that brings out their host by number; he calls them all by name; by the greatness of his might, and for that he is strong in power, not one is lacking.40:27 Why say you, O Jacob, and speak, O Israel, My way is hidden from Yahweh, and the justice due to me is passed away from my God?40:28 Have you not known?  have you not heard?  The everlasting God, Yahweh, the Creator of the ends of the earth, faints not, neither is weary; there is no searching of his understanding.40:29 He gives power to the faint; and to him that has no might he increases strength.40:30 Even the youths shall faint and be weary, and the young men shall utterly fall:40:31 but they that wait for Yahweh shall renew their strength; they shall mount up with wings as eagles; they shall run, and not be weary; they shall walk, and not faint.41:1 Keep silence before me, O islands; and let the peoples renew their strength: let them come near; then let them speak; let us come near together to judgment.41:2 Who has raised up one from the east, whom he calls in righteousness to his foot?  he gives nations before him, and makes him rule over kings; he gives them as the dust to his sword, as the driven stubble to his bow.41:3 He pursues them, and passes on safely, even by a way that he had not gone with his feet.41:4 Who has wrought and done it, calling the generations from the beginning?  I, Yahweh, the first, and with the last, I am he.41:5 The isles have seen, and fear; the ends of the earth tremble; they draw near, and come.41:6 They help every one his neighbor; and every one says to his brother, Be of good courage.41:7 So the carpenter encourages the goldsmith, and he that smooths with the hammer him that smites the anvil, saying of the soldering, It is good; and he fastens it with nails, that it should not be moved.41:8 But you, Israel, my servant, Jacob whom I have chosen, the seed of Abraham my friend,41:9 you whom I have taken hold of from the ends of the earth, and called from the corners thereof, and said to you, You are my servant, I have chosen you and not cast you away;41:10 Fear you not, for I am with you; be not dismayed, for I am your God; I will strengthen you; yes, I will help you; yes, I will uphold you with the right hand of my righteousness.41:11 Behold, all they that are incensed against you shall be put to shame and confounded: they that strive with you shall be as nothing, and shall perish.41:12 You shall seek them, and shall not find them, even them that contend with you: they that war against you shall be as nothing, and as a thing of nought.41:13 For I, Yahweh your God, will hold your right hand, saying to you, Fear not; I will help you.41:14 Fear not, you worm Jacob, and ye men of Israel; I will help you, says Yahweh, and your Redeemer is the Holy One of Israel.41:15 Behold, I have made you to be a new sharp threshing instrument having teeth; you shall thresh the mountains, and beat them small, and shall make the hills as chaff.41:16 You shall winnow them, and the wind shall carry them away, and the whirlwind shall scatter them; and you shall rejoice in Yahweh, you shall glory in the Holy One of Israel.41:17 The poor and needy seek water, and there is none, and their tongue fails for thirst; I, Yahweh, will answer them, I, the God of Israel, will not forsake them.41:18 I will open rivers on the bare heights, and fountains in the midst of the valleys; I will make the wilderness a pool of water, and the dry land springs of water.41:19 I will put in the wilderness the cedar, the acacia, and the myrtle, and the oil-tree; I will set in the desert the fir-tree, the pine, and the box-tree together:41:20 that they may see, and know, and consider, and understand together, that the hand of Yahweh has done this, and the Holy One of Israel has created it.41:21 Produce your cause, says Yahweh; bring forth your strong reasons, says the King of Jacob.41:22 Let them bring forth, and declare to us what shall happen: declare ye the former things, what they are, that we may consider them, and know the latter end of them; or show us things to come.41:23 Declare the things that are to come hereafter, that we may know that ye are gods: yes, do good, or do evil, that we may be dismayed, and behold it together.41:24 Behold, ye are of nothing, and your work is of nought; an abomination is he that chooses you.41:25 I have raised up one from the north, and he is come; from the rising of the sun one that calls upon my name: and he shall come upon rulers as upon mortar, and as the potter treads clay.41:26 Who has declared it from the beginning, that we may know?  and beforetime, that we may say, He is right?  yes, there is none that declares, yes, there is none that shows, yes, there is none that hears your words.41:27 I am the first that says to Zion, Behold, behold them; and I will give to Jerusalem one that brings good tidings.41:28 And when I look, there is no man: even among them there is no counsellor, that, when I ask of them, can answer a word.41:29 Behold, all of them, their works are vanity and nought; their molten images are wind and confusion.42:1 Behold, my servant, whom I uphold; my chosen, in whom my soul delights: I have put my Spirit upon him; he will bring forth justice to the Gentiles.42:2 He will not cry, nor lift up his voice, nor cause it to be heard in the street.42:3 A bruised reed will he not break, and a dimly burning wick will he not quench: he will bring forth justice in truth.42:4 He will not fail nor be discouraged, till he have set justice in the earth; and the isles shall wait for his law.42:5 Thus says God Yahweh, he that created the heavens, and stretched them forth; he that spread abroad the earth and that which comes out of it; he that gives breath to the people upon it, and spirit to them that walk therein:42:6 I, Yahweh, have called you in righteousness, and will hold your hand, and will keep you, and give you for a covenant of the people, for a light of the Gentiles;42:7 to open the blind eyes, to bring out the prisoners from the dungeon, and them that sit in darkness out of the prison-house.42:8 I am Yahweh, that is my name; and my glory will I not give to another, neither my praise to graven images.42:9 Behold, the former things are come to pass, and new things do I declare; before they spring forth I tell you of them.42:10 Sing to Yahweh a new song, and his praise from the end of the earth; ye that go down to the sea, and all that is therein, the isles, and the inhabitants thereof.42:11 Let the wilderness and the cities thereof lift up their voice, the villages that Kedar does inhabit; let the inhabitants of Sela sing, let them shout from the top of the mountains.42:12 Let them give glory to Yahweh, and declare his praise in the islands.42:13 Yahweh will go forth as a mighty man; he will stir up his zeal like a man of war: he will cry, yes, he will shout aloud; he will do mightily against his enemies.42:14 I have long time holden my peace; I have been still, and refrained myself: now will I cry out like a travailing woman; I will gasp and pant together.42:15 I will lay waste mountains and hills, and dry up all their herbs; and I will make the rivers islands, and will dry up the pools.42:16 And I will bring the blind by a way that they know not; in paths that they know not will I lead them; I will make darkness light before them, and crooked places straight.  These things will I do, and I will not forsake them.42:17 They shall be turned back, they shall be utterly put to shame, that trust in graven images, that say to molten images, You are our gods.42:18 Hear, ye deaf; and look, ye blind, that ye may see.42:19 Who is blind, but my servant?  or deaf, as my messenger that I send?  who is blind as he that is at peace with me, and blind as Yahweh's servant?42:20 You see many things, but you observe not; his ears are open, but he hears not.42:21 It pleased Yahweh, for his righteousness' sake, to magnify the law, and make it honorable.42:22 But this is a people robbed and plundered; they are all of them snared in holes, and they are hid in prison-houses: they are for a prey, and none delivers; for a spoil, and none says, Restore.42:23 Who is there among you that will give ear to this?  that will hearken and hear for the time to come?42:24 Who gave Jacob for a spoil, and Israel to the robbers?  did not Yahweh?  he against whom we have sinned, and in whose ways they would not walk, neither were they obedient to his law.42:25 Therefore he poured upon him the fierceness of his anger, and the strength of battle; and it set him on fire round about, yet he knew not; and it burned him, yet he laid it not to heart.43:1 But now thus says Yahweh that created you, O Jacob, and he that formed you, O Israel: Fear not, for I have redeemed you; I have called you by your name, you are mine.43:2 When you pass through the waters, I will be with you; and through the rivers, they shall not overflow you: when you walk through the fire, you shall not be burned, neither shall the flame kindle upon you.43:3 For I am Yahweh your God, the Holy One of Israel, your Saviour; I have given Egypt as your ransom, Ethiopia and Seba in your stead.43:4 Since you have been precious in my sight, and honorable, and I have loved you; therefore will I give men in your stead, and peoples instead of your life.43:5 Fear not; for I am with you: I will bring your seed from the east, and gather you from the west;43:6 I will say to the north, Give up; and to the south, Keep not back; bring my sons from far, and my daughters from the end of the earth;43:7 every one that is called by my name, and whom I have created for my glory, whom I have formed, yes, whom I have made.43:8 Bring forth the blind people that have eyes, and the deaf that have ears.43:9 Let all the nations be gathered together, and let the peoples be assembled: who among them can declare this, and show us former things?  let them bring their witnesses, that they may be justified; or let them hear, and say, It is truth.43:10 You are my witnesses, says Yahweh, and my servant whom I have chosen; that ye may know and believe me, and understand that I am he: before me there was no God formed, neither shall there be after me.43:11 I, even I, am Yahweh; and besides me there is no saviour.43:12 I have declared, and I have saved, and I have shown; and there was no strange God among you: therefore ye are my witnesses, says Yahweh, and I am God.43:13 Yes, since the day was I am he; and there is none that can deliver out of my hand: I will work, and who can hinder it?43:14 Thus says Yahweh, your Redeemer, the Holy One of Israel: For your sake I have sent to Babylon, and I will bring down all of them as fugitives, even the Chaldeans, in the ships of their rejoicing.43:15 I am Yahweh, your Holy One, the Creator of Israel, your King.43:16 Thus says Yahweh, who makes a way in the sea, and a path in the mighty waters;43:17 who brings forth the chariot and horse, the army and the mighty man (they lie down together, they shall not rise; they are extinct, they are quenched as a wick):43:18 Remember ye not the former things, neither consider the things of old.43:19 Behold, I will do a new thing; now shall it spring forth; shall ye not know it?  I will even make a way in the wilderness, and rivers in the desert.43:20 The beasts of the field shall honor me, the jackals and the ostriches; because I give waters in the wilderness, and rivers in the desert, to give drink to my people, my chosen,43:21 the people which I formed for myself, that they might set forth my praise.43:22 Yet you have not called upon me, O Jacob; but you have been weary of me, O Israel.43:23 You have not brought me of your sheep for burnt offerings; neither have you honored me with your sacrifices.  I have not burdened you with offerings, nor wearied you with frankincense.43:24 You have bought me no sweet cane with money, neither have you filled me with the fat of your sacrifices; but you have burdened me with your sins, you have wearied me with your iniquities.43:25 I, even I, am he that blots out your transgressions for my own sake; and I will not remember your sins.43:26 Put me in remembrance; let us plead together: set you forth your cause, that you may be justified.43:27 Your first father sinned, and your teachers have transgressed against me.43:28 Therefore I will profane the princes of the sanctuary; and I will make Jacob a curse, and Israel a reviling.44:1 Yet now hear, O Jacob my servant, and Israel, who I have chosen:44:2 Thus says Yahweh that made you, and formed you from the womb, who will help you: Fear not, O Jacob my servant; and you, Jeshurun, whom I have chosen.44:3 For I will pour water upon him that is thirsty, and streams upon the dry ground; I will pour my Spirit upon your seed, and my blessing upon your offspring:44:4 and they shall spring up among the grass, as willows by the watercourses.44:5 One shall say, I am Yahweh's; and another shall call himself by the name of Jacob; and another shall subscribe with his hand to Yahweh, and surname himself by the name of Israel.44:6 Thus says Yahweh, the King of Israel, and his Redeemer, Yahweh of hosts: I am the first, and I am the last; and besides me there is no God.44:7 And who, as I, shall call, and shall declare it, and set it in order for me, since I established the ancient people?  and the things that are coming, and that shall come to pass, let them declare.44:8 Fear ye not, neither be afraid: have I not declared to you of old, and shown it?  and ye are my witnesses.  Is there a God besides me?  yes, there is no Rock; I know not any.44:9 They that fashion a graven image are all of them vanity; and the things that they delight in shall not profit; and their own witnesses see not, nor know: that they may be put to shame.44:10 Who has fashioned a god, or molten an image that is profitable for nothing?44:11 Behold, all his fellows shall be put to shame; and the workmen, they are of men: let them all be gathered together, let them stand up; they shall fear, they shall be put to shame together.44:12 The smith makes an axe, and works in the coals, and fashions it with hammers, and works it with his strong arm: yes, he is hungry, and his strength fails; he drinks no water, and is faint.44:13 The carpenter stretches out a line; he marks it out with a pencil; he shapes it with planes, and he marks it out with the compasses, and shapes it after the figure of a man, according to the beauty of a man, to dwell in a house.44:14 He hews him down cedars, and takes the holm-tree and the oak, and strengthens for himself one among the trees of the forest: he plants a fir-tree, and the rain does nourish it.44:15 Then shall it be for a man to burn; and he takes thereof, and warms himself; yes, he kindles it, and bakes bread: yes, he makes a god, and worships it; he makes it a graven image, and falls down thereto.44:16 He burns part thereof in the fire; with part thereof he eats flesh; he roasts roast, and is satisfied; yes, he warms himself, and says, aha, I am warm, I have seen the fire.44:17 And the residue thereof he makes a god, even his graven image; he falls down to it and worships, and prays to it, and says, Deliver me; for you are my god.44:18 They know not, neither do they consider: for he has shut their eyes, that they cannot see; and their hearts, that they cannot understand.44:19 And none calls to mind, neither is there knowledge nor understanding to say, I have burned part of it in the fire; yes, also I have baked bread upon the coals thereof; I have roasted flesh and eaten it: and shall I make the residue thereof an abomination?  shall I fall down to the stock of a tree?44:20 He feeds on ashes; a deceived heart has turned him aside; and he cannot deliver his soul, nor say, Is there not a lie in my right hand?44:21 Remember these things, O Jacob, and Israel; for you are my servant: I have formed you; you are my servant: O Israel, you shall not be forgotten of me.44:22 I have blotted out, as a thick cloud, your transgressions, and, as a cloud, your sins: return to me; for I have redeemed you.44:23 Sing, O ye heavens, for Yahweh has done it; shout, ye lower parts of the earth; break forth into singing, ye mountains, O forest, and every tree therein: for Yahweh has redeemed Jacob, and will glorify himself in Israel.44:24 Thus says Yahweh, your Redeemer, and he that formed you from the womb: I am Yahweh, that makes all things; that stretches forth the heavens alone; that spreads abroad the earth (who is with me?);44:25 that frustrates the signs of the liars, and makes diviners mad; that turns wise men backward, and makes their knowledge foolish;44:26 that confirms the word of his servant, and performs the counsel of his messengers; that says of Jerusalem, She shall be inhabited; and of the cities of Judah, They shall be built, and I will raise up the waste places thereof;44:27 that says to the deep, Be dry, and I will dry up your rivers;44:28 That says of Cyrus, He is my shepherd, and shall perform all my pleasure, even saying of Jerusalem, She shall be built; and of the temple, Your foundation shall be laid.45:1 Thus says Yahweh to his anointed, to Cyrus, whose right hand I have holden, to subdue nations before him, and I will loose the loins of kings; to open the doors before him, and the gates shall not be shut:45:2 I will go before you, and make the rough places smooth; I will break in pieces the doors of brass, and cut in sunder the bars of iron;45:3 and I will give you the treasures of darkness, and hidden riches of secret places, that you may know that it is I, Yahweh, who call you by your name, even the God of Israel.45:4 For Jacob my servant's sake, and Israel my chosen, I have called you by your name: I have surnamed you, though you have not known me.45:5 I am Yahweh, and there is none else; besides me there is no God.  I will gird you, though you have not known me;45:6 that they may know from the rising of the sun, and from the west, that there is none besides me: I am Yahweh, and there is none else.45:7 I form the light, and create darkness; I make peace, and create evil.  I am Yahweh, that does all these things.45:8 Distil, ye heavens, from above, and let the skies pour down righteousness: let the earth open, that it may bring forth salvation, and let it cause righteousness to spring up together; I, Yahweh, have created it.45:9 Woe to him that strives with his Maker! a potsherd among the potsherds of the earth! Shall the clay say to him that fashions it, What are you making?  or your work, He has no hands?45:10 Woe to him that says to a father, What are you begetting?  or to a woman, With what are you in labor?45:11 Thus says Yahweh, the Holy One of Israel, and his Maker: Ask me of the things that are to come; concerning my sons, and concerning the work of my hands, command ye me.45:12 I have made the earth, and created man upon it: I, even my hands, have stretched out the heavens; and all their host have I commanded.45:13 I have raised him up in righteousness, and I will make straight all his ways: he shall build my city, and he shall let my exiles go free, not for price nor reward, says Yahweh of hosts.45:14 Thus says Yahweh, The labor of Egypt, and the merchandise of Ethiopia, and the Sabeans, men of stature, shall come over to you, and they shall be yours: they shall go after you, in chains they shall come over; and they shall fall down to you, they shall make supplication to you, saying, Surely God is in you; and there is none else, there is no God.45:15 Verily you are a God that hide yourself, O God of Israel, the Saviour.45:16 They shall be put to shame, yes, confounded, all of them; they shall go into confusion together that are makers of idols.45:17 But Israel shall be saved by Yahweh with an everlasting salvation: ye shall not be put to shame nor confounded world without end.45:18 For thus says Yahweh that created the heavens, the God that formed the earth and made it, that established it and created it not a waste, that formed it to be inhabited: I am Yahweh; and there is none else.45:19 I have not spoken in secret, in a place of the land of darkness; I said not to the seed of Jacob, Seek ye me in vain: I, Yahweh, speak righteousness, I declare things that are right.45:20 Assemble yourselves and come; draw near together, ye that are escaped of the nations: they have no knowledge that carry the wood of their graven image, and pray to a god that cannot save.45:21 Declare ye, and bring it forth; yes, let them take counsel together: who has shown this from ancient time?  who has declared it of old?  have not I, Yahweh?  and there is no God else besides me, a just God and a Saviour; there is none besides me.45:22 Look to me, and be ye saved, all the ends of the earth; for I am God, and there is none else.45:23 By myself have I sworn, the word is gone forth from my mouth in righteousness, and shall not return, that to me every knee shall bow, every tongue shall swear.45:24 Only in Yahweh, it is said of me, is righteousness and strength; even to him shall men come; and all they that were incensed against him shall be put to shame.45:25 In Yahweh shall all the seed of Israel be justified, and shall glory.46:1 Bel bows down, Nebo stoops; their idols are upon the beasts, and upon the cattle: the things that ye carried about are made a load, a burden to the weary beast.46:2 They stoop, they bow down together; they could not deliver the burden, but themselves are gone into captivity.46:3 Hearken to me, O house of Jacob, and all the remnant of the house of Israel, that have been borne by me from their birth, that have been carried from the womb;46:4 and even to old age I am he, and even to hoar hairs will I carry you; I have made, and I will bear; yes, I will carry, and will deliver.46:5 To whom will ye like me, and make me equal, and compare me, that we may be like?46:6 Such as lavish gold out of the bag, and weigh silver in the balance, they hire a goldsmith, and he makes it a god; they fall down, yes, they worship.46:7 They bear it upon the shoulder, they carry it, and set it in its place, and it stands, from its place shall it not remove: yes, one may cry to it, yet can it not answer, nor save him out of his trouble.46:8 Remember this, and show yourselves men; bring it again to mind, O ye transgressors.46:9 Remember the former things of old: for I am God, and there is none else; I am God, and there is none like me;46:10 declaring the end from the beginning, and from ancient times things that are not yet done; saying, My counsel shall stand, and I will do all my pleasure;46:11 calling a ravenous bird from the east, the man of my counsel from a far country; yes, I have spoken, I will also bring it to pass; I have purposed, I will also do it.46:12 Hearken to me, ye stout-hearted, that are far from righteousness:46:13 I bring near my righteousness, it shall not be far off, and my salvation shall not tarry; and I will place salvation in Zion for Israel my glory.47:1 Come down, and sit in the dust, O virgin daughter of Babylon; sit on the ground without a throne, O daughter of the Chaldeans: for you shall no more be called tender and delicate.47:2 Take the millstones, and grind meal; remove your veil, strip off the train, uncover the leg, pass through the rivers.47:3 Your nakedness shall be uncovered, yes, your shame shall be seen: I will take vengeance, and will spare no man.47:4 Our Redeemer, Yahweh of hosts is his name, the Holy One of Israel.47:5 Sit silent, and go into darkness, O daughter of the Chaldeans; for you shall no more be called The mistress of kingdoms.47:6 I was angry with my people, I profaned my inheritance, and gave them into your hand: you did show them no mercy; upon the aged have you very heavily laid your yoke.47:7 And you said, I shall be mistress for ever; so that you did not lay these things to your heart, neither did remember the latter end thereof.47:8 Now therefore hear this, you that are given to pleasures, that sit securely, that say in your heart, I am, and there is none else besides me; I shall not sit as a widow, neither shall I know the loss of children:47:9 but these two things shall come to you in a moment in one day, the loss of children, and widowhood; in their full measure shall they come upon you, in the multitude of your sorceries, and the great abundance of your enchantments.47:10 For you have trusted in your wickedness; you have said, No one sees me; your wisdom and your knowledge, it has perverted you, and you have said in your heart, I am, and there is none else besides me.47:11 Therefore shall evil come upon you; you shall not know the dawning thereof: and mischief shall fall upon you; you shall not be able to put it away: and desolation shall come upon you suddenly, which you know not.47:12 Stand now with your enchantments, and with the multitude of your sorceries, in which you have labored from your youth; if so be you shall be able to profit, if so be you may prevail.47:13 You are wearied in the multitude of your counsels: let now the astrologers, the star-gazers, the monthly prognosticators, stand up, and save you from the things that shall come upon you.47:14 Behold, they shall be as stubble; the fire shall burn them; they shall not deliver themselves from the power of the flame: it shall not be a coal to warm at, nor a fire to sit before.47:15 Thus shall the things be to you in which you have labored: they that have trafficked with you from your youth shall wander every one to his quarter; there shall be none to save you.48:1 Hear ye this, O house of Jacob, who are called by the name of Israel, and are come forth out of the waters of Judah; who swear by the name of Yahweh, and make mention of the God of Israel, but not in truth, nor in righteousness48:2 (for they call themselves of the holy city, and stay themselves upon the God of Israel; Yahweh of hosts is his name):48:3 I have declared the former things from of old; yes, they went forth out of my mouth, and I showed them: suddenly I did them, and they came to pass.48:4 Because I knew that you are obstinate, and your neck is an iron sinew, and your brow brass;48:5 therefore I have declared it to you from of old; before it came to pass I showed it to you; lest you should say, Mine idol has done them, and my graven image, and my molten image, has commanded them.48:6 You have heard it; behold all this; and ye, will ye not declare it?  I have shown you new things from this time, even hidden things, which you have not known.48:7 They are created now, and not from of old; and before this day you heard them not; lest you should say, Behold, I knew them.48:8 Yes, you heard not; yes, you knew not; yes, from of old your ear was not opened: for I knew that you did deal very treacherously, and were called a transgressor from the womb.48:9 For my name's sake will I defer my anger, and for my praise will I refrain for you, that I cut you not off.48:10 Behold, I have refined you, but not as silver; I have chosen you in the furnace of affliction.48:11 For my own sake, for my own sake, will I do it; for how should my name be profaned?  and my glory will I not give to another.48:12 Hearken to me, O Jacob, and Israel my called: I am he; I am the first, I also am the last.48:13 Yes, my hand has laid the foundation of the earth, and my right hand has spread out the heavens: when I call to them, they stand up together.48:14 Assemble yourselves, all ye, and hear; who among them has declared these things?  He whom Yahweh loves shall perform his pleasure on Babylon, and his arm shall be on the Chaldeans.48:15 I, even I, have spoken; yes, I have called him; I have brought him, and he shall make his way prosperous.48:16 Come ye near to me, hear ye this; from the beginning I have not spoken in secret; from the time that it was, there am I: and now the Lord Yahweh has sent me, and his Spirit.48:17 Thus says Yahweh, your Redeemer, the Holy One of Israel: I am Yahweh your God, who teaches you to profit, who leads you by the way that you should go.48:18 Oh that you had hearkened to my commandments! then had your peace been as a river, and your righteousness as the waves of the sea:48:19 your seed also had been as the sand, and the offspring of your bowels like the grains thereof: his name would not be cut off nor destroyed from before me.48:20 Go ye forth from Babylon, flee ye from the Chaldeans; with a voice of singing declare ye, tell this, utter it even to the end of the earth: say ye, Yahweh has redeemed his servant Jacob.48:21 And they thirsted not when he led them through the deserts; he caused the waters to flow out of the rock for them; he clave the rock also, and the waters gushed out.48:22 There is no peace, says Yahweh, to the wicked.49:1 Listen, O isles, to me; and hearken, ye peoples, from far: Yahweh has called me from the womb; from the bowels of my mother has he made mention of my name:49:2 and he has made my mouth like a sharp sword; in the shadow of his hand has he hid me: and he has made me a polished shaft; in his quiver has he kept me close:49:3 and he said to me, You are my servant; Israel, in whom I will be glorified.49:4 But I said, I have labored in vain, I have spent my strength for nought and vanity; yet surely the justice due to me is with Yahweh, and my recompense with my God.49:5 And now says Yahweh that formed me from the womb to be his servant, to bring Jacob again to him, and that Israel be gathered to him (for I am honorable in the eyes of Yahweh, and my God is become my strength);49:6 yes, he says, It is too light a thing that you should be my servant to raise up the tribes of Jacob, and to restore the preserved of Israel: I will also give you for a light to the Gentiles, that you may be my salvation to the end of the earth.49:7 Thus says Yahweh, the Redeemer of Israel, and his Holy One, to him whom man despises, to him whom the nation abhors, to a servant of rulers: Kings shall see and arise; princes, and they shall worship; because of Yahweh that is faithful, even the Holy One of Israel, who has chosen you.49:8 Thus says Yahweh, In an acceptable time have I answered you, and in a day of salvation have I helped you; and I will preserve you, and give you for a covenant of the people, to raise up the land, to make them inherit the desolate heritages:49:9 saying to them that are bound, Go forth; to them that are in darkness, Show yourselves.  They shall feed in the ways, and on all bare heights shall be their pasture.49:10 They shall not hunger nor thirst; neither shall the heat nor sun smite them: for he that has mercy on them will lead them, even by springs of water will he guide them.49:11 And I will make all my mountains a way, and my highways shall be exalted.49:12 Lo, these shall come from far; and, lo, these from the north and from the west; and these from the land of Sinim.49:13 Sing, O heavens; and be joyful, O earth; and break forth into singing, O mountains!  For Yahweh has comforted his people, and will have compassion upon his afflicted.49:14 But Zion said, Yahweh has forsaken me, and the Lord has forgotten me.49:15 Can a woman forget her sucking child, that she should not have compassion on the son of her womb?  Yes, these may forget, yet I will not forget you.49:16 Behold, I have engraved you on the palms of my hands; your walls are continually before me.49:17 Your children make haste; your destroyers and they that made you waste shall go forth from you.49:18 Lift up your eyes round about, and behold: all these gather themselves together, and come to you.  As I live, says Yahweh, you shall surely clothe you with them all as with an ornament, and gird yourself with them, like a bride.49:19 For, as for your waste and your desolate places, and your land that has been destroyed, surely now shall you be too strait for the inhabitants, and they that swallowed you up shall be far away.49:20 The children of your bereavement shall yet say in your ears, The place is too strait for me; give place to me that I may dwell.49:21 Then shall you say in your heart, Who has begotten me these, seeing I have been bereaved of my children, and am solitary, an exile, and wandering to and fro?  and who has brought up these?  Behold, I was left alone; these, where were they?49:22 Thus says the Lord Yahweh, Behold, I will lift up my hand to the nations, and set up my ensign to the peoples; and they shall bring your sons in their bosom, and your daughters shall be carried upon their shoulders.49:23 And kings shall be your nursing fathers, and their queens your nursing mothers: they shall bow down to you with their faces to the earth, and lick the dust of your feet; and you shall know that I am Yahweh; and they that wait for me shall not be put to shame.49:24 Shall the prey be taken from the mighty, or the lawful captives be delivered?49:25 But thus says Yahweh, Even the captives of the mighty shall be taken away, and the prey of the terrible shall be delivered; for I will contend with him that contends with you, and I will save your children.49:26 And I will feed them that oppress you with their own flesh; and they shall be drunken with their own blood, as with sweet wine: and all flesh shall know that I, Yahweh, am your Saviour, and your Redeemer, the Mighty One of Jacob.50:1 Thus says Yahweh, Where is the bill of your mother's divorcement, with which I have put her away?  or which of my creditors is it to whom I have sold you?  Behold, for your iniquities were ye sold, and for your transgressions was your mother put away.50:2 Why, when I came, was there no man?  when I called, was there none to answer?  Is my hand shortened at all, that it cannot redeem?  or have I no power to deliver?  Behold, at my rebuke I dry up the sea, I make the rivers a wilderness: their fish stink, because there is no water, and die for thirst.50:3 I clothe the heavens with blackness, and I make sackcloth their covering.50:4 The Lord Yahweh has given me the tongue of them that are taught, that I may know how to sustain with words him that is weary: he wakens morning by morning, he wakens my ear to hear as they that are taught.50:5 The Lord Yahweh has opened my ear, and I was not rebellious, neither turned away backward.50:6 I gave my back to the smiters, and my cheeks to them that plucked off the hair; I hid not my face from shame and spitting.50:7 For the Lord Yahweh will help me; therefore have I not been confounded: therefore have I set my face like a flint, and I know that I shall not be put to shame.50:8 He is near that justifies me; who will content with me?  let us stand up together: who is my adversary?  let him come near to me.50:9 Behold, the Lord Yahweh will help me; who is he that shall condemn me?  behold, all they shall grow old as a garment, the moth shall eat them up.50:10 Who is among you that fears Yahweh, that obeys the voice of his servant?  he that walks in darkness, and has no light, let him trust in the name of Yahweh, and rely upon his God.50:11 Behold, all ye that kindle a fire, that gird yourselves about with firebrands; walk ye in the flame of your fire, and among the brands that ye have kindled.  This shall ye have of my hand; ye shall lie down in sorrow.51:1 Hearken to me, ye that follow after righteousness, ye that seek Yahweh: look to the rock whence ye were hewn, and to the hold of the pit whence ye were dug.51:2 Look to Abraham your father, and to Sarah that bore you; for when he was but one I called him, and I blessed him, and made him many.51:3 For Yahweh has comforted Zion; he has comforted all her waste places, and has made her wilderness like Eden, and her desert like the garden of Yahweh; joy and gladness shall be found therein, thanksgiving, and the voice of melody.51:4 Attend to me, O my people; and give ear to me, O my nation: for a law shall go forth from me, and I will establish my justice for a light of the peoples.51:5 My righteousness is near, my salvation is gone forth, and my arms shall judge the peoples; the isles shall wait for me, and on my arm shall they trust.51:6 Lift up your eyes to the heavens, and look upon the earth beneath; for the heavens shall vanish away like smoke, and the earth shall grow old like a garment; and they that dwell therein shall die in like manner: but my salvation shall be for ever, and my righteousness shall not be abolished.51:7 Hearken to me, ye that know righteousness, the people in whose heart is my law; fear ye not the reproach of men, neither be ye dismayed at their revilings.51:8 For the moth shall eat them up like a garment, and the worm shall eat them like wool; but my righteousness shall be for ever, and my salvation to all generations.51:9 Awake, awake, put on strength, O arm of Yahweh; awake, as in the days of old, the generations of ancient times.  Is it not you that did cut Rahab in pieces, that did pierce the monster?51:10 Is it not you that dried up the sea, the waters of the great deep; that made the depths of the sea a way for the redeemed to pass over?51:11 And the ransomed of Yahweh shall return, and come with singing to Zion; and everlasting joy shall be upon their heads: they shall obtain gladness and joy; and sorrow and sighing shall flee away.51:12 I, even I, am he that comforts you.  Who are you, that you are afraid of man that shall die, and of the son of man that shall be made as grass;51:13 and have forgotten Yahweh your Maker, that stretched forth the heavens, and laid the foundations of the earth; and fear continually all the day because of the fury of the oppressor, when he makes ready to destroy?  and where is the fury of the oppressor?51:14 The captive exile shall speedily be freed; and he shall not die and go down into the pit, neither shall his bread fail.51:15 For I am Yahweh your God, who stirs up the sea, so that the waves thereof roar: Yahweh of hosts is his name.51:16 And I have put my words in your mouth, and have covered you in the shadow of my hand, that I may plant the heavens, and lay the foundations of the earth, and say to Zion, You are my people.51:17 Awake, awake, stand up, O Jerusalem, that have drunk at the hand of Yahweh the cup of his wrath; you have drunken the bowl of the cup of staggering, and drained it.51:18 There is none to guide her among all the sons whom she has brought forth; neither is there any that takes her by the hand among all the sons that she has brought up.51:19 These two things are befallen you, who shall bemoan you?  desolation and destruction, and the famine and the sword; how shall I comfort you?51:20 Your sons have fainted, they lie at the head of all the streets, as an antelope in a net; they are full of the wrath of Yahweh, the rebuke of your God.51:21 Therefore hear now this, you afflicted, and drunken, but now with wine:51:22 Thus says your Lord Yahweh, and your God that pleads the cause of his people, Behold, I have taken out of your hand the cup of staggering, even the bowl of the cup of my wrath; you shall no more drink it again:51:23 and I will put it into the hand of them that afflict you, that have said to your soul, Bow down, that we may go over; and you have laid your back as the ground, and as the street, to them that go over.52:1 Awake, awake, put on your strength, O Zion.  Put on your beautiful garments, O Jerusalem, the holy city.  For from now on there shall no more come into you the uncircumcised and the unclean.52:2 Shake yourself from the dust; arise, sit on your throne, O Jerusalem: free yourself from the bonds of your neck, O captive daughter of Zion.52:3 For thus says Yahweh, You were sold for nothing; and ye shall also be redeemed without money.52:4 For thus says the Lord Yahweh, My people went down at the first into Egypt to sojourn there: and the Assyrian has oppressed them without cause.52:5 Now therefore, what do I here, says Yahweh, seeing that my people is taken away for nought?  they that rule over them do howl, says Yahweh, and my name continually all the day is blasphemed.52:6 Therefore my people shall know my name: therefore they shall know in that day that I am he that does speak; behold, it is I.52:7 How beautiful upon the mountains are the feet of him that brings good tidings, that publishes peace, that brings good tidings of good, that publishes salvation, that says to Zion, Your God reigns!52:8 The voice of your watchmen! they lift up the voice, together do they sing; for they shall see eye to eye, when Yahweh returns to Zion.52:9 Break forth into joy, sing together, ye waste places of Jerusalem; for Yahweh has comforted his people, he has redeemed Jerusalem.52:10 Yahweh has made bare his holy arm in the eyes of all the nations; and all the ends of the earth have seen the salvation of our God.52:11 Depart ye, depart ye, go ye out from there, touch no unclean thing; go ye out of the midst of her; cleanse yourselves, ye that bear the vessels of Yahweh.52:12 For ye shall not go out in haste, neither shall ye go by flight: for Yahweh will go before you; and the God of Israel will be your rearward.52:13 Behold, my servant shall deal wisely, he shall be exalted and lifted up, and shall be very high.52:14 Like as many were astonished at you (his visage was so marred more than any man, and his form more than the sons of men),52:15 so shall he sprinkle many nations; kings shall shut their mouths at him: for that which had not been told them shall they see; and that which they had not heard shall they understand.53:1 Who has believed our message?  and to whom has the arm of Yahweh been revealed?53:2 For he grew up before him as a tender plant, and as a root out of a dry ground: he has no form nor comeliness; and when we see him, there is no beauty that we should desire him.53:3 He was despised, and rejected by men; a man of sorrows, and acquainted with grief: and as one from whom men hide their face,  he was despised; and we esteemed him not.53:4 Surely he has borne our griefs, and carried our sorrows; yet we considered him stricken, smitten by God, and afflicted.53:5 But he was wounded for our transgressions, he was bruised for our iniquities; the chastisement for our peace was upon him; and with his stripes we are healed.53:6 All we like sheep have gone astray; we have turned, every one, to his own way; and Yahweh has laid on him the iniquity of us all.53:7 He was oppressed, yet when he was afflicted he opened not his mouth; as a lamb that is led to the slaughter, and as a sheep that before its shearers is silent, so he opened not his mouth.53:8 By oppression and judgment he was taken away; and as for his generation, who among them considered that he was cut off out of the land of the living for the transgression of my people to whom the stroke was due?53:9 And they made his grave with the wicked, and with a rich man in his death; though he had done no violence, neither was any deceit in his mouth.53:10 Yet it pleased Yahweh to bruise him; he has put him to grief: when you shall make his soul an offering for sin, he shall see his seed, he shall prolong his days, and the pleasure of Yahweh shall prosper in his hand.53:11 He shall see of the travail of his soul, and shall be satisfied: by the knowledge of himself shall my righteous servant justify many; and he shall bear their iniquities.53:12 Therefore will I divide him a portion with the great, and he shall divide the spoil with the strong; because he poured out his soul unto death, and was numbered with the transgressors: yet he bore the sin of many, and made intercession for the transgressors.54:1 Sing, O barren ones, you that did not bear!  Break forth into singing, and cry aloud, you that did not travail with child.  For more are the children of the desolate than the children of the married wife, says Yahweh.54:2 Enlarge the place of your tent, and let them stretch forth the curtains of your habitations; spare not: lengthen your cords, and strengthen your stakes.54:3 For you shall spread abroad on the right hand and on the left; and your seed shall possess the nations, and make the desolate cities to be inhabited.54:4 Fear not; for you shall not be ashamed: neither be you confounded; for you shall not be put to shame: for you shall forget the shame of your youth; and the reproach of your widowhood shall you remember no more.54:5 For your Maker is your husband; Yahweh of hosts is his name: and the Holy One of Israel is your Redeemer; the God of the whole earth shall he be called.54:6 For Yahweh has called you as a wife forsaken and grieved in spirit, even a wife of youth, when she is cast off, says your God.54:7 For a small moment have I forsaken you; but with great mercies will I gather you.54:8 In overflowing wrath I hid my face from you for a moment; but with everlasting lovingkindness will I have mercy on you, says Yahweh your Redeemer.54:9 For this is as the waters of Noah to me; for as I have sworn that the waters of Noah shall no more go over the earth, so have I sworn that I will not be angry with you, nor rebuke you.54:10 For the mountains may depart, and the hills be removed; but my lovingkindness shall not depart from you, neither shall my covenant of peace be removed, says Yahweh that has mercy on you.54:11 O you afflicted, tossed with tempest, and not comforted, behold, I will set your stones in fair colors, and lay your foundations with sapphires.54:12 And I will make your pinnacles of rubies, and your gates of carbuncles, and all your border of precious stones.54:13 And all your children shall be taught of Yahweh; and great shall be the peace of your children.54:14 In righteousness shall you be established: you shall be far from oppression, for you shall not fear; and from terror, for it shall not come near you.54:15 Behold, they may gather together, but not by me: whosoever shall gather together against you shall fall because of you.54:16 Behold, I have created the smith that blows the fire of coals, and brings forth a weapon for his work; and I have created the waster to destroy.54:17 No weapon that is formed against you shall prosper; and every tongue that shall rise against you in judgment you shall condemn.  This is the heritage of the servants of Yahweh, and their righteousness which is of me, says Yahweh.55:1 Ho, every one that thirsts, come ye to the waters, and he that has no money; come ye, buy, and eat; yes, come, buy wine and milk without money and without price.55:2 Why do ye spend money for that which is not bread?  and your labor for that which satisfies not?  hearken diligently to me, and eat ye that which is good, and let your soul delight itself in fatness.55:3 Incline your ear, and come to me; hear, and your soul shall live: and I will make an everlasting covenant with you, even the sure mercies of David.55:4 Behold, I have given him for a witness to the peoples, a leader and commander to the peoples.55:5 Behold, you shall call a nation that you know not; and a nation that knew not you shall run to you, because of Yahweh your God, and for the Holy One of Israel; for he has glorified you.55:6 Seek ye Yahweh while he may be found; call ye upon him while he is near:55:7 let the wicked forsake his way, and the unrighteous man his thoughts; and let him return to Yahweh, and he will have mercy upon him; and to our God, for he will abundantly pardon.55:8 For my thoughts are not your thoughts, neither are your ways my ways, says Yahweh.55:9 For as the heavens are higher than the earth, so are my ways higher than your ways, and my thoughts than your thoughts.55:10 For as the rain and the snow come down from heaven, and do not return there without watering the earth, and making it bring forth and bud, and giving seed to the sower and bread to the eater;55:11 so shall my word be that goes forth out of my mouth: it shall not return to me void, but it shall accomplish that which I please, and shall prosper in the thing for which I sent it.55:12 For ye shall go out with joy, and be led forth with peace: the mountains and the hills shall break forth before you into singing; and all the trees of the fields shall clap their hands.55:13 Instead of the thorn shall come up the fir tree; and instead of the brier shall come up the myrtle tree: and it shall make a name for Yahweh, an everlasting sign that shall not be cut off.56:1 Thus says Yahweh, Keep ye justice, and do righteousness; for my salvation is near to come, and my righteousness to be revealed.56:2 Blessed is the man that does this, and the son of man that holds it fast; that keeps the sabbath from profaning it, and keeps his hand from doing any evil.56:3 Neither let the foreigner, that has joined himself to Yahweh, speak, saying, Yahweh will surely separate me from his people; neither let the eunuch say, Behold, I am a dry tree.56:4 For thus says Yahweh of the eunuchs that keep my sabbaths, and choose the things that please me, and hold fast my covenant:56:5 To them will I give in my house and within my walls a memorial and a name better than of sons and of daughters; I will give them an everlasting name, that shall not be cut off.56:6 Also the foreigners that join themselves to Yahweh, to minister to him, and to love the name of Yahweh, to be his servants, every one that keeps the sabbath from profaning it, and holds fast my covenant;56:7 even them will I bring to my holy mountain, and make them joyful in my house of prayer: their burnt offerings and their sacrifices shall be accepted upon my altar; for my house shall be called a house of prayer for all peoples.56:8 The Lord Yahweh, who gathers the outcasts of Israel, says, Yet will I gather others to him, besides his own that are gathered.56:9 All ye beasts of the field, come to devour, yes, all ye beasts in the forest.56:10 His watchmen are blind, they are all without knowledge; they are all dumb dogs, they cannot bark; dreaming, lying down, loving to slumber.56:11 Yes, the dogs are greedy, they can never have enough; and these are shepherds that cannot understand: they have all turned to their own way, each one to his gain, from every quarter.56:12 Come ye, say they, I will fetch wine, and we will fill ourselves with strong drink; and tomorrow shall be as this day, a day great beyond measure.57:1 The righteous man perishes, and no one lays it to heart.  And merciful men are taken away, no one considering that it is away from the presence of evil the righteous one is being taken.57:2 He enters into peace.  Those who walk uprightly find rest in their beds. 57:3 But draw near here, ye sons of the sorceress, the seed of the adulterer and the harlot.57:4 Against whom do ye sport yourselves?  against whom make ye a wide mouth, and put out the tongue?  are ye not children of transgression, a seed of falsehood,57:5 ye that inflame yourselves among the oaks, under every green tree; that slay the children in the valleys, under the clefts of the rocks?57:6 Among the smooth stones of the valley is your portion; they, they are your lot; even to them have you poured a drink offering, you have offered an oblation.  Shall I be appeased for these things?57:7 Upon a high and lofty mountain have you set your bed; there also you went up to offer sacrifice.57:8 And behind the doors and the posts have you set up your memorial: for you have uncovered yourself to another than me, and are gone up; you have enlarged your bed, and made you a covenant with them: you loved their bed where you saw it.57:9 And you went to the king with oil, and did increase your perfumes, and did send your ambassadors far off, and did debase yourself even to Sheol.57:10 You were wearied with the length of your way; yet said you not, It is in vain: you did find a quickening of your strength; therefore you were not faint.57:11 And of whom have you been afraid and in fear, that you lie, and have not remembered me, nor laid it to your heart?  have not I held my peace even of long time, and you fear me not?57:12 I will declare your righteousness; and as for your works, they shall not profit you.57:13 When you cry, let them that you have gathered deliver you; but the wind shall take them, a breath shall carry them all away: but he that takes refuge in me shall possess the land, and shall inherit my holy mountain.57:14 And he will say, Cast ye up, cast ye up, prepare the way, take up the stumbling-block out of the way of my people.57:15 For thus says the high and lofty One that inhabits eternity, whose name is Holy: I dwell in the high and holy place, with him also that is of a contrite and humble spirit, to revive the spirit of the humble, and to revive the heart of the contrite.57:16 For I will not contend for ever, neither will I be always angry; for the spirit would faint before me, and the souls that I have made.57:17 For the iniquity of his covetousness was I angry, and smote him; I hid my face and was angry; and he went on backsliding in the way of his heart.57:18 I have seen his ways, and will heal him: I will lead him also, and restore comforts to him and to his mourners.57:19 I create the fruit of the lips: Peace, peace, to him that is far off and to him that is near, says Yahweh; and I will heal him.57:20 But the wicked are like the troubled sea; for it cannot rest, and its waters cast up mire and dirt.57:21 There is no peace, says my God, for the wicked.58:1 Cry aloud, spare not, lift up your voice like a trumpet, and declare to my people their transgression, and to the house of Jacob their sins.58:2 Yet they seek me daily, and delight to know my ways: as a nation that did righteousness, and forsook not the ordinance of their God, they ask of me righteous judgments; they delight to draw near to God.58:3 Why have we fasted, say they, and you see not?  why have we afflicted our soul, and you take no knowledge?  Behold, in the day of your fast ye find your own pleasure, and exact all your labors.58:4 Behold, ye fast for strife and contention, and to smite with the fist of wickedness: ye fast not this day so as to make your voice to be heard on high.58:5 Is such the fast that I have chosen?  the day for a man to afflict his soul?  Is it to bow down his head as a rush, and to spread sackcloth and ashes under him?  will you call this a fast, and an acceptable day to Yahweh?58:6 Is not this the fast that I have chosen: to loose the bonds of wickedness, to undo the bands of the yoke, and to let the oppressed go free, and that ye break every yoke?58:7 Is it not to deal your bread to the hungry, and that you bring the poor that are cast out to your house?  when you see the naked, that you cover him; and that you hide not yourself from your own flesh?58:8 Then shall your light break forth as the morning, and your healing shall spring forth speedily; and your righteousness shall go before you; the glory of Yahweh shall be your rear guard.58:9 Then shall you call, and Yahweh will answer; you shall cry, and he will say, Here I am.  If you take away from the midst of you the yoke, the putting forth of the finger, and speaking wickedly;58:10 and if you draw out your soul to the hungry, and satisfy the afflicted soul: then shall your light rise in darkness, and your obscurity be as the noonday;58:11 and Yahweh will guide you continually, and satisfy your soul in dry places, and make strong your bones; and you shall be like a watered garden, and like a spring of water, whose waters fail not.58:12 And they that shall be of you shall build the old waste places; you shall raise up the foundations of many generations; and you shall be called The repairer of the breach, The restorer of paths to dwell in.58:13 If you turn away your foot from the sabbath, from doing your pleasure on my holy day; and call the sabbath a delight, and the holy of Yahweh honorable; and shall honor it, not doing your own ways, nor finding your own pleasure, nor speaking your own words:58:14 then shall you delight yourself in Yahweh; and I will make you to ride upon the high places of the earth; and I will feed you with the heritage of Jacob your father: for the mouth of Yahweh has spoken it.59:1 Behold, Yahweh's hand is not shortened, that it cannot save; neither his ear heavy, that it cannot hear:59:2 but your iniquities have separated between you and your God, and your sins have hid his face from you, so that he will not hear.59:3 For your hands are defiled with blood, and your fingers with iniquity; your lips have spoken lies, your tongue mutters wickedness.59:4 None sues in righteousness, and none pleads in truth: they trust in vanity, and speak lies; they conceive mischief, and bring forth iniquity.59:5 They hatch adders' eggs, and weave the spider's web: he that eats of their eggs dies; and that which is crushed breaks out into a viper.59:6 Their webs shall not become garments, neither shall they cover themselves with their works: their works are works of iniquity, and the act of violence is in their hands.59:7 Their feet run to evil, and they make haste to shed innocent blood: their thoughts are thoughts of iniquity; desolation and destruction are in their paths.59:8 The way of peace they know not; and there is no justice in their goings: they have made them crooked paths; whosoever goes therein does not know peace.59:9 Therefore is justice far from us, neither does righteousness overtake us: we look for light, but, behold, darkness; for brightness, but we walk in obscurity.59:10 We grope for the wall like the blind; yes, we grope as they that have no eyes: we stumble at noonday as in the twilight; among them that are lusty we are as dead men.59:11 We roar all like bears, and moan sore like doves: we look for justice, but there is none; for salvation, but it is far off from us.59:12 For our transgressions are multiplied before you, and our sins testify against us; for our transgressions are with us, and as for our iniquities, we know them:59:13 transgressing and denying Yahweh, and turning away from following our God, speaking oppression and revolt, conceiving and uttering from the heart words of falsehood.59:14 And justice is turned away backward, and righteousness stands afar off; for truth is fallen in the street, and uprightness cannot enter.59:15 Yes, truth is lacking; and he that departs from evil makes himself a prey.  And Yahweh saw it, and it displeased him that there was no justice.59:16 And he saw that there was no man, and wondered that there was no intercessor: therefore his own arm brought salvation to him; and his righteousness, it upheld him.59:17 And he put on righteousness as a breastplate, and a helmet of salvation upon his head; and he put on garments of vengeance for clothing, and was clad with zeal as a mantle.59:18 According to their deeds, accordingly he will repay, wrath to his adversaries, recompense to his enemies; to the islands he will repay recompense.59:19 So shall they fear the name of Yahweh from the west, and his glory from the rising of the sun; for he will come as a rushing stream, which the breath of Yahweh drives.59:20 And a Redeemer will come to Zion, and to them that turn from transgression in Jacob, says Yahweh.59:21 And as for me, this is my covenant with them, says Yahweh: my Spirit that is upon you, and my words which I have put in your mouth, shall not depart out of your mouth, nor out of the mouth of your seed, nor out of the mouth of your seed's seed, says Yahweh, from from now on and for ever.60:1 Arise, shine; for your light is come, and the glory of Yahweh is risen upon you.60:2 For, behold, darkness shall cover the earth, and gross darkness the peoples; but Yahweh will arise upon you, and his glory shall be seen upon you.60:3 And nations shall come to your light, and kings to the brightness of your rising.60:4 Lift up your eyes round about, and see: they all gather themselves together, they come to you; your sons shall come from far, and your daughters shall be carried in the arms.60:5 Then you shall see and be radiant, and your heart shall thrill and be enlarged; because the abundance of the sea shall be turned to you, the wealth of the nations shall come to you.60:6 The multitude of camels shall cover you, the dromedaries of Midian and Ephah; all they from Sheba shall come; they shall bring gold and frankincense, and shall proclaim the praises of Yahweh.60:7 All the flocks of Kedar shall be gathered together to you, the rams of Nebaioth shall minister to you; they shall come up with acceptance on my altar; and I will glorify the house of my glory.60:8 Who are these that fly as a cloud, and as the doves to their windows?60:9 Surely the isles shall wait for me, and the ships of Tarshish first, to bring your sons from far, their silver and their gold with them, for the name of Yahweh your God, and for the Holy One of Israel, because he has glorified you.60:10 And foreigners shall build up your walls, and their kings shall minister to you: for in my wrath I smote you, but in my favor have I had mercy on you.60:11 Your gates also shall be open continually; they shall not be shut day nor night; that men may bring to you the wealth of the nations, and their kings led captive.60:12 For that nation and kingdom that will not serve you shall perish; yes, those nations shall be utterly wasted.60:13 The glory of Lebanon shall come to you, the fir-tree, the pine, and the box-tree together, to beautify the place of my sanctuary; and I will make the place of my feet glorious.60:14 And the sons of them that afflicted you shall come bending to you; and all they that despised you shall bow themselves down at the soles of your feet; and they shall call you The city of Yahweh, The Zion of the Holy One of Israel.60:15 Whereas you have been forsaken and hated, so that no man passed through you, I will make you an eternal excellency, a joy of many generations.60:16 You shall also suck the milk of the nations, and shall suck the breast of kings; and you shall know that I, Yahweh, am your Saviour, and your Redeemer, the Mighty One of Jacob.60:17 For brass I will bring gold, and for iron I will bring silver, and for wood brass, and for stones iron.  I will also make your officers peace, and your exactors righteousness.60:18 Violence shall no more be heard in your land, desolation nor destruction within your borders; but you shall call your walls Salvation, and your gates Praise.60:19 The sun shall be no more your light by day; neither for brightness shall the moon give light to you: but Yahweh will be to you an everlasting light, and your God your glory.60:20 Your sun shall no more go down, neither shall your moon withdraw itself; for Yahweh will be your everlasting light, and the days of your mourning shall be ended.60:21 Your people also shall be all righteous; they shall inherit the land for ever, the branch of my planting, the work of my hands, that I may be glorified.60:22 The little one shall become a thousand, and the small one a strong nation; I, Yahweh, will hasten it in its time.61:1 The Spirit of the Lord Yahweh is upon me; because Yahweh has anointed me to preach good tidings to the meek; he has sent me to bind up the broken-hearted, to proclaim liberty to the captives, and the opening of the prison to them that are bound;61:2 to proclaim the year of Yahweh's favor, and the day of vengeance of our God; to comfort all that mourn;61:3 to appoint to them that mourn in Zion, to give to them a garland for ashes, the oil of joy for mourning, the garment of praise for the spirit of heaviness; that they may be called trees of righteousness, the planting of Yahweh, that he may be glorified.61:4 And they shall build the old wastes, they shall raise up the former desolations, and they shall repair the waste cities, the desolations of many generations.61:5 And strangers shall stand and feed your flocks, and foreigners shall be your plowmen and your vine-dressers.61:6 But ye shall be named the priests of Yahweh; men shall call you the ministers of our God: ye shall eat the wealth of the nations, and in their glory shall ye boast yourselves.61:7 Instead of your shame ye shall have double; and instead of dishonor they shall rejoice in their portion: therefore in their land they shall possess double; everlasting joy shall be to them.61:8 For I, Yahweh, love justice, I hate robbery with iniquity; and I will give them their recompense in truth, and I will make an everlasting covenant with them.61:9 And their seed shall be known among the nations, and their offspring among the peoples; all that see them shall acknowledge them, that they are the seed which Yahweh has blessed.61:10 I will greatly rejoice in Yahweh, my soul shall be joyful in my God; for he has clothed me with the garments of salvation, he has covered me with the robe of righteousness, as a bridegroom decks himself with a garland, and as a bride adorns herself with her jewels.61:11 For as the earth brings forth its bud, and as the garden causes the things that are sown in it to spring forth; so the Lord Yahweh will cause righteousness and praise to spring forth before all the nations.62:1 For Zion's sake will I not hold my peace, and for Jerusalem's sake I will not rest, until her righteousness go forth as brightness, and her salvation as a lamp that burns.62:2 And the nations shall see your righteousness, and all kings your glory, and you shall be called by a new name, which the mouth of Yahweh shall name.62:3 You shall also be a crown of beauty in the hand of Yahweh, and a royal diadem in the hand of your God.62:4 You shall no more be termed Forsaken; neither shall your land any more be termed Desolate: but you shall be called Hephzi-bah, and your land Beulah; for Yahweh delights in you, and your land shall be married.62:5 For as a young man marries a virgin, so shall your sons marry you; and as the bridegroom rejoices over the bride, so shall your God rejoice over you.62:6 I have set watchmen upon your walls, O Jerusalem; they shall never hold their peace day nor night: ye that are Yahweh's remembrancers, take ye no rest,62:7 and give him no rest, till he establish, and till he make Jerusalem a praise in the earth.62:8 Yahweh has sworn by his right hand, and by the arm of his strength, Surely I will no more give your grain to be food for your enemies; and foreigners shall not drink your new wine, for which you have labored:62:9 but they that have garnered it shall eat it, and praise Yahweh; and they that have gathered it shall drink it in the courts of my sanctuary.62:10 Go through, go through the gates; prepare ye the way of the people; cast up, cast up the highway; gather out the stones; lift up an ensign for the peoples.62:11 Behold, Yahweh has proclaimed to the end of the earth, Say ye to the daughter of Zion, Behold, your salvation comes; behold, his reward is with him, and his recompense before him.62:12 And they shall call them The holy people, The redeemed of Yahweh: and you shall be called Sought out, a city not forsaken.63:1 Who is this that comes from Edom, in crimsoned garments from Bozrah?   This who is glorious in his apparel, marching in the greatness of his strength?  "It is I, speaking in righteousness, mighty to save."63:2 Why is your apparel red, and your garments like him who treads in the winevat?63:3 "I have trodden the winepress alone; and of the peoples there was no man with me: yes, I stomped on them in my anger, and trampled them in my wrath; and their lifeblood is spattered on my garments, and I have stained all my clothing.63:4 For the day of vengeance was in my heart, and the year of my redeemed had come.63:5 And I looked, and there was no one to help; I was aghast, and no one would uphold. So my own arm brought salvation to me; and my wrath, it upheld me.63:6 And I trampled down the peoples in my anger, and made them drunk in my wrath, and I poured out their lifeblood on the earth."63:7 I will make mention of the lovingkindnesses of Yahweh, and the praises of Yahweh, according to all that Yahweh has bestowed on us, and the great goodness toward the house of Israel, which he has bestowed on them according to his mercies, and according to the multitude of his lovingkindnesses.63:8 For he said, Surely, they are my people, children that will not deal falsely: so he was their Saviour.63:9 In all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his presence saved them: in his love and in his pity he redeemed them; and he bore them, and carried them all the days of old.63:10 But they rebelled, and grieved his holy Spirit: therefore he was turned to be their enemy, and himself fought against them.63:11 Then he remembered the days of old, Moses and his people, saying, Where is he that brought them up out of the sea with the shepherds of his flock?  where is he that put his holy Spirit in the midst of them?63:12 that caused his glorious arm to go at the right hand of Moses?  that divided the waters before them, to make himself an everlasting name?63:13 that led them through the depths, as a horse in the wilderness, so that they stumbled not?63:14 As the cattle that go down into the valley, the Spirit of Yahweh caused them to rest; so did you lead your people, to make yourself a glorious name.63:15 Look down from heaven, and behold from the habitation of your holiness and of your glory: where are your zeal and your mighty acts?  the yearning of your heart and your compassions are restrained toward me.63:16 For you are our Father, though Abraham knows us not, and Israel does not acknowledge us: you, O Yahweh, are our Father; our Redeemer from everlasting is your name.63:17 O Yahweh, why do you make us to err from your ways, and harden our heart from your fear?  Return for your servants' sake, the tribes of your inheritance.63:18 Your holy people possessed it but a little while: our adversaries have trodden down your sanctuary.63:19 We are become as they over whom you never bore rule, as they that were not called by your name.64:1 Oh that you would rend the heavens, that you would come down, that the mountains might quake at your presence,64:2 as when fire kindles the brushwood, and the fire causes the waters to boil; to make your name known to your adversaries, that the nations may tremble at your presence!64:3 When you did terrible things which we looked not for, you came down, the mountains quaked at your presence.64:4 For from of old men have not heard, nor perceived by the ear, neither has the eye seen a God besides you, who works for him that waits for him.64:5 You meet him that rejoices and works righteousness, those that remember you in your ways: behold, you were angry, and we sinned: in them have we been of long time; and shall we be saved?64:6 For we are all become as one that is unclean, and all our righteousnesses are as a polluted garment: and we all do fade as a leaf; and our iniquities, like the wind, take us away.64:7 And there is none that calls upon your name, that stirs up himself to take hold of you; for you have hid your face from us, and have consumed us by means of our iniquities.64:8 But now, O Yahweh, you are our Father; we are the clay, and you our potter; and we all are the work of your hand.64:9 Be not angry very sore, O Yahweh, neither remember iniquity for ever: behold, look, we beseech you, we are all your people.64:10 Your holy cities are become a wilderness, Zion is become a wilderness, Jerusalem a desolation.64:11 Our holy and our beautiful house, where our fathers praised you, is burned with fire; and all our pleasant places are laid waste.64:12 Will you refrain yourself for these things, O Yahweh?  will you hold your peace, and afflict us very sore?65:1 I am inquired of by them that asked not for me; I am found of them that sought me not: I said, Behold me, behold me, to a nation that was not called by my name.65:2 I have spread out my hands all the day to a rebellious people, that walk in a way that is not good, after their own thoughts;65:3 a people that provoke me to my face continually, sacrificing in gardens, and burning incense upon bricks;65:4 that sit among the graves, and lodge in the secret places; that eat swine's flesh, and broth of abominable things is in their vessels;65:5 that say, Stand by yourself, come not near to me, for I am holier than you.  These are a smoke in my nose, a fire that burns all the day.65:6 Behold, it is written before me: I will not keep silence, but will recompense, yes, I will recompense into their bosom,65:7 your own iniquities, and the iniquities of your fathers together, says Yahweh, that have burned incense upon the mountains, and blasphemed me upon the hills; therefore will I first measure their work into their bosom.65:8 Thus says Yahweh, as the new wine is found in the cluster, and one says, Destroy it not, for a blessing is in it: so will I do for my servants' sake, that I may not destroy them all.65:9 And I will bring forth a seed out of Jacob, and out of Judah an inheritor of my mountains; and my chosen shall inherit it, and my servants shall dwell there.65:10 And Sharon shall be a fold of flocks, and the valley of Achor a place for herds to lie down in, for my people that have sought me.65:11 But ye that forsake Yahweh, that forget my holy mountain, that prepare a table for Fortune, and that fill up mingled wine to Destiny;65:12 I will destine you to the sword, and ye shall all bow down to the slaughter; because when I called, ye did not answer; when I spoke, ye did not hear; but ye did that which was evil in my eyes, and chose that in which I delighted not.65:13 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh, Behold, my servants shall eat, but ye shall be hungry; behold, my servants shall drink, but ye shall be thirsty; behold, my servants shall rejoice, but ye shall be put to shame;65:14 behold, my servants shall sing for joy of heart, but ye shall cry for sorrow of heart, and shall wail for vexation of spirit.65:15 And ye shall leave your name for a curse to my chosen; and the Lord Yahweh will slay you; and he will call his servants by another name:65:16 so that he who blesses himself in the earth shall bless himself in the God of truth; and he that swears in the earth shall swear by the God of truth; because the former troubles are forgotten, and because they are hid from my eyes.65:17 For, behold, I create new heavens and a new earth; and the former things shall not be remembered, nor come into mind.65:18 But be ye glad and rejoice for ever in that which I create; for, behold, I create Jerusalem a rejoicing, and her people a joy.65:19 And I will rejoice in Jerusalem, and joy in my people; and there shall be heard in her no more the voice of weeping and the voice of crying.65:20 There shall be no more there an infant of days, nor an old man that has not filled his days; for the child shall die a hundred years old, and the sinner being a hundred years old shall be accursed.65:21 And they shall build houses, and inhabit them; and they shall plant vineyards, and eat the fruit of them.65:22 They shall not build, and another inhabit; they shall not plant, and another eat: for as the days of a tree shall be the days of my people, and my chosen shall long enjoy the work of their hands.65:23 They shall not labor in vain, nor bring forth for calamity; for they are the seed of the blessed of Yahweh, and their offspring with them.65:24 And it shall come to pass that, before they call, I will answer; and while they are yet speaking, I will hear.65:25 The wolf and the lamb shall feed together, and the lion shall eat straw like the ox; and dust shall be the serpent's food.  They shall not hurt nor destroy in all my holy mountain, says Yahweh.66:1 Thus says Yahweh, Heaven is my throne, and the earth is my footstool: what manner of house will ye build to me?  and what place shall be my rest?66:2 For all these things has my hand made, and so all these things came to be, says Yahweh: but to this man will I look, even to him that is poor and of a contrite spirit, and that trembles at my word.66:3 He that kills an ox is as he that slays a man; he that sacrifices a lamb, as he that breaks a dog's neck; he that offers an oblation, as he that offers swine's blood; he that burns frankincense, as he that blesses an idol.  Yes, they have chosen their own ways, and their soul delights in their abominations:66:4 I also will choose their delusions, and will bring their fears upon them; because when I called, none did answer; when I spoke, they did not hear: but they did that which was evil in my eyes, and chose that in which I delighted not.66:5 Hear the word of Yahweh, ye that tremble at his word: Your brethren that hate you, that cast you out for my name's sake, have said, Let Yahweh be glorified, that we may see your joy; but it is they that shall be put to shame.66:6 A voice of tumult from the city, a voice from the temple, a voice of Yahweh that renders recompense to his enemies.66:7 Before she travailed, she brought forth; before her pain came, she was delivered of a man-child.66:8 Who has heard such a thing?  who has seen such things?  Shall a land be born in one day?  shall a nation be brought forth at once?  for as soon as Zion travailed, she brought forth her children.66:9 Shall I bring to the birth, and not cause to bring forth?  says Yahweh: shall I that cause to bring forth shut the womb?  says your God.66:10 Rejoice ye with Jerusalem, and be glad for her, all ye that love her: rejoice for joy with her, all ye that mourn over her;66:11 that ye may suck and be satisfied with the breasts of her consolations; that ye may milk out, and be delighted with the abundance of her glory.66:12 For thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will extend peace to her like a river, and the glory of the nations like an overflowing stream: and ye shall suck thereof; ye shall be borne upon the side, and shall be dandled upon the knees.66:13 As one whom his mother comforts, so will I comfort you; and ye shall be comforted in Jerusalem.66:14 And ye shall see it, and your heart shall rejoice, and your bones shall flourish like the tender grass: and the hand of Yahweh shall be known toward his servants; and he will have indignation against his enemies.66:15 For, behold, Yahweh will come with fire, and his chariots shall be like the whirlwind; to render his anger with fierceness, and his rebuke with flames of fire.66:16 For by fire will Yahweh execute judgment, and by his sword, upon all flesh; and the slain of Yahweh shall be many.66:17 They that sanctify themselves and purify themselves to go to the gardens, behind one in the midst, eating swine's flesh, and the abomination, and the mouse, they shall come to an end together, says Yahweh.66:18 For I know their works and their thoughts: the time comes, that I will gather all nations and tongues; and they shall come, and shall see my glory.66:19 And I will set a sign among them, and I will send such as escape of them to the nations, to Tarshish, Pul, and Lud, that draw the bow, to Tubal and Javan, to the isles afar off, that have not heard my fame, neither have seen my glory; and they shall declare my glory among the nations.66:20 And they shall bring all your brethren out of all the nations for an oblation to Yahweh, upon horses, and in chariots, and in litters, and upon mules, and upon dromedaries, to my holy mountain Jerusalem, says Yahweh, as the children of Israel bring their oblation in a clean vessel into the house of Yahweh.66:21 And of them also will I take for priests and for Levites, says Yahweh.66:22 For as the new heavens and the new earth, which I will make, shall remain before me, says Yahweh, so shall your seed and your name remain.66:23 And it shall come to pass, that from one new moon to another, and from one sabbath to another, shall all flesh come to worship before me, says Yahweh.66:24 And they shall go forth, and look upon the dead bodies of the men that have transgressed against me: for their worm shall not die, neither shall their fire be quenched; and they shall be an abhorring to all flesh.End of IsaiahJeremiah1:1 The words of Jeremiah the son of Hilkiah, of the priests that were in Anathoth in the land of Benjamin:1:2 to whom the word of Yahweh came in the days of Josiah the son of Amon, king of Judah, in the thirteenth year of his reign.1:3 It came also in the days of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah, to the end of the eleventh year of Zedekiah, the son of Josiah, king of Judah, to the carrying away of Jerusalem captive in the fifth month.1:4 Now the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,1:5 Before I formed you in the belly I knew you, and before you came forth out of the womb I sanctified you; I have appointed you a prophet to the nations.1:6 Then said I, ah, Lord Yahweh! behold, I know not how to speak; for I am a child.1:7 But Yahweh said to me, Say not, I am a child; for to whomsoever I shall send you you shall go, and whatsoever I shall command you you shall speak.1:8 Be not afraid because of them; for I am with you to deliver you, says Yahweh.1:9 Then Yahweh put forth his hand, and touched my mouth; and Yahweh said to me, Behold, I have put my words in your mouth:1:10 see, I have this day set you over the nations and over the kingdoms, to pluck up and to break down and to destroy and to overthrow, to build and to plant.1:11 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to me, saying, Jeremiah, what see you?  And I said, I see a rod of an almond-tree.1:12 Then said Yahweh to me, You have well seen: for I watch over my word to perform it.1:13 And the word of Yahweh came to me the second time, saying, What see you?  And I said, I see a boiling caldron; and the face thereof is from the north.1:14 Then Yahweh said to me, Out of the north evil shall break forth upon all the inhabitants of the land.1:15 For, lo, I will call all the families of the kingdoms of the north, says Yahweh; and they shall come, and they shall set every one his throne at the entrance of the gates of Jerusalem, and against all the walls thereof round about, and against all the cities of Judah.1:16 And I will utter my judgments against them touching all their wickedness, in that they have forsaken me, and have burned incense to other gods, and worshipped the works of their own hands.1:17 You therefore gird up your loins, and arise, and speak to them all that I command you: be not dismayed at them, lest I dismay you before them.1:18 For, behold, I have made you this day a fortified city, and an iron pillar, and brazen walls, against the whole land, against the kings of Judah, against the princes thereof, against the priests thereof, and against the people of the land.1:19 And they shall fight against you; but they shall not prevail against you: for I am with you, says Yahweh, to deliver you.2:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,2:2 Go, and cry in the ears of Jerusalem, saying, Thus says Yahweh, I remember for you the kindness of your youth, the love of your espousals; how you went after me in the wilderness, in a land that was not sown.2:3 Israel was holiness to Yahweh, the first-fruits of his increase: all that devour him shall be held guilty; evil shall come upon them, says Yahweh.2:4 Hear ye the word of Yahweh, O house of Jacob, and all the families of the house of Israel:2:5 thus says Yahweh, What unrighteousness have your fathers found in me, that they are gone far from me, and have walked after vanity, and are become vain?2:6 Neither said they, Where is Yahweh that brought us up out of the land of Egypt, that led us through the wilderness, through a land of deserts and of pits, through a land of drought and of the shadow of death, through a land that none passed through, and where no man dwelt?2:7 And I brought you into a plentiful land, to eat the fruit thereof and the goodness thereof; but when ye entered, ye defiled my land, and made my heritage an abomination.2:8 The priests said not, Where is Yahweh?  and they that handle the law knew me not: the rulers also transgressed against me, and the prophets prophesied by Baal, and walked after things that do not profit.2:9 Wherefore I will yet contend with you, says Yahweh, and with your children's children will I contend.2:10 For pass over to the isles of Kittim, and see; and send to Kedar, and consider diligently; and see if there has been such a thing.2:11 Has a nation changed its gods, which yet are no gods?  but my people have changed their glory for that which does not profit.2:12 Be astonished, O ye heavens, at this, and be horribly afraid, be ye very desolate, says Yahweh.2:13 For my people have committed two evils: they have forsaken me, the fountain of living waters, and hewed them out cisterns, broken cisterns, that can hold no water.2:14 Is Israel a servant?  is he a home-born slave?  why is he become a prey?2:15 The young lions have roared upon him, and yelled; and they have made his land waste: his cities are burned up, without inhabitant.2:16 The children also of Memphis and Tahpanhes have broken the crown of your head.2:17 Have you not procured this to yourself, in that you have forsaken Yahweh your God, when he led you by the way?2:18 And now what have you to do in the way to Egypt, to drink the waters of the Shihor?  or what have you to do in the way to Assyria, to drink the waters of the River?2:19 Your own wickedness shall correct you, and your backslidings shall reprove you: know therefore and see that it is an evil thing and a bitter, that you have forsaken Yahweh your God, and that my fear is not in you, says the Lord, Yahweh of hosts.2:20 For of old time I have broken your yoke, and burst your bonds; and you said, I will not serve; for upon every high hill and under every green tree you did bow yourself, playing the harlot.2:21 Yet I had planted you a noble vine, wholly a right seed: how then are you turned into the degenerate branches of a foreign vine to me?2:22 For though you wash you with lye, and take you much soap, yet your iniquity is marked before me, says the Lord Yahweh.2:23 How can you say, I am not defiled, I have not gone after the Baalim?  see your way in the valley, know what you have done: you are a swift dromedary traversing her ways;2:24 a wild donkey used to the wilderness, that snuffs up the wind in her desire; in her occasion who can turn her away?  all they that seek her will not weary themselves; in her month they shall find her.2:25 Withhold your foot from being unshod, and your throat from thirst: but you said, It is in vain; no, for I have loved strangers, and after them will I go.2:26 As the thief is ashamed when he is found, so is the house of Israel ashamed; they, their kings, their princes, and their priests, and their prophets;2:27 who say to a stock, You are my father; and to a stone, You have brought me forth: for they have turned their back to me, and not their face; but in the time of their trouble they will say, arise, and save us.2:28 But where are your gods that you have made you?  let them arise, if they can save you in the time of your trouble: for according to the number of your cities are your gods, O Judah.2:29 Why will ye contend with me?  ye all have transgressed against me, says Yahweh.2:30 In vain have I smitten your children; they received no correction: your own sword has devoured your prophets, like a destroying lion.2:31 O generation, see ye the word of Yahweh.  Have I been a wilderness to Israel?  or a land of thick darkness?  why say my people, We are broken loose; we will come no more to you?2:32 Can a virgin forget her ornaments, or a bride her attire?  yet my people have forgotten me days without number.2:33 How trim you your way to seek love! therefore even the wicked women you have taught your ways.2:34 Also in your skirts is found the blood of the souls of the innocent poor: you did not find them breaking in; but it is because of all these things.2:35 Yet you said, I am innocent; surely his anger is turned away from me.  Behold, I will enter into judgment with you, because you say, I have not sinned.2:36 Why gad you about so much to change your way?  you shall be ashamed of Egypt also, as you were ashamed of Assyria.2:37 From there also shall you go forth, with your hands upon your head: for Yahweh has rejected those in whom you trust, and you shall not prosper with them.3:1 They say, If a man put away his wife, and she go from him, and become another man's, will he return to her again?  will not that land be greatly polluted?  But you have played the harlot with many lovers; yet return again to me, says Yahweh.3:2 Lift up your eyes to the bare heights, and see; where have you not been lain with?  By the ways have you sat for them, as an Arabian in the wilderness; and you have polluted the land with your whoredoms and with your wickedness.3:3 Therefore the showers have been withholden, and there has been no latter rain; yet you have a harlot's forehead, you refused to be ashamed.3:4 Will you not from this time cry to me, My Father, you are the guide of my youth?3:5 Will he retain his anger for ever?  will he keep it to the end?  Behold, you have spoken and have done evil things, and have had your way.3:6 Moreover Yahweh said to me in the days of Josiah the king, Have you seen that which backsliding Israel has done?  she is gone up upon every high mountain and under every green tree, and there has played the harlot.3:7 And I said after she had done all these things, She will return to me; but she returned not: and her treacherous sister Judah saw it.3:8 And I saw, when, for this very cause that backsliding Israel had committed adultery, I had put her away and given her a bill of divorcement, yet treacherous Judah her sister feared not; but she also went and played the harlot.3:9 And it came to pass through the lightness of her whoredom, that the land was polluted, and she committed adultery with stones and with stocks.3:10 And yet for all this her treacherous sister Judah has not returned to me with her whole heart, but feignedly, says Yahweh.3:11 And Yahweh said to me, Backsliding Israel has shown herself more righteous than treacherous Judah.3:12 Go, and proclaim these words toward the north, and say, Return, you backsliding Israel, says Yahweh; I will not look in anger upon you; for I am merciful, says Yahweh, I will not keep anger for ever.3:13 Only acknowledge your iniquity, that you have transgressed against Yahweh your God, and have scattered your ways to the strangers under every green tree, and ye have not obeyed my voice, says Yahweh.3:14 Return, O backsliding children, says Yahweh; for I am a husband to you: and I will take you one of a city, and two of a family, and I will bring you to Zion:3:15 and I will give you shepherds according to my heart, who shall feed you with knowledge and understanding.3:16 And it shall come to pass, when ye are multiplied and increased in the land, in those days, says Yahweh, they shall say no more, The ark of the covenant of Yahweh; neither shall it come to mind; neither shall they remember it; neither shall they miss it; neither shall it be made any more.3:17 At that time they shall call Jerusalem the throne of Yahweh; and all the nations shall be gathered to it, to the name of Yahweh, to Jerusalem: neither shall they walk any more after the stubbornness of their evil heart.3:18 In those days the house of Judah shall walk with the house of Israel, and they shall come together out of the land of the north to the land that I gave for an inheritance to your fathers.3:19 But I said, How I will put you among the children, and give you a pleasant land, a goodly heritage of the hosts of the nations! and I said, You shall call me My Father, and shall not turn away from following me.3:20 Surely as a wife treacherously departs from her husband, so have ye dealt treacherously with me, O house of Israel, says Yahweh.3:21 A voice is heard upon the bare heights, the weeping and the supplications of the children of Israel; because they have perverted their way, they have forgotten Yahweh their God.3:22 Return, ye backsliding children, I will heal your backslidings.  Behold, we are come to you; for you are Yahweh our God.3:23 Truly in vain is the help that is looked for from the hills, the tumult on the mountains: truly in Yahweh our God is the salvation of Israel.3:24 But the shameful thing has devoured the labor of our fathers from our youth, their flocks and their herds, their sons and their daughters.3:25 Let us lie down in our shame, and let our confusion cover us; for we have sinned against Yahweh our God, we and our fathers, from our youth even to this day; and we have not obeyed the voice of Yahweh our God.4:1 If you will return, O Israel, says Yahweh, if you will return to me, and if you will put away your abominations out of my sight; then shall you not be removed;4:2 and you shall swear, as Yahweh lives, in truth, in justice, and in righteousness; and the nations shall bless themselves in him, and in him shall they glory.4:3 For thus says Yahweh to the men of Judah and to Jerusalem, Break up your fallow ground, and sow not among thorns.4:4 Circumcise yourselves to Yahweh, and take away the foreskins of your heart, ye men of Judah and inhabitants of Jerusalem; lest my wrath go forth like fire, and burn so that none can quench it, because of the evil of your doings.4:5 Declare ye in Judah, and publish in Jerusalem; and say, Blow ye the trumpet in the land: cry aloud and say, assemble yourselves, and let us go into the fortified cities.4:6 Set up a standard toward Zion: flee for safety, stay not; for I will bring evil from the north, and a great destruction.4:7 A lion is gone up from his thicket, and a destroyer of nations; he is on his way, he is gone forth from his place, to make your land desolate, that your cities be laid waste, without inhabitant.4:8 For this gird you with sackcloth, lament and wail; for the fierce anger of Yahweh is not turned back from us.4:9 And it shall come to pass at that day, says Yahweh, that the heart of the king shall perish, and the heart of the princes; and the priests shall be astonished, and the prophets shall wonder.4:10 Then said I, ah, Lord Yahweh! surely you have greatly deceived this people and Jerusalem, saying, You shall have peace; whereas the sword reaches to the life.4:11 At that time shall it be said to this people and to Jerusalem, a hot wind from the bare heights in the wilderness toward the daughter of my people, not to winnow, nor to cleanse;4:12 a full wind from these shall come for me: now will I also utter judgments against them.4:13 Behold, he shall come up as clouds, and his chariots shall be as the whirlwind: his horses are swifter than eagles.  Woe to us! for we are ruined.4:14 O Jerusalem, wash your heart from wickedness, that you may be saved.  How long shall your evil thoughts lodge within you?4:15 For a voice declares from Dan, and publishes evil from the hills of Ephraim:4:16 make ye mention to the nations; behold, publish against Jerusalem, that watchers come from a far country, and give out their voice against the cities of Judah.4:17 As keepers of a field are they against her round about, because she has been rebellious against me, says Yahweh.4:18 Your way and your doings have procured these things to you; this is your wickedness; for it is bitter, for it reaches to your heart.4:19 My anguish, my anguish! I am pained at my very heart; my heart is disquieted in me; I cannot hold my peace; because you have heard, O my soul, the sound of the trumpet, the alarm of war.4:20 Destruction upon destruction is cried; for the whole land is laid waste: suddenly are my tents destroyed, and my curtains in a moment.4:21 How long shall I see the standard, and hear the sound of the trumpet?4:22 For my people are foolish, they know me not; they are sottish children, and they have no understanding; they are wise to do evil, but to do good they have no knowledge.4:23 I beheld the earth, and, lo, it was waste and void; and the heavens, and they had no light.4:24 I beheld the mountains, and, lo, they trembled, and all the hills moved to and fro.4:25 I beheld, and, lo, there was no man, and all the birds of the heavens were fled.4:26 I beheld, and, lo, the fruitful field was a wilderness, and all the cities thereof were broken down at the presence of Yahweh, and before his fierce anger.4:27 For thus says Yahweh, The whole land shall be a desolation; yet will I not make a full end.4:28 For this shall the earth mourn, and the heavens above be black; because I have spoken it, I have purposed it, and I have not repented, neither will I turn back from it.4:29 Every city flees for the noise of the horsemen and bowmen; they go into the thickets, and climb up upon the rocks: every city is forsaken, and not a man dwells therein.4:30 And you, when you are made desolate, what will you do?  Though you clothe yourself with scarlet, though you deck you with ornaments of gold, though you enlarge your eyes with paint, in vain do you make yourself fair; your lovers despise you, they seek your life.4:31 For I have heard a voice as of a woman in travail, the anguish as of her that brings forth her first child, the voice of the daughter of Zion, that gasps for breath, that spreads her hands, saying, Woe is me now! for my soul faints before the murderers.5:1 Run ye to and fro through the streets of Jerusalem, and see now, and know, and seek in the broad places thereof, if ye can find a man, if there be any that does justly, that seeks truth; and I will pardon her.5:2 And though they say, as Yahweh lives; surely they swear falsely.5:3 O Yahweh, do not your eyes look upon truth?  you have stricken them, but they were not grieved; you have consumed them, but they have refused to receive correction: they have made their faces harder than a rock; they have refused to return.5:4 Then I said, Surely these are poor; they are foolish; for they know not the way of Yahweh, nor the law of their God:5:5 I will get me to the great men, and will speak to them; for they know the way of Yahweh, and the law of their God.  But these with one accord have broken the yoke, and burst the bonds.5:6 Wherefore a lion out of the forest shall slay them, a wolf of the evenings shall destroy them, a leopard shall watch against their cities; every one that goes out there shall be torn in pieces; because their transgressions are many, and their backslidings are increased.5:7 How can I pardon you?  your children have forsaken me, and sworn by them that are no gods: when I had fed them to the full, they committed adultery, and assembled themselves in troops at the harlots' houses.5:8 They were as fed horses roaming at large; every one neighed after his neighbor's wife.5:9 Shall I not visit for these things?  says Yahweh; and shall not my soul be avenged on such a nation as this?5:10 Go ye up upon her walls, and destroy; but make not a full end: take away her branches; for they are not Yahweh's.5:11 For the house of Israel and the house of Judah have dealt very treacherously against me, says Yahweh.5:12 They have denied Yahweh, and said, It is not he; neither shall evil come upon us; neither shall we see sword nor famine:5:13 and the prophets shall become wind, and the word is not in them: thus shall it be done to them.5:14 Wherefore thus says Yahweh, the God of hosts, Because ye speak this word, behold, I will make my words in your mouth fire, and this people wood, and it shall devour them.5:15 Lo, I will bring a nation upon you from far, O house of Israel, says Yahweh: it is a mighty nation, it is an ancient nation, a nation whose language you know not, neither understand what they say.5:16 Their quiver is an open sepulchre, they are all mighty men.5:17 And they shall eat up your harvest, and your bread, which your sons and your daughters should eat; they shall eat up your flocks and your herds; they shall eat up your vines and your fig-trees; they shall beat down your fortified cities, in which you trust, with the sword.5:18 But even in those days, says Yahweh, I will not make a full end with you.5:19 And it shall come to pass, when ye shall say, Why has Yahweh our God done all these things to us?  then shall you say to them, Like as ye have forsaken me, and served foreign gods in your land, so shall ye serve strangers in a land that is not yours.5:20 Declare ye this in the house of Jacob, and publish it in Judah, saying,5:21 Hear now this, O foolish people, and without understanding; that have eyes, and see not; that have ears, and hear not:5:22 Fear ye not me?  says Yahweh: will ye not tremble at my presence, who have placed the sand for the bound of the sea, by a perpetual decree, that it cannot pass it?  and though the waves thereof toss themselves, yet can they not prevail; though they roar, yet can they not pass over it.5:23 But this people has a revolting and a rebellious heart; they are revolted and gone.5:24 Neither say they in their heart, Let us now fear Yahweh our God, that gives rain, both the former and the latter, in its season; that preserves to us the appointed weeks of the harvest.5:25 Your iniquities have turned away these things, and your sins have withholden good from you.5:26 For among my people are found wicked men: they watch, as fowlers lie in wait; they set a trap, they catch men.5:27 As a cage is full of birds, so are their houses full of deceit: therefore they are become great, and grown rich.5:28 They are become fat, they shine: yes, they overpass in deeds of wickedness; they plead not the cause, the cause of the fatherless, that they may prosper; and the right of the needy do they not judge.5:29 Shall I not visit for these things?  says Yahweh; shall not my soul be avenged on such a nation as this?5:30 A wonderful and horrible thing is come to pass in the land:5:31 the prophets prophesy falsely, and the priests bear rule by their means; and my people love to have it so: and what will ye do in the end thereof?6:1 Flee for safety, ye children of Benjamin, out of the midst of Jerusalem, and blow the trumpet in Tekoa, and raise up a signal on Beth-haccherem; for evil looks forth from the north, and a great destruction.6:2 The comely and delicate one, the daughter of Zion, will I cut off.6:3 Shepherds with their flocks shall come to her; they shall pitch their tents against her round about; they shall feed every one in his place.6:4 Prepare ye war against her; arise, and let us go up at noon.  Woe to us! for the day declines, for the shadows of the evening are stretched out.6:5 Arise, and let us go up by night, and let us destroy her palaces.6:6 For thus has Yahweh of hosts said, Hew ye down trees, and cast up a mound against Jerusalem: this is the city to be visited; she is wholly oppression in the midst of her.6:7 As a well casts forth its waters, so she casts forth her wickedness: violence and destruction is heard in her; before me continually is sickness and wounds.6:8 Be you instructed, O Jerusalem, lest my soul be alienated from you; lest I make you a desolation, a land not inhabited.6:9 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, They shall thoroughly glean the remnant of Israel as a vine: turn again your hand as a grape-gatherer into the baskets.6:10 To whom shall I speak and testify, that they may hear?  behold, their ear is uncircumcised, and they cannot hearken: behold, the word of Yahweh is become to them a reproach; they have no delight in it.6:11 Therefore I am full of the wrath of Yahweh; I am weary with holding in: pour it out upon the children in the street, and upon the assembly of young men together; for even the husband with the wife shall be taken, the aged with him that is full of days.6:12 And their houses shall be turned to others, their fields and their wives together; for I will stretch out my hand upon the inhabitants of the land, says Yahweh.6:13 For from the least of them even to the greatest of them every one is given to covetousness; and from the prophet even to the priest every one deals falsely.6:14 They have healed also the hurt of my people slightly, saying, Peace, peace; when there is no peace.6:15 Were they ashamed when they had committed abomination?  nay, they were not at all ashamed, neither could they blush: therefore they shall fall among them that fall; at the time that I visit them they shall be cast down, says Yahweh.6:16 Thus says Yahweh, Stand ye in the ways and see, and ask for the old paths, where the good way is; and walk therein, and ye shall find rest for your souls: but they said, We will not walk therein.6:17 And I set watchmen over you, saying, Hearken to the sound of the trumpet; but they said, We will not hearken.6:18 Therefore hear, ye nations, and know, O congregation, what is among them.6:19 Hear, O earth: behold, I will bring evil upon this people, even the fruit of their thoughts, because they have not hearkened to my words; and as for my law, they have rejected it.6:20 To what purpose comes there to me frankincense from Sheba, and the sweet cane from a far country?  your burnt offerings are not acceptable, nor your sacrifices pleasing to me.6:21 Therefore thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will lay stumbling-blocks before this people; and the fathers and the sons together shall stumble against them; the neighbor and his friend shall perish.6:22 Thus says Yahweh, Behold, a people comes from the north country; and a great nation shall be stirred up from the uttermost parts of the earth.6:23 They lay hold on bow and spear; they are cruel, and have no mercy; their voice roars like the sea, and they ride upon horses, every one set in array, as a man to the battle, against you, O daughter of Zion.6:24 We have heard the report thereof; our hands grow feeble: anguish has taken hold of us, and pangs as of a woman in travail.6:25 Go not forth into the field, nor walk by the way; for the sword of the enemy, and terror, are on every side.6:26 O daughter of my people, gird you with sackcloth, and wallow yourself in ashes: make you mourning, as for an only son, most bitter lamentation; for the destroyer shall suddenly come upon us.6:27 I have made you a trier and a fortress among my people; that you may know and try their way.6:28 They are all grievous revolters, going about with slanders; they are brass and iron: they all of them deal corruptly.6:29 The bellows blow fiercely; the lead is consumed by the fire: in vain do they go on refining; for the wicked are not plucked away.6:30 Refuse silver shall men call them, because Yahweh has rejected them.7:1 The word that came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, saying,7:2 Stand in the gate of Yahweh's house, and proclaim there this word, and say, Hear the word of Yahweh, all ye of Judah, that enter in at these gates to worship Yahweh.7:3 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, amend your ways and your doings, and I will cause you to dwell in this place.7:4 Trust not in lying words, saying, The temple of Yahweh, the temple of Yahweh, the temple of Yahweh, are these.7:5 For if ye thoroughly amend your ways and your doings; if ye thoroughly execute justice a man with his neighbor;7:6 if ye oppress not the sojourner, the fatherless, and the widow, and shed not innocent blood in this place, neither walk after other gods to your own hurt:7:7 then will I cause you to dwell in this place, in the land that I gave to your fathers, from of old even for evermore.7:8 Behold, ye trust in lying words, that cannot profit.7:9 Will ye steal, murder, and commit adultery, and swear falsely, and burn incense to Baal, and walk after other gods that ye have not known,7:10 and come and stand before me in this house, which is called by my name, and say, We are delivered; that ye may do all these abominations?7:11 Is this house, which is called by my name, become a den of robbers in your eyes?  Behold, I, even I, have seen it, says Yahweh.7:12 But go ye now to my place which was in Shiloh, where I caused my name to dwell at the first, and see what I did to it for the wickedness of my people Israel.7:13 And now, because ye have done all these works, says Yahweh, and I spoke to you, rising up early and speaking, but ye heard not; and I called you, but ye answered not:7:14 therefore will I do to the house which is called by my name, in which ye trust, and to the place which I gave to you and to your fathers, as I did to Shiloh.7:15 And I will cast you out of my sight, as I have cast out all your brethren, even the whole seed of Ephraim.7:16 Therefore pray not you for this people, neither lift up cry nor prayer for them, neither make intercession to me; for I will not hear you.7:17 See you not what they do in the cities of Judah and in the streets of Jerusalem?7:18 The children gather wood, and the fathers kindle the fire, and the women knead the dough, to make cakes to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings to other gods, that they may provoke me to anger.7:19 Do they provoke me to anger?  says Yahweh; do they not provoke themselves, to the confusion of their own faces?7:20 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, my anger and my wrath shall be poured out upon this place, upon man, and upon beast, and upon the trees of the field, and upon the fruit of the ground; and it shall burn, and shall not be quenched.7:21 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Add your burnt offerings to your sacrifices, and eat ye flesh.7:22 For I spoke not to your fathers, nor commanded them in the day that I brought them out of the land of Egypt, concerning burnt offerings or sacrifices:7:23 but this thing I commanded them, saying, Hearken to my voice, and I will be your God, and ye shall be my people; and walk ye in all the way that I command you, that it may be well with you.7:24 But they hearkened not, nor inclined their ear, but walked in their own counsels and in the stubbornness of their evil heart, and went backward, and not forward.7:25 Since the day that your fathers came forth out of the land of Egypt to this day, I have sent to you all my servants the prophets, daily rising up early and sending them:7:26 yet they hearkened not to me, nor inclined their ear, but made their neck stiff: they did worse than their fathers.7:27 And you shall speak all these words to them; but they will not hearken to you: you shall also call to them; but they will not answer you.7:28 And you shall say to them, This is the nation that has not hearkened to the voice of Yahweh their God, nor received instruction: truth is perished, and is cut off from their mouth.7:29 Cut off your hair, O Jerusalem, and cast it away, and take up a lamentation on the bare heights; for Yahweh has rejected and forsaken the generation of his wrath.7:30 For the children of Judah have done that which is evil in my sight, says Yahweh: they have set their abominations in the house which is called by my name, to defile it.7:31 And they have built the high places of Topheth, which is in the valley of the son of Hinnom, to burn their sons and their daughters in the fire; which I commanded not, neither came it into my mind.7:32 Therefore, behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that it shall no more be called Topheth, nor The valley of the son of Hinnom, but The valley of Slaughter: for they shall bury in Topheth, till there be no place to bury.7:33 And the dead bodies of this people shall be food for the birds of the heavens, and for the beasts of the earth; and none shall frighten them away.7:34 Then will I cause to cease from the cities of Judah, and from the streets of Jerusalem, the voice of mirth and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom and the voice of the bride; for the land shall become a waste.8:1 At that time, says Yahweh, they shall bring out the bones of the kings of Judah, and the bones of his princes, and the bones of the priests, and the bones of the prophets, and the bones of the inhabitants of Jerusalem, out of their graves;8:2 and they shall spread them before the sun, and the moon, and all the host of heaven, which they have loved, and which they have served, and after which they have walked, and which they have sought, and which they have worshipped: they shall not be gathered, nor be buried, they shall be for dung upon the face of the earth.8:3 And death shall be chosen rather than life by all the residue that remain of this evil family, that remain in all the places whither I have driven them, says Yahweh of hosts.8:4 Moreover you shall say to them, Thus says Yahweh: Shall men fall, and not rise up again?  Shall one turn away, and not return?8:5 Why then is this people of Jerusalem slidden back by a perpetual backsliding?  they hold fast deceit, they refuse to return.8:6 I hearkened and heard, but they spoke not aright: no man repents him of his wickedness, saying, What have I done?  every one turns to his course, as a horse that rushes headlong in the battle.8:7 Yes, the stork in the heavens knows her appointed times; and the turtle-dove and the swallow and the crane observe the time of their coming; but my people know not the law of Yahweh.8:8 How do ye say, We are wise, and the law of Yahweh is with us?  But, behold, the false pen of the scribes has wrought falsely.8:9 The wise men are put to shame, they are dismayed and taken: lo, they have rejected the word of Yahweh; and what manner of wisdom is in them?8:10 Therefore will I give their wives to others, and their fields to them that shall possess them: for every one from the least even to the greatest is given to covetousness; from the prophet even to the priest every one deals falsely.8:11 And they have healed the hurt of the daughter of my people slightly, saying, Peace, peace; when there is no peace.8:12 Were they ashamed when they had committed abomination?  nay, they were not at all ashamed, neither could they blush: therefore shall they fall among them that fall; in the time of their visitation they shall be cast down, says Yahweh.8:13 I will utterly consume them, says Yahweh: there shall be no grapes on the vine, nor figs on the fig-tree, and the leaf shall fade; and the things that I have given them shall pass away from them.8:14 Why do we sit still?  assemble yourselves, and let us enter into the fortified cities, and let us be silent there; for Yahweh our God has put us to silence, and given us water of gall to drink, because we have sinned against Yahweh.8:15 We looked for peace, but no good came; and for a time of healing, and, behold, dismay!8:16 The snorting of his horses is heard from Dan: at the sound of the neighing of his strong ones the whole land trembles; for they are come, and have devoured the land and all that is in it; the city and those that dwell therein.8:17 For, behold, I will send serpents, adders, among you, which will not be charmed; and they shall bite you, says Yahweh.8:18 Oh that I could comfort myself against sorrow! my heart is faint within me.8:19 Behold, the voice of the cry of the daughter of my people from a land that is very far off: is not Yahweh in Zion?  is not her King in her?  Why have they provoked me to anger with their graven images, and with foreign vanities?8:20 The harvest is past, the summer is ended, and we are not saved.8:21 For the hurt of the daughter of my people am I hurt: I mourn; dismay has taken hold on me.8:22 Is there no balm in Gilead?  is there no physician there?  why then is not the health of the daughter of my people recovered?9:1 Oh that my head were waters, and my eyes a fountain of tears, that I might weep day and night for the slain of the daughter of my people!9:2 Oh that I had in the wilderness a lodging-place of wayfaring men; that I might leave my people, and go from them! for they are all adulterers, an assembly of treacherous men.9:3 And they bend their tongue, as it were their bow, for falsehood; and they are grown strong in the land, but not for truth: for they proceed from evil to evil, and they know not me, says Yahweh.9:4 Take ye heed every one of his neighbor, and trust ye not in any brother; for every brother will utterly supplant, and every neighbor will go about with slanders.9:5 And they will deceive every one his neighbor, and will not speak the truth: they have taught their tongue to speak lies; they weary themselves to commit iniquity.9:6 Your habitation is in the midst of deceit; through deceit they refuse to know me, says Yahweh.9:7 Therefore thus says Yahweh of hosts, Behold, I will melt them, and try them; for how else should I do, because of the daughter of my people?9:8 Their tongue is a deadly arrow; it speaks deceit: one speaks peaceably to his neighbor with his mouth, but in his heart he lays wait for him.9:9 Shall I not visit them for these things?  says Yahweh; shall not my soul be avenged on such a nation as this?9:10 For the mountains will I take up a weeping and wailing, and for the pastures of the wilderness a lamentation, because they are burned up, so that none passes through; neither can men hear the voice of the cattle; both the birds of the heavens and the beasts are fled, they are gone.9:11 And I will make Jerusalem heaps, a dwelling-place of jackals; and I will make the cities of Judah a desolation, without inhabitant.9:12 Who is the wise man, that may understand this?  and who is he to whom the mouth of Yahweh has spoken, that he may declare it?  why is the land perished and burned up like a wilderness, so that none passes through?9:13 And Yahweh says, Because they have forsaken my law which I set before them, and have not obeyed my voice, neither walked therein,9:14 but have walked after the stubbornness of their own heart, and after the Baalim, which their fathers taught them;9:15 therefore thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, Behold, I will feed them, even this people, with wormwood, and give them water of gall to drink.9:16 I will scatter them also among the nations, whom neither they nor their fathers have known; and I will send the sword after them, till I have consumed them.9:17 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, Consider ye, and call for the mourning women, that they may come; and send for the skilful women, that they may come:9:18 and let them make haste, and take up a wailing for us, that our eyes may run down with tears, and our eyelids gush out with waters.9:19 For a voice of wailing is heard out of Zion, How are we ruined! we are greatly confounded, because we have forsaken the land, because they have cast down our dwellings.9:20 Yet hear the word of Yahweh, O ye women, and let your ear receive the word of his mouth; and teach your daughters wailing, and every one her neighbor lamentation.9:21 For death is come up into our windows, it is entered into our palaces; to cut off the children from without, and the young men from the streets.9:22 Speak, Thus says Yahweh, The dead bodies of men shall fall as dung upon the open field, and as the handful after the harvestman; and none shall gather them.9:23 Thus says Yahweh, Let not the wise man glory in his wisdom, neither let the mighty man glory in his might, let not the rich man glory in his riches;9:24 but let him that glories glory in this, that he has understanding, and knows me, that I am Yahweh who exercises lovingkindness, justice, and righteousness, in the earth: for in these things I delight, says Yahweh.9:25 Behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that I will punish all them that are circumcised in their uncircumcision:9:26 Egypt, and Judah, and Edom, and the children of Ammon, and Moab, and all that have the corners of their hair cut off, that dwell in the wilderness; for all the nations are uncircumcised, and all the house of Israel are uncircumcised in heart.10:1 Hear ye the word which Yahweh speaks to you, O house of Israel:10:2 thus says Yahweh, Learn not the way of the nations, and be not dismayed at the signs of heaven; for the nations are dismayed at them.10:3 For the customs of the peoples are vanity; for one cuts a tree out of the forest, the work of the hands of the workman with the axe.10:4 They deck it with silver and with gold; they fasten it with nails and with hammers, that it move not.10:5 They are like a palm-tree, of turned work, and speak not: they must be carried around, because they cannot walk.  Be not afraid of them; for they cannot do evil, neither is it in them to do good.10:6 There is none like to you, O Yahweh; you are great, and your name is great in might.10:7 Who should not fear you, O King of the nations?  for to you does it appertain; forasmuch as among all the wise men of the nations, and in all their royal estate, there is none like to you.10:8 But they are together brutish and foolish: the instruction of idols! it is but a stock.10:9 There is silver beaten into plates, which is brought from Tarshish, and gold from Uphaz, the work of the artificer and of the hands of the goldsmith; blue and purple for their clothing; they are all the work of skilful men.10:10 But Yahweh is the true God; he is the living God, and an everlasting King: at his wrath the earth trembles, and the nations are not able to abide his indignation.10:11 Thus shall ye say to them, The gods that have not made the heavens and the earth, these shall perish from the earth, and from under the heavens.10:12 He has made the earth by his power, he has established the world by his wisdom, and by his understanding has he stretched out the heavens:10:13 when he utters his voice, there is a tumult of waters in the heavens, and he causes the vapors to ascend from the ends of the earth; he makes lightnings for the rain, and brings forth the wind out of his treasuries.10:14 Every man is become brutish and is without knowledge; every goldsmith is put to shame by his graven image; for his molten image is falsehood, and there is no breath in them.10:15 They are vanity, a work of delusion: in the time of their visitation they shall perish.10:16 The portion of Jacob is not like these; for he is the former of all things; and Israel is the tribe of his inheritance: Yahweh of hosts is his name.10:17 Gather up your wares out of the land, O you that abide in the siege.10:18 For thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will sling out the inhabitants of the land at this time, and will distress them, that they may feel it.10:19 Woe is me because of my hurt! my wound is grievous: but I said, Truly this is my grief, and I must bear it.10:20 My tent is destroyed, and all my cords are broken: my children are gone forth from me, and they are not: there is none to spread my tent any more, and to set up my curtains.10:21 For the shepherds are become brutish, and have not inquired of Yahweh: therefore they have not prospered, and all their flocks are scattered.10:22 The voice of tidings, behold, it comes, and a great commotion out of the north country, to make the cities of Judah a desolation, a dwelling-place of jackals.10:23 O Yahweh, I know that the way of man is not in himself: it is not in man that walks to direct his steps.10:24 O Yahweh, correct me, but in measure: not in your anger, lest you bring me to nothing.10:25 Pour out your wrath upon the nations that know you not, and upon the families that call not on your name: for they have devoured Jacob, yes, they have devoured him and consumed him, and have laid waste his habitation.11:1 The word that came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, saying,11:2 Hear ye the words of this covenant, and speak to the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem;11:3 and say you to them, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel: Cursed be the man that hears not the words of this covenant,11:4 which I commanded your fathers in the day that I brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, out of the iron furnace, saying, Obey my voice, and do them, according to all which I command you: so shall ye be my people, and I will be your God;11:5 that I may establish the oath which I swore to your fathers, to give them a land flowing with milk and honey, as at this day.  Then answered I, and said, amen, O Yahweh.11:6 And Yahweh said to me, Proclaim all these words in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, saying, Hear ye the words of this covenant, and do them.11:7 For I earnestly protested to your fathers in the day that I brought them up out of the land of Egypt, even to this day, rising early and protesting, saying, Obey my voice.11:8 Yet they obeyed not, nor inclined their ear, but walked every one in the stubbornness of their evil heart: therefore I brought upon them all the words of this covenant, which I commanded them to do, but they did them not.11:9 And Yahweh said to me, a conspiracy is found among the men of Judah, and among the inhabitants of Jerusalem.11:10 They are turned back to the iniquities of their forefathers, who refused to hear my words; and they are gone after other gods to serve them: the house of Israel and the house of Judah have broken my covenant which I made with their fathers.11:11 Therefore thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will bring evil upon them, which they shall not be able to escape; and they shall cry to me, but I will not hearken to them.11:12 Then shall the cities of Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem go and cry to the gods to which they offer incense: but they will not save them at all in the time of their trouble.11:13 For according to the number of your cities are your gods, O Judah; and according to the number of the streets of Jerusalem have ye set up altars to the shameful thing, even altars to burn incense to Baal.11:14 Therefore pray not you for this people, neither lift up cry nor prayer for them; for I will not hear them in the time that they cry to me because of their trouble.11:15 What has my beloved to do in my house, seeing she has wrought lewdness with many, and the holy flesh is passed from you?  when you do evil, then you rejoicest.11:16 Yahweh called your name, a green olive-tree, fair with goodly fruit: with the noise of a great tumult he has kindled fire upon it, and the branches of it are broken.11:17 For Yahweh of hosts, who planted you, has pronounced evil against you, because of the evil of the house of Israel and of the house of Judah, which they have wrought for themselves in provoking me to anger by offering incense to Baal.11:18 And Yahweh gave me knowledge of it, and I knew it: then you showed me their doings.11:19 But I was like a gentle lamb that is led to the slaughter; and I knew not that they had devised devices against me, saying, Let us destroy the tree with the fruit thereof, and let us cut him off from the land of the living, that his name may be no more remembered.11:20 But, O Yahweh of hosts, who judge righteously, who try the heart and the mind, I shall see your vengeance on them; for to you have I revealed my cause.11:21 Therefore thus says Yahweh concerning the men of Anathoth, that seek your life, saying, You shall not prophesy in the name of Yahweh, that you die not by our hand;11:22 therefore thus says Yahweh of hosts, Behold, I will punish them: the young men shall die by the sword; their sons and their daughters shall die by famine;11:23 and there shall be no remnant to them: for I will bring evil upon the men of Anathoth, even the year of their visitation.12:1 Righteous are you, O Yahweh, when I contend with you; yet would I reason the cause with you: why does the way of the wicked prosper?  why are all they at ease that deal very treacherously?12:2 You have planted them, yes, they have taken root; they grow, yes, they bring forth fruit: you are near in their mouth, and far from their heart.12:3 But you, O Yahweh, know me; you see me, and try my heart toward you: pull them out like sheep for the slaughter, and prepare them for the day of slaughter.12:4 How long shall the land mourn, and the herbs of the whole country wither?  for the wickedness of them that dwell therein, the beasts are consumed, and the birds; because they said, He shall not see our latter end.12:5 If you have run with the footmen, and they have wearied you, then how can you contend with horses?  and though in a land of peace you are secure, yet how will you do in the pride of the Jordan?12:6 For even your brethren, and the house of your father, even they have dealt treacherously with you; even they have cried aloud after you: believe them not, though they speak fair words to you.12:7 I have forsaken my house, I have cast off my heritage; I have given the dearly beloved of my soul into the hand of her enemies.12:8 My heritage is become to me as a lion in the forest: she has uttered her voice against me; therefore I have hated her.12:9 Is my heritage to me as a speckled bird of prey?  are the birds of prey against her round about?  go ye, assemble all the beasts of the field, bring them to devour.12:10 Many shepherds have destroyed my vineyard, they have trodden my portion under foot, they have made my pleasant portion a desolate wilderness.12:11 They have made it a desolation; it mourns to me, being desolate; the whole land is made desolate, because no man lays it to heart.12:12 Destroyers are come upon all the bare heights in the wilderness; for the sword of Yahweh devours from the one end of the land even to the other end of the land: no flesh has peace.12:13 They have sown wheat, and have reaped thorns; they have put themselves to pain, and profit nothing: and ye shall be ashamed of your fruits, because of the fierce anger of Yahweh.12:14 Thus says Yahweh against all my evil neighbors, that touch the inheritance which I have caused my people Israel to inherit: behold, I will pluck them up from off their land, and will pluck up the house of Judah from among them.12:15 And it shall come to pass, after that I have plucked them up, I will return and have compassion on them; and I will bring them again, every man to his heritage, and every man to his land.12:16 And it shall come to pass, if they will diligently learn the ways of my people, to swear by my name, as Yahweh lives; even as they taught my people to swear by Baal; then shall they be built up in the midst of my people.12:17 But if they will not hear, then will I pluck up that nation, plucking up and destroying it, says Yahweh.13:1 Thus says Yahweh to me, Go, and buy you a linen girdle, and put it upon your loins, and put it not in water.13:2 So I bought a girdle according to the word of Yahweh, and put it upon my loins.13:3 And the word of Yahweh came to me the second time, saying,13:4 Take the girdle that you have bought, which is upon your loins, and arise, go to the Euphrates, and hide it there in a cleft of the rock.13:5 So I went, and hid it by the Euphrates, as Yahweh commanded me.13:6 And it came to pass after many days, that Yahweh said to me, arise, go to the Euphrates, and take the girdle from there, which I commanded you to hide there.13:7 Then I went to the Euphrates, and dug, and took the girdle from the place where I had hid it; and, behold, the girdle was marred, it was profitable for nothing.13:8 Then the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,13:9 Thus says Yahweh, after this manner will I mar the pride of Judah, and the great pride of Jerusalem.13:10 This evil people, that refuse to hear my words, that walk in the stubbornness of their heart, and are gone after other gods to serve them, and to worship them, shall even be as this girdle, which is profitable for nothing.13:11 For as the girdle cleaves to the loins of a man, so have I caused to cleave to me the whole house of Israel and the whole house of Judah, says Yahweh; that they may be to me for a people, and for a name, and for a praise, and for a glory: but they would not hear.13:12 Therefore you shall speak to them this word: Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Every bottle shall be filled with wine: and they shall say to you, Do we not certainly know that every bottle shall be filled with wine?13:13 Then shall you say to them, Thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will fill all the inhabitants of this land, even the kings that sit upon David's throne, and the priests, and the prophets, and all the inhabitants of Jerusalem, with drunkenness.13:14 And I will dash them one against another, even the fathers and the sons together, says Yahweh: I will not pity, nor spare, nor have compassion, that I should not destroy them.13:15 Hear ye, and give ear; be not proud; for Yahweh has spoken.13:16 Give glory to Yahweh your God, before he cause darkness, and before your feet stumble upon the dark mountains, and, while ye look for light, he turn it into the shadow of death, and make it gross darkness.13:17 But if ye will not hear it, my soul shall weep in secret for your pride; and my eye shall weep sore, and run down with tears, because Yahweh's flock is taken captive.13:18 Say you to the king and to the queen-mother, Humble yourselves, sit down; for your headtires are come down, even the crown of your glory.13:19 The cities of the South are shut up, and there is none to open them: Judah is carried away captive, all of it; it is wholly carried away captive.13:20 Lift up your eyes, and behold them that come from the north: where is the flock that was given you, your beautiful flock?13:21 What will you say, when he shall set over you as head those whom you have yourself taught to be friends to you?  shall not sorrows take hold of you, as of a woman in travail?13:22 And if you say in your heart, Why are these things come upon me?  for the greatness of your iniquity are your skirts uncovered, and your heels suffer violence.13:23 Can the Ethiopian change his skin, or the leopard his spots?  then may ye also do good, that are accustomed to do evil.13:24 Therefore will I scatter them, as the stubble that passes away, by the wind of the wilderness.13:25 This is your lot, the portion measured to you from me, says Yahweh; because you have forgotten me, and trusted in falsehood.13:26 Therefore will I also uncover your skirts upon your face, and your shame shall appear.13:27 I have seen your abominations, even your adulteries, and your neighings, the lewdness of your whoredom, on the hills in the field.  Woe to you, O Jerusalem! you will not be made clean; how long shall it yet be?14:1 The word of Yahweh that came to Jeremiah concerning the drought.14:2 Judah mourns, and the gates thereof languish, they sit in black upon the ground; and the cry of Jerusalem is gone up.14:3 And their nobles send their little ones to the waters: they come to the cisterns, and find no water; they return with their vessels empty; they are put to shame and confounded, and cover their heads.14:4 Because of the ground which is cracked, for that no rain has been in the land, the plowmen are put to shame, they cover their heads.14:5 Yes, the hind also in the field calves, and forsakes her young, because there is no grass.14:6 And the wild asses stand on the bare heights, they pant for air like jackals; their eyes fail, because there is no herbage.14:7 Though our iniquities testify against us, work you for your name's sake, O Yahweh; for our backslidings are many; we have sinned against you.14:8 O you hope of Israel, the Saviour thereof in the time of trouble, why should you be as a sojourner in the land, and as a wayfaring man that turns aside to tarry for a night?14:9 Why should you be as a man affrighted, as a mighty man that cannot save?  yet you, O Yahweh, are in the midst of us, and we are called by your name; leave us not.14:10 Thus says Yahweh to this people, Even so have they loved to wander; they have not refrained their feet: therefore Yahweh does not accept them; now will he remember their iniquity, and visit their sins.14:11 And Yahweh said to me, Pray not for this people for their good.14:12 When they fast, I will not hear their cry; and when they offer burnt offering and meal offering, I will not accept them; but I will consume them by the sword, and by the famine, and by the pestilence.14:13 Then said I, ah, Lord Yahweh! behold, the prophets say to them, You shall not see the sword, neither shall ye have famine; but I will give you assured peace in this place.14:14 Then Yahweh said to me, The prophets prophesy lies in my name; I sent them not, neither have I commanded them, neither spoke I to them: they prophesy to you a lying vision, and divination, and a thing of nought, and the deceit of their own heart.14:15 Therefore thus says Yahweh concerning the prophets that prophesy in my name, and I sent them not, yet they say, Sword and famine shall not be in this land: By sword and famine shall those prophets be consumed.14:16 And the people to whom they prophesy shall be cast out in the streets of Jerusalem because of the famine and the sword; and they shall have none to bury them-them, their wives, nor their sons, nor their daughters: for I will pour their wickedness upon them.14:17 And you shall say this word to them, Let my eyes run down with tears night and day, and let them not cease; for the virgin daughter of my people is broken with a great breach, with a very grievous wound.14:18 If I go forth into the field, then, behold, the slain with the sword! and if I enter into the city, then, behold, they that are sick with famine! for both the prophet and the priest go about in the land, and have no knowledge.14:19 Have you utterly rejected Judah?  has your soul loathed Zion?  why have you smitten us, and there is no healing for us?  We looked for peace, but no good came; and for a time of healing, and, behold, dismay!14:20 We acknowledge, O Yahweh, our wickedness, and the iniquity of our fathers; for we have sinned against you.14:21 Do not abhor us, for your name's sake; do not disgrace the throne of your glory: remember, break not your covenant with us.14:22 Are there any among the vanities of the nations that can cause rain?  or can the heavens give showers?  are not you he, O Yahweh our God?  therefore we will wait for you; for you have made all these things.15:1 Then said Yahweh to me, Though Moses and Samuel stood before me, yet my mind would not be toward this people: cast them out of my sight, and let them go forth.15:2 And it shall come to pass, when they say to you, Whither shall we go forth?  then you shall tell them, Thus says Yahweh: Such as are for death, to death; and such as are for the sword, to the sword; and such as are for the famine, to the famine; and such as are for captivity, to captivity.15:3 And I will appoint over them four kinds, says Yahweh: the sword to slay, and the dogs to tear, and the birds of the heavens, and the beasts of the earth, to devour and to destroy.15:4 And I will cause them to be tossed to and fro among all the kingdoms of the earth, because of Manasseh, the son of Hezekiah, king of Judah, for that which he did in Jerusalem.15:5 For who will have pity upon you, O Jerusalem?  or who will bemoan you?  or who will turn aside to ask of your welfare?15:6 You have rejected me, says Yahweh, you are gone backward: therefore have I stretched out my hand against you, and destroyed you; I am weary with repenting.15:7 And I have winnowed them with a fan in the gates of the land; I have bereaved them of children, I have destroyed my people; they returned not from their ways.15:8 Their widows are increased to me above the sand of the seas; I have brought upon them against the mother of the young men a destroyer at noonday: I have caused anguish and terrors to fall upon her suddenly.15:9 She that has borne seven languishes; she has given up the ghost; her sun is gone down while it was yet day; she has been put to shame and confounded: and the residue of them will I deliver to the sword before their enemies, says Yahweh.15:10 Woe is me, my mother, that you have borne me a man of strife and a man of contention to the whole earth! I have not lent, neither have men lent to me; yet every one of them does curse me.15:11 Yahweh said, Verily I will strengthen you for good; verily I will cause the enemy to make supplication to you in the time of evil and in the time of affliction.15:12 Can one break iron, even iron from the north, and brass?15:13 Your substance and your treasures will I give for a spoil without price, and that for all your sins, even in all your borders.15:14 And I will make them to pass with your enemies into a land which you know not; for a fire is kindled in my anger, which shall burn upon you.15:15 O Yahweh, you know; remember me, and visit me, and avenge me of my persecutors; take me not away in your longsuffering: know that for your sake I have suffered reproach.15:16 Your words were found, and I did eat them; and your words were to me a joy and the rejoicing of my heart: for I am called by your name, O Yahweh, God of hosts.15:17 I sat not in the assembly of them that make merry, nor rejoiced; I sat alone because of your hand; for you have filled me with indignation.15:18 Why is my pain perpetual, and my wound incurable, which refuses to be healed?  will you indeed be to me as a deceitful brook, as waters that fail?15:19 Therefore thus says Yahweh, If you return, then will I bring you again, that you may stand before me; and if you take forth the precious from the vile, you shall be as my mouth: they shall return to you, but you shall not return to them.15:20 And I will make you to this people a fortified brazen wall; and they shall fight against you, but they shall not prevail against you; for I am with you to save you and to deliver you, says Yahweh.15:21 And I will deliver you out of the hand of the wicked, and I will redeem you out of the hand of the terrible.16:1 The word of Yahweh came also to me, saying,16:2 You shall not take you a wife, neither shall you have sons or daughters, in this place.16:3 For thus says Yahweh concerning the sons and concerning the daughters that are born in this place, and concerning their mothers that bore them, and concerning their fathers that begat them in this land:16:4 They shall die grievous deaths: they shall not be lamented, neither shall they be buried; they shall be as dung upon the face of the ground; and they shall be consumed by the sword, and by famine; and their dead bodies shall be food for the birds of the heavens, and for the beasts of the earth.16:5 For thus says Yahweh, Enter not into the house of mourning, neither go to lament, neither bemoan them; for I have taken away my peace from this people, says Yahweh, even lovingkindness and tender mercies.16:6 Both great and small shall die in this land; they shall not be buried, neither shall men lament for them, nor cut themselves, nor make themselves bald for them;16:7 neither shall men break bread for them in mourning, to comfort them for the dead; neither shall men give them the cup of consolation to drink for their father or for their mother.16:8 And you shall not go into the house of feasting to sit with them, to eat and to drink.16:9 For thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Behold, I will cause to cease out of this place, before your eyes and in your days, the voice of mirth and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom and the voice of the bride.16:10 And it shall come to pass, when you shall show this people all these words, and they shall say to you, Why has Yahweh pronounced all this great evil against us?  or what is our iniquity?  or what is our sin that we have committed against Yahweh our God?16:11 Then shall you say to them, Because your fathers have forsaken me, says Yahweh, and have walked after other gods, and have served them, and have worshipped them, and have forsaken me, and have not kept my law;16:12 and ye have done evil more than your fathers; for, behold, ye walk every one after the stubbornness of his evil heart, so that ye hearken not to me:16:13 therefore will I cast you forth out of this land into the land that ye have not known, neither ye nor your fathers; and there shall ye serve other gods day and night; for I will show you no favor.16:14 Therefore, behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that it shall no more be said, as Yahweh lives, that brought up the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt;16:15 but, as Yahweh lives, that brought up the children of Israel from the land of the north, and from all the countries whither he had driven them.  And I will bring them again into their land that I gave to their fathers.16:16 Behold, I will send for many fishers, says Yahweh, and they shall fish them up; and afterward I will send for many hunters, and they shall hunt them from every mountain, and from every hill, and out of the clefts of the rocks.16:17 For my eyes are upon all their ways; they are not hid from my face, neither is their iniquity concealed from my eyes.16:18 And first I will recompense their iniquity and their sin double, because they have polluted my land with the carcasses of their detestable things, and have filled my inheritance with their abominations.16:19 O Yahweh, my strength, and my stronghold, and my refuge in the day of affliction, to you shall the nations come from the ends of the earth, and shall say, Our fathers have inherited nought but lies, even vanity and things in which there is no profit.16:20 Shall a man make to himself gods, which yet are no gods?16:21 Therefore, behold, I will cause them to know, this once will I cause them to know my hand and my might; and they shall know that my name is Yahweh.17:1 The sin of Judah is written with a pen of iron, and with the point of a diamond: it is graven upon the tablet of their heart, and upon the horns of your altars;17:2 whilst their children remember their altars and their Asherim by the green trees upon the high hills.17:3 O my mountain in the field, I will give your substance and all your treasures for a spoil, and your high places, because of sin, throughout all your borders.17:4 And you, even of yourself, shall discontinue from your heritage that I gave you; and I will cause you to serve your enemies in the land which you know not: for ye have kindled a fire in my anger which shall burn for ever.17:5 Thus says Yahweh: Cursed is the man that trusts in man, and makes flesh his arm, and whose heart departs from Yahweh.17:6 For he shall be like the heath in the desert, and shall not see when good comes, but shall inhabit the parched places in the wilderness, a salt land and not inhabited.17:7 Blessed is the man that trusts in Yahweh, and whose trust Yahweh is.17:8 For he shall be as a tree planted by the waters, that spreads out its roots by the river, and shall not fear when heat comes, but its leaf shall be green; and shall not be careful in the year of drought, neither shall cease from yielding fruit.17:9 The heart is deceitful above all things, and it is exceedingly corrupt: who can know it?17:10 I, Yahweh, search the mind, I try the heart, even to give every man according to his ways, according to the fruit of his doings.17:11 As the partridge that sits on eggs which she has not laid, so is he that gets riches, and not by right; in the midst of his days they shall leave him, and at his end he shall be a fool.17:12 A glorious throne, set on high from the beginning, is the place of our sanctuary.17:13 O Yahweh, the hope of Israel, all that forsake you shall be put to shame.  They that depart from me shall be written in the earth, because they have forsaken Yahweh, the fountain of living waters.17:14 Heal me, O Yahweh, and I shall be healed; save me, and I shall be saved: for you are my praise.17:15 Behold, they say to me, Where is the word of Yahweh?  let it come now.17:16 As for me, I have not hastened from being a shepherd after you; neither have I desired the woeful day; you know: that which came out of my lips was before your face.17:17 Be not a terror to me: you are my refuge in the day of evil.17:18 Let them be put to shame that persecute me, but let not me be put to shame; let them be dismayed, but let not me be dismayed; bring upon them the day of evil, and destroy them with double destruction.17:19 Thus said Yahweh to me: Go, and stand in the gate of the children of the people, whereby the kings of Judah come in, and by which they go out, and in all the gates of Jerusalem;17:20 and say to them, Hear ye the word of Yahweh, ye kings of Judah, and all Judah, and all the inhabitants of Jerusalem, that enter in by these gates:17:21 Thus says Yahweh, Take heed to yourselves, and bear no burden on the sabbath day, nor bring it in by the gates of Jerusalem;17:22 neither carry forth a burden out of your houses on the sabbath day, neither do ye any work: but hallow ye the sabbath day, as I commanded your fathers.17:23 But they hearkened not, neither inclined their ear, but made their neck stiff, that they might not hear, and might not receive instruction.17:24 And it shall come to pass, if ye diligently hearken to me, says Yahweh, to bring in no burden through the gates of this city on the sabbath day, but to hallow the sabbath day, to do no work therein;17:25 then shall there enter in by the gates of this city kings and princes sitting upon the throne of David, riding in chariots and on horses, they, and their princes, the men of Judah, and the inhabitants of Jerusalem; and this city shall remain for ever.17:26 And they shall come from the cities of Judah, and from the places round about Jerusalem, and from the land of Benjamin, and from the lowland, and from the hill-country, and from the South, bringing burnt offerings, and sacrifices, and meal offerings, and frankincense, and bringing sacrifices of thanksgiving, to the house of Yahweh.17:27 But if ye will not hearken to me to hallow the sabbath day, and not to bear a burden and enter in at the gates of Jerusalem on the sabbath day; then will I kindle a fire in the gates thereof, and it shall devour the palaces of Jerusalem, and it shall not be quenched.18:1 The word which came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, saying,18:2 Arise, and go down to the potter's house, and there I will cause you to hear my words.18:3 Then I went down to the potter's house, and, behold, he was making a work on the wheels.18:4 And when the vessel that he made of the clay was marred in the hand of the potter, he made it again another vessel, as seemed good to the potter to make it.18:5 Then the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,18:6 O house of Israel, cannot I do with you as this potter?  says Yahweh.  Behold, as the clay in the potter's hand, so are ye in my hand, O house of Israel.18:7 At what instant I shall speak concerning a nation, and concerning a kingdom, to pluck up and to break down and to destroy it;18:8 if that nation, concerning which I have spoken, turn from their evil, I will repent of the evil that I thought to do to them.18:9 And at what instant I shall speak concerning a nation, and concerning a kingdom, to build and to plant it;18:10 if they do that which is evil in my sight, that they obey not my voice, then I will repent of the good, with which I said I would benefit them.18:11 Now therefore, speak to the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, saying, Thus says Yahweh: Behold, I frame evil against you, and devise a device against you: return ye now every one from his evil way, and amend your ways and your doings.18:12 But they say, It is in vain; for we will walk after our own devices, and we will do every one after the stubbornness of his evil heart.18:13 Therefore thus says Yahweh: Ask ye now among the nations, who has heard such things; the virgin of Israel has done a very horrible thing.18:14 Shall the snow of Lebanon fail from the rock of the field?  or shall the cold waters that flow down from afar be dried up?18:15 For my people have forgotten me, they have burned incense to false gods; and they have been made to stumble in their ways, in the ancient paths, to walk in bypaths, in a way not cast up;18:16 to make their land an astonishment, and a perpetual hissing; every one that passes thereby shall be astonished, and shake his head.18:17 I will scatter them as with an east wind before the enemy; I will show them the back, and not the face, in the day of their calamity.18:18 Then said they, Come, and let us devise devices against Jeremiah; for the law shall not perish from the priest, nor counsel from the wise, nor the word from the prophet.  Come, and let us smite him with the tongue, and let us not give heed to any of his words.18:19 Give heed to me, O Yahweh, and hearken to the voice of them that contend with me.18:20 Shall evil be recompensed for good?  for they have dug a pit for my soul.  Remember how I stood before you to speak good for them, to turn away your wrath from them.18:21 Therefore deliver up their children to the famine, and give them over to the power of the sword; and let their wives become childless, and widows; and let their men be slain of death, and their young men smitten of the sword in battle.18:22 Let a cry be heard from their houses, when you shall bring a troop suddenly upon them; for they have dug a pit to take me, and hid snares for my feet.18:23 Yet, Yahweh, you know all their counsel against me to slay me; forgive not their iniquity, neither blot out their sin from your sight; but let them be overthrown before you; deal you with them in the time of your anger.19:1 Thus said Yahweh, Go, and buy a potter's earthen bottle, and take of the elders of the people, and of the elders of the priests;19:2 and go forth to the valley of the son of Hinnom, which is by the entry of the gate Harsith, and proclaim there the words that I shall tell you;19:3 and say, Hear ye the word of Yahweh, O kings of Judah, and inhabitants of Jerusalem: thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, which whosoever hears, his ears shall tingle.19:4 Because they have forsaken me, and have estranged this place, and have burned incense in it to other gods, that they knew not, they and their fathers and the kings of Judah; and have filled this place with the blood of innocents,19:5 and have built the high places of Baal, to burn their sons in the fire for burnt offerings to Baal; which I commanded not, nor spoke it, neither came it into my mind:19:6 therefore, behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that this place shall no more be called Topheth, nor The valley of the son of Hinnom, but The valley of Slaughter.19:7 And I will make void the counsel of Judah and Jerusalem in this place; and I will cause them to fall by the sword before their enemies, and by the hand of them that seek their life: and their dead bodies will I give to be food for the birds of the heavens, and for the beasts of the earth.19:8 And I will make this city an astonishment, and a hissing; every one that passes thereby shall be astonished and hiss because of all the plagues thereof.19:9 And I will cause them to eat the flesh of their sons and the flesh of their daughters; and they shall eat every one the flesh of his friend, in the siege and in the distress, with which their enemies, and they that seek their life, shall distress them.19:10 Then shall you break the bottle in the sight of the men that go with you,19:11 and shall say to them, Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Even so will I break this people and this city, as one breaks a potter's vessel, that cannot be made whole again; and they shall bury in Topheth, till there be no place to bury.19:12 Thus will I do to this place, says Yahweh, and to the inhabitants thereof, even making this city as Topheth:19:13 and the houses of Jerusalem, and the houses of the kings of Judah, which are defiled, shall be as the place of Topheth, even all the houses upon whose roofs they have burned incense to all the host of heaven, and have poured out drink offerings to other gods.19:14 Then came Jeremiah from Topheth, whither Yahweh had sent him to prophesy; and he stood in the court of Yahweh's house, and said to all the people:19:15 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, Behold, I will bring upon this city and upon all its towns all the evil that I have pronounced against it; because they have made their neck stiff, that they may not hear my words.20:1 Now Pashhur, the son of Immer the priest, who was chief officer in the house of Yahweh, heard Jeremiah prophesying these things.20:2 Then Pashhur smote Jeremiah the prophet, and put him in the stocks that were in the upper gate of Benjamin, which was in the house of Yahweh.20:3 And it came to pass on the morrow, that Pashhur brought forth Jeremiah out of the stocks.  Then said Jeremiah to him, Yahweh has not called your name Pashhur, but Magor-missabib.20:4 For thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will make you a terror to yourself, and to all your friends; and they shall fall by the sword of their enemies, and your eyes shall behold it; and I will give all Judah into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall carry them captive to Babylon, and shall slay them with the sword.20:5 Moreover I will give all the riches of this city, and all the gains thereof, and all the precious things thereof, yes, all the treasures of the kings of Judah will I give into the hand of their enemies; and they shall make them a prey, and take them, and carry them to Babylon.20:6 And you, Pashhur, and all that dwell in your house shall go into captivity; and you shall come to Babylon, and there you shall die, and there shall you be buried, you, and all your friends, to whom you have prophesied falsely.20:7 O Yahweh, you have persuaded me, and I was persuaded; you are stronger than I, and have prevailed: I am become a laughing-stock all the day, every one mocks me.20:8 For as often as I speak, I cry out; I cry, Violence and destruction! because the word of Yahweh is made a reproach to me, and a derision, all the day.20:9 And if I say, I will not make mention of him, nor speak any more in his name, then there is in my heart as it were a burning fire shut up in my bones, and I am weary with forbearing, and I cannot contain.20:10 For I have heard the defaming of many, terror on every side.  Denounce, and we will denounce him, say all my familiar friends, they that watch for my fall; peradventure he will be persuaded, and we shall prevail against him, and we shall take our revenge on him.20:11 But Yahweh is with me as a mighty one and a terrible: therefore my persecutors shall stumble, and they shall not prevail; they shall be utterly put to shame, because they have not dealt wisely, even with an everlasting dishonor which shall never be forgotten.20:12 But, O Yahweh of hosts, that try the righteous, that see the heart and the mind, let me see your vengeance on them; for to you have I revealed my cause.20:13 Sing to Yahweh, praise ye Yahweh; for he has delivered the soul of the needy from the hand of evil-doers.20:14 Cursed be the day in which I was born: let not the day in which my mother bore me be blessed.20:15 Cursed be the man who brought tidings to my father, saying, a man-child is born to you; making him very glad.20:16 And let that man be as the cities which Yahweh overthrew, and repented not: and let him hear a cry in the morning, and shouting at noontime;20:17 because he slew me not from the womb; and so my mother would have been my grave, and her womb always great.20:18 Why came I forth out of the womb to see labor and sorrow, that my days should be consumed with shame?21:1 The word which came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, when king Zedekiah sent to him Pashhur the son of Malchijah, and Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah, the priest, saying,21:2 Inquire, I pray you, of Yahweh for us; for Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon makes war against us: peradventure Yahweh will deal with us according to all his wondrous works, that he may go up from us.21:3 Then said Jeremiah to them, Thus shall ye say to Zedekiah:21:4 Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Behold, I will turn back the weapons of war that are in your hands, with which ye fight against the king of Babylon, and against the Chaldeans that besiege you, without the walls; and I will gather them into the midst of this city.21:5 And I myself will fight against you with an outstretched hand and with a strong arm, even in anger, and in wrath, and in great indignation.21:6 And I will smite the inhabitants of this city, both man and beast: they shall die of a great pestilence.21:7 And afterward, says Yahweh, I will deliver Zedekiah king of Judah, and his servants, and the people, even such as are left in this city from the pestilence, from the sword, and from the famine, into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of their enemies, and into the hand of those that seek their life: and he shall smite them with the edge of the sword; he shall not spare them, neither have pity, nor have mercy.21:8 And to this people you shall say, Thus says Yahweh: Behold, I set before you the way of life and the way of death.21:9 He that abides in this city shall die by the sword, and by the famine, and by the pestilence; but he that goes out, and passes over to the Chaldeans that besiege you, he shall live, and his life shall be to him for a prey.21:10 For I have set my face upon this city for evil, and not for good, says Yahweh: it shall be given into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall burn it with fire.21:11 And touching the house of the king of Judah, hear ye the word of Yahweh:21:12 O house of David, thus says Yahweh, Execute justice in the morning, and deliver him that is robbed out of the hand of the oppressor, lest my wrath go forth like fire, and burn so that none can quench it, because of the evil of your doings.21:13 Behold, I am against you, O inhabitant of the valley, and of the rock of the plain, says Yahweh; you that say, Who shall come down against us?  or who shall enter into our habitations?21:14 And I will punish you according to the fruit of your doings, says Yahweh; and I will kindle a fire in her forest, and it shall devour all that is round about her.22:1 Thus said Yahweh: Go down to the house of the king of Judah, and speak there this word,22:2 And say, Hear the word of Yahweh, O king of Judah, that sit upon the throne of David, you, and your servants, and your people that enter in by these gates.22:3 Thus says Yahweh: Execute ye justice and righteousness, and deliver him that is robbed out of the hand of the oppressor: and do no wrong, do no violence, to the sojourner, the fatherless, nor the widow; neither shed innocent blood in this place.22:4 For if ye do this thing indeed, then shall there enter in by the gates of this house kings sitting upon the throne of David, riding in chariots and on horses, he, and his servants, and his people.22:5 But if ye will not hear these words, I swear by myself, says Yahweh, that this house shall become a desolation.22:6 For thus says Yahweh concerning the house of the king of Judah: You are Gilead to me, and the head of Lebanon; yet surely I will make you a wilderness, and cities which are not inhabited.22:7 And I will prepare destroyers against you, every one with his weapons; and they shall cut down your choice cedars, and cast them into the fire.22:8 And many nations shall pass by this city, and they shall say every man to his neighbor, Why has Yahweh done thus to this great city?22:9 Then they shall answer, Because they forsook the covenant of Yahweh their God, and worshipped other gods, and served them.22:10 Weep ye not for the dead, neither bemoan him; but weep sore for him that goes away; for he shall return no more, nor see his native country.22:11 For thus says Yahweh touching Shallum the son of Josiah, king of Judah, who reigned instead of Josiah his father, and who went forth out of this place: He shall not return there any more.22:12 But in the place whither they have led him captive, there shall he die, and he shall see this land no more.22:13 Woe to him that builds his house by unrighteousness, and his chambers by injustice; that uses his neighbor's service without wages, and gives him not his hire;22:14 that says, I will build me a wide house and spacious chambers, and cuts him out windows; and it is ceiled with cedar, and painted with vermilion.22:15 Shall you reign, because you strive to excel in cedar?  Did not your father eat and drink, and do justice and righteousness?  then it was well with him.22:16 He judged the cause of the poor and needy; then it was well.  Was not this to know me?  says Yahweh.22:17 But your eyes and your heart are only for your covetousness, and for shedding innocent blood, and for oppression, and for violence, to do it.22:18 Therefore thus says Yahweh concerning Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah: they shall not lament for him, saying, ah my brother! or, ah sister! They shall not lament for him, saying Ah lord! or, ah his glory!22:19 He shall be buried with the burial of a donkey, drawn and cast forth beyond the gates of Jerusalem.22:20 Go up to Lebanon, and cry; and lift up your voice in Bashan, and cry from Abarim; for all your lovers are destroyed.22:21 I spoke to you in your prosperity; but you said, I will not hear.  This has been your manner from your youth, that you obeyed not my voice.22:22 The wind shall feed all your shepherds, and your lovers shall go into captivity: surely then shall you be ashamed and confounded for all your wickedness.22:23 O inhabitant of Lebanon, that make your nest in the cedars, how greatly to be pitied shall you be when pangs come upon you, the pain as of a woman in travail!22:24 As I live, says Yahweh, though Coniah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah were the signet upon my right hand, yet would I pluck you there;22:25 and I will give you into the hand of those that seek your life, and into the hand of those of whom you are afraid, even into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of the Chaldeans.22:26 And I will cast you out, and your mother that bore you, into another country, where ye were not born; and there shall ye die.22:27 But to the land to which their soul longs to return, there they shall not return.22:28 Is this man Coniah a despised broken vessel?  is he a vessel in which no one delights?  why are they cast out, he and his seed, and are cast into the land which they know not?22:29 O earth, earth, earth, hear the word of Yahweh.22:30 Thus says Yahweh, Write ye this man childless, a man that shall not prosper in his days; for no more shall a man of his seed prosper, sitting upon the throne of David, and ruling in Judah.23:1 Woe to the shepherds that destroy and scatter the sheep of my pasture! says Yahweh.23:2 Therefore thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, against the shepherds that feed my people: You have scattered my flock, and driven them away, and have not visited them; behold, I will visit upon you the evil of your doings, says Yahweh.23:3 And I will gather the remnant of my flock out of all the countries whither I have driven them, and will bring them again to their folds; and they shall be fruitful and multiply.23:4 And I will set up shepherds over them, who shall feed them; and they shall fear no more, nor be dismayed, neither shall any be lacking, says Yahweh.23:5 Behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that I will raise to David a righteous Branch, and he shall reign as king and deal wisely, and shall execute justice and righteousness in the land.23:6 In his days Judah shall be saved, and Israel shall dwell safely; and this is his name whereby he shall be called: Yahweh our righteousness.23:7 Therefore, behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that they shall no more say, as Yahweh lives, who brought up the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt;23:8 but, as Yahweh lives, who brought up and who led the seed of the house of Israel out of the north country, and from all the countries whither I had driven them.  And they shall dwell in their own land.23:9 Concerning the prophets.  My heart within me is broken, all my bones shake; I am like a drunken man, and like a man whom wine has overcome, because of Yahweh, and because of his holy words.23:10 For the land is full of adulterers; for because of swearing the land mourns; the pastures of the wilderness are dried up.  And their course is evil, and their might is not right;23:11 for both prophet and priest are profane; yes, in my house have I found their wickedness, says Yahweh.23:12 Wherefore their way shall be to them as slippery places in the darkness: they shall be driven on, and fall therein; for I will bring evil upon them, even the year of their visitation, says Yahweh.23:13 And I have seen folly in the prophets of Samaria; they prophesied by Baal, and caused my people Israel to err.23:14 In the prophets of Jerusalem also I have seen a horrible thing: they commit adultery, and walk in lies; and they strengthen the hands of evil-doers, so that none does return from his wickedness: they are all of them become to me as Sodom, and the inhabitants thereof as Gomorrah.23:15 Therefore thus says Yahweh of hosts concerning the prophets: Behold, I will feed them with wormwood, and make them drink the water of gall; for from the prophets of Jerusalem is ungodliness gone forth into all the land.23:16 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, Hearken not to the words of the prophets that prophesy to you: they teach you vanity; they speak a vision of their own heart, and not out of the mouth of Yahweh.23:17 They say continually to them that despise me, Yahweh has said, You shall have peace; and to every one that walks in the stubbornness of his own heart they say, No evil shall come upon you.23:18 For who has stood in the council of Yahweh, that he should perceive and hear his word?  who has marked my word, and heard it?23:19 Behold, the tempest of Yahweh, even his wrath, is gone forth, yes, a whirling tempest: it shall burst upon the head of the wicked.23:20 The anger of Yahweh shall not return, until he have executed, and till he have performed the intents of his heart: in the latter days ye shall understand it perfectly.23:21 I sent not these prophets, yet they ran: I spoke not to them, yet they prophesied.23:22 But if they had stood in my council, then had they caused my people to hear my words, and had turned them from their evil way, and from the evil of their doings.23:23 Am I a God at hand, says Yahweh, and not a God afar off?23:24 Can any hide himself in secret places so that I shall not see him?  says Yahweh.  Do not I fill heaven and earth?  says Yahweh.23:25 I have heard what the prophets have said, that prophesy lies in my name, saying, I have dreamed, I have dreamed.23:26 How long shall this be in the heart of the prophets that prophesy lies, even the prophets of the deceit of their own heart?23:27 that think to cause my people to forget my name by their dreams which they tell every man to his neighbor, as their fathers forgat my name for Baal.23:28 The prophet that has a dream, let him tell a dream; and he that has my word, let him speak my word faithfully.  What is the straw to the wheat?  says Yahweh.23:29 Is not my word like fire?  says Yahweh; and like a hammer that breaks the rock in pieces?23:30 Therefore, behold, I am against the prophets, says Yahweh, that steal my words every one from his neighbor.23:31 Behold, I am against the prophets, says Yahweh, that use their tongues, and say, He says.23:32 Behold, I am against them that prophesy lying dreams, says Yahweh, and do tell them, and cause my people to err by their lies, and by their vain boasting: yet I sent them not, nor commanded them; neither do they profit this people at all, says Yahweh.23:33 And when this people, or the prophet, or a priest, shall ask you, saying, What is the burden concerning Yahweh?  then shall you say to them, What burden! I will cast you off, says Yahweh.23:34 And as for the prophet, and the priest, and the people, that shall say, The burden concerning Yahweh, I will even punish that man and his house.23:35 Thus shall ye say every one to his neighbor, and every one to his brother, What has Yahweh answered?  and, What has Yahweh spoken?23:36 And the burden of Yahweh shall ye mention no more: for every man's own word shall be his burden; for ye have perverted the words of the living God, of Yahweh of hosts our God.23:37 Thus shall you say to the prophet, What has Yahweh answered you?  and, What has Yahweh spoken?23:38 But if ye say, The burden of Yahweh; therefore thus says Yahweh: Because ye say this word, The burden of Yahweh, and I have sent to you, saying, You shall not say, The burden of Yahweh;23:39 therefore, behold, I will utterly forget you, and I will cast you off, and the city that I gave to you and to your fathers, away from my presence:23:40 and I will bring an everlasting reproach upon you, and a perpetual shame, which shall not be forgotten.24:1 Yahweh showed me, and, behold, two baskets of figs set before the temple of Yahweh, after that Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon had carried away captive Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim, king of Judah, and the princes of Judah, with the craftsmen and smiths, from Jerusalem, and had brought them to Babylon.24:2 One basket had very good figs, like the figs that are first-ripe; and the other basket had very bad figs, which could not be eaten, they were so bad.24:3 Then said Yahweh to me, What see you, Jeremiah?  And I said, Figs; the good figs, very good; and the bad, very bad, that cannot be eaten, they are so bad.24:4 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,24:5 Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel: Like these good figs, so will I regard the captives of Judah, whom I have sent out of this place into the land of the Chaldeans, for good.24:6 For I will set my eyes upon them for good, and I will bring them again to this land: and I will build them, and not pull them down; and I will plant them, and not pluck them up.24:7 And I will give them a heart to know me, that I am Yahweh: and they shall be my people, and I will be their God; for they shall return to me with their whole heart.24:8 And as the bad figs, which cannot be eaten, they are so bad, surely thus says Yahweh, So will I give up Zedekiah the king of Judah, and his princes, and the residue of Jerusalem, that remain in this land, and them that dwell in the land of Egypt,24:9 I will even give them up to be tossed to and fro among all the kingdoms of the earth for evil; to be a reproach and a proverb, a taunt and a curse, in all places whither I shall drive them.24:10 And I will send the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, among them, till they be consumed from off the land that I gave to them and to their fathers.25:1 The word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the people of Judah, in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah (the same was the first year of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon,)25:2 which Jeremiah the prophet spoke to all the people of Judah, and to all the inhabitants of Jerusalem, saying:25:3 From the thirteenth year of Josiah the son of Amon, king of Judah, even to this day, these three and twenty years, the word of Yahweh has come to me, and I have spoken to you, rising up early and speaking; but ye have not hearkened.25:4 And Yahweh has sent to you all his servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them, (but ye have not hearkened, nor inclined your ear to hear,)25:5 saying, Return ye now every one from his evil way, and from the evil of your doings, and dwell in the land that Yahweh has given to you and to your fathers, from of old and even for evermore;25:6 and go not after other gods to serve them, and to worship them, and provoke me not to anger with the work of your hands; and I will do you no hurt.25:7 Yet ye have not hearkened to me, says Yahweh; that ye may provoke me to anger with the work of your hands to your own hurt.25:8 Therefore thus says Yahweh of hosts: Because ye have not heard my words,25:9 behold, I will send and take all the families of the north, says Yahweh, and I will send to Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon, my servant, and will bring them against this land, and against the inhabitants thereof, and against all these nations round about; and I will utterly destroy them, and make them an astonishment, and a hissing, and perpetual desolations.25:10 Moreover I will take from them the voice of mirth and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom and the voice of the bride, the sound of the millstones, and the light of the lamp.25:11 And this whole land shall be a desolation, and an astonishment; and these nations shall serve the king of Babylon seventy years.25:12 And it shall come to pass, when seventy years are accomplished, that I will punish the king of Babylon, and that nation, says Yahweh, for their iniquity, and the land of the Chaldeans; and I will make it desolate for ever.25:13 And I will bring upon that land all my words which I have pronounced against it, even all that is written in this book, which Jeremiah has prophesied against all the nations.25:14 For many nations and great kings shall make bondmen of them, even of them; and I will recompense them according to their deeds, and according to the work of their hands.25:15 For thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, to me: take this cup of the wine of wrath at my hand, and cause all the nations, to whom I send you, to drink it.25:16 And they shall drink, and reel to and fro, and be mad, because of the sword that I will send among them.25:17 Then took I the cup at Yahweh's hand, and made all the nations to drink, to whom Yahweh had sent me:25:18 that is, to Jerusalem, and the cities of Judah, and the kings thereof, and the princes thereof, to make them a desolation, an astonishment, a hissing, and a curse, as it is this day;25:19 Pharaoh king of Egypt, and his servants, and his princes, and all his people;25:20 and all the mingled people, and all the kings of the land of the Uz, and all the kings of the Philistines, and Ashkelon, and Gaza, and Ekron, and the remnant of Ashdod;25:21 Edom, and Moab, and the children of Ammon;25:22 and all the kings of Tyre, and all the kings of Sidon, and the kings of the isle which is beyond the sea;25:23 Dedan, and Tema, and Buz, and all that have the corners of their hair cut off;25:24 and all the kings of Arabia, and all the kings of the mingled people that dwell in the wilderness;25:25 and all the kings of Zimri, and all the kings of Elam, and all the kings of the Medes;25:26 and all the kings of the north, far and near, one with another; and all the kingdoms of the world, which are upon the face of the earth: and the king of Sheshach shall drink after them.25:27 And you shall say to them, Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Drink ye, and be drunken, and spew, and fall, and rise no more, because of the sword which I will send among you.25:28 And it shall be, if they refuse to take the cup at your hand to drink, then shall you say to them, Thus says Yahweh of hosts: You shall surely drink.25:29 For, lo, I begin to work evil at the city which is called by my name; and should ye be utterly unpunished?  You shall not be unpunished; for I will call for a sword upon all the inhabitants of the earth, says Yahweh of hosts.25:30 Therefore prophesy you against them all these words, and say to them, Yahweh will roar from on high, and utter his voice from his holy habitation; he will mightily roar against his fold; he will give a shout, as they that tread the grapes, against all the inhabitants of the earth.25:31 A noise shall come even to the end of the earth; for Yahweh has a controversy with the nations; he will enter into judgment with all flesh: as for the wicked, he will give them to the sword, says Yahweh.25:32 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, Behold, evil shall go forth from nation to nation, and a great tempest shall be raised up from the uttermost parts of the earth.25:33 And the slain of Yahweh shall be at that day from one end of the earth even to the other end of the earth: they shall not be lamented, neither gathered, nor buried; they shall be dung upon the face of the ground.25:34 Wail, ye shepherds, and cry; and wallow in ashes, ye principal of the flock; for the days of your slaughter and of your dispersions are fully come, and ye shall fall like a goodly vessel.25:35 And the shepherds shall have no way to flee, nor the principal of the flock to escape.25:36 A voice of the cry of the shepherds, and the wailing of the principal of the flock! for Yahweh lays waste their pasture.25:37 And the peaceable folds are brought to silence because of the fierce anger of Yahweh.25:38 He has left his covert, as the lion; for their land is become an astonishment because of the fierceness of the oppressing sword, and because of his fierce anger.26:1 In the beginning of the reign of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah, came this word from Yahweh, saying,26:2 Thus says Yahweh: Stand in the court of Yahweh's house, and speak to all the cities of Judah, which come to worship in Yahweh's house, all the words that I command you to speak to them; diminish not a word.26:3 It may be they will hearken, and turn every man from his evil way; that I may repent me of the evil which I purpose to do to them because of the evil of their doings.26:4 And you shall say to them, Thus says Yahweh: If ye will not hearken to me, to walk in my law, which I have set before you,26:5 to hearken to the words of my servants the prophets, whom I send to you, even rising up early and sending them, but ye have not hearkened;26:6 then will I make this house like Shiloh, and will make this city a curse to all the nations of the earth.26:7 And the priests and the prophets and all the people heard Jeremiah speaking these words in the house of Yahweh.26:8 And it came to pass, when Jeremiah had made an end of speaking all that Yahweh had commanded him to speak to all the people, that the priests and the prophets and all the people laid hold on him, saying, You shall surely die.26:9 Why have you prophesied in the name of Yahweh, saying, This house shall be like Shiloh, and this city shall be desolate, without inhabitant?  And all the people were gathered to Jeremiah in the house of Yahweh.26:10 And when the princes of Judah heard these things, they came up from the king's house to the house of Yahweh; and they sat in the entry of the new gate of Yahweh's house.26:11 Then spoke the priests and the prophets to the princes and to all the people, saying, This man is worthy of death; for he has prophesied against this city, as ye have heard with your ears.26:12 Then spoke Jeremiah to all the princes and to all the people, saying, Yahweh sent me to prophesy against this house and against this city all the words that ye have heard.26:13 Now therefore amend your ways and your doings, and obey the voice of Yahweh your God; and Yahweh will repent him of the evil that he has pronounced against you.26:14 But as for me, behold, I am in your hand: do with me as is good and right in your eyes.26:15 Only know ye for certain that, if ye put me to death, ye will bring innocent blood upon yourselves, and upon this city, and upon the inhabitants thereof; for of a truth Yahweh has sent me to you to speak all these words in your ears.26:16 Then said the princes and all the people to the priests and to the prophets: This man is not worthy of death; for he has spoken to us in the name of Yahweh our God.26:17 Then rose up certain of the elders of the land, and spoke to all the assembly of the people, saying,26:18 Micah the Morashtite prophesied in the days of Hezekiah king of Judah; and he spoke to all the people of Judah, saying, Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Zion shall be plowed as a field, and Jerusalem shall become heaps, and the mountain of the house as the high places of a forest.26:19 Did Hezekiah king of Judah and all Judah put him to death?  did he not fear Yahweh, and entreat the favor of Yahweh, and Yahweh repented him of the evil which he had pronounced against them?  Thus should we commit great evil against our own souls.26:20 And there was also a man that prophesied in the name of Yahweh, Uriah the son of Shemaiah of Kiriath-jearim; and he prophesied against this city and against this land according to all the words of Jeremiah:26:21 and when Jehoiakim the king, with all his mighty-men, and all the princes, heard his words, the king sought to put him to death; but when Uriah heard it, he was afraid, and fled, and went into Egypt:26:22 and Jehoiakim the king sent men into Egypt, namely, Elnathan the son of Achbor, and certain men with him, into Egypt;26:23 and they fetched forth Uriah out of Egypt, and brought him to Jehoiakim the king, who slew him with the sword, and cast his dead body into the graves of the common people.26:24 But the hand of Ahikam the son of Shaphan was with Jeremiah, that they should not give him into the hand of the people to put him to death.27:1 In the beginning of the reign of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah, came this word to Jeremiah from Yahweh, saying,27:2 Thus says Yahweh to me: Make you bonds and bars, and put them upon your neck;27:3 and send them to the king of Edom, and to the king of Moab, and to the king of the children of Ammon, and to the king of Tyre, and to the king of Sidon, by the hand of the messengers that come to Jerusalem to Zedekiah king of Judah;27:4 and give them a charge to their masters, saying, Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, Thus shall ye say to your masters:27:5 I have made the earth, the men and the beasts that are upon the face of the earth, by my great power and by my outstretched arm; and I give it to whom it seems right to me.27:6 And now have I given all these lands into the hand of Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon, my servant; and the beasts of the field also have I given him to serve him.27:7 And all the nations shall serve him, and his son, and his son's son, until the time of his own land come: and then many nations and great kings shall make him their bondman.27:8 And it shall come to pass, that the nation and the kingdom which will not serve the same Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon, and that will not put their neck under the yoke of the king of Babylon, that nation will I punish, says Yahweh, with the sword, and with the famine, and with the pestilence, until I have consumed them by his hand.27:9 But as for you, hearken ye not to your prophets, nor to your diviners, nor to your dreams, nor to your soothsayers, nor to your sorcerers, that speak to you, saying, You shall not serve the king of Babylon:27:10 for they prophesy a lie to you, to remove you far from your land, and that I should drive you out, and ye should perish.27:11 But the nation that shall bring their neck under the yoke of the king of Babylon, and serve him, that nation will I let remain in their own land, says Yahweh; and they shall till it, and dwell therein.27:12 And I spoke to Zedekiah king of Judah according to all these words, saying, Bring your necks under the yoke of the king of Babylon, and serve him and his people, and live.27:13 Why will ye die, you and your people, by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence, as Yahweh has spoken concerning the nation that will not serve the king of Babylon?27:14 And hearken not to the words of the prophets that speak to you, saying, You shall not serve the king of Babylon; for they prophesy a lie to you.27:15 For I have not sent them, says Yahweh, but they prophesy falsely in my name; that I may drive you out, and that ye may perish, ye, and the prophets that prophesy to you.27:16 Also I spoke to the priests and to all this people, saying, Thus says Yahweh: Hearken not to the words of your prophets that prophesy to you, saying, Behold, the vessels of Yahweh's house shall now shortly be brought again from Babylon; for they prophesy a lie to you.27:17 Hearken not to them; serve the king of Babylon, and live: why should this city become a desolation?27:18 But if they be prophets, and if the word of Yahweh be with them, let them now make intercession to Yahweh of hosts, that the vessels which are left in the house of Yahweh, and in the house of the king of Judah, and at Jerusalem, go not to Babylon.27:19 For thus says Yahweh of hosts concerning the pillars, and concerning the sea, and concerning the bases, and concerning the residue of the vessels that are left in this city,27:20 which Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon took not, when he carried away captive Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim, king of Judah, from Jerusalem to Babylon, and all the nobles of Judah and Jerusalem;27:21 yes, thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, concerning the vessels that are left in the house of Yahweh, and in the house of the king of Judah, and at Jerusalem:27:22 They shall be carried to Babylon, and there shall they be, until the day that I visit them, says Yahweh; then will I bring them up, and restore them to this place.28:1 And it came to pass the same year, in the beginning of the reign of Zedekiah king of Judah, in the fourth year, in the fifth month, that Hananiah the son of Azzur, the prophet, who was of Gibeon, spoke to me in the house of Yahweh, in the presence of the priests and of all the people, saying,28:2 Thus speaks Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, saying, I have broken the yoke of the king of Babylon.28:3 Within two full years will I bring again into this place all the vessels of Yahweh's house, that Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon took away from this place, and carried to Babylon:28:4 and I will bring again to this place Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim, king of Judah, with all the captives of Judah, that went to Babylon, says Yahweh; for I will break the yoke of the king of Babylon.28:5 Then the prophet Jeremiah said to the prophet Hananiah in the presence of the priests, and in the presence of all the people that stood in the house of Yahweh,28:6 even the prophet Jeremiah said, amen: Yahweh do so; Yahweh perform your words which you have prophesied, to bring again the vessels of Yahweh's house, and all them of the captivity, from Babylon to this place.28:7 Nevertheless hear you now this word that I speak in your ears, and in the ears of all the people:28:8 The prophets that have been before me and before you of old prophesied against many countries, and against great kingdoms, of war, and of evil, and of pestilence.28:9 The prophet that prophesies of peace, when the word of the prophet shall come to pass, then shall the prophet be known, that Yahweh has truly sent him.28:10 Then Hananiah the prophet took the bar from off the prophet Jeremiah's neck, and broke it.28:11 And Hananiah spoke in the presence of all the people, saying, Thus says Yahweh: Even so will I break the yoke of Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon within two full years from off the neck of all the nations.  And the prophet Jeremiah went his way.28:12 Then the word of Yahweh came to Jeremiah, after that Hananiah the prophet had broken the bar from off the neck of the prophet Jeremiah, saying,28:13 Go, and tell Hananiah, saying, Thus says Yahweh: You have broken the bars of wood; but you have made in their stead bars of iron.28:14 For thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: I have put a yoke of iron upon the neck of all these nations, that they may served Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon; and they shall serve him: and I have given him the beasts of the field also.28:15 Then said the prophet Jeremiah to Hananiah the prophet, Hear now, Hananiah: Yahweh has not sent you; but you cause this people to trust in a lie.28:16 Therefore thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will send you away from off the face of the earth: this year you shall die, because you have spoken rebellion against Yahweh.28:17 So Hananiah the prophet died the same year in the seventh month.29:1 Now these are the words of the letter that Jeremiah the prophet sent from Jerusalem to the residue of the elders of the captivity, and to the priests, and to the prophets, and to all the people, whom Nebuchadnezzar had carried away captive from Jerusalem to Babylon,29:2 (after that Jeconiah the king, and the queen-mother, and the eunuchs, and the princes of Judah and Jerusalem, and the craftsmen, and the smiths, were departed from Jerusalem,)29:3 by the hand of Elasah the son of Shaphan, and Gemariah the son of Hilkiah, (whom Zedekiah king of Judah sent to Babylon to Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon,) saying,29:4 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, to all the captivity, whom I have caused to be carried away captive from Jerusalem to Babylon:29:5 Build ye houses, and dwell in them; and plant gardens, and eat the fruit of them.29:6 Take ye wives, and beget sons and daughters; and take wives for your sons, and give your daughters to husbands, that they may bear sons and daughters; and multiply ye there, and be not diminished.29:7 And seek the peace of the city whither I have caused you to be carried away captive, and pray to Yahweh for it; for in the peace thereof shall ye have peace.29:8 For thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Let not your prophets that are in the midst of you, and your diviners, deceive you; neither hearken ye to your dreams which ye cause to be dreamed.29:9 For they prophesy falsely to you in my name: I have not sent them, says Yahweh.29:10 For thus says Yahweh, after seventy years are accomplished for Babylon, I will visit you, and perform my good word toward you, in causing you to return to this place.29:11 For I know the thoughts that I think toward you, says Yahweh, thoughts of peace, and not of evil, to give you hope in your latter end.29:12 And ye shall call upon me, and ye shall go and pray to me, and I will listen to you.29:13 And ye shall seek me, and find me, when ye shall search for me with all your heart.29:14 And I will be found by you, says Yahweh, and I will turn back your captivity, and I will gather you from all the nations, and from all the places to which I have driven you, says Yahweh; and I will bring you back to the place from which I caused you to be carried away captive.29:15 Because ye have said, Yahweh has raised us up prophets in Babylon;29:16 thus says Yahweh concerning the king that sits upon the throne of David, and concerning all the people that dwell in this city, your brethren that are not gone forth with you into captivity;29:17 thus says Yahweh of hosts; Behold, I will send upon them the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, and will make them like vile figs, that cannot be eaten, they are so bad.29:18 And I will pursue them with the sword, with the famine, and with the pestilence, and will deliver them to be tossed to and fro among all the kingdoms of the earth, to be an execration, and an astonishment, and a hissing, and a reproach, among all the nations to which I have driven them;29:19 because they have not heeded my words, says Yahweh, with which I sent to them my servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them; but ye would not hear, says Yahweh.29:20 Hear ye therefore the word of Yahweh, all ye of the captivity, whom I have sent away from Jerusalem to Babylon.29:21 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, concerning Ahab the son of Kolaiah, and concerning Zedekiah the son of Maaseiah, who prophesy a lie to you in my name: Behold, I will deliver them into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon; and he shall slay them before your eyes;29:22 and of them shall be taken up a curse by all the captives of Judah that are in Babylon, saying, Yahweh make you like Zedekiah and like Ahab, whom the king of Babylon roasted in the fire;29:23 because they have wrought folly in Israel, and have committed adultery with their neighbors' wives, and have spoken words in my name falsely, which I commanded them not; and I am he that knows, and am witness, says Yahweh.29:24 And concerning Shemaiah the Nehelamite you shall speak, saying,29:25 Thus speaks Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, saying, Because you have sent letters in your own name to all the people that are at Jerusalem, and to Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah, the priest, and to all the priests, saying,29:26 Yahweh has made you priest in the stead of Jehoiada the priest, that there may be officers in the house of Yahweh, for every man that is mad, and makes himself a prophet, that you should put him in the stocks and in shackles.29:27 Now therefore, why have you not rebuked Jeremiah of Anathoth, who makes himself a prophet to you,29:28 forasmuch as he has sent to us in Babylon, saying, The captivity is long: build ye houses, and dwell in them; and plant gardens, and eat the fruit of them?29:29 And Zephaniah the priest read this letter in the ears of Jeremiah the prophet.29:30 Then came the word of Yahweh to Jeremiah, saying,29:31 Send to all them of the captivity, saying, Thus says Yahweh concerning Shemaiah the Nehelamite: Because that Shemaiah has prophesied to you, and I sent him not, and he has caused you to trust in a lie;29:32 therefore thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will punish Shemaiah the Nehelamite, and his seed; he shall not have a man to dwell among this people, neither shall he behold the good that I will do to my people, says Yahweh, because he has spoken rebellion against Yahweh.30:1 The word that came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, saying,30:2 Thus speaks Yahweh, the God of Israel, saying, Write you all the words that I have spoken to you in a book.30:3 For, lo, the days come, says Yahweh, that I will turn again the captivity of my people Israel and Judah, says Yahweh; and I will cause them to return to the land that I gave to their fathers, and they shall possess it.30:4 And these are the words that Yahweh spoke concerning Israel and concerning Judah.30:5 For thus says Yahweh: We have heard a voice of trembling, of fear, and not of peace.30:6 Ask ye now, and see whether a man does travail with child: why do I see every man with his hands on his loins, as a woman in travail, and all faces are turned into paleness?30:7 Alas! for that day is great, so that none is like it: it is even the time of Jacob's trouble; but he shall be saved out of it.30:8 And it shall come to pass in that day, says Yahweh of hosts, that I will break his yoke from off your neck, and will burst your bonds; and strangers shall no more make him their bondman;30:9 but they shall serve Yahweh their God, and David their king, whom I will raise up to them.30:10 Therefore fear you not, O Jacob my servant, says Yahweh; neither be dismayed, O Israel: for, lo, I will save you from afar, and your seed from the land of their captivity; and Jacob shall return, and shall be quiet and at ease, and none shall make him afraid.30:11 For I am with you, says Yahweh, to save you: for I will make a full end of all the nations to which I have scattered you, but I will not make a full end of you.  But I will correct you in measure, and will in no wise leave you unpunished.30:12 For thus says Yahweh, Your hurt is incurable, and your wound grievous.30:13 There is none to plead your cause, that you may be bound up: you have no healing medicines.30:14 All your lovers have forgotten you; they seek you not: for I have wounded you with the wound of an enemy, with the chastisement of a cruel one, for the greatness of your iniquity, because your sins were increased.30:15 Why cry for your hurt?  your pain is incurable: for the greatness of your iniquity, because your sins were increased, I have done these things to you.30:16 Therefore all they that devour you shall be devoured; and all your adversaries, every one of them, shall go into captivity; and they that despoil you shall be a spoil, and all that prey upon you will I give as a prey.30:17 For I will restore health to you, and I will heal you of your wounds, says Yahweh; because they have called you an outcast, saying, It is Zion, whom no man seeks after.30:18 Thus says Yahweh: Behold, I will turn again the captivity of Jacob's tents, and have compassion on his dwelling-places; and the city shall be built upon its own hill, and the palace shall be inhabited after its own manner.30:19 And out of them shall proceed thanksgiving and the voice of them that make merry: and I will multiply them, and they shall not be few; I will also glorify them, and they shall not be small.30:20 Their children also shall be as aforetime, and their congregation shall be established before me; and I will punish all that oppress them.30:21 And their prince shall be of themselves, and their ruler shall proceed from the midst of them; and I will cause him to draw near, and he shall approach to me: for who is he that has had boldness to approach to me?  says Yahweh.30:22 And ye shall be my people, and I will be your God.30:23 Behold, the tempest of Yahweh, even his wrath, is gone forth, a sweeping tempest: it shall burst upon the head of the wicked.30:24 The fierce anger of Yahweh shall not return, until he have executed, and till he have performed the intents of his heart: in the latter days ye shall understand it.31:1 At that time, says Yahweh, will I be the God of all the families of Israel, and they shall be my people.31:2 Thus says Yahweh, The people that were left of the sword found favor in the wilderness; even Israel, when I went to cause him to rest.31:3 Yahweh appeared of old to me, saying, Yes, I have loved you with an everlasting love: therefore with lovingkindness have I drawn you.31:4 Again will I build you, and you shall be built, O virgin of Israel: again shall you be adorned with your tabrets, and shall go forth in the dances of them that make merry.31:5 Again shall you plant vineyards upon the mountains of Samaria; the planters shall plant, and shall enjoy the fruit thereof.31:6 For there shall be a day, that the watchmen upon the hills of Ephraim shall cry, arise ye, and let us go up to Zion to Yahweh our God.31:7 For thus says Yahweh, Sing with gladness for Jacob, and shout for the chief of the nations: publish ye, praise ye, and say, O Yahweh, save your people, the remnant of Israel.31:8 Behold, I will bring them from the north country, and gather them from the uttermost parts of the earth, and with them the blind and the lame, the woman with child and her that travails with child together: a great company shall they return here.31:9 They shall come with weeping; and with supplications will I lead them: I will cause them to walk by rivers of waters, in a straight way in which they shall not stumble; for I am a father to Israel, and Ephraim is my first-born.31:10 Hear the word of Yahweh, O ye nations, and declare it in the isles afar off; and say, He that scattered Israel will gather him, and keep him, as a shepherd does his flock.31:11 For Yahweh has ransomed Jacob, and redeemed him from the hand of him that was stronger than he.31:12 And they shall come and sing in the height of Zion, and shall flow to the goodness of Yahweh, to the grain, and to the new wine, and to the oil, and to the young of the flock and of the herd: and their soul shall be as a watered garden; and they shall not sorrow any more at all.31:13 Then shall the virgin rejoice in the dance, and the young men and the old together; for I will turn their mourning into joy, and will comfort them, and make them rejoice from their sorrow.31:14 And I will satiate the soul of the priests with fatness, and my people shall be satisfied with my goodness, says Yahweh.31:15 Thus says Yahweh: A voice is heard in Ramah, lamentation, and bitter weeping, Rachel weeping for her children; she refuses to be comforted for her children, because they are not.31:16 Thus says Yahweh: Refrain your voice from weeping, and your eyes from tears; for your work shall be rewarded, says Yahweh; and they shall come again from the land of the enemy.31:17 And there is hope for your latter end, says Yahweh; and your children shall come again to their own border.31:18 I have surely heard Ephraim bemoaning himself thus, You have chastised me, and I was chastised, as a calf unaccustomed to the yoke: turn you me, and I shall be turned; for you are Yahweh my God.31:19 Surely after that I was turned, I repented; and after that I was instructed, I smote upon my thigh: I was ashamed, yes, even confounded, because I did bear the reproach of my youth.31:20 Is Ephraim my dear son?  is he a darling child?  for as often as I speak against him, I do earnestly remember him still: therefore my heart yearns for him; I will surely have mercy upon him, says Yahweh.31:21 Set you up waymarks, make you guide-posts; set your heart toward the highway, even the way by which you went: turn again, O virgin of Israel, turn again to these your cities.31:22 How long will you go here and there, O you backsliding daughter?  for Yahweh has created a new thing in the earth: a woman shall encompass a man.31:23 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, Yet again shall they use this speech in the land of Judah and in the cities thereof, when I shall bring again their captivity: Yahweh bless you, O habitation of righteousness, O mountain of holiness.31:24 And Judah and all the cities thereof shall dwell therein together, the husbandmen, and they that go about with flocks.31:25 For I have satiated the weary soul, and every sorrowful soul have I replenished.31:26 Upon this I awaked, and beheld; and my sleep was sweet to me.31:27 Behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that I will sow the house of Israel and the house of Judah with the seed of man, and with the seed of beast.31:28 And it shall come to pass that, like as I have watched over them to pluck up and to break down and to overthrow and to destroy and to afflict, so will I watch over them to build and to plant, says Yahweh.31:29 In those days they shall say no more, The fathers have eaten sour grapes, and the children's teeth are set on edge.31:30 But every one shall die for his own iniquity: every man that eats the sour grapes, his teeth shall be set on edge.31:31 Behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that I will make a new covenant with the house of Israel, and with the house of Judah:31:32 not according to the covenant that I made with their fathers in the day that I took them by the hand to bring them out of the land of Egypt; which my covenant they broke, although I was a husband to them, says Yahweh.31:33 But this is the covenant that I will make with the house of Israel after those days, says Yahweh: I will put my law in their inward parts, and in their heart will I write it; and I will be their God, and they shall be my people:31:34 and they shall no longer teach each man his neighbor, and every man his brother, saying, Know Yahweh; for they shall all know me, from the least of them to the greatest of them, says Yahweh: for I will forgive their iniquity, and their sin will I remember no more.31:35 Thus says Yahweh, who gives the sun for a light by day, and the ordinances of the moon and of the stars for a light by night, who stirs up the sea, so that the waves thereof roar; Yahweh of hosts is his name:31:36 If these ordinances depart from before me, says Yahweh, then the seed of Israel also shall cease from being a nation before me for ever.31:37 Thus says Yahweh: If heaven above can be measured, and the foundations of the earth searched out beneath, then will I also cast off all the seed of Israel for all that they have done, says Yahweh.31:38 Behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that the city shall be built to Yahweh from the tower of Hananel to the gate of the corner.31:39 And the measuring line shall go out further straight onward to the hill Gareb, and shall turn about to Goah.31:40 And the whole valley of the dead bodies and of the ashes, and all the fields to the brook Kidron, to the corner of the horse gate toward the east, shall be holy to Yahweh; it shall not be plucked up, nor thrown down any more for ever.32:1 The word that came to Jeremiah from Yahweh in the tenth year of Zedekiah king of Judah, which was the eighteenth year of Nebuchadrezzar.32:2 Now at that time the king of Babylon's army was besieging Jerusalem; and Jeremiah the prophet was shut up in the court of the guard, which was in the king of Judah's house.32:3 For Zedekiah king of Judah had shut him up, saying, Why do you prophesy, and say, Thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will give this city into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall take it;32:4 and Zedekiah king of Judah shall not escape out of the hand of the Chaldeans, but shall surely be delivered into the hand of the king of Babylon, and shall speak with him mouth to mouth, and his eyes shall behold his eyes;32:5 and he shall bring Zedekiah to Babylon, and there shall he be until I visit him, says Yahweh: though ye fight with the Chaldeans, ye shall not prosper?32:6 And Jeremiah said, The word of Yahweh came to me, saying,32:7 Behold, Hanamel the son of Shallum your uncle shall come to you, saying, Buy you my field that is in Anathoth; for the right of redemption is yours to buy it.32:8 So Hanamel my uncle's son came to me in the court of the guard according to the word of Yahweh, and said to me, Buy my field, I pray you, that is in Anathoth, which is in the land of Benjamin; for the right of inheritance is yours, and the redemption is yours; buy it for yourself.  Then I knew that this was the word of Yahweh.32:9 And I bought the field that was in Anathoth of Hanamel my uncle's son, and weighed him the money, even seventeen shekels of silver.32:10 And I subscribed the deed, and sealed it, and called witnesses, and weighed him the money in the balances.32:11 So I took the deed of the purchase, both that which was sealed, according to the law and custom, and that which was open:32:12 and I delivered the deed of the purchase to Baruch the son of Neriah, the son of Mahseiah, in the presence of Hanamel my uncle's son, and in the presence of the witnesses that subscribed the deed of the purchase, before all the Jews that sat in the court of the guard.32:13 And I charged Baruch before them, saying,32:14 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Take these deeds, this deed of the purchase which is sealed, and this deed which is open, and put them in an earthen vessel; that they may continue many days.32:15 For thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Houses and fields and vineyards shall yet again be bought in this land.32:16 Now after I had delivered the deed of the purchase to Baruch the son of Neriah, I prayed to Yahweh, saying,32:17 Ah Lord Yahweh! behold, you have made the heavens and the earth by your great power and by your outstretched arm; there is nothing too hard for you,32:18 who show lovingkindness to thousands, and recompense the iniquity of the fathers into the bosom of their children after them; the great, the mighty God, Yahweh of hosts is his name;32:19 great in counsel, and mighty in work; whose eyes are open upon all the ways of the sons of men, to give to every one according to his ways, and according to the fruit of his doings:32:20 who did set signs and wonders in the land of Egypt, even to this day, both in Israel and among other men; and made you a name, as at this day;32:21 and did bring forth your people Israel out of the land of Egypt with signs, and with wonders, and with a strong hand, and with an outstretched arm, and with great terror;32:22 and gave them this land, which you did swear to their fathers to give them, a land flowing with milk and honey;32:23 and they came in, and possessed it, but they obeyed not your voice, neither walked in your law; they have done nothing of all that you commanded them to do: therefore you have caused all this evil to come upon them.32:24 Behold, the mounds, they are come to the city to take it; and the city is given into the hand of the Chaldeans that fight against it, because of the sword, and of the famine, and of the pestilence; and what you have spoken is come to pass; and, behold, you see it.32:25 And you have said to me, O Lord Yahweh, Buy you the field for money, and call witnesses; whereas the city is given into the hand of the Chaldeans.32:26 Then came the word of Yahweh to Jeremiah, saying,32:27 Behold, I am Yahweh, the God of all flesh: is there anything too hard for me?32:28 Therefore thus says Yahweh: Behold, I will give this city into the hand of the Chaldeans, and into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and he shall take it:32:29 and the Chaldeans, that fight against this city, shall come and set this city on fire, and burn it, with the houses, upon whose roofs they have offered incense to Baal, and poured out drink offerings to other gods, to provoke me to anger.32:30 For the children of Israel and the children of Judah have done only that which was evil in my sight from their youth; for the children of Israel have only provoked me to anger with the work of their hands, says Yahweh.32:31 For this city has been to me a provocation of my anger and of my wrath from the day that they built it even to this day; that I should remove it from before my face,32:32 because of all the evil of the children of Israel and of the children of Judah, which they have done to provoke me to anger, they, their kings, their princes, their priests, and their prophets, and the men of Judah, and the inhabitants of Jerusalem.32:33 And they have turned to me the back, and not the face: and though I taught them, rising up early and teaching them, yet they have not hearkened to receive instruction.32:34 But they set their abominations in the house which is called by my name, to defile it.32:35 And they built the high places of Baal, which are in the valley of the son of Hinnom, to cause their sons and their daughters to pass through the fire to Molech; which I commanded them not, neither came it into my mind, that they should do this abomination, to cause Judah to sin.32:36 And now therefore thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, concerning this city, whereof ye say, It is given into the hand of the king of Babylon by the sword, and by the famine, and by the pestilence:32:37 Behold, I will gather them out of all the countries, whither I have driven them in my anger, and in my wrath, and in great indignation; and I will bring them again to this place, and I will cause them to dwell safely:32:38 and they shall be my people, and I will be their God:32:39 and I will give them one heart and one way, that they may fear me for ever, for the good of them, and of their children after them:32:40 and I will make an everlasting covenant with them, that I will not turn away from following them, to do them good; and I will put my fear in their hearts, that they may not depart from me.32:41 Yes, I will rejoice over them to do them good, and I will plant them in this land assuredly with my whole heart and with my whole soul.32:42 For thus says Yahweh: Like as I have brought all this great evil upon this people, so will I bring upon them all the good that I have promised them.32:43 And fields shall be bought in this land, whereof ye say, It is desolate, without man or beast; it is given into the hand of the Chaldeans.32:44 Men shall buy fields for money, and subscribe the deeds, and seal them, and call witnesses, in the land of Benjamin, and in the places about Jerusalem, and in the cities of Judah, and in the cities of the hill-country, and in the cities of the lowland, and in the cities of the South: for I will cause their captivity to return, says Yahweh.33:1 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to Jeremiah the second time, while he was yet shut up in the court of the guard, saying,33:2 Thus says Yahweh that does it, Yahweh that forms it to establish it; Yahweh is his name:33:3 Call to me, and I will answer you, and will show you great things, and difficult, which you know not.33:4 For thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, concerning the houses of this city, and concerning the houses of the kings of Judah, which are broken down to make a defence against the mounds and against the sword;33:5 while men come to fight with the Chaldeans, and to fill them with the dead bodies of men, whom I have slain in my anger and in my wrath, and for all whose wickedness I have hid my face from this city:33:6 Behold, I will bring it health and cure, and I will cure them; and I will reveal to them abundance of peace and truth.33:7 And I will cause the captivity of Judah and the captivity of Israel to return, and will build them, as at the first.33:8 And I will cleanse them from all their iniquity, whereby they have sinned against me; and I will pardon all their iniquities, whereby they have sinned against me, and whereby they have transgressed against me.33:9 And this city shall be to me for a name of joy, for a praise and for a glory, before all the nations of the earth, which shall hear all the good that I do to them, and shall fear and tremble for all the good and for all the peace that I procure to it.33:10 Thus says Yahweh: Yet again there shall be heard in this place, whereof ye say, It is waste, without man and without beast, even in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, that are desolate, without man and without inhabitant and without beast,33:11 the voice of joy and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom and the voice of the bride, the voice of them that say, Give thanks to Yahweh of hosts, for Yahweh is good, for his lovingkindness endures for ever; and of them that bring sacrifices of thanksgiving into the house of Yahweh.  For I will cause the captivity of the land to return as at the first, says Yahweh.33:12 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Yet again shall there be in this place, which is waste, without man and without beast, and in all the cities thereof, a habitation of shepherds causing their flocks to lie down.33:13 In the cities of the hill-country, in the cities of the lowland, and in the cities of the South, and in the land of Benjamin, and in the places about Jerusalem, and in the cities of Judah, shall the flocks again pass under the hands of him that numbers them, says Yahweh.33:14 Behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that I will perform that good word which I have spoken concerning the house of Israel and concerning the house of Judah.33:15 In those days, and at that time, will I cause a Branch of righteousness to grow up to David; and he shall execute justice and righteousness in the land.33:16 In those days shall Judah be saved, and Jerusalem shall dwell safely; and this is the name whereby she shall be called: Yahweh our righteousness.33:17 For thus says Yahweh: David shall never want a man to sit upon the throne of the house of Israel;33:18 neither shall the priests the Levites want a man before me to offer burnt offerings, and to burn meal offerings, and to do sacrifice continually.33:19 And the word of Yahweh came to Jeremiah, saying,33:20 Thus says Yahweh: If ye can break my covenant of the day, and my covenant of the night, so that there shall not be day and night in their season;33:21 then may also my covenant be broken with David my servant, that he shall not have a son to reign upon his throne; and with the Levites the priests, my ministers.33:22 As the host of heaven cannot be numbered, neither the sand of the sea measured; so will I multiply the seed of David my servant, and the Levites that minister to me.33:23 And the word of Yahweh came to Jeremiah, saying,33:24 Have you not considered what this people have spoken, saying, The two families which Yahweh did choose, he has cast them off?  thus do they despise my people, that they should be no more a nation before them.33:25 Thus says Yahweh: If my covenant of day and night stand not, if I have not appointed the ordinances of heaven and earth;33:26 then will I also cast away the seed of Jacob, and of David my servant, so that I will not take of his seed to be rulers over the seed of Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob: for I will cause their captivity to return, and will have mercy on them.34:1 The word which came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, when Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon, and all his army, and all the kingdoms of the earth that were under his dominion, and all the peoples, were fighting against Jerusalem, and against all the cities thereof, saying:34:2 Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Go, and speak to Zedekiah king of Judah, and tell him, Thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will give this city into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall burn it with fire:34:3 and you shall not escape out of his hand, but shall surely be taken, and delivered into his hand; and your eyes shall behold the eyes of the king of Babylon, and he shall speak with you mouth to mouth, and you shall go to Babylon.34:4 Yet hear the word of Yahweh, O Zedekiah king of Judah: thus says Yahweh concerning you, You shall not die by the sword;34:5 you shall die in peace; and with the burnings of your fathers, the former kings that were before you, so shall they make a burning for you; and they shall lament you, saying, ah Lord! for I have spoken the word, says Yahweh.34:6 Then Jeremiah the prophet spoke all these words to Zedekiah king of Judah in Jerusalem,34:7 when the king of Babylon's army was fighting against Jerusalem, and against all the cities of Judah that were left, against Lachish and against Azekah; for these alone remained of the cities of Judah as fortified cities.34:8 The word that came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, after that the king Zedekiah had made a covenant with all the people that were at Jerusalem, to proclaim liberty to them;34:9 that every man should let his man-servant, and every man his maid-servant, that is a Hebrew or a Hebrewess, go free; that none should make bondmen of them, that is, of a Jew his brother.34:10 And all the princes and all the people obeyed, that had entered into the covenant, that every one should let his man-servant, and every one his maid-servant, go free, that none should make bondmen of them any more; they obeyed, and let them go:34:11 but afterwards they turned, and caused the servants and the handmaids, whom they had let go free, to return, and brought them into subjection for servants and for handmaids.34:12 Therefore the word of Yahweh came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, saying,34:13 Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel: I made a covenant with your fathers in the day that I brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondage, saying,34:14 At the end of seven years ye shall let go every man his brother that is a Hebrew, that has been sold to you, and has served you six years, you shall let him go free from you: but your fathers hearkened not to me, neither inclined their ear.34:15 And ye were now turned, and had done that which is right in my eyes, in proclaiming liberty every man to his neighbor; and ye had made a covenant before me in the house which is called by my name:34:16 but ye turned and profaned my name, and caused every man his servant, and every man his handmaid, whom ye had let go free at their pleasure, to return; and ye brought them into subjection, to be to you for servants and for handmaids.34:17 Therefore thus says Yahweh: ye have not hearkened to me, to proclaim liberty, every man to his brother, and every man to his neighbor: behold, I proclaim to you a liberty, says Yahweh, to the sword, to the pestilence, and to the famine; and I will make you to be tossed to and fro among all the kingdoms of the earth.34:18 And I will give the men that have transgressed my covenant, that have not performed the words of the covenant which they made before me, when they cut the calf in twain and passed between the parts thereof;34:19 the princes of Judah, and the princes of Jerusalem, the eunuchs, and the priests, and all the people of the land, that passed between the parts of the calf;34:20 I will even give them into the hand of their enemies, and into the hand of them that seek their life; and their dead bodies shall be for food to the birds of the heavens, and to the beasts of the earth.34:21 And Zedekiah king of Judah and his princes will I give into the hand of their enemies, and into the hand of them that seek their life, and into the hand of the king of Babylon's army, that are gone away from you.34:22 Behold, I will command, says Yahweh, and cause them to return to this city; and they shall fight against it, and take it, and burn it with fire: and I will make the cities of Judah a desolation, without inhabitant.35:1 The word which came to Jeremiah from Yahweh in the days of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah, saying,35:2 Go to the house of the Rechabites, and speak to them, and bring them into the house of Yahweh, into one of the chambers, and give them wine to drink.35:3 Then I took Jaazaniah the son of Jeremiah, the son of Habazziniah, and his brethren, and all his sons, and the whole house of the Rechabites;35:4 and I brought them into the house of Yahweh, into the chamber of the sons of Hanan the son of Igdaliah, the man of God, which was by the chamber of the princes, which was above the chamber of Maaseiah the son of Shallum, the keeper of the threshold.35:5 And I set before the sons of the house of the Rechabites bowls full of wine, and cups; and I said to them, Drink ye wine.35:6 But they said, We will drink no wine; for Jonadab the son of Rechab, our father, commanded us, saying, You shall drink no wine, neither ye, nor your sons, for ever:35:7 neither shall ye build house, nor sow seed, nor plant vineyard, nor have any; but all your days ye shall dwell in tents; that ye may live many days in the land in which ye sojourn.35:8 And we have obeyed the voice of Jonadab the son of Rechab, our father, in all that he charged us, to drink no wine all our days, we, our wives, our sons, or our daughters;35:9 nor to build houses for us to dwell in; neither have we vineyard, nor field, nor seed:35:10 but we have dwelt in tents, and have obeyed, and done according to all that Jonadab our father commanded us.35:11 But it came to pass, when Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon came up into the land, that we said, Come, and let us go to Jerusalem for fear of the army of the Chaldeans, and for fear of the army of the Syrians; so we dwell at Jerusalem.35:12 Then came the word of Yahweh to Jeremiah, saying,35:13 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Go, and say to the men of Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem, Will ye not receive instruction to hearken to my words?  says Yahweh.35:14 The words of Jonadab the son of Rechab, that he commanded his sons, not to drink wine, are performed; and to this day they drink none, for they obey their father's commandment: but I have spoken to you, rising up early and speaking; and ye have not hearkened to me.35:15 I have sent also to you all my servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them, saying, Return ye now every man from his evil way, and amend your doings, and go not after other gods to serve them, and ye shall dwell in the land which I have given to you and to your fathers: but ye have not inclined your ear, nor hearkened to me.35:16 Forasmuch as the sons of Jonadab the son of Rechab have performed the commandment of their father which he commanded them, but this people has not hearkened to me;35:17 therefore thus says Yahweh, the God of hosts, the God of Israel: Behold, I will bring upon Judah and upon all the inhabitants of Jerusalem all the evil that I have pronounced against them; because I have spoken to them, but they have not heard; and I have called to them, but they have not answered.35:18 And Jeremiah said to the house of the Rechabites, Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Because ye have obeyed the commandment of Jonadab your father, and kept all his precepts, and done according to all that he commanded you;35:19 therefore thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Jonadab the son of Rechab shall not want a man to stand before me for ever.36:1 And it came to pass in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah, that this word came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, saying,36:2 Take you a roll of a book, and write therein all the words that I have spoken to you against Israel, and against Judah, and against all the nations, from the day I spoke to you, from the days of Josiah, even to this day.36:3 It may be that the house of Judah will hear all the evil which I purpose to do to them; that they may return every man from his evil way; that I may forgive their iniquity and their sin.36:4 Then Jeremiah called Baruch the son of Neriah; and Baruch wrote from the mouth of Jeremiah all the words of Yahweh, which he had spoken to him, upon a roll of a book.36:5 And Jeremiah commanded Baruch, saying, I am shut up; I cannot go into the house of Yahweh:36:6 therefore go you, and read in the roll, which you have written from my mouth, the words of Yahweh in the ears of the people in Yahweh's house upon the fast-day; and also you shall read them in the ears of all Judah that come out of their cities.36:7 It may be they will present their supplication before Yahweh, and will return every one from his evil way; for great is the anger and the wrath that Yahweh has pronounced against this people.36:8 And Baruch the son of Neriah did according to all that Jeremiah the prophet commanded him, reading in the book the words of Yahweh in Yahweh's house.36:9 Now it came to pass in the fifth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah, in the ninth month, that all the people in Jerusalem, and all the people that came from the cities of Judah to Jerusalem, proclaimed a fast before Yahweh.36:10 Then read Baruch in the book the words of Jeremiah in the house of Yahweh, in the chamber of Gemariah the son of Shaphan, the scribe, in the upper court, at the entry of the new gate of Yahweh's house, in the ears of all the people.36:11 And when Micaiah the son of Gemariah, the son of Shaphan, had heard out of the book all the words of Yahweh,36:12 he went down into the king's house, into the scribe's chamber: and, lo, all the princes were sitting there, that is, Elishama the scribe, and Delaiah the son of Shemaiah, and Elnathan the son of Achbor, and Gemariah the son of Shaphan, and Zedekiah the son of Hananiah, and all the princes.36:13 Then Micaiah declared to them all the words that he had heard, when Baruch read the book in the ears of the people.36:14 Therefore all the princes sent Jehudi the son of Nethaniah, the son of Shelemiah, the son of Cushi, to Baruch, saying, Take in your hand the roll in which you have read in the ears of the people, and come.  So Baruch the son of Neriah took the roll in his hand, and came to them.36:15 And they said to him, Sit down now, and read it in our ears.  So Baruch read it in their ears.36:16 Now it came to pass, when they had heard all the words, they turned in fear one toward another, and said to Baruch, We will surely tell the king of all these words.36:17 And they asked Baruch, saying, Tell us now, How did you write all these words at his mouth?36:18 Then Baruch answered them, He pronounced all these words to me with his mouth, and I wrote them with ink in the book.36:19 Then said the princes to Baruch, Go, hide you, you and Jeremiah; and let no man know where ye are.36:20 And they went in to the king into the court; but they had laid up the roll in the chamber of Elishama the scribe; and they told all the words in the ears of the king.36:21 So the king sent Jehudi to fetch the roll; and he took it out of the chamber of Elishama the scribe.  And Jehudi read it in the ears of the king, and in the ears of all the princes that stood beside the king.36:22 Now the king was sitting in the winter-house in the ninth month: and there was a fire in the brazier burning before him.36:23 And it came to pass, when Jehudi had read three or four leaves, that the king cut it with the penknife, and cast it into the fire that was in the brazier, until all the roll was consumed in the fire that was in the brazier.36:24 And they were not afraid, nor rent their garments, neither the king, nor any of his servants that heard all these words.36:25 Moreover Elnathan and Delaiah and Gemariah had made intercession to the king that he would not burn the roll; but he would not hear them.36:26 And the king commanded Jerahmeel the king's son, and Seraiah the son of Azriel, and Shelemiah the son of Abdeel, to take Baruch the scribe and Jeremiah the prophet; but Yahweh hid them.36:27 Then the word of Yahweh came to Jeremiah, after that the king had burned the roll, and the words which Baruch wrote at the mouth of Jeremiah, saying,36:28 Take you again another roll, and write in it all the former words that were in the first roll, which Jehoiakim the king of Judah has burned.36:29 And concerning Jehoiakim king of Judah you shall say, Thus says Yahweh: You have burned this roll, saying, Why have you written therein, saying, The king of Babylon shall certainly come and destroy this land, and shall cause to cease from there man and beast?36:30 Therefore thus says Yahweh concerning Jehoiakim king of Judah: He shall have none to sit upon the throne of David; and his dead body shall be cast out in the day to the heat, and in the night to the frost.36:31 And I will punish him and his seed and his servants for their iniquity; and I will bring upon them, and upon the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and upon the men of Judah, all the evil that I have pronounced against them, but they hearkened not.36:32 Then took Jeremiah another roll, and gave it to Baruch the scribe, the son of Neriah, who wrote therein from the mouth of Jeremiah all the words of the book which Jehoiakim king of Judah had burned in the fire; and there were added besides to them many like words.37:1 And Zedekiah the son of Josiah reigned as king, instead of Coniah the son of Jehoiakim, whom Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon made king in the land of Judah.37:2 But neither he, nor his servants, nor the people of the land, did hearken to the words of Yahweh, which he spoke by the prophet Jeremiah.37:3 And Zedekiah the king sent Jehucal the son of Shelemiah, and Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah, the priest, to the prophet Jeremiah, saying, Pray now to Yahweh our God for us.37:4 Now Jeremiah came in and went out among the people; for they had not put him into prison.37:5 And Pharaoh's army was come forth out of Egypt; and when the Chaldeans that were besieging Jerusalem heard tidings of them, they broke up from Jerusalem.37:6 Then came the word of Yahweh to the prophet Jeremiah, saying,37:7 Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, Thus shall ye say to the king of Judah, that sent you to me to inquire of me: Behold, Pharaoh's army, which is come forth to help you, shall return to Egypt into their own land.37:8 And the Chaldeans shall come again, and fight against this city; and they shall take it, and burn it with fire.37:9 Thus says Yahweh, Deceive not yourselves, saying, The Chaldeans shall surely depart from us; for they shall not depart.37:10 For though ye had smitten the whole army of the Chaldeans that fight against you, and there remained but wounded men among them, yes would they rise up every man in his tent, and burn this city with fire.37:11 And it came to pass that, when the army of the Chaldeans was broken up from Jerusalem for fear of Pharaoh's army,37:12 then Jeremiah went forth out of Jerusalem to go into the land of Benjamin, to receive his portion there, in the midst of the people.37:13 And when he was in the gate of Benjamin, a captain of the ward was there, whose name was Irijah, the son of Shelemiah, the son of Hananiah; and he laid hold on Jeremiah the prophet, saying, You are falling away to the Chaldeans.37:14 Then said Jeremiah, It is false; I am not falling away to the Chaldeans.  But he hearkened not to him; so Irijah laid hold on Jeremiah, and brought him to the princes.37:15 And the princes were angry with Jeremiah, and smote him, and put him in prison in the house of Jonathan the scribe; for they had made that the prison.37:16 When Jeremiah was come into the dungeon-house, and into the cells, and Jeremiah had remained there many days;37:17 Then Zedekiah the king sent, and fetched him: and the king asked him secretly in his house, and said, Is there any word from Yahweh?  And Jeremiah said, There is.  He said also, You shall be delivered into the hand of the king of Babylon.37:18 Moreover Jeremiah said to king Zedekiah, In what way have I sinned against you, or against your servants, or against this people, that ye have put me in prison?37:19 Where now are your prophets that prophesied to you, saying, The king of Babylon shall not come against you, nor against this land?37:20 And now hear, I pray you, O my lord the king: let my supplication, I pray you, be presented before you, that you cause me not to return to the house of Jonathan the scribe, lest I die there.37:21 Then Zedekiah the king commanded, and they committed Jeremiah into the court of the guard; and they gave him daily a loaf of bread out of the bakers' street, until all the bread in the city was spent.  Thus Jeremiah remained in the court of the guard.38:1 And Shephatiah the son of Mattan, and Gedaliah the son of Pashhur, and Jucal the son of Shelemiah, and Pashhur the son of Malchijah, heard the words that Jeremiah spoke to all the people, saying,38:2 Thus says Yahweh, He that abides in this city shall die by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence; but he that goes forth to the Chaldeans shall live, and his life shall be to him for a prey, and he shall live.38:3 Thus says Yahweh, This city shall surely be given into the hand of the army of the king of Babylon, and he shall take it.38:4 Then the princes said to the king, Let this man, we pray you, be put to death; forasmuch as he weakens the hands of the men of war that remain in this city, and the hands of all the people, in speaking such words to them: for this man seeks not the welfare of this people, but the hurt.38:5 And Zedekiah the king said, Behold, he is in your hand; for the king is not he that can do anything against you.38:6 Then took they Jeremiah, and cast him into the dungeon of Malchijah the king's son, that was in the court of the guard: and they let down Jeremiah with cords.  And in the dungeon there was no water, but mire; and Jeremiah sank in the mire.38:7 Now when Ebed-melech the Ethiopian, a eunuch, who was in the king's house, heard that they had put Jeremiah in the dungeon (the king then sitting in the gate of Benjamin,)38:8 Ebed-melech went forth out of the king's house, and spoke to the king, saying,38:9 My lord the king, these men have done evil in all that they have done to Jeremiah the prophet, whom they have cast into the dungeon; and he is like to die in the place where he is, because of the famine; for there is no more bread in the city.38:10 Then the king commanded Ebed-melech the Ethiopian, saying, Take from here thirty men with you, and take up Jeremiah the prophet out of the dungeon, before he die.38:11 So Ebed-melech took the men with him, and went into the house of the king under the treasury, and took there rags and worn-out garments, and let them down by cords into the dungeon to Jeremiah.38:12 And Ebed-melech the Ethiopian said to Jeremiah, Put now these rags and worn-out garments under your armholes under the cords.  And Jeremiah did so.38:13 So they drew up Jeremiah with the cords, and took him up out of the dungeon: and Jeremiah remained in the court of the guard.38:14 Then Zedekiah the king sent, and took Jeremiah the prophet to him into the third entry that is in the house of Yahweh: and the king said to Jeremiah, I will ask you a thing; hide nothing from me.38:15 Then Jeremiah said to Zedekiah, If I declare it to you, will you not surely put me to death?  and if I give you counsel, you will not hearken to me.38:16 So Zedekiah the king swore secretly to Jeremiah, saying, as Yahweh lives, that made us this soul, I will not put you to death, neither will I give you into the hand of these men that seek your life.38:17 Then said Jeremiah to Zedekiah, Thus says Yahweh, the God of hosts, the God of Israel: If you will go forth to the king of Babylon's princes, then your soul shall live, and this city shall not be burned with fire; and you shall live, and your house.38:18 But if you will not go forth to the king of Babylon's princes, then shall this city be given into the hand of the Chaldeans, and they shall burn it with fire, and you shall not escape out of their hand.38:19 And Zedekiah the king said to Jeremiah, I am afraid of the Jews that are fallen away to the Chaldeans, lest they deliver me into their hand, and they mock me.38:20 But Jeremiah said, They shall not deliver you.  Obey, I beseech you, the voice of Yahweh, in that which I speak to you: so it shall be well with you, and your soul shall live.38:21 But if you refuse to go forth, this is the word that Yahweh has shown me:38:22 behold, all the women that are left in the king of Judah's house shall be brought forth to the king of Babylon's princes, and those women shall say, Your familiar friends have set you on, and have prevailed over you: now that your feet are sunk in the mire, they are turned away back.38:23 And they shall bring out all your wives and your children to the Chaldeans; and you shall not escape out of their hand, but shall be taken by the hand of the king of Babylon: and you shall cause this city to be burned with fire.38:24 Then said Zedekiah to Jeremiah, Let no man know of these words, and you shall not die.38:25 But if the princes hear that I have talked with you, and they come to you, and say to you, Declare to us now what you have said to the king; hide it not from us, and we will not put you to death; also what the king said to you:38:26 then you shall say to them, I presented my supplication before the king, that he would not cause me to return to Jonathan's house, to die there.38:27 Then came all the princes to Jeremiah, and asked him; and he told them according to all these words that the king had commanded.  So they left off speaking with him; for the matter was not perceived.38:28 So Jeremiah abode in the court of the guard until the day that Jerusalem was taken.39:1 And it came to pass when Jerusalem was taken, (in the ninth year of Zedekiah king of Judah, in the tenth month, came Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon and all his army against Jerusalem, and besieged it;39:2 in the eleventh year of Zedekiah, in the fourth month, the ninth day of the month, a breach was made in the city,)39:3 that all the princes of the king of Babylon came in, and sat in the middle gate, that is, Nergal-sharezer, Samgar-nebo, Sarsechim, Rab-saris, Nergal-sharezer, Rab-mag, with all the rest of the princes of the king of Babylon.39:4 And it came to pass that, when Zedekiah the king of Judah and all the men of war saw them, then they fled, and went forth out of the city by night, by the way of the king's garden, through the gate between the two walls; and he went out toward the Arabah.39:5 But the army of the Chaldeans pursued after them, and overtook Zedekiah in the plains of Jericho: and when they had taken him, they brought him up to Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon to Riblah in the land of Hamath; and he gave judgment upon him.39:6 Then the king of Babylon slew the sons of Zedekiah in Riblah before his eyes: also the king of Babylon slew all the nobles of Judah.39:7 Moreover he put out Zedekiah's eyes, and bound him in fetters, to carry him to Babylon.39:8 And the Chaldeans burned the king's house, and the houses of the people, with fire, and broke down the walls of Jerusalem.39:9 Then Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard carried away captive into Babylon the residue of the people that remained in the city, the deserters also that fell away to him, and the residue of the people that remained.39:10 But Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard left of the poor of the people, that had nothing, in the land of Judah, and gave them vineyards and fields at the same time.39:11 Now Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon gave charge concerning Jeremiah to Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard, saying,39:12 Take him, and look well to him, and do him no harm; but do to him even as he shall say to you.39:13 So Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard sent, and Nebushazban, Rab-saris, and Nergal-sharezer, Rab-mag, and all the chief officers of the king of Babylon;39:14 they sent, and took Jeremiah out of the court of the guard, and committed him to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam, the son of Shaphan, that he should carry him home: so he dwelt among the people.39:15 Now the word of Yahweh came to Jeremiah, while he was shut up in the court of the guard, saying,39:16 Go, and speak to Ebed-melech the Ethiopian, saying, Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Behold, I will bring my words upon this city for evil, and not for good; and they shall be accomplished before you in that day.39:17 But I will deliver you in that day, says Yahweh; and you shall not be given into the hand of the men of whom you are afraid.39:18 For I will surely save you, and you shall not fall by the sword, but your life shall be for a prey to you; because you have put your trust in me, says Yahweh.40:1 The word which came to Jeremiah from Yahweh, after that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had let him go from Ramah, when he had taken him being bound in chains among all the captives of Jerusalem and Judah, that were carried away captive to Babylon.40:2 And the captain of the guard took Jeremiah, and said to him, Yahweh your God pronounced this evil upon this place;40:3 and Yahweh has brought it, and done according as he spoke: because ye have sinned against Yahweh, and have not obeyed his voice, therefore this thing is come upon you.40:4 And now, behold, I loose you this day from the chains which are upon your hand.  If it seem good to you to come with me into Babylon, come, and I will look well to you; but if it seem ill to you to come with me into Babylon, forbear: behold, all the land is before you; whither it seems good and right to you to go, there go.40:5 Now while he was not yet gone back, Go back then, said he, to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam, the son of Shaphan, whom the king of Babylon has made governor over the cities of Judah, and dwell with him among the people; or go wheresoever it seems right to you to go.  So the captain of the guard gave him victuals and a present, and let him go.40:6 Then went Jeremiah to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam to Mizpah, and dwelt with him among the people that were left in the land.40:7 Now when all the captains of the forces that were in the fields, even they and their men, heard that the king of Babylon had made Gedaliah the son of Ahikam governor in the land, and had committed to him men, and women, and children, and of the poorest of the land, of them that were not carried away captive to Babylon;40:8 then they came to Gedaliah to Mizpah, that is, Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and Johanan and Jonathan the sons of Kareah, and Seraiah the son of Tanhumeth, and the sons of Ephai the Netophathite, and Jezaniah the son of the Maacathite, they and their men.40:9 And Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan swore to them and to their men, saying, Fear not to serve the Chaldeans: dwell in the land, and serve the king of Babylon, and it shall be well with you.40:10 As for me, behold, I will dwell at Mizpah, to stand before the Chaldeans that shall come to us: but ye, gather ye wine and summer fruits and oil, and put them in your vessels, and dwell in your cities that ye have taken.40:11 Likewise when all the Jews that were in Moab, and among the children of Ammon, and in Edom, and that were in all the countries, heard that the king of Babylon had left a remnant of Judah, and that he had set over them Gedaliah the son of Ahikam, the son of Shaphan;40:12 then all the Jews returned out of all places whither they were driven, and came to the land of Judah, to Gedaliah, to Mizpah, and gathered wine and summer fruits very much.40:13 Moreover Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were in the fields, came to Gedaliah to Mizpah,40:14 and said to him, Do you know that Baalis the king of the children of Ammon has sent Ishmael the son of Nethaniah to take your life?  But Gedaliah the son of Ahikam believed them not.40:15 Then Johanan the son of Kareah spoke to Gedaliah in Mizpah secretly, saying, Let me go, I pray you, and I will slay Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and no man shall know it: why should he take your life, that all the Jews that are gathered to you should be scattered, and the remnant of Judah perish?40:16 But Gedaliah the son of Ahikam said to Johanan the son of Kareah, You shall not do this thing; for you speak falsely of Ishmael.41:1 Now it came to pass in the seventh month, that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, the son of Elishama, of the seed royal and one of the chief officers of the king, and ten men with him, came to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam to Mizpah; and there they did eat bread together in Mizpah.41:2 Then arose Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and the ten men that were with him, and smote Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan with the sword, and slew him, whom the king of Babylon had made governor over the land.41:3 Ishmael also slew all the Jews that were with him, that is, with Gedaliah, at Mizpah, and the Chaldeans that were found there, the men of war.41:4 And it came to pass the second day after he had slain Gedaliah, and no man knew it,41:5 that there came men from Shechem, from Shiloh, and from Samaria, even eighty men, having their beards shaven and their clothes rent, and having cut themselves, with meal offerings and frankincense in their hand, to bring them to the house of Yahweh.41:6 And Ishmael the son of Nethaniah went forth from Mizpah to meet them, weeping all along as he went: and it came to pass, as he met them, he said to them, Come to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam.41:7 And it was so, when they came into the midst of the city, that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah slew them, and cast them into the midst of the pit, he, and the men that were with him.41:8 But ten men were found among them that said to Ishmael, Slay us not; for we have stores hidden in the field, of wheat, and of barley, and of oil, and of honey.  So he forbare, and slew them not among their brethren.41:9 Now the pit in which Ishmael cast all the dead bodies of the men whom he had slain, by the side of Gedaliah (the same was that which Asa the king had made for fear of Baasha king of Israel,) Ishmael the son of Nethaniah filled it with them that were slain.41:10 Then Ishmael carried away captive all the residue of the people that were in Mizpah, even the king's daughters, and all the people that remained in Mizpah, whom Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had committed to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam; Ishmael the son of Nethaniah carried them away captive, and departed to go over to the children of Ammon.41:11 But when Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, heard of all the evil that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah had done,41:12 then they took all the men, and went to fight with Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and found him by the great waters that are in Gibeon.41:13 Now it came to pass that, when all the people that were with Ishmael saw Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, then they were glad.41:14 So all the people that Ishmael had carried away captive from Mizpah turned about and came back, and went to Johanan the son of Kareah.41:15 But Ishmael the son of Nethaniah escaped from Johanan with eight men, and went to the children of Ammon.41:16 Then took Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, all the remnant of the people whom he had recovered from Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, from Mizpah, after that he had slain Gedaliah the son of Ahikam, that is, the men of war, and the women, and the children, and the eunuchs, whom he had brought back from Gibeon:41:17 and they departed, and dwelt in Geruth Chimham, which is by Beth-lehem, to go to enter into Egypt,41:18 because of the Chaldeans; for they were afraid of them, because Ishmael the son of Nethaniah had slain Gedaliah the son of Ahikam, whom the king of Babylon made governor over the land.42:1 Then all the captains of the forces, and Johanan the son of Kareah, and Jezaniah the son of Hoshaiah, and all the people from the least even to the greatest, came near,42:2 and said to Jeremiah the prophet, Let, we pray you, our supplication be presented before you, and pray for us to Yahweh your God, even for all this remnant; for we are left but a few of many, as your eyes do behold us:42:3 that Yahweh your God may show us the way in which we should walk, and the thing that we should do.42:4 Then Jeremiah the prophet said to them, I have heard you; behold, I will pray to Yahweh your God according to your words; and it shall come to pass that whatsoever thing Yahweh shall answer you, I will declare it to you; I will keep nothing back from you.42:5 Then they said to Jeremiah, Yahweh be a true and faithful witness amongst us, if we do not according to all the word with which Yahweh your God shall send you to us.42:6 Whether it be good, or whether it be evil, we will obey the voice of Yahweh our God, to whom we send you; that it may be well with us, when we obey the voice of Yahweh our God.42:7 And it came to pass after ten days, that the word of Yahweh came to Jeremiah.42:8 Then called he Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, and all the people from the least even to the greatest,42:9 and said to them, Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, to whom ye sent me to present your supplication before him:42:10 If ye will still abide in this land, then will I build you, and not pull you down, and I will plant you, and not pluck you up; for I repent me of the evil that I have done to you.42:11 Be not afraid of the king of Babylon, of whom ye are afraid; be not afraid of him, says Yahweh: for I am with you to save you, and to deliver you from his hand.42:12 And I will grant you mercy, that he may have mercy upon you, and cause you to return to your own land.42:13 But if ye say, We will not dwell in this land; so that ye obey not the voice of Yahweh your God,42:14 saying, No; but we will go into the land of Egypt, where we shall see no war, nor hear the sound of the trumpet, nor have hunger of bread; and there will we dwell:42:15 now therefore hear ye the word of Yahweh, O remnant of Judah: Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, If ye indeed set your faces to enter into Egypt, and go to sojourn there;42:16 then it shall come to pass, that the sword, which ye fear, shall overtake you there in the land of Egypt; and the famine, whereof ye are afraid, shall follow hard after you there in Egypt; and there ye shall die.42:17 So shall it be with all the men that set their faces to go into Egypt to sojourn there: they shall die by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence; and none of them shall remain or escape from the evil that I will bring upon them.42:18 For thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: As my anger and my wrath has been poured forth upon the inhabitants of Jerusalem, so shall my wrath be poured forth upon you, when ye shall enter into Egypt; and ye shall be an execration, and an astonishment, and a curse, and a reproach; and ye shall see this place no more.42:19 Yahweh has spoken concerning you, O remnant of Judah, Go ye not into Egypt: know certainly that I have testified to you this day.42:20 For ye have dealt deceitfully against your own souls; for ye sent me to Yahweh your God, saying, Pray for us to Yahweh our God; and according to all that Yahweh our God shall say, so declare to us, and we will do it:42:21 and I have this day declared it to you; but ye have not obeyed the voice of Yahweh your God in anything for which he has sent me to you.42:22 Now therefore know certainly that ye shall die by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence, in the place whither ye desire to go to sojourn there.43:1 And it came to pass that, when Jeremiah had made an end of speaking to all the people all the words of Yahweh their God, with which Yahweh their God had sent him to them, even all these words,43:2 then spoke Azariah the son of Hoshaiah, and Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the proud men, saying to Jeremiah, You speak falsely: Yahweh our God has not sent you to say, You shall not go into Egypt to sojourn there;43:3 but Baruch the son of Neriah sets you on against us, to deliver us into the hand of the Chaldeans, that they may put us to death, and carry us away captive to Babylon.43:4 So Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, and all the people, obeyed not the voice of Yahweh, to dwell in the land of Judah.43:5 But Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, took all the remnant of Judah, that were returned from all the nations whither they had been driven, to sojourn in the land of Judah;43:6 the men, and the women, and the children, and the king's daughters, and every person that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had left with Gedaliah the son of Ahikam, the son of Shaphan; and Jeremiah the prophet, and Baruch the son of Neriah;43:7 and they came into the land of Egypt; for they obeyed not the voice of Yahweh: and they came to Tahpanhes.43:8 Then came the word of Yahweh to Jeremiah in Tahpanhes, saying,43:9 Take great stones in your hand, and hide them in mortar in the brickwork, which is at the entry of Pharaoh's house in Tahpanhes, in the sight of the men of Judah;43:10 and say to them, Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Behold, I will send and take Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon, my servant, and will set his throne upon these stones that I have hid; and he shall spread his royal pavilion over them.43:11 And he shall come, and shall smite the land of Egypt; such as are for death shall be given to death, and such as are for captivity to captivity, and such as are for the sword to the sword.43:12 And I will kindle a fire in the houses of the gods of Egypt; and he shall burn them, and carry them away captive: and he shall array himself with the land of Egypt, as a shepherd puts on his garment; and he shall go forth from there in peace.43:13 He shall also break the pillars of Beth-shemesh, that is in the land of Egypt; and the houses of the gods of Egypt shall he burn with fire.44:1 The word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the Jews that dwelt in the land of Egypt, that dwelt at Migdol, and at Tahpanhes, and at Memphis, and in the country of Pathros, saying,44:2 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: You have seen all the evil that I have brought upon Jerusalem, and upon all the cities of Judah; and, behold, this day they are a desolation, and no man dwells therein,44:3 because of their wickedness which they have committed to provoke me to anger, in that they went to burn incense, and to serve other gods, that they knew not, neither they, nor ye, nor your fathers.44:4 Yet I would send to you all my servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them, saying, Oh, do not this abominable thing that I hate.44:5 But they hearkened not, nor inclined their ear to turn from their wickedness, to burn no incense to other gods.44:6 Wherefore my wrath and my anger was poured forth, and was kindled in the cities of Judah and in the streets of Jerusalem; and they are wasted and desolate, as it is this day.44:7 Therefore now thus says Yahweh, the God of hosts, the God of Israel: Why commit ye this great evil against your own souls, to cut off from you man and woman, infant and suckling, out of the midst of Judah, to leave you none remaining;44:8 in that ye provoke me to anger with the works of your hands, burning incense to other gods in the land of Egypt, whither ye are gone to sojourn; that ye may be cut off, and that ye may be a curse and a reproach among all the nations of the earth?44:9 Have ye forgotten the wickedness of your fathers, and the wickedness of the kings of Judah, and the wickedness of their wives, and your own wickedness, and the wickedness of your wives which they committed in the land of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem?44:10 They are not humbled even to this day, neither have they feared, nor walked in my law, nor in my statutes, that I set before you and before your fathers.44:11 Therefore thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Behold, I will set my face against you for evil, even to cut off all Judah.44:12 And I will take the remnant of Judah, that have set their faces to go into the land of Egypt to sojourn there, and they shall all be consumed; in the land of Egypt shall they fall; they shall be consumed by the sword and by the famine; they shall die, from the least even to the greatest, by the sword and by the famine; and they shall be an execration, and an astonishment, and a curse, and a reproach.44:13 For I will punish them that dwell in the land of Egypt, as I have punished Jerusalem, by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence;44:14 so that none of the remnant of Judah, that are gone into the land of Egypt to sojourn there, shall escape or be left, to return into the land of Judah, to which they have a desire to return to dwell there: for none shall return save such as shall escape.44:15 Then all the men who knew that their wives burned incense to other gods, and all the women that stood by, a great assembly, even all the people that dwelt in the land of Egypt, in Pathros, answered Jeremiah, saying,44:16 As for the word that you have spoken to us in the name of Yahweh, we will not hearken to you.44:17 But we will certainly perform every word that is gone forth out of our mouth, to burn incense to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings to her, as we have done, we and our fathers, our kings and our princes, in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem; for then had we plenty of victuals, and were well, and saw no evil.44:18 But since we left off burning incense to the queen of heaven, and pouring out drink offerings to her, we have wanted all things, and have been consumed by the sword and by the famine.44:19 And when we burned incense to the queen of heaven, and poured out drink offerings to her, did we make her cakes to worship her, and pour out drink offerings to her, without our husbands?44:20 Then Jeremiah said to all the people, to the men, and to the women, even to all the people that had given him that answer, saying,44:21 The incense that ye burned in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, ye and your fathers, your kings and your princes, and the people of the land, did not Yahweh remember them, and came it not into his mind?44:22 so that Yahweh could not longer bear, because of the evil of your doings, and because of the abominations which ye have committed; therefore is your land become a desolation, and an astonishment, and a curse, without inhabitant, as it is this day.44:23 Because ye have burned incense, and because ye have sinned against Yahweh, and have not obeyed the voice of Yahweh, nor walked in his law, nor in his statutes, nor in his testimonies; therefore this evil is happened to you, as it is this day.44:24 Moreover Jeremiah said to all the people, and to all the women, Hear the word of Yahweh, all Judah that are in the land of Egypt:44:25 Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, saying, You and your wives have both spoken with your mouths, and with your hands have fulfilled it, saying, We will surely perform our vows that we have vowed, to burn incense to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings to her: establish then your vows, and perform your vows.44:26 Therefore hear ye the word of Yahweh, all Judah that dwell in the land of Egypt: Behold, I have sworn by my great name, says Yahweh, that my name shall no more be named in the mouth of any man of Judah in all the land of Egypt, saying, as the Lord Yahweh lives.44:27 Behold, I watch over them for evil, and not for good; and all the men of Judah that are in the land of Egypt shall be consumed by the sword and by the famine, until there be an end of them.44:28 And they that escape the sword shall return out of the land of Egypt into the land of Judah, few in number; and all the remnant of Judah, that are gone into the land of Egypt to sojourn there, shall know whose word shall stand, mine, or theirs.44:29 And this shall be the sign to you, says Yahweh, that I will punish you in this place, that ye may know that my words shall surely stand against you for evil:44:30 Thus says Yahweh, Behold, I will give Pharaoh Hophra king of Egypt into the hand of his enemies, and into the hand of them that seek his life; as I gave Zedekiah king of Judah into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, who was his enemy, and sought his life.45:1 The word that Jeremiah the prophet spoke to Baruch the son of Neriah, when he wrote these word in a book at the mouth of Jeremiah, in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah, saying,45:2 Thus says Yahweh, the God of Israel, to you, O Baruch:45:3 You did say, Woe is me now! for Yahweh has added sorrow to my pain; I am weary with my groaning, and I find no rest.45:4 Thus shall you say to him, Thus says Yahweh: Behold, that which I have built will I break down, and that which I have planted I will pluck up; and this in the whole land.45:5 And seek you great things for yourself?  seek them not; for, behold, I will bring evil upon all flesh, says Yahweh; but your life will I give to you for a prey in all places whither you go.46:1 The word of Yahweh which came to Jeremiah the prophet concerning the nations.46:2 Of Egypt: concerning the army of Pharaoh-neco king of Egypt, which was by the river Euphrates in Carchemish, which Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon smote in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah, king of Judah.46:3 Prepare ye the buckler and shield, and draw near to battle.46:4 Harness the horses, and get up, ye horsemen, and stand forth with your helmets; furbish the spears, put on the coats of mail.46:5 Why have I seen it?  they are dismayed and are turned backward; and their mighty ones are beaten down, and are fled apace, and look not back: terror is on every side, says Yahweh.46:6 Let not the swift flee away, nor the mighty man escape; in the north by the river Euphrates have they stumbled and fallen.46:7 Who is this that rises up like the Nile, whose waters toss themselves like the rivers?46:8 Egypt rises up like the Nile, and his waters toss themselves like the rivers: and he says, I will rise up, I will cover the earth; I will destroy cities and the inhabitants thereof.46:9 Go up, ye horses; and rage, ye chariots; and let the mighty men go forth: Cush and Put,  that handle the shield; and the Ludim,  that handle and bend the bow.46:10 For that day is a day of the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, a day of vengeance, that he may avenge him of his adversaries: and the sword shall devour and be satiated, and shall drink its fill of their blood; for the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, has a sacrifice in the north country by the river Euphrates.46:11 Go up into Gilead, and take balm, O virgin daughter of Egypt: in vain do you use many medicines; there is no healing for you.46:12 The nations have heard of your shame, and the earth is full of your cry; for the mighty man has stumbled against the mighty, they are fallen both of them together.46:13 The word that Yahweh spoke to Jeremiah the prophet, how that Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon should come and smite the land of Egypt.46:14 Declare ye in Egypt, and publish in Migdol, and publish in Memphis and in Tahpanhes: say ye, Stand forth, and prepare you; for the sword has devoured round about you.46:15 Why are your strong ones swept away?  they stood not, because Yahweh did drive them.46:16 He made many to stumble, yes, they fell one upon another: and they said, arise, and let us go again to our own people, and to the land of our nativity, from the oppressing sword.46:17 They cried there, Pharaoh king of Egypt is but a noise; he has let the appointed time pass by.46:18 As I live, says the King, whose name is Yahweh of hosts, surely like Tabor among the mountains, and like Carmel by the sea, so shall he come.46:19 O you daughter that dwell in Egypt, furnish yourself to go into captivity; for Memphis shall become a desolation, and shall be burnt up, without inhabitant.46:20 Egypt is a very fair heifer; but destruction out of the north is come, it is come.46:21 Also her hired men in the midst of her are like calves of the stall; for they also are turned back, they are fled away together, they did not stand: for the day of their calamity is come upon them, the time of their visitation.46:22 The sound thereof shall go like the serpent; for they shall march with an army, and come against her with axes, as hewers of wood.46:23 They shall cut down her forest, says Yahweh, though it cannot be searched; because they are more than the locusts, and are innumerable.46:24 The daughter of Egypt shall be put to shame; she shall be delivered into the hand of the people of the north.46:25 Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, says: Behold, I will punish Amon of No, and Pharaoh, and Egypt, with her gods, and her kings; even Pharaoh, and them that trust in him:46:26 and I will deliver them into the hand of those that seek their lives, and into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of his servants; and afterwards it shall be inhabited, as in the days of old, says Yahweh.46:27 But fear not you, O Jacob my servant, neither be dismayed, O Israel: for, lo, I will save you from afar, and your seed from the land of their captivity; and Jacob shall return, and shall be quiet and at ease, and none shall make him afraid.46:28 Fear not you, O Jacob my servant, says Yahweh; for I am with you: for I will make a full end of all the nations whither I have driven you; but I will not make a full end of you, but I will correct you in measure, and will in no wise leave you unpunished.47:1 The word of Yahweh that came to Jeremiah the prophet concerning the Philistines, before that Pharaoh smote Gaza.47:2 Thus says Yahweh: Behold, waters rise up out of the north, and shall become an overflowing stream, and shall overflow the land and all that is therein, the city and them that dwell therein; and the men shall cry, and all the inhabitants of the land shall wail.47:3 At the noise of the stamping of the hoofs of his strong ones, at the rushing of his chariots, at the rumbling of his wheels, the fathers look not back to their children for feebleness of hands;47:4 because of the day that comes to destroy all the Philistines, to cut off from Tyre and Sidon every helper that remains: for Yahweh will destroy the Philistines, the remnant of the isle of Caphtor.47:5 Baldness is come upon Gaza; Ashkelon is brought to nought, the remnant of their valley: how long will you cut yourself?47:6 O you sword of Yahweh, how long will it be until you are quiet?  put yourself up into your scabbard; rest, and be still.47:7 How can you be quiet, seeing Yahweh has given you a charge?  Against Ashkelon, and against the sea-shore, there has he appointed it.48:1 Of Moab.  Thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Woe to Nebo! for it is laid waste; Kiriathaim is put to shame, it is taken; Misgab is put to shame and broken down.48:2 The praise of Moab is no more; in Heshbon they have devised evil against her: Come, and let us cut her off from being a nation.  You also, O Madmen, shall be brought to silence: the sword shall pursue you.48:3 The sound of a cry from Horonaim, desolation and great destruction!48:4 Moab is destroyed; her little ones have caused a cry to be heard.48:5 For by the ascent of Luhith with continual weeping shall they go up; for at the descent of Horonaim they have heard the distress of the cry of destruction.48:6 Flee, save your lives, and be like the heath in the wilderness.48:7 For, because you have trusted in your works and in your treasures, you also shall be taken: and Chemosh shall go forth into captivity, his priests and his princes together.48:8 And the destroyer shall come upon every city, and no city shall escape; the valley also shall perish, and the plain shall be destroyed; as Yahweh has spoken.48:9 Give wings to Moab, that she may fly and get her away: and her cities shall become a desolation, without any to dwell therein.48:10 Cursed be he that does the work of Yahweh negligently; and cursed be he that keeps back his sword from blood.48:11 Moab has been at ease from his youth, and he has settled on his lees, and has not been emptied from vessel to vessel, neither has he gone into captivity: therefore his taste remains in him, and his scent is not changed.48:12 Therefore, behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that I will send to him them that pour off, and they shall pour him off; and they shall empty his vessels, and break their bottles in pieces.48:13 And Moab shall be ashamed of Chemosh, as the house of Israel was ashamed of Beth-el their confidence.48:14 How say ye, We are mighty men, and valiant men for the war?48:15 Moab is laid waste, and they are gone up into his cities, and his chosen young men are gone down to the slaughter, says the King, whose name is Yahweh of hosts.48:16 The calamity of Moab is near to come, and his affliction hastens fast.48:17 All ye that are round about him, bemoan him, and all ye that know his name; say, How is the strong staff broken, the beautiful rod!48:18 O you daughter that dwell in Dibon, come down from your glory, and sit in thirst; for the destroyer of Moab is come up against you, he has destroyed your strongholds.48:19 O inhabitant of Aroer, stand by the way, and watch: ask him that flees, and her that escapes; say, What has been done?48:20 Moab is put to shame; for it is broken down: wail and cry; tell ye it by the Arnon, that Moab is laid waste.48:21 And judgment is come upon the plain country, upon Holon, and upon Jahzah, and upon Mephaath,48:22 and upon Dibon, and upon Nebo, and upon Beth-diblathaim,48:23 and upon Kiriathaim, and upon Beth-gamul, and upon Beth-meon,48:24 and upon Kerioth, and upon Bozrah, and upon all the cities of the land of Moab, far or near.48:25 The horn of Moab is cut off, and his arm is broken, says Yahweh.48:26 Make ye him drunken; for he magnified himself against Yahweh: and Moab shall wallow in his vomit, and he also shall be in derision.48:27 For was not Israel a derision to you?  was he found among thieves?  for as often as you speak of him, you wag the head.48:28 O ye inhabitants of Moab, leave the cities, and dwell in the rock; and be like the dove that makes her nest over the mouth of the abyss.48:29 We have heard of the pride of Moab, that he is very proud; his loftiness, and his pride, and his arrogancy, and the haughtiness of his heart.48:30 I know his wrath, says Yahweh, that it is nought; his boastings have wrought nothing.48:31 Therefore will I wail for Moab; yes, I will cry out for all Moab: for the men of Kir-heres shall they mourn.48:32 With more than the weeping of Jazer will I weep for you, O vine of Sibmah: your branches passed over the sea, they reached even to the sea of Jazer: upon your summer fruits and upon your vintage the destroyer is fallen.48:33 And gladness and joy is taken away from the fruitful field and from the land of Moab; and I have caused wine to cease from the winepresses: none shall tread with shouting; the shouting shall be no shouting.48:34 From the cry of Heshbon even to Elealeh, even to Jahaz have they uttered their voice, from Zoar even to Horonaim, to Eglath-shelishiyah: for the waters of Nimrim also shall become desolate.48:35 Moreover I will cause to cease in Moab, says Yahweh, him that offers in the high place, and him that burns incense to his gods.48:36 Therefore my heart sounds for Moab like pipes, and my heart sounds like pipes for the men of Kir-heres: therefore the abundance that he has gotten is perished.48:37 For every head is bald, and every beard clipped: upon all the hands are cuttings, and upon the loins sackcloth.48:38 On all the housetops of Moab and in the streets thereof there is lamentation every where; for I have broken Moab like a vessel in which none delights, says Yahweh.48:39 How is it broken down! how do they wail! how has Moab turned the back with shame! so shall Moab become a derision and a terror to all that are round about him.48:40 For thus says Yahweh: Behold, he shall fly as an eagle, and shall spread out his wings against Moab.48:41 Kerioth is taken, and the strongholds are seized, and the heart of the mighty men of Moab at that day shall be as the heart of a woman in her pangs.48:42 And Moab shall be destroyed from being a people, because he has magnified himself against Yahweh.48:43 Fear, and the pit, and the snare, are upon you, O inhabitant of Moab, says Yahweh.48:44 He that flees from the fear shall fall into the pit; and he that gets up out of the pit shall be taken in the snare: for I will bring upon him, even upon Moab, the year of their visitation, says Yahweh.48:45 They that fled stand without strength under the shadow of Heshbon; for a fire is gone forth out of Heshbon, and a flame from the midst of Sihon, and has devoured the corner of Moab, and the crown of the head of the tumultuous ones.48:46 Woe to you, O Moab! the people of Chemosh is undone; for your sons are taken away captive, and your daughters into captivity.48:47 Yet will I bring back the captivity of Moab in the latter days, says Yahweh.  Thus far is the judgment of Moab.49:1 Of the children of Ammon.  Thus says Yahweh: Has Israel no sons?  has he no heir?  why then does Malcam possess Gad, and his people well in the cities thereof?49:2 Therefore, behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that I will cause an alarm of war to be heard against Rabbah of the children of Ammon; and it shall become a desolate heap, and her daughters shall be burned with fire: then shall Israel possess them that did possess him, says Yahweh.49:3 Wail, O Heshbon, for Ai is laid waste; cry, ye daughters of Rabbah, gird you with sackcloth: lament, and run to and fro among the fences; for Malcam shall go into captivity, his priests and his princes together.49:4 Why do you glory in the valleys, your flowing valley, O backsliding daughter?  that trusted in her treasures, saying, Who shall come to me?49:5 Behold, I will bring a fear upon you, says the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, from all that are round about you; and ye shall be driven out every man right forth, and there shall be none to gather together the fugitives.49:6 But afterward I will bring back the captivity of the children of Ammon, says Yahweh.49:7 Of Edom.  Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Is wisdom no more in Teman?  is counsel perished from the prudent?  is their wisdom vanished?49:8 Flee ye, turn back, dwell in the depths, O inhabitants of Dedan;  for I will bring the calamity of Esau upon him, the time that I shall visit him.49:9 If grape-gatherers came to you, would they not leave some gleaning grapes?  if thieves by night, would they not destroy till they had enough?49:10 But I have made Esau bare, I have uncovered his secret places, and he shall not be able to hide himself: his seed is destroyed, and his brethren, and his neighbors; and he is not.49:11 Leave your fatherless children, I will preserve them alive; and let your widows trust in me.49:12 For thus says Yahweh: Behold, they to whom it pertained not to drink of the cup shall assuredly drink; and are you he that shall altogether go unpunished?  you shall not go unpunished, but you shall surely drink.49:13 For I have sworn by myself, says Yahweh, that Bozrah shall become an astonishment, a reproach, a waste, and a curse; and all the cities thereof shall be perpetual wastes.49:14 I have heard tidings from Yahweh, and an ambassador is sent among the nations, saying, Gather yourselves together, and come against her, and rise up to the battle.49:15 For, behold, I have made you small among the nations, and despised among men.49:16 As for your terribleness, the pride of your heart has deceived you, O you that dwell in the clefts of the rock, that hold the height of the hill: though you should make your nest as high as the eagle, I will bring you down from there, says Yahweh.49:17 And Edom shall become an astonishment: every one that passes by it shall be astonished, and shall hiss at all the plagues thereof.49:18 As in the overthrow of Sodom and Gomorrah and the neighbor cities thereof, says Yahweh, no man shall dwell there, neither shall any son of man sojourn therein.49:19 Behold, he shall come up like a lion from the pride of the Jordan against the strong habitation: for I will suddenly make them run away from it; and whoso is chosen, him will I appoint over it: for who is like me?  and who will appoint me a time?  and who is the shepherd that will stand before me?49:20 Therefore hear ye the counsel of Yahweh, that he has taken against Edom; and his purposes, that he has purposed against the inhabitants of Teman: Surely they shall drag them away, even the little ones of the flock; surely he shall make their habitation desolate over them.49:21 The earth trembles at the noise of their fall; there is a cry, the noise whereof is heard in the Red Sea.49:22 Behold, he shall come up and fly as the eagle, and spread out his wings against Bozrah: and the heart of the mighty men of Edom at that day shall be as the heart of a woman in her pangs.49:23 Of Damascus.  Hamath is confounded, and Arpad; for they have heard evil tidings, they are melted away: there is sorrow on the sea; it cannot be quiet.49:24 Damascus is become feeble, she turns herself to flee, and trembling has seized on her: anguish and sorrows have taken hold of her, as of a woman in travail.49:25 How is the city of praise not forsaken, the city of my joy?49:26 Therefore her young men shall fall in her streets, and all the men of war shall be brought to silence in that day, says Yahweh of hosts.49:27 And I will kindle a fire in the wall of Damascus, and it shall devour the palaces of Ben-hadad.49:28 Of Kedar, and of the kingdoms of Hazor, which Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon smote.  Thus says Yahweh: Arise ye, go up to Kedar, and destroy the children of the east.49:29 Their tents and their flocks shall they take; they shall carry away for themselves their curtains, and all their vessels, and their camels; and they shall cry to them, Terror on every side!49:30 Flee ye, wander far off, dwell in the depths, O ye inhabitants of Hazor, says Yahweh; for Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon has taken counsel against you, and has conceived a purpose against you.49:31 Arise, go up to a nation that is at ease, that dwells without care, says Yahweh; that have neither gates nor bars, that dwell alone.49:32 And their camels shall be a booty, and the multitude of their cattle a spoil: and I will scatter to all winds them that have the corners of their hair cut off; and I will bring their calamity from every side of them, says Yahweh.49:33 And Hazor shall be a dwelling-place of jackals, a desolation for ever: no man shall dwell there, neither shall any son of man sojourn therein.49:34 The word of Yahweh that came to Jeremiah the prophet concerning Elam, in the beginning of the reign of Zedekiah king of Judah, saying,49:35 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Behold, I will break the bow of Elam, the chief of their might.49:36 And upon Elam will I bring the four winds from the four quarters of heaven, and will scatter them toward all those winds; and there shall be no nation whither the outcasts of Elam shall not come.49:37 And I will cause Elam to be dismayed before their enemies, and before them that seek their life; and I will bring evil upon them, even my fierce anger, says Yahweh; and I will send the sword after them, till I have consumed them;49:38 and I will set my throne in Elam, and will destroy from there king and princes, says Yahweh.49:39 But it shall come to pass in the latter days, that I will bring back the captivity of Elam, says Yahweh.50:1 The word that Yahweh spoke concerning Babylon, concerning the land of the Chaldeans, by Jeremiah the prophet.50:2 Declare ye among the nations and publish, and set up a standard; publish, and conceal not: say, Babylon is taken, Bel is put to shame, Merodach is dismayed; her images are put to shame, her idols are dismayed.50:3 For out of the north there comes up a nation against her, which shall make her land desolate, and none shall dwell therein: they are fled, they are gone, both man and beast.50:4 In those days, and in that time, says Yahweh, the children of Israel shall come, they and the children of Judah together; they shall go on their way weeping, and shall seek Yahweh their God.50:5 They shall inquire concerning Zion with their faces thereward, saying, Come ye, and join yourselves to Yahweh in an everlasting covenant that shall not be forgotten.50:6 My people have been lost sheep: their shepherds have caused them to go astray; they have turned them away on the mountains; they have gone from mountain to hill; they have forgotten their resting-place.50:7 All that found them have devoured them; and their adversaries said, We are not guilty, because they have sinned against Yahweh, the habitation of righteousness, even Yahweh, the hope of their fathers.50:8 Flee out of the midst of Babylon, and go forth out of the land of the Chaldeans, and be as the he-goats before the flocks.50:9 For, lo, I will stir up and cause to come up against Babylon a company of great nations from the north country; and they shall set themselves in array against her; from there she shall be taken: their arrows shall be as of an expert mighty man; none shall return in vain.50:10 And Chaldea shall be a prey: all that prey upon her shall be satisfied, says Yahweh.50:11 Because ye are glad, because ye rejoice, O ye that plunder my heritage, because ye are wanton as a heifer that treads out the grain, and neigh as strong horses;50:12 your mother shall be utterly put to shame; she that bore you shall be confounded: behold, she shall be the hindermost of the nations, a wilderness, a dry land, and a desert.50:13 Because of the wrath of Yahweh she shall not be inhabited, but she shall be wholly desolate: every one that goes by Babylon shall be astonished, and hiss at all her plagues.50:14 Set yourselves in array against Babylon round about, all ye that bend the bow; shoot at her, spare no arrows: for she has sinned against Yahweh.50:15 Shout against her round about: she has submitted herself; her bulwarks are fallen, her walls are thrown down; for it is the vengeance of Yahweh: take vengeance upon her; as she has done, do to her.50:16 Cut off the sower from Babylon, and him that handles the sickle in the time of harvest: for fear of the oppressing sword they shall turn every one to his people, and they shall flee every one to his own land.50:17 Israel is a hunted sheep; the lions have driven him away: first, the king of Assyria devoured him; and now at last Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon has broken his bones.50:18 Therefore thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: Behold, I will punish the king of Babylon and his land, as I have punished the king of Assyria.50:19 And I will bring Israel again to his pasture, and he shall feed on Carmel and Bashan, and his soul shall be satisfied upon the hills of Ephraim and in Gilead.50:20 In those days, and in that time, says Yahweh, the iniquity of Israel shall be sought for, and there shall be none; and the sins of Judah, and they shall not be found: for I will pardon them whom I leave as a remnant.50:21 Go up against the land of Merathaim, even against it, and against the inhabitants of Pekod: slay and utterly destroy after them, says Yahweh, and do according to all that I have commanded you.50:22 A sound of battle is in the land, and of great destruction.50:23 How is the hammer of the whole earth cut asunder and broken! how is Babylon become a desolation among the nations!50:24 I have laid a snare for you, and you are also taken, O Babylon, and you were not aware: you are found, and also caught, because you have striven against Yahweh.50:25 Yahweh has opened his armory, and has brought forth the weapons of his indignation; for the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, has a work to do in the land of the Chaldeans.50:26 Come against her from the utmost border; open her store-houses; cast her up as heaps, and destroy her utterly; let nothing of her be left.50:27 Slay all her bullocks; let them go down to the slaughter: woe to them! for their day is come, the time of their visitation.50:28 The voice of them that flee and escape out of the land of Babylon, to declare in Zion the vengeance of Yahweh our God, the vengeance of his temple.50:29 Call together the archers against Babylon, all them that bend the bow; encamp against her round about; let none thereof escape: recompense her according to her work; according to all that she has done, do to her; for she has been proud against Yahweh, against the Holy One of Israel.50:30 Therefore shall her young men fall in her streets, and all her men of war shall be brought to silence in that day, says Yahweh.50:31 Behold, I am against you, O you proud one, says the Lord, Yahweh of hosts; for your day is come, the time that I will visit you.50:32 And the proud one shall stumble and fall, and none shall raise him up; and I will kindle a fire in his cities, and it shall devour all that are round about him.50:33 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: The children of Israel and the children of Judah are oppressed together; and all that took them captive hold them fast; they refuse to let them go.50:34 Their Redeemer is strong; Yahweh of hosts is his name: he will thoroughly plead their cause, that he may give rest to the earth, and disquiet the inhabitants of Babylon.50:35 A sword is upon the Chaldeans, says Yahweh, and upon the inhabitants of Babylon, and upon her princes, and upon her wise men.50:36 A sword is upon the boasters, and they shall become fools; a sword is upon her mighty men, and they shall be dismayed.50:37 A sword is upon their horses, and upon their chariots, and upon all the mingled people that are in the midst of her; and they shall become as women: a sword is upon her treasures, and they shall be robbed.50:38 A drought is upon her waters, and they shall be dried up; for it is a land of graven images, and they are mad over idols.50:39 Therefore the wild beasts of the desert with the wolves shall dwell there, and the ostriches shall dwell therein: and it shall be no more inhabited for ever; neither shall it be dwelt in from generation to generation.50:40 As when God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah and the neighbor cities thereof, says Yahweh, so shall no man dwell there, neither shall any son of man sojourn therein.50:41 Behold, a people comes from the north; and a great nation and many kings shall be stirred up from the uttermost parts of the earth.50:42 They lay hold on bow and spear; they are cruel, and have no mercy; their voice roars like the sea; and they ride upon horses, every one set in array, as a man to the battle, against you, O daughter of Babylon.50:43 The king of Babylon has heard the tidings of them, and his hands grow feeble: anguish has taken hold of him, and pangs as of a woman in travail.50:44 Behold, the enemy shall come up like a lion from the pride of the Jordan against the strong habitation: for I will suddenly make them run away from it; and whoso is chosen, him will I appoint over it: for who is like me?  and who will appoint me a time?  and who is the shepherd that can stand before me?50:45 Therefore hear ye the counsel of Yahweh, that he has taken against Babylon; and his purposes, that he has purposed against the land of the Chaldeans: Surely they shall drag them away, even the little ones of the flock; surely he shall make their habitation desolate over them.50:46 At the noise of the taking of Babylon the earth trembles, and the cry is heard among the nations.51:1 Thus says Yahweh: Behold, I will raise up against Babylon, and against them that dwell in Leb-kamai, a destroying wind.51:2 And I will send to Babylon strangers, that shall winnow her; and they shall empty her land: for in the day of trouble they shall be against her round about.51:3 Against him that bends let the archer bend his bow, and against him that lifts himself up in his coat of mail: and spare ye not her young men; destroy ye utterly all her host.51:4 And they shall fall down slain in the land of the Chaldeans, and thrust through in her streets.51:5 For Israel is not forsaken, nor Judah, of his God, of Yahweh of hosts; though their land is full of guilt against the Holy One of Israel.51:6 Flee out of the midst of Babylon, and save every man his life; be not cut off in her iniquity: for it is the time of Yahweh's vengeance; he will render to her a recompense.51:7 Babylon has been a golden cup in Yahweh's hand, that made all the earth drunken: the nations have drunk of her wine; therefore the nations are mad.51:8 Babylon is suddenly fallen and destroyed: wail for her; take balm for her pain, if so be she may be healed.51:9 We would have healed Babylon, but she is not healed: forsake her, and let us go every one into his own country; for her judgment reaches to heaven, and is lifted up even to the skies.51:10 Yahweh has brought forth our righteousness: come, and let us declare in Zion the work of Yahweh our God.51:11 Make sharp the arrows; hold firm the shields: Yahweh has stirred up the spirit of the kings of the Medes; because his purpose is against Babylon, to destroy it: for it is the vengeance of Yahweh, the vengeance of his temple.51:12 Set up a standard against the walls of Babylon, make the watch strong, set the watchmen, prepare the ambushes; for Yahweh has both purposed and done that which he spoke concerning the inhabitants of Babylon.51:13 O you that dwell upon many waters, abundant in treasures, your end is come, the measure of your covetousness.51:14 Yahweh of hosts has sworn by himself, saying, Surely I will fill you with men, as with the canker-worm; and they shall lift up a shout against you.51:15 He has made the earth by his power, he has established the world by his wisdom, and by his understanding has he stretched out the heavens:51:16 when he utters his voice, there is a tumult of waters in the heavens, and he causes the vapors to ascend from the ends of the earth; he makes lightnings for the rain, and brings forth the wind out of his treasuries.51:17 Every man is become brutish and is without knowledge; every goldsmith is put to shame by his image; for his molten image is falsehood, and there is no breath in them.51:18 They are vanity, a work of delusion: in the time of their visitation they shall perish.51:19 The portion of Jacob is not like these; for he is the former of all things; and Israel is the tribe of his inheritance: Yahweh of hosts is his name.51:20 You are my battle-axe and weapons of war: and with you will I break in pieces the nations; and with you will I destroy kingdoms;51:21 and with you will I break in pieces the horse and his rider;51:22 and with you will I break in pieces the chariot and him that rides therein; and with you will I break in pieces man and woman; and with you will I break in pieces the old man and the youth; and with you will I break in pieces the young man and the virgin;51:23 and with you will I break in pieces the shepherd and his flock; and with you will I break in pieces the husbandman and his yoke of oxen; and with you will I break in pieces governors and deputies.51:24 And I will render to Babylon and to all the inhabitants of Chaldea all their evil that they have done in Zion in your sight, says Yahweh.51:25 Behold, I am against you, O destroying mountain, says Yahweh, which destroy all the earth; and I will stretch out my hand upon you, and roll you down from the rocks, and will make you a burnt mountain.51:26 And they shall not take of you a stone for a corner, nor a stone for foundations; but you shall be desolate for ever, says Yahweh.51:27 Set ye up a standard in the land, blow the trumpet among the nations, prepare the nations against her, call together against her the kingdoms of Ararat, Minni, and Ashkenaz: appoint a marshal against her; cause the horses to come up as the rough canker-worm.51:28 Prepare against her the nations, the kings of the Medes, the governors thereof, and all the deputies thereof, and all the land of their dominion.51:29 And the land trembles and is in pain; for the purposes of Yahweh against Babylon do stand, to make the land of Babylon a desolation, without inhabitant.51:30 The mighty men of Babylon have forborne to fight, they remain in their strongholds; their might has failed; they are become as women: her dwelling-places are set on fire; her bars are broken.51:31 One post shall run to meet another, and one messenger to met another, to show the king of Babylon that his city is taken on every quarter:51:32 and the passages are seized, and the reeds they have burned with fire, and the men of war are affrighted.51:33 For thus says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel: The daughter of Babylon is like a threshing-floor at the time when it is trodden; yet a little while, and the time of harvest shall come for her.51:34 Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon has devoured me, he has crushed me, he has made me an empty vessel, he has, like a monster, swallowed me up, he has filled his maw with my delicacies; he has cast me out.51:35 The violence done to me and to my flesh be upon Babylon, shall the inhabitant of Zion say; and, My blood be upon the inhabitants of Chaldea, shall Jerusalem say.51:36 Therefore thus says Yahweh: Behold, I will plead your cause, and take vengeance for you; and I will dry up her sea, and make her fountain dry.51:37 And Babylon shall become heaps, a dwelling-place for jackals, an astonishment, and a hissing, without inhabitant.51:38 They shall roar together like young lions; they shall growl as lions' whelps.51:39 When they are heated, I will make their feast, and I will make them drunken, that they may rejoice, and sleep a perpetual sleep, and not wake, says Yahweh.51:40 I will bring them down like lambs to the slaughter, like rams with he-goats.51:41 How is Sheshach taken! and the praise of the whole earth seized! how is Babylon become a desolation among the nations!51:42 The sea is come up upon Babylon; she is covered with the multitude of the waves thereof.51:43 Her cities are become a desolation, a dry land, and a desert, a land in which no man dwells, neither does any son of man pass thereby.51:44 And I will execute judgment upon Bel in Babylon, and I will bring forth out of his mouth that which he has swallowed up; and the nations shall not flow any more to him: yes, the wall of Babylon shall fall.51:45 My people, go ye out of the midst of her, and save yourselves every man from the fierce anger of Yahweh.51:46 And let not your heart faint, neither fear ye for the tidings that shall be heard in the land; for tidings shall come one year, and after that in another year shall come tidings, and violence in the land, ruler against ruler.51:47 Therefore, behold, the days come, that I will execute judgment upon the graven images of Babylon; and her whole land shall be confounded; and all her slain shall fall in the midst of her.51:48 Then the heavens and the earth, and all that is therein, shall sing for joy over Babylon; for the destroyers shall come to her from the north, says Yahweh.51:49 As Babylon has caused the slain of Israel to fall, so at Babylon shall fall the slain of all the land.51:50 You that have escaped the sword, go ye, stand not still; remember Yahweh from afar, and let Jerusalem come into your mind.51:51 We are confounded, because we have heard reproach; confusion has covered our faces: for strangers are come into the sanctuaries of Yahweh's house.51:52 Wherefore, behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that I will execute judgment upon her graven images; and through all her land the wounded shall groan.51:53 Though Babylon should mount up to heaven, and though she should fortify the height of her strength, yet from me shall destroyers come to her, says Yahweh.51:54 The sound of a cry from Babylon, and of great destruction from the land of the Chaldeans!51:55 For Yahweh lays Babylon waste, and destroys out of her the great voice; and their waves roar like many waters; the noise of their voice is uttered:51:56 for the destroyer is come upon her, even upon Babylon, and her mighty men are taken, their bows are broken in pieces; for Yahweh is a God of recompenses, he will surely requite.51:57 And I will make drunk her princes and her wise men, her governors and her deputies, and her mighty men; and they shall sleep a perpetual sleep, and not wake, says the King, whose name is Yahweh of hosts.51:58 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: The broad walls of Babylon shall be utterly overthrown, and her high gates shall be burned with fire; and the peoples shall labor for vanity, and the nations for the fire; and they shall be weary.51:59 The word which Jeremiah the prophet commanded Seraiah the son of Neriah, the son of Mahseiah, when he went with Zedekiah the king of Judah to Babylon in the fourth year of his reign.  Now Seraiah was chief eunuch.51:60 And Jeremiah wrote in a book all the evil that should come upon Babylon, even all these words that are written concerning Babylon.51:61 And Jeremiah said to Seraiah, When you come to Babylon, then see that you read all these words,51:62 and say, O Yahweh, you have spoken concerning this place, to cut it off, that none shall dwell therein, neither man nor beast, but that it shall be desolate for ever.51:63 And it shall be, when you have made an end of reading this book, that you shall bind a stone to it, and cast it into the midst of the Euphrates:51:64 and you shall say, Thus shall Babylon sink, and shall not rise again because of the evil that I will bring upon her; and they shall be weary.  Thus far are the words of Jeremiah.52:1 Zedekiah was one and twenty years old when he began to reign; and he reigned eleven years in Jerusalem: and his mother's name was Hamutal the daughter of Jeremiah of Libnah.52:2 And he did that which was evil in the sight of Yahweh, according to all that Jehoiakim had done.52:3 For through the anger of Yahweh did it come to pass in Jerusalem and Judah, until he had cast them out from his presence.  And Zedekiah rebelled against the king of Babylon.52:4 And it came to pass in the ninth year of his reign, in the tenth month, in the tenth day of the month, that Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon came, he and all his army, against Jerusalem, and encamped against it; and they built forts against it round about.52:5 So the city was besieged to the eleventh year of king Zedekiah.52:6 In the fourth month, in the ninth day of the month, the famine was sore in the city, so that there was no bread for the people of the land.52:7 Then a breach was made in the city, and all the men of war fled, and went forth out of the city by night by the way of the gate between the two walls, which was by the king's garden; (now the Chaldeans were against the city round about;) and they went toward the Arabah.52:8 But the army of the Chaldeans pursued after the king, and overtook Zedekiah in the plains of Jericho; and all his army was scattered from him.52:9 Then they took the king, and carried him up to the king of Babylon to Riblah in the land of Hamath; and he gave judgment upon him.52:10 And the king of Babylon slew the sons of Zedekiah before his eyes: he slew also all the princes of Judah in Riblah.52:11 And he put out the eyes of Zedekiah; and the king of Babylon bound him in fetters, and carried him to Babylon, and put him in prison till the day of his death.52:12 Now in the fifth month, in the tenth day of the month, which was the nineteenth year of king Nebuchadrezzar, king of Babylon, came Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard, who stood before the king of Babylon, into Jerusalem:52:13 and he burned the house of Yahweh, and the king's house; and all the houses of Jerusalem, even every great house, burned he with fire.52:14 And all the army of the Chaldeans, that were with the captain of the guard, broke down all the walls of Jerusalem round about.52:15 Then Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard carried away captive of the poorest of the people, and the residue of the people that were left in the city, and those that fell away, that fell to the king of Babylon, and the residue of the multitude.52:16 But Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard left of the poorest of the land to be vinedressers and husbandmen.52:17 And the pillars of brass that were in the house of Yahweh, and the bases and the brazen sea that were in the house of Yahweh, did the Chaldeans break in pieces, and carried all the brass of them to Babylon.52:18 The pots also, and the shovels, and the snuffers, and the basins, and the spoons, and all the vessels of brass with which they ministered, took they away.52:19 And the cups, and the firepans, and the basins, and the pots, and the candlesticks, and the spoons, and the bowls-that which was of gold, in gold, and that which was of silver, in silver,- the captain of the guard took away.52:20 The two pillars, the one sea, and the twelve brazen bulls that were under the bases, which king Solomon had made for the house of Yahweh-the brass of all these vessels was without weight.52:21 And as for the pillars, the height of the one pillar was eighteen cubits; and a line of twelve cubits did compass it; and the thickness thereof was four fingers: it was hollow.52:22 And a capital of brass was upon it; and the height of the one capital was five cubits, with network and pomegranates upon the capital round about, all of brass: and the second pillar also had like to these, and pomegranates.52:23 And there were ninety and six pomegranates on the sides; all the pomegranates were a hundred upon the network round about.52:24 And the captain of the guard took Seraiah the chief priest, and Zephaniah the second priest, and the three keepers of the threshold:52:25 and out of the city he took an officer that was set over the men of war; and seven men of them that saw the king's face, that were found in the city; and the scribe of the captain of the host, who mustered the people of the land; and sixty men of the people of the land, that were found in the midst of the city.52:26 And Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard took them, and brought them to the king of Babylon to Riblah.52:27 And the king of Babylon smote them, and put them to death at Riblah in the land of Hamath.  So Judah was carried away captive out of his land.52:28 This is the people whom Nebuchadrezzar carried away captive: in the seventh year three thousand Jews and three and twenty;52:29 in the eighteenth year of Nebuchadrezzar he carried away captive from Jerusalem eight hundred thirty and two persons;52:30 in the three and twentieth year of Nebuchadrezzar Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard carried away captive of the Jews seven hundred forty and five persons: all the persons were four thousand and six hundred.52:31 And it came to pass in the seven and thirtieth year of the captivity of Jehoiachin king of Judah, in the twelfth month, in the five and twentieth day of the month, that Evil-merodach king of Babylon, in the first year of his reign, lifted up the head of Jehoiachin king of Judah, and brought him forth out of prison;52:32 and he spoke kindly to him, and set his throne above the throne of the kings that were with him in Babylon,52:33 and changed his prison garments.  And Jehoiachin did eat bread before him continually all the days of his life:52:34 and for his allowance, there was a continual allowance given him by the king of Babylon, every day a portion until the day of his death, all the days of his life.End of JeremiahLamentations1:1 How does the city sit solitary, that was full of people! She is become as a widow, that was great among the nations! She that was a princess among the provinces is become tributary!1:2 She weeps sore in the night, and her tears are on her cheeks; Among all her lovers she has none to comfort her: All her friends have dealt treacherously with her; they are become her enemies.1:3 Judah is gone into captivity because of affliction, and because of great servitude; She dwells among the nations, she finds no rest: All her persecutors overtook her within the straits.1:4 The ways of Zion do mourn, because none come to the solemn assembly; All her gates are desolate, her priests do sigh: Her virgins are afflicted, and she herself is in bitterness.1:5 Her adversaries are become the head, her enemies prosper; For Yahweh has afflicted her for the multitude of her transgressions: Her young children are gone into captivity before the adversary.1:6 And from the daughter of Zion all her majesty is departed: Her princes are become like deer that find no pasture, and they are gone without strength before the pursuer.1:7 Jerusalem remembers in the days of her affliction and of her miseries all her pleasant things that were from the days of old: When her people fell into the hand of the adversary, and none did help her, The adversaries saw her, they did mock at her desolations.1:8 Jerusalem has grievously sinned; therefore she is become as an unclean thing; All that honored her despise her, because they have seen her nakedness: Yes, she sighs, and turns backward.1:9 Her filthiness was in her skirts; she remembered not her latter end; Therefore is she come down wonderfully; she has no comforter: Behold, O Yahweh, my affliction; for the enemy has magnified himself.1:10 The adversary has spread out his hand upon all her pleasant things: For she has seen that the nations are entered into her sanctuary, Concerning whom you did command that they should not enter into your assembly.1:11 All her people sigh, they seek bread; They have given their pleasant things for food to refresh the soul: See, O Yahweh, and behold; for I am become abject.1:12 Is it nothing to you, all ye that pass by?  Behold, and see if there be any sorrow like to my sorrow, which is brought upon me, With which Yahweh has afflicted me in the day of his fierce anger.1:13 From on high has he sent fire into my bones, and it prevails against them; He has spread a net for my feet, he has turned me back: He has made me desolate and faint all the day.1:14 The yoke of my transgressions is bound by his hand; They are knit together, they are come up upon my neck; he has made my strength to fail: The Lord has delivered me into their hands, against whom I am not able to stand.1:15 The Lord has set at nought all my mighty men in the midst of me; He has called a solemn assembly against me to crush my young men: The Lord has trodden as in a winepress the virgin daughter of Judah.1:16 For these things I weep; my eye, my eye runs down with water; Because the comforter that should refresh my soul is far from me: My children are desolate, because the enemy has prevailed.1:17 Zion spreads forth her hands; there is none to comfort her; Yahweh has commanded concerning Jacob, that they that are round about him should be his adversaries: Jerusalem is among them as an unclean thing.1:18 Yahweh is righteous; for I have rebelled against his commandment: Hear, I pray you, all ye peoples, and behold my sorrow: My virgins and my young men are gone into captivity.1:19 I called for my lovers, but they deceived me: My priests and my elders gave up the ghost in the city, While they sought them food to refresh their souls.1:20 Behold, O Yahweh; for I am in distress; my heart is troubled; My heart is turned within me; for I have grievously rebelled: Abroad the sword bereaves, at home there is as death.1:21 They have heard that I sigh; there is none to comfort me; All my enemies have heard of my trouble; they are glad that you have done it: You will bring the day that you have proclaimed, and they shall be like to me.1:22 Let all their wickedness come before you; And do to them, as you have done to me for all my transgressions: For my sighs are many, and my heart is faint.2:1 How has the Lord covered the daughter of Zion with a cloud in his anger! He has cast down from heaven to the earth the beauty of Israel, and has not remembered his footstool in the day of his anger.2:2 The Lord has swallowed up all the habitations of Jacob, and has not pitied: He has thrown down in his wrath the strongholds of the daughter of Judah; He has brought them down to the ground; he has profaned the kingdom and the princes thereof.2:3 He has cut off in fierce anger all the horn of Israel; He has drawn back his right hand from before the enemy: And he has burned up Jacob like a flaming fire, which devours round about.2:4 He has bent his bow like an enemy, he has stood with his right hand as an adversary, and has slain all that were pleasant to the eye: In the tent of the daughter of Zion he has poured out his wrath like fire.2:5 The Lord is become as an enemy, he has swallowed up Israel; He has swallowed up all her palaces, he has destroyed his strongholds; And he has multiplied in the daughter of Judah mourning and lamentation.2:6 And he has violently taken away his tabernacle, as if it were of a garden; he has destroyed his place of assembly: Yahweh has caused solemn assembly and sabbath to be forgotten in Zion, and has despised in the indignation of his anger the king and the priest.2:7 The Lord has cast off his altar, he has abhorred his sanctuary; He has given up into the hand of the enemy the walls of her palaces: They have made a noise in the house of Yahweh, as in the day of a solemn assembly.2:8 Yahweh has purposed to destroy the wall of the daughter of Zion; He has stretched out the line, he has not withdrawn his hand from destroying; And he has made the rampart and wall to lament; they languish together.2:9 Her gates are sunk into the ground; he has destroyed and broken her bars: Her king and her princes are among the nations where the law is not; Yes, her prophets find no vision from Yahweh.2:10 The elders of the daughter of Zion sit upon the ground, they keep silence; They have cast up dust upon their heads; they have girded themselves with sackcloth: The virgins of Jerusalem hang down their heads to the ground.2:11 Mine eyes do fail with tears, my heart is troubled; My liver is poured upon the earth, because of the destruction of the daughter of my people, Because the young children and the sucklings swoon in the streets of the city.2:12 They say to their mothers, Where is grain and wine?  When they swoon as the wounded in the streets of the city, When their soul is poured out into their mothers' bosom.2:13 What shall I testify to you?  what shall I liken to you, O daughter of Jerusalem?  What shall I compare to you, that I may comfort you, O virgin daughter of Zion?  For your breach is great like the sea: who can heal you?2:14 Your prophets have seen for you false and foolish visions; And they have not uncovered your iniquity, to bring back your captivity, But have seen for you false oracles and causes of banishment.2:15 All that pass by clap their hands at you; They hiss and wag their head at the daughter of Jerusalem, saying, Is this the city that men called The perfection of beauty, The joy of the whole earth?2:16 All your enemies have opened their mouth wide against you; They hiss and gnash the teeth; they say, We have swallowed her up; Certainly this is the day that we looked for; we have found, we have seen it.2:17 Yahweh has done that which he purposed; he has fulfilled his word that he commanded in the days of old; He has thrown down, and has not pitied: And he has caused the enemy to rejoice over you; he has exalted the horn of your adversaries.2:18 Their heart cried to the Lord: O wall of the daughter of Zion, let tears run down like a river day and night; Give yourself no respite; let not the apple of your eye cease.2:19 Arise, cry out in the night, at the beginning of the watches; Pour out your heart like water before the face of the Lord: Lift up your hands toward him for the life of your young children, that faint for hunger at the head of every street.2:20 See, O Yahweh, and behold to whom you have done thus! Shall the women eat their fruit, the children that are dandled in the hands?  Shall the priest and the prophet be slain in the sanctuary of the Lord?2:21 The youth and the old man lie on the ground in the streets; My virgins and my young men are fallen by the sword: You have slain them in the day of your anger; you have slaughtered, and not pitied.2:22 You have called, as in the day of a solemn assembly, my terrors on every side; And there was none that escaped or remained in the day of Yahweh's anger: Those that I have dandled and brought up has my enemy consumed.3:1 I am the man that has seen affliction by the rod of his wrath.3:2 He has led me and caused me to walk in darkness, and not in light.3:3 Surely against me he turns his hand again and again all the day.3:4 My flesh and my skin has he made old; he has broken my bones.3:5 He has built against me, and compassed me with gall and travail.3:6 He has made me to dwell in dark places, as those that have been long dead.3:7 He has walled me about, that I cannot go forth; he has made my chain heavy.3:8 Yes, when I cry, and call for help, he shuts out my prayer.3:9 He has walled up my ways with hewn stone; he has made my paths crooked.3:10 He is to me as a bear lying in wait, as a lion in secret places.3:11 He has turned aside my ways, and pulled me in pieces; he has made me desolate.3:12 He has bent his bow, and set me as a mark for the arrow.3:13 He has caused the shafts of his quiver to enter into my reins.3:14 I am become a derision to all my people, and their song all the day.3:15 He has filled me with bitterness, he has sated me with wormwood.3:16 He has also broken my teeth with gravel stones; he has covered me with ashes.3:17 And you have removed my soul far off from peace; I forgat prosperity.3:18 And I said, My strength is perished, and my expectation from Yahweh.3:19 Remember my affliction and my misery, the wormwood and the gall.3:20 My soul has them still in remembrance, and is bowed down within me.3:21 This I recall to my mind; therefore have I hope.3:22 It is of Yahweh's lovingkindnesses that we are not consumed, because his compassions fail not.3:23 They are new every morning; great is your faithfulness.3:24 Yahweh is my portion, says my soul; therefore will I hope in him.3:25 Yahweh is good to them that wait for him, to the soul that seeks him.3:26 It is good that a man should hope and quietly wait for the salvation of Yahweh.3:27 It is good for a man that he bear the yoke in his youth.3:28 Let him sit alone and keep silence, because he has laid it upon him.3:29 Let him put his mouth in the dust, if so be there may be hope.3:30 Let him give his cheek to him that smites him; let him be filled full with reproach.3:31 For the Lord will not cast off for ever.3:32 For though he cause grief, yet will he have compassion according to the multitude of his lovingkindnesses.3:33 For he does not afflict willingly, nor grieve the children of men.3:34 To crush under foot all the prisoners of the earth,3:35 To turn aside the right of a man before the face of the Most High,3:36 To subvert a man in his cause, the Lord approves not.3:37 Who is he that says, and it comes to pass, when the Lord commands it not?3:38 Out of the mouth of the Most High comes there not evil and good?3:39 Why does a living man complain, a man for the punishment of his sins?3:40 Let us search and try our ways, and turn again to Yahweh.3:41 Let us lift up our heart with our hands to God in the heavens.3:42 We have transgressed and have rebelled; you have not pardoned.3:43 You have covered with anger and pursued us; you have slain, you have not pitied.3:44 You have covered yourself with a cloud, so that no prayer can pass through.3:45 You have made us an off-scouring and refuse in the midst of the peoples.3:46 All our enemies have opened their mouth wide against us.3:47 Fear and the pit are come upon us, devastation and destruction.3:48 Mine eye runs down with streams of water, for the destruction of the daughter of my people.3:49 Mine eye pours down, and ceases not, without any intermission,3:50 Till Yahweh look down, and behold from heaven.3:51 Mine eye affects my soul, because of all the daughters of my city.3:52 They have chased me sore like a bird, they that are my enemies without cause.3:53 They have cut off my life in the dungeon, and have cast a stone upon me.3:54 Waters flowed over my head.  I said, I am cut off.3:55 I called upon your name, O Yahweh, out of the lowest dungeon.3:56 You heard my voice; hide not your ear at my breathing, at my cry.3:57 You drew near in the day that I called upon you; you said, Fear not.3:58 O Lord, you have pled the causes of my soul; you have redeemed my life.3:59 O Yahweh, you have seen my wrong; please, you judge my cause.3:60 You have seen all their vengeance and all their devices against me.3:61 You have heard their reproach, O Yahweh, and all their devices against me,3:62 The lips of those that rose up against me, and their device against me all the day.3:63 You behold their sitting down, and their rising up; I am their song.3:64 You will render to them a recompense, O Yahweh, according to the work of their hands.3:65 You will give them hardness of heart, your curse to them.3:66 You will pursue them in anger, and destroy them from under the heavens of Yahweh.4:1 How is the gold become dim! how is the most pure gold changed! The stones of the sanctuary are poured out at the head of every street.4:2 The precious sons of Zion, comparable to fine gold, How are they esteemed as earthen pitchers, the work of the hands of the potter!4:3 Even the jackals pull out the breast, they give suck to their young ones: The daughter of my people is become cruel, like the ostriches in the wilderness.4:4 The tongue of the sucking child cleaves to the roof of his mouth for thirst: The young children ask for bread, and no one breaks it for them.4:5 Those who did feed delicately are desolate in the streets: Those who were brought up in scarlet embrace dunghills.4:6 For the iniquity of the daughter of my people is greater than the sin of Sodom, That was overthrown as in a moment, and no hands were laid upon her.4:7 Her nobles were purer than snow, they were whiter than milk; They were more ruddy in body than rubies, their polishing was as of sapphire.4:8 Their visage is blacker than a coal; they are not known in the streets: Their skin cleaves to their bones; it is withered, it is become like a stick.4:9 They that are slain with the sword are better than they that are slain with hunger; For these pine away, stricken through, for want of the fruits of the field.4:10 The hands of the pitiful women have boiled their own children; They were their food in the destruction of the daughter of my people.4:11 Yahweh has accomplished his wrath, he has poured out his fierce anger; And he has kindled a fire in Zion, which has devoured the foundations thereof.4:12 The kings of the earth believed not, neither all the inhabitants of the world, That the adversary and the enemy would enter into the gates of Jerusalem.4:13 It is because of the sins of her prophets, and the iniquities of her priests, That have shed the blood of the just in the midst of her.4:14 They wander as blind men in the streets, they are polluted with blood, So that men cannot touch their garments.4:15 Depart ye, they cried to them, Unclean! depart, depart, touch not! When they fled away and wandered, men said among the nations, They shall no more sojourn here.4:16 The anger of Yahweh has scattered them; he will no more regard them: They respected not the persons of the priests, they favored not the elders.4:17 Our eyes do yet fail in looking for our vain help: In our watching we have watched for a nation that could not save.4:18 They hunt our steps, so that we cannot go in our streets: Our end is near, our days are fulfilled; for our end is come.4:19 Our pursuers were swifter than the eagles of the heavens: They chased us upon the mountains, they laid wait for us in the wilderness.4:20 The breath of our nostrils, the anointed of Yahweh, was taken in their pits; Of whom we said, Under his shadow we shall live among the nations.4:21 Rejoice and be glad, O daughter of Edom, that dwell in the land of Uz: The cup shall pass through to you also; you shall be drunken, and shall make yourself naked.4:22 The punishment of your iniquity is accomplished, O daughter of Zion; he will no more carry you away into captivity: He will visit your iniquity, O daughter of Edom; he will uncover your sins.5:1 Remember, O Yahweh, what is come upon us: Behold, and see our reproach.5:2 Our inheritance is turned to strangers, Our houses to aliens.5:3 We are orphans and fatherless; Our mothers are as widows.5:4 We have drunken our water for money; Our wood is sold to us.5:5 Our pursuers are upon our necks: We are weary, and have no rest.5:6 We have given the hand to the Egyptians, and to the Assyrians, to be satisfied with bread.5:7 Our fathers sinned, and are not; And we have borne their iniquities.5:8 Servants rule over us: There is none to deliver us out of their hand.5:9 We get our bread at the peril of our lives, Because of the sword of the wilderness.5:10 Our skin is black like an oven, Because of the burning heat of famine.5:11 They ravished the women in Zion, The virgins in the cities of Judah.5:12 Princes were hanged up by their hand: The faces of elders were not honored.5:13 The young men bore the mill; And the children stumbled under the wood.5:14 The elders have ceased from the gate, The young men from their music.5:15 The joy of our heart is ceased; Our dance is turned into mourning.5:16 The crown is fallen from our head: Woe to us! for we have sinned.5:17 For this our heart is faint; For these things our eyes are dim;5:18 For the mountain of Zion, which is desolate: The foxes walk upon it.5:19 You, O Yahweh, abide for ever; Your throne is from generation to generation.5:20 Why do you forget us for ever, and forsake us so long time?5:21 Turn thou us toward you, O Yahweh, and we shall be turned; Renew our days as of old.5:22 But you have utterly rejected us; You are very angry against us.End of LamentationsEzekiel1:1 Now it came to pass in the thirtieth year, in the fourth month, in the fifth day of the month, as I was among the captives by the river Chebar, that the heavens were opened, and I saw visions of God.1:2 In the fifth day of the month, which was the fifth year of king Jehoiachin's captivity,1:3 the word of Yahweh came expressly to Ezekiel the priest, the son of Buzi, in the land of the Chaldeans by the river Chebar; and the hand of Yahweh was there upon him.1:4 And I looked, and, behold, a stormy wind came out of the north, a great cloud, with a fire infolding itself, and a brightness round about it, and out of the midst thereof as it were glowing metal, out of the midst of the fire.1:5 And out of the midst thereof came the likeness of four living creatures.  And this was their appearance: they had the likeness of a man.1:6 And every one had four faces, and every one of them had four wings.1:7 And their feet were straight feet; and the soles of their feet were like the soles of a calf's feet; and they sparkled like burnished brass.1:8 And they had the hands of a man under their wings on their four sides; and they four had their faces and their wings thus:1:9 their wings were joined one to another; they turned not when they went; they went every one straight forward.1:10 As for the likeness of their faces, they had the face of a man; and they four had the face of a lion on the right side; and they four had the face of an ox on the left side; they four had also the face of an eagle.1:11 And their faces and their wings were separate above; two wings of every one were joined one to another, and two covered their bodies.1:12 And they went every one straight forward: whither the spirit was to go, they went; they turned not when they went.1:13 As for the likeness of the living creatures, their appearance was like burning coals of fire, like the appearance of torches: the fire went up and down among the living creatures; and the fire was bright, and out of the fire went forth lightning.1:14 And the living creatures ran and returned as the appearance of a flash of lightning.1:15 Now as I beheld the living creatures, behold, one wheel upon the earth beside the living creatures, for each of the four faces thereof.1:16 The appearance of the wheels and their work was similar to a beryl: and they four had one likeness; and their appearance and their work was as it were a wheel within a wheel.1:17 When they went, they went in their four directions: they turned not when they went.1:18 As for their rims, they were high and dreadful; and they four had their rims full of eyes round about.1:19 And when the living creatures went, the wheels went beside them; and when the living creatures were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted up.1:20 Wherever the spirit was to go, they went; there was the spirit to go: and the wheels were lifted up beside them; for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels.1:21 When those went, these went; and when those stood, these stood; and when those were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted up beside them: for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels.1:22 And over the head of the living creature there was the likeness of a firmament, like the terrible crystal to look upon, stretched forth over their heads above.1:23 And under the firmament were their wings straight, the one toward the other: every one had two which covered on this side, and every one had two which covered on that side, their bodies.1:24 And when they went, I heard the noise of their wings like the noise of great waters, like the voice of the Almighty, a noise of tumult like the noise of a host: when they stood, they let down their wings.1:25 And there was a voice above the firmament that was over their heads: when they stood, they let down their wings.1:26 And above the firmament that was over their heads was the likeness of a throne, as the appearance of a sapphire stone; and upon the likeness of the throne was a likeness as the appearance of a man upon it above.1:27 And I saw as it were glowing metal, as the appearance of fire within it round about, from the appearance of his loins and upward; and from the appearance of his loins and downward I saw as it were the appearance of fire, and there was brightness round about him.1:28 As the appearance of the bow that is in the cloud in the day of rain, so was the appearance of the brightness round about.  This was the appearance of the likeness of the glory of Yahweh.  And when I saw it, I fell upon my face, and I heard a voice of one that spoke.2:1 And he said to me, Son of man, stand upon your feet, and I will speak with you.2:2 And the Spirit entered into me when he spoke to me, and set me upon my feet; and I heard him that spoke to me.2:3 And he said to me, Son of man, I send you to the children of Israel, to nations that are rebellious, which have rebelled against me: they and their fathers have transgressed against me even to this very day.2:4 And the children are impudent and stiffhearted: I do sent you to them; and you shall say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh.2:5 And they, whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear, (for they are a rebellious house,) yet shall know that there has been a prophet among them.2:6 And you, son of man, be not afraid of them, neither be afraid of their words, though briers and thorns are with you, and you do dwell among scorpions: be not afraid of their words, nor be dismayed at their looks, though they are a rebellious house.2:7 And you shall speak my words to them, whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear; for they are most rebellious.2:8 But you, son of man, hear what I say to you; be not you rebellious like that rebellious house: open your mouth, and eat that which I give you.2:9 And when I looked, behold, a hand was put forth to me; and, lo, a roll of a book was therein;2:10 And he spread it before me: and it was written within and without; and there were written therein lamentations, and mourning, and woe.3:1 And he said to me, Son of man, eat that which you findest; eat this roll, and go, speak to the house of Israel.3:2 So I opened my mouth, and he caused me to eat the roll.3:3 And he said to me, Son of man, cause your belly to eat, and fill your bowels with this roll that I give you.  Then did I eat it; and it was in my mouth as honey for sweetness.3:4 And he said to me, Son of man, go, get yourself to the house of Israel, and speak with my words to them.3:5 For you are not sent to a people of a strange speech and of a hard language, but to the house of Israel;3:6 not to many peoples of a strange speech and of a hard language, whose words you cannot understand.  Surely, if I sent you to them, they would hearken to you.3:7 But the house of Israel will not listen to you; for they will not listen to me: for all the house of Israel are of hard forehead and of a stiff heart.3:8 Behold, I have made your face hard against their faces, and your forehead hard against their foreheads.3:9 As an adamant harder than flint have I made your forehead: fear them not, neither be dismayed at their looks, though they are a rebellious house.3:10 Moreover he said to me, Son of man, all my words that I shall speak to you receive in your heart, and hear with your ears.3:11 And go, get yourself to them of the captivity, to the children of your people, and speak to them, and tell them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh; whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear.3:12 Then the Spirit lifted me up, and I heard behind me the voice of a great rushing, saying, Blessed be the glory of Yahweh from his place.3:13 And I heard the noise of the wings of the living creatures as they touched one another, and the noise of the wheels beside them, even the noise of a great rushing.3:14 So the Spirit lifted me up, and took me away; and I went in bitterness, in the heat of my spirit; and the hand of Yahweh was strong upon me.3:15 Then I came to them of the captivity at Tel-abib, that dwelt by the river Chebar, and to where they dwelt; and I sat there overwhelmed among them seven days.3:16 And it came to pass at the end of seven days, that the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,3:17 Son of man, I have made you a watchman to the house of Israel: therefore hear the word at my mouth, and give them warning from me.3:18 When I say to the wicked, You shall surely die; and you give him not warning, nor speak to warn the wicked from his wicked way, to save his life; the same wicked man shall die in his iniquity; but his blood will I require at your hand.3:19 Yet if you warn the wicked, and he turn not from his wickedness, nor from his wicked way, he shall die in his iniquity; but you have delivered your soul.3:20 Again, when a righteous man does turn from his righteousness, and commit iniquity, and I lay a stumblingblock before him, he shall die: because you have not given him warning, he shall die in his sin, and his righteous deeds which he has done shall not be remembered; but his blood will I require at your hand.3:21 Nevertheless if you warn the righteous man, that the righteous sin not, and he does not sin, he shall surely live, because he took warning; and you have delivered your soul.3:22 And the hand of Yahweh was there upon me; and he said to me, arise, go forth into the plain, and I will there talk with you.3:23 Then I arose, and went forth into the plain: and, behold, the glory of Yahweh stood there, as the glory which I saw by the river Chebar; and I fell on my face.3:24 Then the Spirit entered into me, and set me upon my feet; and he spoke with me, and said to me, Go, shut yourself within your house.3:25 But you, son of man, behold, they shall lay bands upon you, and shall bind you with them, and you shall not go out among them:3:26 and I will make your tongue cleave to the roof of your mouth, that you shall be dumb, and shall not be to them a reprover; for they are a rebellious house.3:27 But when I speak with you, I will open your mouth, and you shall say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: He that hears, let him hear; and he that forbears, let him forbear: for they are a rebellious house.4:1 You also, son of man, take you a tile, and lay it before you, and portray upon it a city, even Jerusalem:4:2 and lay siege against it, and build forts against it, and cast up a mound against it; set camps also against it, and plant battering rams against it round about.4:3 And take you to you an iron pan, and set it for a wall of iron between you and the city: and set your face toward it, and it shall be besieged, and you shall lay siege against it.  This shall be a sign to the house of Israel.4:4 Moreover lie you upon your left side, and lay the iniquity of the house of Israel upon it; according to the number of the days that you shall lie upon it, you shall bear their iniquity.4:5 For I have appointed the years of their iniquity to be to you a number of days, even three hundred and ninety days: so shall you bear the iniquity of the house of Israel.4:6 And again, when you have accomplished these, you shall lie on your right side, and shall bear the iniquity of the house of Judah: forty days, each day for a year, have I appointed it to you.4:7 And you shall set your face toward the siege of Jerusalem, with your arm uncovered; and you shall prophesy against it.4:8 And, behold, I lay bands upon you, and you shall not turn you from one side to the other, till you have accomplished the days of your siege.4:9 Take you also to you wheat, and barley, and beans, and lentils, and millet, and spelt, and put them in one vessel, and make you bread thereof; according to the number of the days that you shall lie upon your side, even three hundred and ninety days, shall you eat thereof.4:10 And your food which you shall eat shall be by weight, twenty shekels a day: from time to time shall you eat it.4:11 And you shall drink water by measure, the sixth part of a hin: from time to time shall you drink.4:12 And you shall eat it as barley cakes, and you shall bake it in their sight with dung that comes out of man.4:13 And Yahweh said, Even thus shall the children of Israel eat their bread unclean, among the nations whither I will drive them.4:14 Then said I, ah Lord Yahweh! behold, my soul has not been polluted; for from my youth up even till now have I not eaten of that which dies of itself, or is torn of beasts; neither came there abominable flesh into my mouth.4:15 Then he said to me, See, I have given you cow's dung for man's dung, and you shall prepare your bread upon it.4:16 Moreover he said to me, Son of man, behold, I will break the staff of bread in Jerusalem: and they shall eat bread by weight, and with fearfulness; and they shall drink water by measure, and in dismay:4:17 that they may want bread and water, and be dismayed one with another, and pine away in their iniquity.5:1 And you, son of man, take you a sharp sword; as a barber's razor shall you take it to you, and shall cause it to pass upon your head and upon your beard: then take you balances to weigh, and divide the hair.5:2 A third part shall you burn in the fire in the midst of the city, when the days of the siege are fulfilled; and you shall take a third part, and smite with the sword round about it; and a third part you shall scatter to the wind, and I will draw out a sword after them.5:3 And you shall take thereof a few in number, and bind them in your skirts.5:4 And of these again shall you take, and cast them into the midst of the fire, and burn them in the fire; therefrom shall a fire come forth into all the house of Israel.5:5 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: This is Jerusalem; I have set her in the midst of the nations, and countries are round about her.5:6 And she has rebelled against my ordinances in doing wickedness more than the nations, and against my statutes more than the countries that are round about her; for they have rejected my ordinances, and as for my statutes, they have not walked in them.5:7 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because ye are turbulent more than the nations that are round about you, and have not walked in my statutes, neither have kept my ordinances, neither have done after the ordinances of the nations that are round about you;5:8 therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I, even I, am against you; and I will execute judgments in the midst of you in the sight of the nations.5:9 And I will do in you that which I have not done, and whereto I will not do any more the like, because of all your abominations.5:10 Therefore the fathers shall eat the sons in the midst of you, and the sons shall eat their fathers; and I will execute judgments on you; and the whole remnant of you will I scatter to all the winds.5:11 Wherefore, as I live, says the Lord Yahweh, surely, because you have defiled my sanctuary with all your detestable things, and with all your abominations, therefore will I also diminish you; neither shall my eye spare, and I also will have no pity.5:12 A third part of you shall die with the pestilence, and with famine shall they be consumed in the midst of you; and a third part shall fall by the sword round about you; and a third part I will scatter to all the winds, and will draw out a sword after them.5:13 Thus shall my anger be accomplished, and I will cause my wrath toward them to rest, and I shall be comforted; and they shall know that I, Yahweh, have spoken in my zeal, when I have accomplished my wrath upon them.5:14 Moreover I will make you a desolation and a reproach among the nations that are round about you, in the sight of all that pass by.5:15 So it shall be a reproach and a taunt, an instruction and an astonishment, to the nations that are round about you, when I shall execute judgments on you in anger and in wrath, and in wrathful rebukes; (I, Yahweh, have spoken it;)5:16 when I shall send upon them the evil arrows of famine, that are for destruction, which I will send to destroy you: and I will increase the famine upon you, and will break your staff of bread;5:17 and I will send upon you famine and evil beasts, and they shall bereave you; and pestilence and blood shall pass through you; and I will bring the sword upon you: I, Yahweh, have spoken it.6:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,6:2 Son of man, set your face toward the mountains of Israel, and prophesy to them,6:3 and say, You mountains of Israel, hear the word of the Lord Yahweh: Thus says the Lord Yahweh to the mountains and to the hills, to the watercourses and to the valleys: Behold, I, even I, will bring a sword upon you, and I will destroy your high places.6:4 And your altars shall become desolate, and your sun-images shall be broken; and I will cast down your slain men before your idols.6:5 And I will lay the dead bodies of the children of Israel before their idols; and I will scatter your bones round about your altars.6:6 In all your dwelling-places the cities shall be laid waste, and the high places shall be desolate; that your altars may be laid waste and made desolate, and your idols may be broken and cease, and your sun-images may be hewn down, and your works may be abolished.6:7 And the slain shall fall in the midst of you, and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.6:8 Yet will I leave a remnant, in that ye shall have some that escape the sword among the nations, when ye shall be scattered through the countries.6:9 And those of you that escape shall remember me among the nations whither they shall be carried captive, how that I have been broken with their lewd heart, which has departed from me, and with they eyes, which play the harlot after their idols: and they shall loathe themselves in their own sight for the evils which they have committed in all their abominations.6:10 And they shall know that I am Yahweh: I have not said in vain that I would do this evil to them.6:11 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Smite with your hand, and stamp with your foot, and say, alas! because of all the evil abominations of the house of Israel; for they shall fall by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence.6:12 He that is far off shall die of the pestilence; and he that is near shall fall by the sword; and he that remains and is besieged shall die by the famine: thus will I accomplish my wrath upon them.6:13 And ye shall know that I am Yahweh, when their slain men shall be among their idols round about their altars, upon every high hill, on all the tops of the mountains, and under every green tree, and under every thick oak, the places where they offered sweet savor to all their idols.6:14 And I will stretch out my hand upon them, and make the land desolate and waste, from the wilderness toward Diblah, throughout all their habitations: and they shall know that I am Yahweh.7:1 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,7:2 And you, son of man, thus says the Lord Yahweh to the land of Israel, an end: the end is come upon the four corners of the land.7:3 Now is the end upon you, and I will send my anger upon you, and will judge you according to your ways; and I will bring upon you all your abominations.7:4 And my eye shall not spare you, neither will I have pity; but I will bring your ways upon you, and your abominations shall be in the midst of you: and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.7:5 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: An evil, an only evil; behold, it comes.7:6 An end is come, the end is come; it awakes against you; behold, it comes.7:7 Your doom is come to you, O inhabitant of the land: the time is come, the day is near, a day of tumult, and not of joyful shouting, upon the mountains.7:8 Now will I shortly pour out my wrath upon you, and accomplish my anger against you, and will judge you according to your ways; and I will bring upon you all your abominations.7:9 And my eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity: I will bring upon you according to your ways; and your abominations shall be in the midst of you; and ye shall know that I, Yahweh, do smite.7:10 Behold, the day, behold, it comes: your doom is gone forth; the rod has blossomed, pride has budded.7:11 Violence is risen up into a rod of wickedness; none of them shall remain, nor of their multitude, nor of their wealth: neither shall there be eminency among them.7:12 The time is come, the day draws near: let not the buyer rejoice, nor the seller mourn; for wrath is upon all the multitude thereof.7:13 For the seller shall not return to that which is sold, although they be yet alive: for the vision is touching the whole multitude thereof, none shall return; neither shall any strengthen himself in the iniquity of his life.7:14 They have blown the trumpet, and have made all ready; but none goes to the battle; for my wrath is upon all the multitude thereof.7:15 The sword is without, and the pestilence and the famine within: he that is in the field shall die with the sword: and he that is in the city, famine and pestilence shall devour him.7:16 But those of them that escape shall escape, and shall be on the mountains like doves of the valleys, all of them moaning, every one in his iniquity.7:17 All hands shall be feeble, and all knees shall be weak as water.7:18 They shall also gird themselves with sackcloth, and horror shall cover them; and shame shall be upon all faces, and baldness upon all their heads.7:19 They shall cast their silver in the streets, and their gold shall be as an unclean thing; their silver and their gold shall not be able to deliver them in the day of the wrath of Yahweh: they shall not satisfy their souls, neither fill their bowels; because it has been the stumblingblock of their iniquity.7:20 As for the beauty of his ornament, he set it in majesty; but they made the images of their abominations and their detestable things therein: therefore have I made it to them as an unclean thing.7:21 And I will give it into the hands of the strangers for a prey, and to the wicked of the earth for a spoil; and they shall profane it.7:22 My face will I turn also from them, and they shall profane my secret place; and robbers shall enter into it, and profane it.7:23 Make the chain; for the land is full of bloody crimes, and the city is full of violence.7:24 Wherefore I will bring the worst of the nations, and they shall possess their houses: I will also make the pride of the strong to cease; and their holy places shall be profaned.7:25 Destruction comes; and they shall seek peace, and there shall be none.7:26 Mischief shall come upon mischief, and rumor shall be upon rumor; and they shall seek a vision of the prophet; but the law shall perish from the priest, and counsel from the elders.7:27 The king shall mourn, and the prince shall be clothed with desolation, and the hands of the people of the land shall be troubled: I will do to them after their way, and according to their deserts will I judge them; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.8:1 And it came to pass in the sixth year, in the sixth month, in the fifth day of the month, as I sat in my house, and the elders of Judah sat before me, that the hand of the Lord Yahweh fell there upon me.8:2 Then I beheld, and, lo, a likeness as the appearance of fire; from the appearance of his loins and downward, fire; and from his loins and upward, as the appearance of brightness, as it were glowing metal.8:3 And he put forth the form of a hand, and took me by a lock of my head; and the Spirit lifted me up between earth and heaven, and brought me in the visions of God to Jerusalem, to the door of the gate of the inner court that looks toward the north; where was the seat of the image of jealousy, which provokes to jealousy.8:4 And, behold, the glory of the God of Israel was there, according to the appearance that I saw in the plain.8:5 Then said he to me, Son of man, lift up your eyes now the way toward the north.  So I lifted up my eyes the way toward the north, and behold, northward of the gate of the altar this image of jealousy in the entry.8:6 And he said to me, Son of man, see you what they do?  even the great abominations that the house of Israel do commit here, that I should go far off from my sanctuary?  but you shall again see yet other great abominations.8:7 And he brought me to the door of the court; and when I looked, behold, a hole in the wall.8:8 Then said he to me, Son of man, dig now in the wall: and when I had dug in the wall, behold, a door.8:9 And he said to me, Go in, and see the wicked abominations that they do here.8:10 So I went in and saw; and behold, every form of creeping things, and abominable beasts, and all the idols of the house of Israel, portrayed upon the wall round about.8:11 And there stood before them seventy men of the elders of the house of Israel; and in the midst of them stood Jaazaniah the son of Shaphan, every man with his censer in his hand; and the odor of the cloud of incense went up.8:12 Then said he to me, Son of man, have you seen what the elders of the house of Israel do in the dark, every man in his chambers of imagery?  for they say, Yahweh sees us not; Yahweh has forsaken the land.8:13 He said also to me, You shall again see yet other great abominations which they do.8:14 Then he brought me to the door of the gate of Yahweh's house which was toward the north; and behold, there sat the women weeping for Tammuz.8:15 Then said he to me, Have you seen this, O son of man?  you shall again see yet greater abominations than these.8:16 And he brought me into the inner court of Yahweh's house; and behold, at the door of the temple of Yahweh, between the porch and the altar, were about five and twenty men, with their backs toward the temple of Yahweh, and their faces toward the east; and they were worshipping the sun toward the east.8:17 Then he said to me, Have you seen this, O son of man?  Is it a light thing to the house of Judah that they commit the abominations which they commit here?  for they have filled the land with violence, and have turned again to provoke me to anger: and, lo, they put the branch to their nose.8:18 Therefore will I also deal in wrath; my eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity; and though they cry in my ears with a loud voice, yet will I not hear them.9:1 Then he cried in my ears with a loud voice, saying, Cause ye them that have charge over the city to draw near, every man with his destroying weapon in his hand.9:2 And behold, six men came from the way of the upper gate, which lies toward the north, every man with his slaughter weapon in his hand; and one man in the midst of them clothed in linen, with a writer's inkhorn by his side.  And they went in, and stood beside the brazen altar.9:3 And the glory of the God of Israel was gone up from the cherub, whereupon it was, to the threshold of the house: and he called to the man clothed in linen, who had the writer's inkhorn by his side.9:4 And Yahweh said to him, Go through the midst of the city, through the midst of Jerusalem, and set a mark upon the foreheads of the men that sigh and that cry over all the abominations that are done in the midst thereof.9:5 And to the others he said in my hearing, Go ye through the city after him, and smite: let not your eye spare, neither have ye pity;9:6 slay utterly the old man, the young man and the virgin, and little children and women; but come not near any man upon whom is the mark: and begin at my sanctuary.  Then they began at the old men that were before the house.9:7 And he said to them, Defile the house, and fill the courts with the slain: go ye forth.  And they went forth, and smote in the city.9:8 And it came to pass, while they were smiting, and I was left, that I fell upon my face, and cried, and said, ah Lord Yahweh! will you destroy all the residue of Israel in your pouring out of your wrath upon Jerusalem?9:9 Then said he to me, The iniquity of the house of Israel and Judah is exceedingly great, and the land is full of blood, and the city full of wrestling of judgment: for they say, Yahweh has forsaken the land, and Yahweh sees not.9:10 And as for me also, my eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity, but I will bring their way upon their head.9:11 And behold, the man clothed in linen, who had the inkhorn by his side, reported the matter, saying, I have done as you have commanded me.10:1 Then I looked, and behold, in the firmament that was over the head of the cherubim there appeared above them as it were a sapphire stone, as the appearance of the likeness of a throne.10:2 And he spoke to the man clothed in linen, and said, Go in between the whirling wheels, even under the cherub, and fill both your hands with coals of fire from between the cherubim, and scatter them over the city.  And he went in in my sight.10:3 Now the cherubim stood on the right side of the house, when the man went in; and the cloud filled the inner court.10:4 And the glory of Yahweh mounted up from the cherub, and stood over the threshold of the house; and the house was filled with the cloud, and the court was full of the brightness of Yahweh's glory.10:5 And the sound of the wings of the cherubim was heard even to the outer court, as the voice of God Almighty when he speaks.10:6 And it came to pass, when he commanded the man clothed in linen, saying, Take fire from between the whirling wheels, from between the cherubim, that he went in, and stood beside a wheel.10:7 And the cherub stretched forth his hand from between the cherubim to the fire that was between the cherubim, and took of it, and put it into the hands of him that was clothed in linen, who took it and went out.10:8 And there appeared in the cherubim the form of a man's hand under their wings.10:9 And I looked, and behold, four wheels beside the cherubim, one wheel beside one cherub, and another wheel beside another cherub; and the appearance of the wheels was like to a beryl stone.10:10 And as for their appearance, they four had one likeness, as if a wheel have been within a wheel.10:11 When they went, they went in their four directions: they turned not as they went, but to the place whither the head looked they followed it; they turned not as they went.10:12 And their whole body, and their backs, and their hands, and their wings, and the wheels, were full of eyes round about, even the wheels that they four had.10:13 As for the wheels, they were called in my hearing, the whirling wheels.10:14 And every one had four faces: the first face was the face of the cherub, and the second face was the face of a man, and the third face the face of a lion, and the fourth the face of an eagle.10:15 And the cherubim mounted up: this is the living creature that I saw by the river Chebar.10:16 And when the cherubim went, the wheels went beside them; and when the cherubim lifted up their wings to mount up from the earth, the wheels also turned not from beside them.10:17 When they stood, these stood; and when they mounted up, these mounted up with them: for the spirit of the living creature was in them.10:18 And the glory of Yahweh went forth from over the threshold of the house, and stood over the cherubim.10:19 And the cherubim lifted up their wings, and mounted up from the earth in my sight when they went forth, and the wheels beside them: and they stood at the door of the east gate of Yahweh's house; and the glory of the God of Israel was over them above.10:20 This is the living creature that I saw under the God of Israel by the river Chebar; and I knew that they were cherubim.10:21 Every one had four faces, and every one four wings; and the likeness of the hands of a man was under their wings.10:22 And as for the likeness of their faces, they were the faces which I saw by the river Chebar, their appearances and themselves; they went every one straight forward.11:1 Moreover the Spirit lifted me up, and brought me to the east gate of Yahweh's house, which looks eastward: and behold, at the door of the gate five and twenty men; and I saw in the midst of them Jaazaniah the son of Azzur, and Pelatiah the son of Benaiah, princes of the people.11:2 And he said to me, Son of man, these are the men that devise iniquity, and that give wicked counsel in this city;11:3 that say, The time is not near to build houses: this city is the caldron, and we are the flesh.11:4 Therefore prophesy against them, prophesy, O son of man.11:5 And the Spirit of Yahweh fell upon me, and he said to me, Speak, Thus says Yahweh: Thus have ye said, O house of Israel; for I know the things that come into your mind.11:6 You have multiplied your slain in this city, and ye have filled the streets thereof with the slain.11:7 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Your slain whom ye have laid in the midst of it, they are the flesh, and this city is the caldron; but ye shall be brought forth out of the midst of it.11:8 You have feared the sword; and I will bring the sword upon you, says the Lord Yahweh.11:9 And I will bring you forth out of the midst thereof, and deliver you into the hands of strangers, and will execute judgments among you.11:10 You shall fall by the sword; I will judge you in the border of Israel; and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.11:11 This city shall not be your caldron, neither shall ye be the flesh in the midst thereof; I will judge you in the border of Israel;11:12 and ye shall know that I am Yahweh: for ye have not walked in my statutes, neither have ye executed my ordinances, but have done after the ordinances of the nations that are round about you.11:13 And it came to pass, when I prophesied, that Pelatiah the son of Benaiah died.  Then fell I down upon my face, and cried with a loud voice, and said, ah Lord Yahweh! will you make a full end of the remnant of Israel?11:14 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,11:15 Son of man, your brethren, even your brethren, the men of your kindred, and all the house of Israel, all of them, are they to whom the inhabitants of Jerusalem have said, Get you far from Yahweh; to us is this land given for a possession.11:16 Therefore say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Whereas I have removed them far off among the nations, and whereas I have scattered them among the countries, yet will I be to them a sanctuary for a little while in the countries where they are come.11:17 Therefore say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: I will gather you from the peoples, and assemble you out of the countries where ye have been scattered, and I will give you the land of Israel.11:18 And they shall come there, and they shall take away all the detestable things thereof and all the abominations thereof from there.11:19 And I will give them one heart, and I will put a new spirit within you; and I will take the stony heart out of their flesh, and will give them a heart of flesh;11:20 that they may walk in my statutes, and keep my ordinances, and do them: and they shall be my people, and I will be their God.11:21 But as for them whose heart walks after the heart of their detestable things and their abominations, I will bring their way upon their own heads, says the Lord Yahweh.11:22 Then did the cherubim lift up their wings, and the wheels were beside them; and the glory of the God of Israel was over them above.11:23 And the glory of Yahweh went up from the midst of the city, and stood upon the mountain which is on the east side of the city.11:24 And the Spirit lifted me up, and brought me in the vision by the Spirit of God into Chaldea, to them of the captivity.  So the vision that I had seen went up from me.11:25 Then I spoke to them of the captivity all the things that Yahweh had shown me.12:1 The word of Yahweh also came to me, saying,12:2 Son of man, you dwell in the midst of the rebellious house, that have eyes to see, and see not, that have ears to hear, and hear not; for they are a rebellious house.12:3 Therefore, you son of man, prepare stuff for removing, and remove by day in their sight; and you shall remove from your place to another place in their sight: it may be they will consider, though they are a rebellious house.12:4 And you shall bring forth your stuff by day in their sight, as stuff for removing; and you shall go forth yourself at evening in their sight, as when men go forth into exile.12:5 Dig through the wall in their sight, and carry out thereby.12:6 In their sight shall you bear it upon your shoulder, and carry it forth in the dark; you shall cover your face, that you see not the land: for I have set you for a sign to the house of Israel.12:7 And I did so as I was commanded: I brought forth my stuff by day, as stuff for removing, and in the even I dug through the wall with my hand; I brought it forth in the dark, and bore it upon my shoulder in their sight.12:8 And in the morning came the word of Yahweh to me, saying,12:9 Son of man, has not the house of Israel, the rebellious house, said to you, What do you?12:10 Say you to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: This burden concerns the prince in Jerusalem, and all the house of Israel among whom they are.12:11 Say, I am your sign: like as I have done, so shall it be done to them; they shall go into exile, into captivity.12:12 And the prince that is among them shall bear upon his shoulder in the dark, and shall go forth: they shall dig through the wall to carry out thereby: he shall cover his face, because he shall not see the land with his eyes.12:13 My net also will I spread upon him, and he shall be taken in my snare; and I will bring him to Babylon to the land of the Chaldeans; yet shall he not see it, though he shall die there.12:14 And I will scatter toward every wind all that are round about him to help him, and all his bands; and I will draw out the sword after them.12:15 And they shall know that I am Yahweh, when I shall disperse them among the nations, and scatter them through the countries.12:16 But I will leave a few men of them from the sword, from the famine, and from the pestilence; that they may declare all their abominations among the nations whither they come; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.12:17 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,12:18 Son of man, eat your bread with quaking, and drink your water with trembling and with fearfulness;12:19 and say to the people of the land, Thus says the Lord Yahweh concerning the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and the land of Israel: They shall eat their bread with fearfulness, and drink their water in dismay, that her land may be desolate, and despoiled of all that is therein, because of the violence of all them that dwell therein.12:20 And the cities that are inhabited shall be laid waste, and the land shall be a desolation; and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.12:21 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,12:22 Son of man, what is this proverb that ye have in the land of Israel, saying, The days are prolonged, and every vision fails?12:23 Tell them therefore, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: I will make this proverb to cease, and they shall no more use it as a proverb in Israel; but say to them, The days are at hand, and the fulfilment of every vision.12:24 For there shall be no more any false vision nor flattering divination within the house of Israel.12:25 For I am Yahweh; I will speak, and the word that I shall speak shall be performed; it shall be no more deferred: for in your days, O rebellious house, will I speak the word, and will perform it, says the Lord Yahweh.12:26 Again the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,12:27 Son of man, behold, they of the house of Israel say, The vision that he sees is for many day to come, and he prophesies of times that are far off.12:28 Therefore say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: There shall none of my words be deferred any more, but the word which I shall speak shall be performed, says the Lord Yahweh.13:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,13:2 Son of man, prophesy against the prophets of Israel that prophesy, and say you to them that prophesy out of their own heart, Hear ye the word of Yahweh:13:3 Thus says the Lord Yahweh, Woe to the foolish prophets, that follow their own spirit, and have seen nothing!13:4 O Israel, your prophets have been like foxes in the waste places.13:5 You have not gone up into the gaps, neither built up the wall for the house of Israel, to stand in the battle in the day of Yahweh.13:6 They have seen falsehood and lying divination, that say, Yahweh says; but Yahweh has not sent them: and they have made men to hope that the word would be confirmed.13:7 Have ye not seen a false vision, and have ye not spoken a lying divination, in that ye say, Yahweh says; albeit I have not spoken?13:8 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because ye have spoken falsehood, and seen lies, therefore, behold, I am against you, says the Lord Yahweh.13:9 And my hand shall be against the prophets that see false visions, and that divine lies: they shall not be in the council of my people, neither shall they be written in the writing of the house of Israel, neither shall they enter into the land of Israel; and ye shall know that I am the Lord Yahweh.13:10 Because, even because they have seduced my people, saying, Peace; and there is no peace; and when one builds up a wall, behold, they daub it with untempered mortar:13:11 say to them that daub it with untempered mortar, that it shall fall: there shall be an overflowing shower; and ye, O great hailstones, shall fall; and a stormy wind shall rend it.13:12 Lo, when the wall is fallen, shall it not be said to you, Where is the daubing with which ye have daubed it?13:13 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: I will even rend it with a stormy wind in my wrath; and there shall be an overflowing shower in my anger, and great hailstones in wrath to consume it.13:14 So will I break down the wall that ye have daubed with untempered mortar, and bring it down to the ground, so that the foundation of it shall be uncovered; and it shall fall, and ye shall be consumed in the midst thereof: and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.13:15 Thus will I accomplish my wrath upon the wall, and upon them that have daubed it with untempered mortar; and I will say to you, The wall is no more, neither they that daubed it;13:16 that is, the prophets of Israel that prophesy concerning Jerusalem, and that see visions of peace for her, and there is no peace, says the Lord Yahweh.13:17 And you, son of man, set your face against the daughters of your people, that prophesy out of their own heart; and prophesy you against them,13:18 and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Woe to the women that sew pillows upon all elbows, and make kerchiefs for the head of persons of every stature to hunt souls! Will ye hunt the souls of my people, and save souls alive for yourselves?13:19 And ye have profaned me among my people for handfuls of barley and for pieces of bread, to slay the souls that should not die, and to save the souls alive that should not live, by your lying to my people that hearken to lies.13:20 Wherefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I am against your pillows, with which ye there hunt the souls to make them fly, and I will tear them from your arms; and I will let the souls go, even the souls that ye hunt to make them fly.13:21 Your kerchiefs also will I tear, and deliver my people out of your hand, and they shall be no more in your hand to be hunted; and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.13:22 Because with lies ye have grieved the heart of the righteous, whom I have not made sad; and strengthened the hands of the wicked, that he should not return from his wicked way, and be saved alive:13:23 Therefore ye shall no more see false visions, nor divine divinations: and I will deliver my people out of your hand; and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.14:1 Then came certain of the elders of Israel to me, and sat before me.14:2 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,14:3 Son of man, these men have taken their idols into their heart, and put the stumblingblock of their iniquity before their face: should I be inquired of at all by them?14:4 Therefore speak to them, and say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Every man of the house of Israel that takes his idols into his heart, and puts the stumblingblock of his iniquity before his face, and comes to the prophet; I Yahweh will answer him therein according to the multitude of his idols;14:5 that I may take the house of Israel in their own heart, because they are all estranged from me through their idols.14:6 Therefore say to the house of Israel, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Return ye, and turn yourselves from your idols; and turn away your faces from all your abominations.14:7 For every one of the house of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn in Israel, that separates himself from me, and takes his idols into his heart, and puts the stumblingblock of his iniquity before his face, and comes to the prophet to inquire for himself of me; I Yahweh will answer him by myself:14:8 and I will set my face against that man, and will make him an astonishment, for a sign and a proverb, and I will cut him off from the midst of my people; and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.14:9 And if the prophet be deceived and speak a word, I, Yahweh, have deceived that prophet, and I will stretch out my hand upon him, and will destroy him from the midst of my people Israel.14:10 And they shall bear their iniquity: the iniquity of the prophet shall be even as the iniquity of him that seekes to him;14:11 that the house of Israel may go no more astray from me, neither defile themselves any more with all their transgressions; but that they may be my people, and I may be their God, says the Lord Yahweh.14:12 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,14:13 Son of man, when a land sins against me by committing a trespass, and I stretch out my hand upon it, and break the staff of the bread thereof, and send famine upon it, and cut off from it man and beast;14:14 though these three men, Noah, Daniel, and Job, were in it, they should deliver but their own souls by their righteousness, says the Lord Yahweh.14:15 If I cause evil beasts to pass through the land, and they ravage it, and it be made desolate, so that no man may pass through because of the beasts;14:16 though these three men were in it, as I live, says the Lord Yahweh, they should deliver neither sons nor daughters; they only should be delivered, but the land should be desolate.14:17 Or if I bring a sword upon that land, and say, Sword, go through the land; so that I cut off from it man and beast;14:18 though these three men were in it, as I live, says the Lord Yahweh, they should deliver neither sons nor daughters, but they only should be delivered themselves.14:19 Or if I send a pestilence into that land, and pour out my wrath upon it in blood, to cut off from it man and beast;14:20 though Noah, Daniel, and Job, were in it, as I live, says the Lord Yahweh, they should deliver neither son nor daughter; they should but deliver their own souls by their righteousness.14:21 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: How much more when I send my four sore judgments upon Jerusalem, the sword, and the famine, and the evil beasts, and the pestilence, to cut off from it man and beast!14:22 Yet, behold, therein shall be left a remnant that shall be carried forth, both sons and daughters: behold, they shall come forth to you, and ye shall see their way and their doings; and ye shall be comforted concerning the evil that I have brought upon Jerusalem, even concerning all that I have brought upon it.14:23 And they shall comfort you, when ye see their way and their doings; and ye shall know that I have not done without cause all that I have done in it, says the Lord Yahweh.15:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,15:2 Son of man, what is the vine-tree more than any tree, the vine-branch which is among the trees of the forest?15:3 Shall wood be taken thereof to make any work?  or will men take a pin of it to hang any vessel upon it?15:4 Behold, it is cast into the fire for fuel; the fire has devoured both the ends of it, and the midst of it is burned: is it profitable for any work?15:5 Behold, when it was whole, it was meet for no work: how much less, when the fire has devoured it, and it is burned, shall it yet be meet for any work!15:6 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: As the vine-tree among the trees of the forest, which I have given to the fire for fuel, so will I give the inhabitants of Jerusalem.15:7 And I will set my face against them; they shall go forth from the fire, but the fire shall devour them; and ye shall know that I am Yahweh, when I set my face against them.15:8 And I will make the land desolate, because they have committed a trespass, says the Lord Yahweh.16:1 Again the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,16:2 Son of man, cause Jerusalem to know her abominations;16:3 and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh to Jerusalem: Your birth and your nativity is of the land of the Canaanite; the Amorite was your father, and your mother was a Hittite.16:4 And as for your nativity, in the day you were born your navel was not cut, neither were you washed in water to cleanse you; you were not salted at all, nor swaddled at all.16:5 No eye pitied you, to do any of these things to you, to have compassion upon you; but you were cast out in the open field, for that your person was abhorred, in the day that you were born.16:6 And when I passed by you, and saw you weltering in your blood, I said to you, Though you are in your blood, live; yes, I said to you, Though you are in your blood, live.16:7 I caused you to multiply as that which grows in the field, and you did increase and grow great, and you attained to excellent ornament; your breasts were fashioned, and your hair was grown; yet you were naked and bare.16:8 Now when I passed by you, and looked upon you, behold, your time was the time of love; and I spread my skirt over you, and covered your nakedness: yes, I swore to you, and entered into a covenant with you, says the Lord Yahweh, and you became mine.16:9 Then washed I you with water; yes, I thoroughly washed away your blood from you, and I anointed you with oil.16:10 I clothed you also with broidered work, and shod you with sealskin, and I girded you about with fine linen, and covered you with silk.16:11 And I decked you with ornaments, and I put bracelets upon your hands, and a chain on your neck.16:12 And I put a ring upon your nose, and ear-rings in your ears, and a beautiful crown upon your head.16:13 Thus were you decked with gold and silver; and your raiment was of fine linen, and silk, and broidered work; you did eat fine flour, and honey, and oil; and you were exceedingly beautiful, and you did prosper to royal estate.16:14 And your renown went forth among the nations for your beauty; for it was perfect, through my majesty which I had put upon you, says the Lord Yahweh.16:15 But you did trust in your beauty, and played the harlot because of your renown, and poured out your whoredoms on every one that passed by; his it was.16:16 And you did take of your garments, and made for you high places decked with divers colors, and played the harlot upon them: the like things shall not come, neither shall it be so.16:17 You did also take your fair jewels of my gold and of my silver, which I had given you, and made for you images of men, and did play the harlot with them;16:18 and you took your broidered garments, and covered them, and did set my oil and my incense before them.16:19 My bread also which I gave you, fine flour, and oil, and honey, with which I fed you, you did even set it before them for a sweet savor; and thus it was, says the Lord Yahweh.16:20 Moreover you have taken your sons and your daughters, whom you have borne to me, and these have you sacrificed to them to be devoured.  Were your whoredoms a small matter,16:21 that you have slain my children, and delivered them up, in causing them to pass through the fire to them?16:22 And in all your abominations and your whoredoms you have not remembered the days of your youth, when you were naked and bare, and were weltering in your blood.16:23 And it is come to pass after all your wickedness, (woe, woe to you! says the Lord Yahweh,)16:24 that you have built for yourself a vaulted place, and have made you a lofty place in every street.16:25 You have built your lofty place at the head of every way, and made your beauty an abomination, and have spread your legs to every one that passed by, and multiplied your whoredom.16:26 You have also committed fornication with the Egyptians, your lustful neighbors; and have multiplied your whoredom, to provoke me to anger.16:27 Behold therefore, I have stretched out my hand over you, and have diminished your ordinary food, and delivered you to the will of them that hate you, the daughters of the Philistines, that are ashamed of your lewd way.16:28 You have played the harlot also with the Assyrians, because you were insatiable; yes, you have played the harlot with them, and yet you were not satisfied.16:29 You have moreover multiplied your whoredom to the land of traffic, to Chaldea; and yet you were not satisfied herewith.16:30 How weak is your heart, says the Lord Yahweh, seeing you do all these things, the work of an impudent harlot;16:31 in that you build your vaulted place at the head of every way, and make your lofty place in every street, and have not been as a harlot, in that you scorn a fee.16:32 A wife that commits adultery! that takes strangers instead of her husband!16:33 They give gifts to all harlots; but you give your gifts to all your lovers, and bribe them, that they may come to you on every side for your whoredoms.16:34 And you are different from other women in your whoredoms, in that none follows you to play the harlot; and whereas you give a fee, and no fee is given to you, therefore you are different.16:35 Wherefore, O harlot, hear the word of Yahweh:16:36 Thus says the Lord Yahweh, Because your filthiness was poured out, and your nakedness uncovered through your whoredoms with your lovers; and because of all the idols of your abominations, and for the blood of your children, that you did give to them;16:37 therefore behold, I will gather all your lovers, with whom you have taken pleasure, and all them that you have loved, with all them that you have hated; I will even gather them against you on every side, and will uncover your nakedness to them, that they may see all your nakedness.16:38 And I will judge you, as women that break wedlock and shed blood are judged; and I will bring upon you the blood of wrath and jealousy.16:39 I will also give you into their hand, and they shall throw down your vaulted place, and break down your lofty places; and they shall strip you of your clothes, and take your fair jewels; and they shall leave you naked and bare.16:40 They shall also bring up a company against you, and they shall stone you with stones, and thrust you through with their swords.16:41 And they shall burn your houses with fire, and execute judgments upon you in the sight of many women; and I will cause you to cease from playing the harlot, and you shall also pay no fee any more.16:42 So will I cause my wrath toward you to rest, and my jealousy shall depart from you, and I will be quiet, and will be no more angry.16:43 Because you have not remembered the days of your youth, but have raged against me in all these things; therefore, behold, I also will bring your way upon your head, says the Lord Yahweh: and you shall not commit this lewdness with all your abominations.16:44 Behold, every one that uses proverbs shall use this proverb against you, saying, as is the mother, so is her daughter.16:45 You are the daughter of your mother, that loathes her husband and her children; and you are the sister of your sisters, who loathed their husbands and their children: your mother was a Hittite, and your father an Amorite.16:46 And your elder sister is Samaria, that dwells at your left hand, she and her daughters; and your younger sister, that dwells at your right hand, is Sodom and her daughters.16:47 Yet have you not walked in their ways, nor done after their abominations; but, as if that were a very little thing, you were more corrupt than they in all your ways.16:48 As I live, says the Lord Yahweh, Sodom your sister has not done, she nor her daughters, as you have done, you and your daughters.16:49 Behold, this was the iniquity of your sister Sodom: pride, fulness of bread, and prosperous ease was in her and in her daughters; neither did she strengthen the hand of the poor and needy.16:50 And they were haughty, and committed abomination before me: therefore I took them away as I saw good.16:51 Neither has Samaria committed half of your sins; but you have multiplied your abominations more than they, and have justified your sisters by all your abominations which you have done.16:52 You also, bear you your own shame, in that you have given judgment for your sisters; through your sins that you have committed more abominable than they, they are more righteous that you: yes, be you also confounded, and bear your shame, in that you have justified your sisters.16:53 And I will turn again their captivity, the captivity of Sodom and her daughters, and the captivity of Samaria and her daughters, and the captivity of your captives in the midst of them;16:54 that you may bear your own shame, and may be ashamed because of all that you have done, in that you are a comfort to them.16:55 And your sisters, Sodom and her daughters, shall return to their former estate; and Samaria and her daughters shall return to their former estate; and you and your daughters shall return to your former estate.16:56 For your sister Sodom was not mentioned by your mouth in the day of your pride,16:57 before your wickedness was uncovered, as at the time of the reproach of the daughters of Syria, and of all that are round about her, the daughters of the Philistines, that do despite to you round about.16:58 You have borne your lewdness and your abominations, says Yahweh.16:59 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: I will also deal with you as you have done, who have despised the oath in breaking the covenant.16:60 Nevertheless I will remember my covenant with you in the days of your youth, and I will establish to you an everlasting covenant.16:61 Then shall you remember your ways, and be ashamed, when you shall receive your sisters, your elder sisters and your younger; and I will give them to you for daughters, but not by your covenant.16:62 And I will establish my covenant with you; and you shall know that I am Yahweh;16:63 that you may remember, and be confounded, and never open your mouth any more, because of your shame, when I have forgiven you all that you have done, says the Lord Yahweh.17:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,17:2 Son of man, put forth a riddle, and speak a parable to the house of Israel;17:3 and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: A great eagle with great wings and long pinions, full of feathers, which had divers colors, came to Lebanon, and took the top of the cedar:17:4 he cropped off the topmost of the young twigs thereof, and carried it to a land of traffic; he set it in a city of merchants.17:5 He took also of the seed of the land, and planted it in a fruitful soil; he placed it beside many waters; he set it as a willow-tree.17:6 And it grew, and became a spreading vine of low stature, whose branches turned toward him, and the roots thereof were under him: so it became a vine, and brought forth branches, and shot forth sprigs.17:7 There was also another great eagle with great wings and many feathers: and, behold, this vine did bend its roots toward him, and shot forth its branches toward him, from the beds of its plantation, that he might water it.17:8 It was planted in a good soil by many waters, that it might bring forth branches, and that it might bear fruit, that it might be a goodly vine.17:9 Say you, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Shall it prosper?  shall he not pull up the roots thereof, and cut off the fruit thereof, that it may wither; that all its fresh springing leaves may wither?  and not by a strong arm or much people can it be raised from the roots thereof.17:10 Yes, behold, being planted, shall it prosper?  shall it not utterly wither, when the east wind touches it?  it shall wither in the beds where it grew.17:11 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,17:12 Say now to the rebellious house, Know ye not what these things mean?  tell them, Behold, the king of Babylon came to Jerusalem, and took the king thereof, and the princes thereof, and brought them to him to Babylon:17:13 and he took of the seed royal, and made a covenant with him; he also brought him under an oath, and took away the mighty of the land;17:14 that the kingdom might be base, that it might not lift itself up, but that by keeping his covenant it might stand.17:15 But he rebelled against him in sending his ambassadors into Egypt, that they might give him horses and much people.  Shall he prosper?  shall he escape that does such things?  shall he break the covenant, and yet escape?17:16 As I live, says the Lord Yahweh, surely in the place where the king dwells that made him king, whose oath he despised, and whose covenant he broke, even with him in the midst of Babylon he shall die.17:17 Neither shall Pharaoh with his mighty army and great company help him in the war, when they cast up mounds and build forts, to cut off many persons.17:18 For he has despised the oath by breaking the covenant; and behold, he had given his hand, and yet has done all these things; he shall not escape.17:19 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: As I live, surely my oath that he has despised, and my covenant that he has broken, I will even bring it upon his own head.17:20 And I will spread my net upon him, and he shall be taken in my snare, and I will bring him to Babylon, and will enter into judgment with him there for his trespass that he has trespassed against me.17:21 And all his fugitives in all his bands shall fall by the sword, and they that remain shall be scattered toward every wind: and ye shall know that I, Yahweh, have spoken it.17:22 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: I will also take of the lofty top of the cedar, and will set it; I will crop off from the topmost of its young twigs a tender one, and I will plant it upon a high and lofty mountain:17:23 in the mountain of the height of Israel will I plant it; and it shall bring forth boughs, and bear fruit, and be a goodly cedar: and under it shall dwell all birds of every wing; in the shade of the branches thereof shall they dwell.17:24 And all the trees of the field shall know that I, Yahweh, have brought down the high tree, have exalted the low tree, have dried up the green tree, and have made the dry tree to flourish; I, Yahweh, have spoken and have done it.18:1 The word of Yahweh came to me again, saying,18:2 What mean ye, that ye use this proverb concerning the land of Israel, saying, The fathers have eaten sour grapes, and the children's teeth are set on edge?18:3 As I live, says the Lord Yahweh, ye shall not have occasion any more to use this proverb in Israel.18:4 Behold, all souls are mine; as the soul of the father, so also the soul of the son is mine: the soul that sins, it shall die.18:5 But if a man be just, and do that which is lawful and right,18:6 and has not eaten upon the mountains, neither has lifted up his eyes to the idols of the house of Israel, neither has defiled his neighbor's wife, neither has come near to a woman in her impurity,18:7 and has not wronged any, but has restored to the debtor his pledge, has taken nought by robbery, has given his bread to the hungry, and has covered the naked with a garment;18:8 he that has not given forth upon interest, neither has taken any increase, that has withdrawn his hand from iniquity, has executed true justice between man and man,18:9 has walked in my statutes, and has kept my ordinances, to deal truly; he is just, he shall surely live, says the Lord Yahweh.18:10 If he beget a son that is a robber, a shedder of blood, and that does any one of these things,18:11 and that does not any of those duties, but even has eaten upon the mountains, and defiled his neighbor's wife,18:12 has wronged the poor and needy, has taken by robbery, has not restored the pledge, and has lifted up his eyes to the idols, has committed abomination,18:13 has given forth upon interest, and has taken increase; shall he then live?  he shall not live: he has done all these abominations; he shall surely die; his blood shall be upon him.18:14 Now, lo, if he beget a son, that sees all his father's sins, which he has done, and fears, and does not such like;18:15 that has not eaten upon the mountains, neither has lifted up his eyes to the idols of the house of Israel, has not defiled his neighbor's wife,18:16 neither has wronged any, has not taken anything to pledge, neither has taken by robbery, but has given his bread to the hungry, and has covered the naked with a garment;18:17 that has withdrawn his hand from the poor, that has not received interest nor increase, has executed my ordinances, has walked in my statutes; he shall not die for the iniquity of his father, he shall surely live.18:18 As for his father, because he cruelly oppressed, robbed his brother, and did that which is not good among his people, behold, he shall die in his iniquity.18:19 Yet say ye, Why does not the son bear the iniquity of the father?  when the son has done that which is lawful and right, and has kept all my statutes, and has done them, he shall surely live.18:20 The soul that sins, it shall die: the son shall not bear the iniquity of the father, neither shall the father bear the iniquity of the son; the righteousness of the righteous shall be upon him, and the wickedness of the wicked shall be upon him.18:21 But if the wicked turn from all his sins that he has committed, and keep all my statutes, and do that which is lawful and right, he shall surely live, he shall not die.18:22 None of his transgressions that he has committed shall be remembered against him: in his righteousness that he has done he shall live.18:23 Have I any pleasure in the death of the wicked?  says the Lord Yahweh; and not rather that he should return from his way, and live?18:24 But when the righteous turns away from his righteousness, and commits iniquity, and does according to all the abominations that the wicked man does, shall he live?  None of his righteous deeds that he has done shall be remembered: in his trespass that he has trespassed, and in his sin that he has sinned, in them shall he die.18:25 Yet ye say, The way of the Lord is not equal.  Hear now, O house of Israel: Is not my way equal?  are not your ways unequal?18:26 When the righteous man turns away from his righteousness, and commits iniquity, and dies therein; in his iniquity that he has done shall he die.18:27 Again, when the wicked man turns away from his wickedness that he has committed, and does that which is lawful and right, he shall save his soul alive.18:28 Because he considers, and turns away from all his transgressions that he has committed, he shall surely live, he shall not die.18:29 Yet says the house of Israel, The way of the Lord is not equal.  O house of Israel, are not my ways equal?  are not your ways unequal?18:30 Therefore I will judge you, O house of Israel, every one according to his ways, says the Lord Yahweh.  Return ye, and turn yourselves from all your transgressions; so iniquity shall not be your ruin.18:31 Cast away from you all your transgressions, in which ye have transgressed; and make you a new heart and a new spirit: for why will ye die, O house of Israel?18:32 For I have no pleasure in the death of him that dies, says the Lord Yahweh: therefore turn yourselves, and live.19:1 Moreover, take you up a lamentation for the princes of Israel,19:2 and say, What was your mother?  A lioness: she crouched among lions, in the midst of the young lions she nourished her whelps.19:3 And she brought up one of her whelps: he became a young lion, and he learned to catch the prey; he devoured men.19:4 The nations also heard of him; he was taken in their pit; and they brought him with hooks to the land of Egypt.19:5 Now when she saw that she had waited, and her hope was lost, then she took another of her whelps, and made him a young lion.19:6 And he went up and down among the lions; he became a young lion, and he learned to catch the prey; he devoured men.19:7 And he knew their palaces, and laid waste their cities; and the land was desolate, and the fulness thereof, because of the noise of his roaring.19:8 Then the nations set against him on every side from the provinces; and they spread their net over him; he was taken in their pit.19:9 And they put him in a cage with hooks, and brought him to the king of Babylon; they brought him into strongholds, that his voice should no more be heard upon the mountains of Israel.19:10 Your mother was like a vine, in your blood, planted by the waters: it was fruitful and full of branches by reason of many waters.19:11 And it had strong rods for the sceptres of them that bore rule, and their stature was exalted among the thick boughs, and they were seen in their height with the multitude of their branches.19:12 But it was plucked up in fury, it was cast down to the ground, and the east wind dried up its fruit: its strong rods were broken off and withered; the fire consumed them.19:13 And now it is planted in the wilderness, in a dry and thirsty land.19:14 And fire is gone out of the rods of its branches, it has devoured its fruit, so that there is in it no strong rod to be a sceptre to rule.  This is a lamentation, and shall be for a lamentation.20:1 And it came to pass in the seventh year, in the fifth month, the tenth day of the month, that certain of the elders of Israel came to inquire of Yahweh, and sat before me.20:2 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,20:3 Son of man, speak to the elders of Israel, and say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Is it to inquire of me that ye are come?  As I live, says the Lord Yahweh, I will not be inquired of by you.20:4 Will you judge them, son of man, will you judge them?  Cause them to know the abominations of their fathers;20:5 and say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: In the day when I chose Israel, and swore to the seed of the house of Jacob, and made myself known to them in the land of Egypt, when I swore to them, saying, I am Yahweh your God;20:6 in that day I swore to them, to bring them forth out of the land of Egypt into a land that I had searched out for them, flowing with milk and honey, which is the glory of all lands.20:7 And I said to them, Cast ye away every man the abominations of his eyes, and defile not yourselves with the idols of Egypt; I am Yahweh your God.20:8 But they rebelled against me, and would not hearken to me; they did not every man cast away the abominations of their eyes, neither did they forsake the idols of Egypt.  Then I said I would pour out my wrath upon them, to accomplish my anger against them in the midst of the land of Egypt.20:9 But I wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be profaned in the sight of the nations, among which they were, in whose sight I made myself known to them, in bringing them forth out of the land of Egypt.20:10 So I caused them to go forth out of the land of Egypt, and brought them into the wilderness.20:11 And I gave them my statutes, and showed them my ordinances, which if a man do, he shall live in them.20:12 Moreover also I gave them my sabbaths, to be a sign between me and them, that they might know that I am Yahweh that sanctifies them.20:13 But the house of Israel rebelled against me in the wilderness: they walked not in my statutes, and they rejected my ordinances, which if a man keep, he shall live in them; and my sabbaths they greatly profaned.  Then I said I would pour out my wrath upon them in the wilderness, to consume them.20:14 But I wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be profaned in the sight of the nations, in whose sight I brought them out.20:15 Moreover also I swore to them in the wilderness, that I would not bring them into the land which I had given them, flowing with milk and honey, which is the glory of all lands;20:16 because they rejected my ordinances, and walked not in my statutes, and profaned my sabbaths: for their heart went after their idols.20:17 Nevertheless my eye spared them, and I destroyed them not, neither did I make a full end of them in the wilderness.20:18 And I said to their children in the wilderness, Walk ye not in the statutes of your fathers, neither observe their ordinances, nor defile yourselves with their idols.20:19 I am Yahweh your God: walk in my statutes, and keep my ordinances, and do them;20:20 and hallow my sabbaths; and they shall be a sign between me and you, that ye may know that I am Yahweh your God.20:21 But the children rebelled against me; they walked not in my statutes, neither kept my ordinances to do them, which if a man do, he shall live in them; they profaned my sabbaths.  Then I said I would pour out my wrath upon them, to accomplish my anger against them in the wilderness.20:22 Nevertheless I withdrew my hand, and wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be profaned in the sight of the nations, in whose sight I brought them forth.20:23 Moreover I swore to them in the wilderness, that I would scatter them among the nations, and disperse them through the countries;20:24 because they had not executed my ordinances, but had rejected my statutes, and had profaned my sabbaths, and their eyes were after their fathers' idols.20:25 Moreover also I gave them statutes that were not good, and ordinances in which they should not live;20:26 and I polluted them in their own gifts, in that they caused to pass through the fire all that opens the womb, that I might make them desolate, to the end that they might know that I am Yahweh.20:27 Therefore, son of man, speak to the house of Israel, and say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: In this moreover have your fathers blasphemed me, in that they have committed a trespass against me.20:28 For when I had brought them into the land, which I swore to give to them, then they saw every high hill, and every thick tree, and they offered there their sacrifices, and there they presented the provocation of their offering; there also they made their sweet savor, and they poured out there their drink offerings.20:29 Then I said to them, What means the high place whereto ye go?  So the name thereof is called Bamah to this day.20:30 Wherefore say to the house of Israel, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Do ye pollute yourselves after the manner of your fathers?  and play ye the harlot after their abominations?20:31 and when ye offer your gifts, when ye make your sons to pass through the fire, do ye pollute yourselves with all your idols to this day?  and shall I be inquired of by you, O house of Israel?  As I live, says the Lord Yahweh, I will not be inquired of by you;20:32 and that which comes into your mind shall not be at all, in that ye say, We will be as the nations, as the families of the countries, to serve wood and stone.20:33 As I live, says the Lord Yahweh, surely with a mighty hand, and with an outstretched arm, and with wrath poured out, will I be king over you:20:34 and I will bring you out from the peoples, and will gather you out of the countries in which ye are scattered, with a mighty hand, and with an outstretched arm, and with wrath poured out;20:35 and I will bring you into the wilderness of the peoples, and there will I enter into judgment with you face to face.20:36 Like as I entered into judgment with your fathers in the wilderness of the land of Egypt, so will I enter into judgment with you, says the Lord Yahweh.20:37 And I will cause you to pass under the rod, and I will bring you into the bond of the covenant;20:38 and I will purge out from among you the rebels, and them that transgress against me; I will bring them forth out of the land where they sojourn, but they shall not enter into the land of Israel: and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.20:39 As for you, O house of Israel, thus says the Lord Yahweh: Go ye, serve every one his idols, and hereafter also, if ye will not hearken to me; but my holy name shall ye no more profane with your gifts, and with your idols.20:40 For in my holy mountain, in the mountain of the height of Israel, says the Lord Yahweh, there shall all the house of Israel, all of them, serve me in the land: there will I accept them, and there will I require your offerings, and the first-fruits of your oblations, with all your holy things.20:41 As a sweet savor will I accept you, when I bring you out from the peoples, and gather you out of the countries in which ye have been scattered; and I will be sanctified in you in the sight of the nations.20:42 And ye shall know that I am Yahweh, when I shall bring you into the land of Israel, into the country which I swore to give to your fathers.20:43 And there shall ye remember your ways, and all your doings, in which ye have polluted yourselves; and ye shall loathe yourselves in your own sight for all your evils that ye have committed.20:44 And ye shall know that I am Yahweh, when I have dealt with you for my name's sake, not according to your evil ways, nor according to your corrupt doings, O ye house of Israel, says the Lord Yahweh.20:45 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,20:46 Son of man, set your face toward the south, and drop your word toward the south, and prophesy against the forest of the field in the South;20:47 and say to the forest of the South, Hear the word of Yahweh: Thus says the Lord Yahweh, Behold, I will kindle a fire in you, and it shall devour every green tree in you, and every dry tree: the flaming flame shall not be quenched, and all faces from the south to the north shall be burnt thereby.20:48 And all flesh shall see that I, Yahweh, have kindled it; it shall not be quenched.20:49 Then said I, ah Lord Yahweh! they say of me, Is he not a speaker of parables?21:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,21:2 Son of man, set your face toward Jerusalem, and drop your word toward the sanctuaries, and prophesy against the land of Israel;21:3 and say to the land of Israel, Thus says Yahweh: Behold, I am against you, and will draw forth my sword out of its sheath, and will cut off from you the righteous and the wicked.21:4 Seeing then that I will cut off from you the righteous and the wicked, therefore shall my sword go forth out of its sheath against all flesh from the south to the north:21:5 and all flesh shall know that I, Yahweh, have drawn forth my sword out of its sheath; it shall not return any more.21:6 Sigh therefore, you son of man; with the breaking of your loins and with bitterness shall you sigh before their eyes.21:7 And it shall be, when they say to you, Why do you sigh?  that you shall say, Because of the tidings, for it comes; and every heart shall melt, and all hands shall be feeble, and every spirit shall faint, and all knees shall be weak as water: behold, it comes, and it shall be done, says the Lord Yahweh.21:8 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,21:9 Son of man, prophesy, and say, Thus says Yahweh: Say, a sword, a sword, it is sharpened, and also furbished;21:10 it is sharpened that it may make a slaughter; it is furbished that it may be as lightning: shall we then make mirth?  the rod of my son, it despises every tree.21:11 And it is given to be furbished, that it may be handled: the sword, it is sharpened, yes, it is furbished, to give it into the hand of the slayer.21:12 Cry and wail, son of man; for it is upon my people, it is upon all the princes of Israel: they are delivered over to the sword with my people; smite therefore upon your thigh.21:13 For there is a trial; and what if even the rod that despises shall be no more?  says the Lord Yahweh.21:14 You therefore, son of man, prophesy, and smite your hands together; and let the sword be doubled the third time, the sword of the deadly wounded: it is the sword of the great one that is deadly wounded, whichenters into their chambers.21:15 I have set the threatening sword against all their gates, that their heart may melt, and their stumblings be multiplied: ah! it is made as lightning, it is pointed for slaughter.21:16 Gather you together, go to the right, set yourself in array, go to the left, wherever your face is set.21:17 I will also smite my hands together, and I will cause my wrath to rest: I, Yahweh, have spoken it.21:18 The word of Yahweh came to me again, saying,21:19 Also, you son of man, appoint you two ways, that the sword of the king of Babylon may come; they twain shall come forth out of one land: and mark out a place, mark it out at the head of the way to the city.21:20 You shall appoint a way for the sword to come to Rabbah of the children of Ammon, and to Judah in Jerusalem the fortified.21:21 For the king of Babylon stood at the parting of the way, at the head of the two ways, to use divination: he shook the arrows to and fro, he consulted the teraphim, he looked in the liver.21:22 In his right hand was the divination for Jerusalem, to set battering rams, to open the mouth in the slaughter, to lift up the voice with shouting, to set battering rams against the gates, to cast up mounds, to build forts.21:23 And it shall be to them as a false divination in their sight, who have sworn oaths to them; but he brings iniquity to remembrance, that they may be taken.21:24 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because ye have made your iniquity to be remembered, in that your transgressions are uncovered, so that in all your doings your sins do appear; because that ye are come to remembrance, ye shall be taken with the hand.21:25 And you, O deadly wounded wicked one, the prince of Israel, whose day is come, in the time of the iniquity of the end,21:26 thus says the Lord Yahweh: Remove the mitre, and take off the crown; this shall be no more the same; exalt that which is low, and abase that which is high.21:27 I will overturn, overturn, overturn it: this also shall be no more, until he come whose right it is; and I will give it him.21:28 And you, son of man, prophesy, and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh concerning the children of Ammon, and concerning their reproach; and say you, a sword, a sword is drawn, for the slaughter it is furbished, to cause it to devour, that it may be as lightning;21:29 while they see for you false visions, while they divine lies to you, to lay you upon the necks of the wicked that are deadly wounded, whose day is come in the time of the iniquity of the end.21:30 Cause it to return into its sheath.  In the place where you were created, in the land of your birth, will I judge you.21:31 And I will pour out my indignation upon you; I will blow upon you with the fire of my wrath; and I will deliver you into the hand of brutish men, skilful to destroy.21:32 You shall be for fuel to the fire; your blood shall be in the midst of the land; you shall be no more remembered: for I, Yahweh, have spoken it.22:1 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,22:2 And you, son of man, will you judge, will you judge the bloody city?  then cause her to know all her abominations.22:3 And you shall say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: A city that sheds blood in the midst of her, that her time may come, and that makes idols against herself to defile her!22:4 You are become guilty in your blood that you have shed, and are defiled in your idols which you have made; and you have caused your days to draw near, and are come even to your years: therefore have I made you a reproach to the nations, and a mocking to all the countries.22:5 Those that are near, and those that are far from you, shall mock you, you infamous one and full of tumult.22:6 Behold, the princes of Israel, every one according to his power, have been in you to shed blood.22:7 In you have they set light by father and mother; in the midst of you have they dealt by oppression with the sojourner; in you have they wronged the fatherless and the widow.22:8 You have despised my holy things, and have profaned my sabbaths.22:9 Slanderous men have been in you to shed blood; and in you they have eaten upon the mountains: in the midst of you they have committed lewdness.22:10 In you have they uncovered their fathers' nakedness; in you have they humbled her that was unclean in her impurity.22:11 And one has committed abomination with his neighbor's wife; and another has lewdly defiled his daughter-in-law; and another in you has humbled his sister, his father's daughter.22:12 In you have they taken bribes to shed blood; you have taken interest and increase, and you have greedily gained of your neighbors by oppression, and have forgotten me, says the Lord Yahweh.22:13 Behold, therefore, I have smitten my hand at your dishonest gain which you have made, and at your blood which has been in the midst of you.22:14 Can your heart endure, or can your hands be strong, in the days that I shall deal with you?  I, Yahweh, have spoken it, and will do it.22:15 And I will scatter you among the nations, and disperse you through the countries; and I will consume your filthiness out of you.22:16 And you shall be profaned in yourself, in the sight of the nations; and you shall know that I am Yahweh.22:17 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,22:18 Son of man, the house of Israel is become dross to me: all of them are brass and tin and iron and lead, in the midst of the furnace; they are the dross of silver.22:19 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because ye are all become dross, therefore, behold, I will gather you into the midst of Jerusalem.22:20 As they gather silver and brass and iron and lead and tin into the midst of the furnace, to blow the fire upon it, to melt it; so will I gather you in my anger and in my wrath, and I will lay you there, and melt you.22:21 Yes, I will gather you, and blow upon you with the fire of my wrath, and ye shall be melted in the midst thereof.22:22 As silver is melted in the midst of the furnace, so shall ye be melted in the midst thereof; and ye shall know that I, Yahweh, have poured out my wrath upon you.22:23 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,22:24 Son of man, say to her, You are a land that is not cleansed, nor rained upon in the day of indignation.22:25 There is a conspiracy of her prophets in the midst thereof, like a roaring lion ravening the prey: they have devoured souls; they take treasure and precious things; they have made her widows many in the midst thereof.22:26 Her priests have done violence to my law, and have profaned my holy things: they have made no distinction between the holy and the common, neither have they caused men to discern between the unclean and the clean, and have hid their eyes from my sabbaths, and I am profaned among them.22:27 Her princes in the midst thereof are like wolves ravening the prey, to shed blood, and to destroy souls, that they may get dishonest gain.22:28 And her prophets have daubed for them with untempered mortar, seeing false visions, and divining lies to them, saying, Thus says the Lord Yahweh, when Yahweh has not spoken.22:29 The people of the land have used oppression, and exercised robbery; yes, they have vexed the poor and needy, and have oppressed the sojourner wrongfully.22:30 And I sought for a man among them, that should build up the wall, and stand in the gap before me for the land, that I should not destroy it; but I found none.22:31 Therefore have I poured out my indignation upon them; I have consumed them with the fire of my wrath: their own way have I brought upon their heads, says the Lord Yahweh.23:1 The word of Yahweh came again to me, saying,23:2 Son of man, there were two women, the daughters of one mother:23:3 and they played the harlot in Egypt; they played the harlot in their youth; there were their breasts pressed, and there was handled the bosom of their virginity.23:4 And the names of them were Oholah the elder, and Oholibah her sister: and they became mine, and they bore sons and daughters.  And as for their names, Samaria is Oholah, and Jerusalem Oholibah.23:5 And Oholah played the harlot when she was mine; and she doted on her lovers, on the Assyrians her neighbors,23:6 who were clothed with blue, governors and rulers, all of them desirable young men, horsemen riding upon horses.23:7 And she bestowed her whoredoms upon them, the choicest men of Assyria all of them; and on whomsoever she doted, with all their idols she defiled herself.23:8 Neither has she left her whoredoms since the days of Egypt; for in her youth they lay with her, and they handled the bosom of her virginity; and they poured out their whoredom upon her.23:9 Wherefore I delivered her into the hand of her lovers, into the hand of the Assyrians, upon whom she doted.23:10 These uncovered her nakedness; they took her sons and her daughters; and her they slew with the sword: and she became a byword among women; for they executed judgments upon her.23:11 And her sister Oholibah saw this, yet was she more corrupt in her doting than she, and in her whoredoms which were more than the whoredoms of her sister.23:12 She doted upon the Assyrians, governors and rulers, her neighbors, clothed most gorgeously, horsemen riding upon horses, all of them desirable young men.23:13 And I saw that she was defiled; they both took one way.23:14 And she increased her whoredoms; for she saw men portrayed upon the wall, the images of the Chaldeans portrayed with vermilion,23:15 girded with girdles upon their loins, with flowing turbans upon their heads, all of them princes to look upon, after the likeness of the Babylonians in Chaldea, the land of their nativity.23:16 And as soon as she saw them she doted upon them, and sent messengers to them into Chaldea.23:17 And the Babylonians came to her into the bed of love, and they defiled her with their whoredom, and she was polluted with them, and her soul was alienated from them.23:18 So she uncovered her whoredoms, and uncovered her nakedness: then my soul was alienated from her, like as my soul was alienated from her sister.23:19 Yet she multiplied her whoredoms, remembering the days of her youth, in which she had played the harlot in the land of Egypt.23:20 And she doted upon their paramours, whose flesh is as the flesh of asses, and whose issue is like the issue of horses.23:21 Thus you called to remembrance the lewdness of your youth, in the handling of your bosom by the Egyptians for the breasts of your youth.23:22 Therefore, O Oholibah, thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I will raise up your lovers against you, from whom your soul is alienated, and I will bring them against you on every side:23:23 the Babylonians and all the Chaldeans, Pekod and Shoa and Koa, and all the Assyrians with them; desirable young men, governors and rulers all of them, princes and men of renown, all of them riding upon horses.23:24 And they shall come against you with weapons, chariots, and wagons, and with a company of peoples; they shall set themselves against you with buckler and shield and helmet round about; and I will commit the judgment to them, and they shall judge you according to their judgments.23:25 And I will set my jealousy against you, and they shall deal with you in fury; they shall take away your nose and your ears; and your residue shall fall by the sword: they shall take your sons and your daughters; and your residue shall be devoured by the fire.23:26 They shall also strip you of your clothes, and take away your fair jewels.23:27 Thus will I make your lewdness to cease from you, and your whoredom brought from the land of Egypt; so that you shall not lift up your eyes to them, nor remember Egypt any more.23:28 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I will deliver you into the hand of them whom you hate, into the hand of them from whom your soul is alienated;23:29 and they shall deal with you in hatred, and shall take away all your labor, and shall leave you naked and bare; and the nakedness of your whoredoms shall be uncovered, both your lewdness and your whoredoms.23:30 These things shall be done to you, for that you have played the harlot after the nations, and because you are polluted with their idols.23:31 You have walked in the way of your sister; therefore will I give her cup into your hand.23:32 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: You shall drink of your sister's cup, which is deep and large; you shall be laughed to scorn and had in derision; it contains much.23:33 You shall be filled with drunkenness and sorrow, with the cup of astonishment and desolation, with the cup of your sister Samaria.23:34 You shall even drink it and drain it out, and you shall gnaw the sherds thereof, and shall tear your breasts; for I have spoken it, says the Lord Yahweh.23:35 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because you have forgotten me, and cast me behind your back, therefore bear you also your lewdness and your whoredoms.23:36 Yahweh said moreover to me: Son of man, will you judge Oholah and Oholibah?  then declare to them their abominations.23:37 For they have committed adultery, and blood is in their hands; and with their idols have they committed adultery; and they have also caused their sons, whom they bore to me, to pass through the fire to them to be devoured.23:38 Moreover this they have done to me: they have defiled my sanctuary in the same day, and have profaned my sabbaths.23:39 For when they had slain their children to their idols, then they came the same day into my sanctuary to profane it; and, lo, thus have they done in the midst of my house.23:40 And furthermore ye have sent for men that come from far, to whom a messenger was sent, and, lo, they came; for whom you did wash yourself, paint your eyes, and deck yourself with ornaments,23:41 and sit upon a stately bed, with a table prepared before it, whereupon you did set my incense and my oil.23:42 And the voice of a multitude being at ease was with her: and with men of the common sort were brought drunkards from the wilderness; and they put bracelets upon the hands of them twain, and beautiful crowns upon their heads.23:43 Then said I of her that was old in adulteries, Now will they play the harlot with her, and she with them.23:44 And they went in to her, as they go in to a harlot: so went they in to Oholah and to Oholibah, the lewd women.23:45 And righteous men, they shall judge them with the judgment of adulteresses, and with the judgment of women that shed blood; because they are adulteresses, and blood is in their hands.23:46 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: I will bring up a company against them, and will give them to be tossed to and fro and robbed.23:47 And the company shall stone them with stones, and despatch them with their swords; they shall slay their sons and their daughters, and burn up their houses with fire.23:48 Thus will I cause lewdness to cease out of the land, that all women may be taught not to do after your lewdness.23:49 And they shall recompense your lewdness upon you, and ye shall bear the sins of your idols; and ye shall know that I am the Lord Yahweh.24:1 Again, in the ninth year, in the tenth month, in the tenth day of the month, the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,24:2 Son of man, write you the name of the day, even of this selfsame day: the king of Babylon drew close to Jerusalem this selfsame day.24:3 And utter a parable to the rebellious house, and say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh, Set on the caldron, set it on, and also pour water into it:24:4 gather the pieces thereof into it, even every good piece, the thigh, and the shoulder; fill it with the choice bones.24:5 Take the choice of the flock, and also a pile of wood for the bones under the caldron; make it boil well; yes, let the bones thereof be boiled in the midst of it.24:6 Wherefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Woe to the bloody city, to the caldron whose rust is therein, and whose rust is not gone out of it! take out of it piece after piece; No lot is fallen upon it.24:7 For her blood is in the midst of her; she set it upon the bare rock; she poured it not upon the ground, to cover it with dust.24:8 That it may cause wrath to come up to take vengeance, I have set her blood upon the bare rock, that it should not be covered.24:9 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Woe to the bloody city! I also will make the pile great.24:10 Heap on the wood, make the fire hot, boil well the flesh, and make thick the broth, and let the bones be burned.24:11 Then set it empty upon the coals thereof, that it may be hot, and the brass thereof may burn, and that the filthiness of it may be molten in it, that the rust of it may be consumed.24:12 She has wearied herself with toil; yet her great rust goes not forth out of her; her rust goes not forth by fire.24:13 In your filthiness is lewdness: because I have cleansed you and you were not cleansed, you shall not be cleansed from your filthiness any more, till I have caused my wrath toward you to rest.24:14 I, Yahweh, have spoken it: it shall come to pass, and I will do it: I will not go back, neither will I spare, neither will I repent; according to your ways, and according to your doings, shall they judge you, says the Lord Yahweh.24:15 Also the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,24:16 Son of man, behold, I take away from you the desire of your eyes with a stroke: yet you shall neither mourn nor weep, neither shall your tears run down.24:17 Sigh, but not aloud, make no mourning for the dead; bind your headtire upon you, and put your shoes upon your feet, and cover not your lips, and eat not the bread of men.24:18 So I spoke to the people in the morning; and at even my wife died; and I did in the morning as I was commanded.24:19 And the people said to me, Will you not tell us what these things are to us, that you do so?24:20 Then I said to them, The word of Yahweh came to me, saying,24:21 Speak to the house of Israel, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I will profane my sanctuary, the pride of your power, the desire of your eyes, and that which your soul pities; and your sons and your daughters whom ye have left behind shall fall by the sword.24:22 And ye shall do as I have done: ye shall not cover your lips, nor eat the bread of men.24:23 And your tires shall be upon your heads, and your shoes upon your feet: ye shall not mourn nor weep; but ye shall pine away in your iniquities, and moan one toward another.24:24 Thus shall Ezekiel be to you a sign; according to all that he has done shall ye do: when this comes, then shall ye know that I am the Lord Yahweh.24:25 And you, son of man, shall it not be in the day when I take from them their strength, the joy of their glory, the desire of their eyes, and that whereupon they set their heart, their sons and their daughters,24:26 that in that day he that escapes shall come to you, to cause you to hear it with your ears?24:27 In that day shall your mouth be opened to him that is escaped, and you shall speak, and be no more dumb: so shall you be a sign to them; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.25:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,25:2 Son of man, set your face toward the children of Ammon, and prophesy against them:25:3 and say to the children of Ammon, Hear the word of the Lord Yahweh: Thus says the Lord Yahweh, Because you said, aha, against my sanctuary, when it was profaned; and against the land of Israel, when it was made desolate; and against the house of Judah, when they went into captivity:25:4 therefore, behold, I will deliver you to the children of the east for a possession, and they shall set their encampments in you, and make their dwellings in you; they shall eat your fruit, and they shall drink your milk.25:5 And I will make Rabbah a stable for camels, and the children of Ammon a couching-place for flocks: and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.25:6 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because you have clapped your hands, and stamped with the feet, and rejoiced with all the despite of your soul against the land of Israel;25:7 therefore, behold, I have stretched out my hand upon you, and will deliver you for a spoil to the nations; and I will cut you off from the peoples, and I will cause you to perish out of the countries: I will destroy you; and you shall know that I am Yahweh.25:8 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because that Moab and Seir do say, Behold, the house of Judah is like to all the nations;25:9 therefore, behold, I will open the side of Moab from the cities, from his cities which are on his frontiers, the glory of the country, Beth-jeshimoth, Baal-meon, and Kiriathaim,25:10 to the children of the east, to go against the children of Ammon; and I will give them for a possession, that the children of Ammon may not be remembered among the nations.25:11 and I will execute judgments upon Moab; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.25:12 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because that Edom has dealt against the house of Judah by taking vengeance, and has greatly offended, and revenged himself upon them;25:13 therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh, I will stretch out my hand upon Edom, and will cut off man and beast from it; and I will make it desolate from Teman; even to Dedan shall they fall by the sword.25:14 And I will lay my vengeance upon Edom by the hand of my people Israel; and they shall do in Edom according to my anger and according to my wrath; and they shall know my vengeance, says the Lord Yahweh.25:15 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because the Philistines have dealt by revenge, and have taken vengeance with despite of soul to destroy with perpetual enmity;25:16 therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh, Behold, I will stretch out my hand upon the Philistines, and I will cut off the Cherethites, and destroy the remnant of the sea coast.25:17 And I will execute great vengeance upon them with wrathful rebukes; and they shall know that I am Yahweh, when I shall lay my vengeance upon them.26:1 And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the first day of the month, that the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,26:2 Son of man, because that Tyre has said against Jerusalem, aha, she is broken that was the gate of the peoples; she is turned to me; I shall be replenished, now that she is laid waste:26:3 therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh, Behold, I am against you, O Tyre, and will cause many nations to come up against you, as the sea causes its waves to come up.26:4 And they shall destroy the walls of Tyre, and break down her towers: I will also scrape her dust from her, and make her a bare rock.26:5 She shall be a place for the spreading of nets in the midst of the sea; for I have spoken it, says the Lord Yahweh; and she shall become a spoil to the nations.26:6 And her daughters that are in the field shall be slain with the sword: and they shall know that I am Yahweh.26:7 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I will bring upon Tyre Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, king of kings, from the north, with horses, and with chariots, and with horsemen, and a company, and much people.26:8 He shall slay with the sword your daughters in the field; and he shall make forts against you, and cast up a mound against you, and raise up the buckler against you.26:9 And he shall set his battering engines against your walls, and with his axes he shall break down your towers.26:10 By reason of the abundance of his horses their dust shall cover you: your walls shall shake at the noise of the horsemen, and of the wagons, and of the chariots, when he shall enter into your gates, as men enter into a city in which is made a breach.26:11 With the hoofs of his horses shall he tread down all your streets; he shall slay your people with the sword; and the pillars of your strength shall go down to the ground.26:12 And they shall make a spoil of your riches, and make a prey of your merchandise; and they shall break down your walls, and destroy your pleasant houses; and they shall lay your stones and your timber and your dust in the midst of the waters.26:13 And I will cause the noise of your songs to cease; and the sound of your harps shall be no more heard.26:14 And I will make you a bare rock; you shall be a place for the spreading of nets; you shall be built no more: for I Yahweh have spoken it, says the Lord Yahweh.26:15 Thus says the Lord Yahweh to Tyre: shall not the isles shake at the sound of your fall, when the wounded groan, when the slaughter is made in the midst of you?26:16 Then all the princes of the sea shall come down from their thrones, and lay aside their robes, and strip off their broidered garments: they shall clothe themselves with trembling; they shall sit upon the ground, and shall tremble every moment, and be astonished at you.26:17 And they shall take up a lamentation over you, and say to you, How are you destroyed, that were inhabited by seafaring men, the renowned city, that was strong in the sea, she and her inhabitants, that caused their terror to be on all that dwelt there!26:18 Now shall the isles tremble in the day of your fall; yes, the isles that are in the sea shall be dismayed at your departure.26:19 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: When I shall make you a desolate city, like the cities that are not inhabited; when I shall bring up the deep upon you, and the great waters shall cover you;26:20 then will I bring you down with them that descend into the pit, to the people of old time, and will make you to dwell in the nether parts of the earth, in the places that are desolate of old, with them that go down to the pit, that you be not inhabited; and I will set glory in the land of the living:26:21 I will make you a terror, and you shall no more have any being; though you be sought for, yet shall you never be found again, says the Lord Yahweh.27:1 The word of Yahweh came again to me, saying,27:2 And you, son of man, take up a lamentation over Tyre;27:3 and say to Tyre, O you that dwell at the entry of the sea, that are the merchant of the peoples to many isles, thus says the Lord Yahweh: You, O Tyre, have said, I am perfect in beauty.27:4 Your borders are in the heart of the seas; your builders have perfected your beauty.27:5 They have made all your planks of fir-trees from Senir; they have taken a cedar from Lebanon to make a mast for you.27:6 Of the oaks of Bashan have they made your oars; they have made your benches of ivory inlaid in boxwood, from the isles of Kittim.27:7 Of fine linen with broidered work from Egypt was your sail, that it might be to you for an ensign; blue and purple from the isles of Elishah was your awning.27:8 The inhabitants of Sidon and Arvad were your rowers: your wise men, O Tyre, were in you, they were your pilots.27:9 The old men of Gebal and the wise men thereof were in you your calkers: all the ships of the sea with their mariners were in you to deal in your merchandise.27:10 Persia and Lud and Put  were in your army, your men of war: they hanged the shield and helmet in you; they set forth your comeliness.27:11 The men of Arvad with your army were upon your walls round about, and valorous men were in your towers; they hanged their shields upon your walls round about; they have perfected your beauty.27:12 Tarshish was your merchant by reason of the multitude of all kinds of riches; with silver, iron, tin, and lead, they traded for your wares.27:13 Javan, Tubal, and Meshech, they were your traffickers; they traded the persons of men and vessels of brass for your merchandise.27:14 They of the house of Togarmah traded for your wares with horses and war-horses and mules.27:15 The men of Dedan were your traffickers; many isles were the mart of your hand: they brought you in exchange horns of ivory and ebony.27:16 Syria was your merchant by reason of the multitude of your handiworks: they traded for your wares with emeralds, purple, and broidered work, and fine linen, and coral, and rubies.27:17 Judah, and the land of Israel, they were your traffickers: they traded for your merchandise wheat of Minnith, and pannag, and honey, and oil, and balm.27:18 Damascus was your merchant for the multitude of your handiworks, by reason of the multitude of all kinds of riches, with the wine of Helbon, and white wool.27:19 Vedan and Javan traded with yarn for your wares: bright iron, cassia, and calamus, were among your merchandise.27:20 Dedan was your trafficker in precious cloths for riding.27:21 Arabia, and all the princes of Kedar, they were the merchants of your hand; in lambs, and rams, and goats, in these were they your merchants.27:22 The traffickers of Sheba and Raamah, they were your traffickers; they traded for your wares with the chief of all spices, and with all precious stones, and gold.27:23 Haran and Canneh and Eden, the traffickers of Sheba, asshur and Chilmad, were your traffickers.27:24 These were your traffickers in choice wares, in wrappings of blue and broidered work, and in chests of rich apparel, bound with cords and made of cedar, among your merchandise.27:25 The ships of Tarshish were your caravans for your merchandise: and you were replenished, and made very glorious in the heart of the seas.27:26 Your rowers have brought you into great waters: the east wind has broken you in the heart of the seas.27:27 Your riches, and your wares, your merchandise, your mariners, and your pilots, your calkers, and the dealers in your merchandise, and all your men of war, that are in you, with all your company which is in the midst of you, shall fall into the heart of the seas in the day of your ruin.27:28 At the sound of the cry of your pilots the suburbs shall shake.27:29 And all that handled the oar, the mariners, and all the pilots of the sea, shall come down from their ships; they shall stand upon the land,27:30 and shall cause their voice to be heard over you, and shall cry bitterly, and shall cast up dust upon their heads, they shall wallow themselves in the ashes:27:31 and they shall make themselves bald for you, and gird them with sackcloth, and they shall weep for you in bitterness of soul with bitter mourning.27:32 And in their wailing they shall take up a lamentation for you, and lament over you, saying, Who is there like Tyre, like her that is brought to silence in the midst of the sea?27:33 When your wares went forth out of the seas, you filled many peoples; you did enrich the kings of the earth with the multitude of your riches and of your merchandise.27:34 In the time that you were broken by the seas in the depths of the waters, your merchandise and all your company did fall in the midst of you.27:35 All the inhabitants of the isles are astonished at you, and their kings are horribly afraid; they are troubled in their countenance.27:36 The merchants among the peoples hiss at you; you are become a terror, and you shall nevermore have any being.28:1 The word of Yahweh came again to me, saying,28:2 Son of man, say to the prince of Tyre, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because your heart is lifted up, and you have said, I am a god, I sit in the seat of God, in the midst of the seas; yet you are man, and not God, though you did set your heart as the heart of God;-28:3 behold, you are wiser than Daniel; there is no secret that is hidden from you;28:4 by your wisdom and by your understanding you have gotten you riches, and have gotten gold and silver into your treasures;28:5 by your great wisdom and by your traffic have you increased your riches, and your heart is lifted up because of your riches;-28:6 therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because you have set your heart as the heart of God,28:7 therefore, behold, I will bring strangers upon you, the terrible of the nations; and they shall draw their swords against the beauty of your wisdom, and they shall defile your brightness.28:8 They shall bring you down to the pit; and you shall die the death of them that are slain, in the heart of the seas.28:9 Will you yet say before him that slays you, I am God?  but you are man, and not God, in the hand of him that wounds you.28:10 You shall die the death of the uncircumcised by the hand of strangers: for I have spoken it, says the Lord Yahweh.28:11 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,28:12 Son of man, take up a lamentation over the king of Tyre, and say to him, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: You seal up the sum, full of wisdom, and perfect in beauty.28:13 You were in Eden, the garden of God; every precious stone was your covering, the sardius, the topaz, and the diamond, the beryl, the onyx, and the jasper, the sapphire, the emerald, and the carbuncle, and gold: the workmanship of your tabrets and of your pipes was in you; in the day that you were created they were prepared.28:14 You were the anointed cherub that covers: and I set you, so that you were upon the holy mountain of God; you have walked up and down in the midst of the stones of fire.28:15 You were perfect in your ways from the day that you were created, till unrighteousness was found in you.28:16 By the abundance of your traffic they filled the midst of you with violence, and you have sinned: therefore have I cast you as profane out of the mountain of God; and I have destroyed you, O covering cherub, from the midst of the stones of fire.28:17 Your heart was lifted up because of your beauty; you have corrupted your wisdom by reason of your brightness: I have cast you to the ground; I have laid you before kings, that they may behold you.28:18 By the multitude of your iniquities, in the unrighteousness of your traffic, you have profaned your sanctuaries; therefore have I brought forth a fire from the midst of you; it has devoured you, and I have turned you to ashes upon the earth in the sight of all them that behold you.28:19 All they that know you among the peoples shall be astonished at you: you are become a terror, and you shall nevermore have any being.28:20 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,28:21 Son of man, set your face toward Sidon, and prophesy against it,28:22 and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I am against you, O Sidon; and I will be glorified in the midst of you; and they shall know that I am Yahweh, when I shall have executed judgments in her, and shall be sanctified in her.28:23 For I will send pestilence into her, and blood into her streets; and the wounded shall fall in the midst of her, with the sword upon her on every side; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.28:24 And there shall be no more a pricking brier to the house of Israel, nor a hurting thorn of any that are round about them, that did despite to them; and they shall know that I am the Lord Yahweh.28:25 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: When I shall have gathered the house of Israel from the peoples among whom they are scattered, and shall be sanctified in them in the sight of the nations, then shall they dwell in their own land which I gave to my servant Jacob.28:26 And they shall dwell securely therein; yes, they shall build houses, and plant vineyards, and shall dwell securely, when I have executed judgments upon all those that do them despite round about them; and they shall know that I am Yahweh their God.29:1 In the tenth year, in the tenth month, in the twelfth day of the month, the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,29:2 Son of man, set your face against Pharaoh king of Egypt, and prophesy against him, and against all Egypt;29:3 speak, and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I am against you, Pharaoh king of Egypt, the great monster that lies in the midst of his rivers, that has said, My river is my own, and I have made it for myself.29:4 And I will put hooks in your jaws, and I will cause the fish of your rivers to stick to your scales; and I will bring you up out of the midst of your rivers, with all the fish of your rivers which stick to your scales.29:5 And I will cast you forth into the wilderness, you and all the fish of your rivers: you shall fall upon the open field; you shall not be brought together, nor gathered; I have given you for food to the beasts of the earth and to the birds of the heavens.29:6 And all the inhabitants of Egypt shall know that I am Yahweh, because they have been a staff of reed to the house of Israel.29:7 When they took hold of you by your hand, you did break, and did rend all their shoulders; and when they leaned upon you, you broke, and made all their loins to be at a stand.29:8 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I will bring a sword upon you, and will cut off from you man and beast.29:9 And the land of Egypt shall be a desolation and a waste; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.  Because he has said, The river is my, and I have made it;29:10 therefore, behold, I am against you, and against your rivers, and I will make the land of Egypt an utter waste and desolation, from the tower of Seveneh even to the border of Ethiopia.29:11 No foot of man shall pass through it, nor foot of beast shall pass through it, neither shall it be inhabited forty years.29:12 And I will make the land of Egypt a desolation in the midst of the countries that are desolate; and her cities among the cities that are laid waste shall be a desolation forty years; and I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and will disperse them through the countries.29:13 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: At the end of forty years will I gather the Egyptians from the peoples whither they were scattered;29:14 and I will bring back the captivity of Egypt, and will cause them to return into the land of Pathros, into the land of their birth; and they shall be there a base kingdom.29:15 It shall be the basest of the kingdoms; neither shall it any more lift itself up above the nations: and I will diminish them, that they shall no more rule over the nations.29:16 And it shall be no more the confidence of the house of Israel, bringing iniquity to remembrance, when they turn to look after them: and they shall know that I am the Lord Yahweh.29:17 And it came to pass in the seven and twentieth year, in the first month, in the first day of the month, the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,29:18 Son of man, Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon caused his army to serve a great service against Tyre: every head was made bald, and every shoulder was worn; yet had he no wages, nor his army, from Tyre, for the service that he had served against it.29:19 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I will give the land of Egypt to Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon; and he shall carry off her multitude, and take her spoil, and take her prey; and it shall be the wages for his army.29:20 I have given him the land of Egypt as his recompense for which he served, because they wrought for me, says the Lord Yahweh.29:21 In that day will I cause a horn to bud forth to the house of Israel, and I will give you the opening of the mouth in the midst of them; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.30:1 The word of Yahweh came again to me, saying,30:2 Son of man, prophesy, and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Wail ye, alas for the day!30:3 For the day is near, even the day of Yahweh is near; it shall be a day of clouds, a time of the nations.30:4 And a sword shall come upon Egypt, and anguish shall be in Ethiopia, when the slain shall fall in Egypt; and they shall take away her multitude, and her foundations shall be broken down.30:5 Ethiopia, and Put,  and Lud,  and all the mingled people, and Cub, and the children of the land that is in league, shall fall with them by the sword.30:6 Thus says Yahweh: They also that uphold Egypt shall fall; and the pride of her power shall come down: from the tower of Seveneh shall they fall in it by the sword, says the Lord Yahweh.30:7 And they shall be desolate in the midst of the countries that are desolate; and her cities shall be in the midst of the cities that are wasted.30:8 And they shall know at I am Yahweh, when I have set a fire in Egypt, and all her helpers are destroyed.30:9 In that day shall messengers go forth from before me in ships to make the careless Ethiopians afraid; and there shall be anguish upon them, as in the day of Egypt; for, lo, it comes.30:10 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: I will also make the multitude of Egypt to cease, by the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon.30:11 He and his people with him, the terrible of the nations, shall be brought in to destroy the land; and they shall draw their swords against Egypt, and fill the land with the slain.30:12 And I will make the rivers dry, and will sell the land into the hand of evil men; and I will make the land desolate, and all that is therein, by the hand of strangers: I, Yahweh, have spoken it.30:13 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: I will also destroy the idols, and I will cause the images to cease from Memphis; and there shall be no more a prince from the land of Egypt: and I will put a fear in the land of Egypt.30:14 And I will make Pathros desolate, and will set a fire in Zoan, and will execute judgments upon No.30:15 And I will pour my wrath upon Sin, the stronghold of Egypt; and I will cut off the multitude of No.30:16 And I will set a fire in Egypt: Sin shall be in great anguish, and No shall be broken up; and Memphis shall have adversaries in the day-time.30:17 The young men of Aven and of Pibeseth shall fall by the sword; and these cities shall go into captivity.30:18 At Tehaphnehes also the day shall withdraw itself, when I shall break there the yokes of Egypt, and the pride of her power shall cease in her: as for her, a cloud shall cover her, and her daughters shall go into captivity.30:19 Thus will I execute judgments upon Egypt; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.30:20 And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the first month, in the seventh day of the month, that the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,30:21 Son of man, I have broken the arm of Pharaoh king of Egypt; and, lo, it has not been bound up, to apply healing medicines, to put a bandage to bind it, that it be strong to hold the sword.30:22 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I am against Pharaoh king of Egypt, and will break his arms, the strong arm, and that which was broken; and I will cause the sword to fall out of his hand.30:23 And I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and will disperse them through the countries.30:24 And I will strengthen the arms of the king of Babylon, and put my sword in his hand: but I will break the arms of Pharaoh, and he shall groan before him with the groanings of a deadly wounded man.30:25 And I will hold up the arms of the king of Babylon; and the arms of Pharaoh shall fall down; and they shall know that I am Yahweh, when I shall put my sword into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall stretch it out upon the land of Egypt.30:26 And I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and disperse them through the countries; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.31:1 And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the third month, in the first day of the month, that the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,31:2 Son of man, say to Pharaoh king of Egypt, and to his multitude: Whom are you like in your greatness?31:3 Behold, the Assyrian was a cedar in Lebanon with fair branches, and with a forest-like shade, and of high stature; and its top was among the thick boughs.31:4 The waters nourished it, the deep made it to grow: the rivers thereof ran round about its plantation; and it sent out its channels to all the trees of the field.31:5 Therefore its stature was exalted above all the trees of the field; and its boughs were multiplied, and its branches became long by reason of many waters, when it shot them forth.31:6 All the birds of the heavens made their nests in its boughs; and under its branches did all the beasts of the field bring forth their young; and under its shadow dwelt all great nations.31:7 Thus was it fair in its greatness, in the length of its branches; for its root was by many waters.31:8 The cedars in the garden of God could not hide it; the fir-trees were not like its boughs, and the plane-trees were not as its branches; nor was any tree in the garden of God like to it in its beauty.31:9 I made it fair by the multitude of its branches, so that all the trees of Eden, that were in the garden of God, envied it.31:10 Therefore thus said the Lord Yahweh: Because you are exalted in stature, and he has set his top among the thick boughs, and his heart is lifted up in his height;31:11 I will even deliver him into the hand of the mighty one of the nations; he shall surely deal with him; I have driven him out for his wickedness.31:12 And strangers, the terrible of the nations, have cut him off, and have left him: upon the mountains and in all the valleys his branches are fallen, and his boughs are broken by all the watercourses of the land; and all the peoples of the earth are gone down from his shadow, and have left him.31:13 Upon his ruin all the birds of the heavens shall dwell, and all the beasts of the field shall be upon his branches;31:14 to the end that none of all the trees by the waters exalt themselves in their stature, neither set their top among the thick boughs, nor that their mighty ones stand up on their height, even all that drink water: for they are all delivered to death, to the nether parts of the earth, in the midst of the children of men, with them that go down to the pit.31:15 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: In the day when he went down to Sheol I caused a mourning: I covered the deep for him, and I restrained the rivers thereof; and the great waters were stayed; and I caused Lebanon to mourn for him, and all the trees of the field fainted for him.31:16 I made the nations to shake at the sound of his fall, when I cast him down to Sheol with them that descend into the pit; and all the trees of Eden, the choice and best of Lebanon, all that drink water, were comforted in the nether parts of the earth.31:17 They also went down into Sheol with him to them that are slain by the sword; yes, they that were his arm, that dwelt under his shadow in the midst of the nations.31:18 To whom are you thus like in glory and in greatness among the trees of Eden?  yet shall you be brought down with the trees of Eden to the nether parts of the earth: you shall lie in the midst of the uncircumcised, with them that are slain by the sword.  This is Pharaoh and all his multitude, says the Lord Yahweh.32:1 And it came to pass in the twelfth year, in the twelfth month, in the first day of the month, that the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,32:2 Son of man, take up a lamentation over Pharaoh king of Egypt, and say to him, You were likened to a young lion of the nations: yet are you as a monster in the seas; and you did break forth with your rivers, and troubled the waters with your feet, and fouled their rivers.32:3 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: I will spread out my net upon you with a company of many peoples; and they shall bring you up in my net.32:4 And I will leave you upon the land, I will cast you forth upon the open field, and will cause all the birds of the heavens to settle upon you, and I will satisfy the beasts of the whole earth with you.32:5 And I will lay your flesh upon the mountains, and fill the valleys with your height.32:6 I will also water with your blood the land in which you swim, even to the mountains; and the watercourses shall be full of you.32:7 And when I shall extinguish you, I will cover the heavens, and make the stars thereof dark; I will cover the sun with a cloud, and the moon shall not give its light.32:8 All the bright lights of heaven will I make dark over you, and set darkness upon your land, says the Lord Yahweh.32:9 I will also vex the hearts of many peoples, when I shall bring your destruction among the nations, into the countries which you have not known.32:10 Yes, I will make many peoples amazed at you, and their kings shall be horribly afraid for you, when I shall brandish my sword before them; and they shall tremble at every moment, every man for his own life, in the day of your fall.32:11 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: The sword of the king of Babylon shall come upon you.32:12 By the swords of the mighty will I cause your multitude to fall; the terrible of the nations are they all: and they shall bring to nought the pride of Egypt, and all the multitude thereof shall be destroyed.32:13 I will destroy also all the beasts thereof from beside many waters; neither shall the foot of man trouble them any more, nor the hoofs of beasts trouble them.32:14 Then will I make their waters clear, and cause their rivers to run like oil, says the Lord Yahweh.32:15 When I shall make the land of Egypt desolate and waste, a land destitute of that whereof it was full, when I shall smite all them that dwell therein, then shall they know that I am Yahweh.32:16 This is the lamentation with which they shall lament; the daughters of the nations shall lament using it; over Egypt, and over all her multitude, shall they lament with it, says the Lord Yahweh.32:17 It came to pass also in the twelfth year, in the fifteenth day of the month, that the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,32:18 Son of man, wail for the multitude of Egypt, and cast them down, even her, and the daughters of the famous nations, to the nether parts of the earth, with them that go down into the pit.32:19 Whom do you pass in beauty?  go down, and be you laid with the uncircumcised.32:20 They shall fall in the midst of them that are slain by the sword: she is delivered to the sword; draw her away and all her multitudes.32:21 The strong among the mighty shall speak to him out of the midst of Sheol with them that help him: they are gone down, they lie still, even the uncircumcised, slain by the sword.32:22 Asshur  is there and all her company; her graves are round about her; all of them slain, fallen by the sword;32:23 whose graves are set in the uttermost parts of the pit, and her company is round about her grave; all of them slain, fallen by the sword, who caused terror in the land of the living.32:24 There is Elam  and all her multitude round about her grave; all of them slain, fallen by the sword, who are gone down uncircumcised into the nether parts of the earth, who caused their terror in the land of the living, and have borne their shame with them that go down to the pit.32:25 They have set her a bed in the midst of the slain with all her multitude; her graves are round about her; all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword; for their terror was caused in the land of the living, and they have borne their shame with them that go down to the pit: he is put in the midst of them that are slain.32:26 There is Meshech, Tubal,  and all their multitude; their graves are round about them; all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword; for they caused their terror in the land of the living.32:27 And they shall not lie with the mighty that are fallen of the uncircumcised, that are gone down to Sheol with their weapons of war, and have laid their swords under their heads, and their iniquities are upon their bones; for they were the terror of the mighty in the land of the living.32:28 But you shall be broken in the midst of the uncircumcised, and shall lie with them that are slain by the sword.32:29 There is Edom,  her kings and all her princes, who in their might are laid with them that are slain by the sword: they shall lie with the uncircumcised, and with them that go down to the pit.32:30 There are the princes of the north,  all of them, and all the Sidonians,  who are gone down with the slain; in the terror which they caused by their might they are put to shame; and they lie uncircumcised with them that are slain by the sword, and bear their shame with them that go down to the pit.32:31 Pharaoh shall see them, and shall be comforted over all his multitude, even Pharaoh and all his army, slain by the sword, says the Lord Yahweh.32:32 For I have put his terror in the land of the living; and he shall be laid in the midst of the uncircumcised, with them that are slain by the sword, even Pharaoh and all his multitude, says the Lord Yahweh.33:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,33:2 Son of man, speak to the children of your people, and say to them, When I bring the sword upon a land, and the people of the land take a man from among them, and set him for their watchman;33:3 if, when he sees the sword come upon the land, he blow the trumpet, and warn the people;33:4 then whosoever hears the sound of the trumpet, and takes not warning, if the sword come, and take him away, his blood shall be upon his own head.33:5 He heard the sound of the trumpet, and took not warning; his blood shall be upon him; whereas if he had taken warning, he would have delivered his soul.33:6 But if the watchman see the sword come, and blow not the trumpet, and the people be not warned, and the sword come, and take any person from among them; he is taken away in his iniquity, but his blood will I require at the watchman's hand.33:7 So you, son of man, I have set you a watchman to the house of Israel; therefore hear the word at my mouth, and give them warning from me.33:8 When I say to the wicked, O wicked man, you shall surely die, and you do not speak to warn the wicked from his way; that wicked man shall die in his iniquity, but his blood will I require at your hand.33:9 Nevertheless, if you warn the wicked of his way to turn from it, and he turn not from his way; he shall die in his iniquity, but you have delivered your soul.33:10 And you, son of man, say to the house of Israel: Thus ye speak, saying, Our transgressions and our sins are upon us, and we pine away in them; how then can we live?33:11 Say to them, as I live, says the Lord Yahweh, I have no pleasure in the death of the wicked; but that the wicked turn from his way and live: turn ye, turn ye from your evil ways; for why will ye die, O house of Israel?33:12 And you, son of man, say to the children of your people, The righteousness of the righteous shall not deliver him in the day of his transgression; and as for the wickedness of the wicked, he shall not fall thereby in the day that he turns from his wickedness; neither shall he that is righteous be able to live thereby in the day that he sins.33:13 When I say to the righteous, that he shall surely live; if he trust to his righteousness, and commit iniquity, none of his righteous deeds shall be remembered; but in his iniquity that he has committed, therein shall he die.33:14 Again, when I say to the wicked, You shall surely die; if he turn from his sin, and do that which is lawful and right;33:15 if the wicked restore the pledge, give again that which he had taken by robbery, walk in the statutes of life, committing no iniquity; he shall surely live, he shall not die.33:16 None of his sins that he has committed shall be remembered against him: he has done that which is lawful and right; he shall surely live.33:17 Yet the children of your people say, The way of the Lord is not equal: but as for them, their way is not equal.33:18 When the righteous turns from his righteousness, and commits iniquity, he shall even die therein.33:19 And when the wicked turns from his wickedness, and does that which is lawful and right, he shall live thereby.33:20 Yet ye say, The way of the Lord is not equal.  O house of Israel, I will judge you every one after his ways.33:21 And it came to pass in the twelfth year of our captivity, in the tenth month, in the fifth day of the month, that one that had escaped out of Jerusalem came to me, saying, The city is smitten.33:22 Now the hand of Yahweh had been upon me in the evening, before he that was escaped came; and he had opened my mouth, until he came to me in the morning; and my mouth was opened, and I was no more dumb.33:23 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,33:24 Son of man, they that inhabit those waste places in the land of Israel speak, saying, abraham was one, and he inherited the land: but we are many; the land is given us for inheritance.33:25 Wherefore say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: You eat with the blood, and lift up your eyes to your idols, and shed blood: and shall ye possess the land?33:26 You stand upon your sword, ye work abomination, and ye defile every one his neighbor's wife: and shall ye possess the land?33:27 Thus shall you say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: As I live, surely they that are in the waste places shall fall by the sword; and him that is in the open field will I give to the beasts to be devoured; and they that are in the strongholds and in the caves shall die of the pestilence.33:28 And I will make the land a desolation and an astonishment; and the pride of her power shall cease; and the mountains of Israel shall be desolate, so that none shall pass through.33:29 Then shall they know that I am Yahweh, when I have made the land a desolation and an astonishment, because of all their abominations which they have committed.33:30 And as for you, son of man, the children of your people talk of you by the walls and in the doors of the houses, and speak one to another, every one to his brother, saying, Come, I pray you, and hear what is the word that comes forth from Yahweh.33:31 And they come to you as the people comes, and they sit before you as my people, and they hear your words, but do them not; for with their mouth they show much love, but their heart goes after their gain.33:32 And, lo, you are to them as a very lovely song of one that has a pleasant voice, and can play well on an instrument; for they hear your words, but they do them not.33:33 And when this comes to pass, (behold, it comes,) then shall they know that a prophet has been among them.34:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,34:2 Son of man, prophesy against the shepherds of Israel, prophesy, and say to them, even to the shepherds, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Woe to the shepherds of Israel that feed only themselves! Should not the shepherds feed the sheep?34:3 You eat the fat, and you clothe yourselves with the wool, you kill the fatlings; but the sheep you do not feed.34:4 The diseased you have not strengthened, neither have you healed that which was sick, neither have you bound up that which was broken, neither have you brought back that which was driven away, neither have you searched for that which was lost; but with force and with rigor you have ruled over them.34:5 And they were scattered, because there was no shepherd; and they became food to all the beasts of the field, and were scattered.34:6 My sheep wandered through all the mountains, and upon every high hill: yes, my sheep were scattered upon all the face of the earth; and there was none that did search or seek after them.34:7 Therefore, ye shepherds, hear the word of Yahweh:34:8 As I live, says the Lord Yahweh, surely forasmuch as my sheep became a prey, and my sheep became food to all the beasts of the field, because there was no shepherd, neither did my shepherds search for my sheep, but the shepherds fed themselves, and fed not my sheep;34:9 therefore, ye shepherds, hear the word of Yahweh:34:10 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I am against the shepherds; and I will require my sheep at their hand, and cause them to cease from feeding the sheep; neither shall the shepherds feed themselves any more; and I will deliver my sheep from their mouth, that they may not be food for them.34:11 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I myself, even I, will search for my sheep, and will seek them out.34:12 As a shepherd seeks out his flock in the day that he is among his sheep that are scattered abroad, so will I seek out my sheep; and I will deliver them out of all places whither they have been scattered in the cloudy and dark day.34:13 And I will bring them out from the peoples, and gather them from the countries, and will bring them into their own land; and I will feed them upon the mountains of Israel, by the watercourses, and in all the inhabited places of the country.34:14 I will feed them with good pasture; and upon the mountains of the height of Israel shall their fold be: there shall they lie down in a good fold; and on fat pasture shall they feed upon the mountains of Israel.34:15 I myself will be the shepherd of my sheep, and I will cause them to lie down, says the Lord Yahweh.34:16 I will seek that which was lost, and will bring back that which was driven away, and will bind up that which was broken, and will strengthen that which was sick: but the fat and the strong I will destroy; I will feed them in justice.34:17 And as for you, O my flock, thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I judge between sheep and sheep, the rams and the he-goats.34:18 Seems it a small thing to you to have fed upon the good pasture, but ye must tread down with your feet the residue of your pasture?  and to have drunk of the clear waters, but ye must foul the residue with your feet?34:19 And as for my sheep, they eat that which ye have trodden with your feet, and they drink that which ye have fouled with your feet.34:20 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh to them: Behold, I, even I, will judge between the fat sheep and the lean sheep.34:21 Because ye thrust with side and with shoulder, and push all the diseased with your horns, till ye have scattered them abroad;34:22 therefore will I save my flock, and they shall no more be a prey; and I will judge between sheep and sheep.34:23 And I will set up one shepherd over them, and he shall feed them, even my servant David; he shall feed them, and he shall be their shepherd.34:24 And I, Yahweh, will be their God, and my servant David prince among them; I, Yahweh, have spoken it.34:25 And I will make with them a covenant of peace, and will cause evil beasts to cease out of the land; and they shall dwell securely in the wilderness, and sleep in the woods.34:26 And I will make them and the places round about my hill a blessing; and I will cause the shower to come down in its season; there shall be showers of blessing.34:27 And the tree of the field shall yield its fruit, and the earth shall yield its increase, and they shall be secure in their land; and they shall know that I am Yahweh, when I have broken the bars of their yoke, and have delivered them out of the hand of those that made bondmen of them.34:28 And they shall no more be a prey to the nations, neither shall the beasts of the earth devour them; but they shall dwell securely, and none shall make them afraid.34:29 And I will raise up to them a plantation for renown, and they shall be no more consumed with famine in the land, neither bear the shame of the nations any more.34:30 And they shall know that I, Yahweh, their God am with them, and that they, the house of Israel, are my people, says the Lord Yahweh.34:31 And ye my sheep, the sheep of my pasture, are men, and I am your God, says the Lord Yahweh.35:1 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,35:2 Son of man, set your face against mount Seir, and prophesy against it,35:3 and say to it, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I am against you, O mount Seir, and I will stretch out my hand against you, and I will make you a desolation and an astonishment.35:4 I will lay your cities waste, and you shall be desolate; and you shall know that I am Yahweh.35:5 Because you have had a perpetual enmity, and have given over the children of Israel to the power of the sword in the time of their calamity, in the time of the iniquity of the end;35:6 therefore, as I live, says the Lord Yahweh, I will prepare you to blood, and blood shall pursue you: since you have not hated blood, therefore blood shall pursue you.35:7 Thus will I make mount Seir an astonishment and a desolation; and I will cut off from it him that passes through and him that returns.35:8 And I will fill its mountains with its slain: in your hills and in your valleys and in all your watercourses shall they fall that are slain with the sword.35:9 I will make you a perpetual desolation, and your cities shall not be inhabited; and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.35:10 Because you have said, These two nations and these two countries shall be mine, and we will possess it; whereas Yahweh was there:35:11 therefore, as I live, says the Lord Yahweh, I will do according to your anger, and according to your envy which you have shown out of your hatred against them; and I will make myself known among them, when I shall judge you.35:12 And you shall know that I, Yahweh, have heard all your revilings which you have spoken against the mountains of Israel, saying, They are laid desolate, they are given us to devour.35:13 And ye have magnified yourselves against me with your mouth, and have multiplied your words against me: I have heard it.35:14 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: When the whole earth rejoices, I will make you desolate.35:15 As you did rejoice over the inheritance of the house of Israel, because it was desolate, so will I do to you: you shall be desolate, O mount Seir, and all Edom, even all of it; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.36:1 And you, son of man, prophesy to the mountains of Israel, and say, You mountains of Israel, hear the word of Yahweh.36:2 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because the enemy has said against you, aha! and, The ancient high places are ours in possession;36:3 therefore prophesy, and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because, even because they have made you desolate, and swallowed you up on every side, that ye might be a possession to the residue of the nations, and ye are taken up in the lips of talkers, and the evil report of the people;36:4 therefore, ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the Lord Yahweh: Thus says the Lord Yahweh to the mountains and to the hills, to the watercourses and to the valleys, to the desolate wastes and to the cities that are forsaken, which are become a prey and derision to the residue of the nations that are round about;36:5 therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Surely in the fire of my jealousy have I spoken against the residue of the nations, and against all Edom, that have appointed my land to themselves for a possession with the joy of all their heart, with despite of soul, to cast it out for a prey.36:6 Therefore prophesy concerning the land of Israel, and say to the mountains and to the hills, to the watercourses and to the valleys, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I have spoken in my jealousy and in my wrath, because ye have borne the shame of the nations:36:7 therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: I have sworn, saying, Surely the nations that are round about you, they shall bear their shame.36:8 But ye, O mountains of Israel, ye shall shoot forth your branches, and yield your fruit to my people Israel; for they are at hand to come.36:9 For, behold, I am for you, and I will turn into you, and ye shall be tilled and sown;36:10 and I will multiply men upon you, all the house of Israel, even all of it; and the cities shall be inhabited, and the waste places shall be built;36:11 and I will multiply upon you man and beast; and they shall increase and be fruitful; and I will cause you to be inhabited after your former estate, and will do better to you than at your beginnings: and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.36:12 Yes, I will cause men to walk upon you, even my people Israel; and they shall possess you, and you shall be their inheritance, and you shall no more from now on bereave them of children.36:13 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Because they say to you, You land are a devourer of men, and have been a bereaver of your nation;36:14 therefore you shall devour men no more, neither bereave your nation any more, says the Lord Yahweh;36:15 neither will I let you hear any more the shame of the nations, neither shall you bear the reproach of the peoples any more, neither shall you cause your nation to stumble any more, says the Lord Yahweh.36:16 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,36:17 Son of man, when the house of Israel dwelt in their own land, they defiled it by their way and by their doings: their way before me was as the uncleanness of a woman in her impurity.36:18 Wherefore I poured out my wrath upon them for the blood which they had poured out upon the land, and because they had defiled it with their idols;36:19 and I scattered them among the nations, and they were dispersed through the countries: according to their way and according to their doings I judged them.36:20 And when they came to the nations, whither they went, they profaned my holy name; in that men said of them, These are the people of Yahweh, and are gone forth out of his land.36:21 But I had regard for my holy name, which the house of Israel had profaned among the nations, whither they went.36:22 Therefore say to the house of Israel, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: I do not this for your sake, O house of Israel, but for my holy name, which ye have profaned among the nations, whither ye went.36:23 And I will sanctify my great name, which has been profaned among the nations, which ye have profaned in the midst of them; and the nations shall know that I am Yahweh, says the Lord Yahweh, when I shall be sanctified in you before their eyes.36:24 For I will take you from among the nations, and gather you out of all the countries, and will bring you into your own land.36:25 And I will sprinkle clean water upon you, and ye shall be clean: from all your filthiness, and from all your idols, will I cleanse you.36:26 A new heart also will I give you, and a new spirit will I put within you; and I will take away the stony heart out of your flesh, and I will give you a heart of flesh.36:27 And I will put my Spirit within you, and cause you to walk in my statutes, and ye shall keep my ordinances, and do them.36:28 And ye shall dwell in the land that I gave to your fathers; and ye shall be my people, and I will be your God.36:29 And I will save you from all your uncleannesses: and I will call for the grain, and will multiply it, and lay no famine upon you.36:30 And I will multiply the fruit of the tree, and the increase of the field, that ye may receive no more the reproach of famine among the nations.36:31 Then shall ye remember your evil ways, and your doings that were not good; and ye shall loathe yourselves in your own sight for your iniquities and for your abominations.36:32 Nor for your sake do I this, says the Lord Yahweh, be it known to you: be ashamed and confounded for your ways, O house of Israel.36:33 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: In the day that I cleanse you from all your iniquities, I will cause the cities to be inhabited, and the waste places shall be built.36:34 And the land that was desolate shall be tilled, whereas it was a desolation in the sight of all that passed by.36:35 And they shall say, This land that was desolate is become like the garden of Eden; and the waste and desolate and ruined cities are fortified and inhabited.36:36 Then the nations that are left round about you shall know that I, Yahweh, have built the ruined places, and planted that which was desolate: I, Yahweh, have spoken it, and I will do it.36:37 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: For this, moreover, will I be inquired of by the house of Israel, to do it for them: I will increase them with men like a flock.36:38 As the flock for sacrifice, as the flock of Jerusalem in her appointed feasts, so shall the waste cities be filled with flocks of men; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.37:1 The hand of Yahweh was upon me, and he brought me out in the Spirit of Yahweh, and set me down in the midst of the valley; and it was full of bones.37:2 And he caused me to pass by them round about: and, behold, there were very many in the open valley; and, lo, they were very dry.37:3 And he said to me, Son of man, can these bones live?  And I answered, O Lord Yahweh, you know.37:4 Again he said to me, Prophesy over these bones, and say to them, O ye dry bones, hear the word of Yahweh.37:5 Thus says the Lord Yahweh to these bones: Behold, I will cause breath to enter into you, and ye shall live.37:6 And I will lay sinews upon you, and will bring up flesh upon you, and cover you with skin, and put breath in you, and ye shall live; and ye shall know that I am Yahweh.37:7 So I prophesied as I was commanded: and as I prophesied, there was a noise, and, behold, an earthquake; and the bones came together, bone to its bone.37:8 And I beheld, and, lo, there were sinews upon them, and flesh came up, and skin covered them above; but there was no breath in them.37:9 Then said he to me, Prophesy to the wind, prophesy, son of man, and say to the wind, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Come from the four winds, O breath, and breathe upon these slain, that they may live.37:10 So I prophesied as he commanded me, and the breath came into them, and they lived, and stood up upon their feet, an exceedingly great army.37:11 Then he said to me, Son of man, these bones are the whole house of Israel: behold, they say, Our bones are dried up, and our hope is lost; we are clean cut off.37:12 Therefore prophesy, and say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I will open your graves, and cause you to come up out of your graves, O my people; and I will bring you into the land of Israel.37:13 And ye shall know that I am Yahweh, when I have opened your graves, and caused you to come up out of your graves, O my people.37:14 And I will put my Spirit in you, and ye shall live, and I will place you in your own land: and ye shall know that I, Yahweh, have spoken it and performed it, says Yahweh.37:15 The word of Yahweh came again to me, saying,37:16 And you, son of man, take you one stick, and write upon it, For Judah, and for the children of Israel his companions: then take another stick, and write upon it, For Joseph, the stick of Ephraim, and for all the house of Israel his companions:37:17 and join them for you one to another into one stick, that they may become one in your hand.37:18 And when the children of your people shall speak to you, saying, Will you not show us what you mean by these?37:19 say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I will take the stick of Joseph, which is in the hand of Ephraim, and the tribes of Israel his companions; and I will put them with it, even with the stick of Judah, and make them one stick, and they shall be one in my hand.37:20 And the sticks whereon you write shall be in your hand before their eyes.37:21 And say to them, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I will take the children of Israel from among the nations, whither they are gone, and will gather them on every side, and bring them into their own land:37:22 and I will make them one nation in the land, upon the mountains of Israel; and one king shall be king to them all; and they shall be no more two nations, neither shall they be divided into two kingdoms any more at all;37:23 neither shall they defile themselves any more with their idols, nor with their detestable things, nor with any of their transgressions; but I will save them out of all their dwelling-places, in which they have sinned, and will cleanse them: so shall they be my people, and I will be their God.37:24 And my servant David shall be king over them; and they all shall have one shepherd: they shall also walk in my ordinances, and observe my statutes, and do them.37:25 And they shall dwell in the land that I have given to Jacob my servant, in which your fathers dwelt; and they shall dwell therein, they, and their children, and their children's children, for ever: and David my servant shall be their prince for ever.37:26 Moreover I will make a covenant of peace with them; it shall be an everlasting covenant with them; and I will place them, and multiply them, and will set my sanctuary in the midst of them for evermore.37:27 My tabernacle also shall be with them; and I will be their God, and they shall be my people.37:28 And the nations shall know that I am Yahweh that sanctifies Israel, when my sanctuary shall be in the midst of them for evermore.38:1 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,38:2 Son of man, set your face toward Gog,  of the land of Magog, the prince of Rosh, Meshech, and Tubal, and prophesy against him,38:3 and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I am against you, O Gog, prince of Rosh, Meshech, and Tubal:38:4 and I will turn you about, and put hooks into your jaws, and I will bring you forth, and all your army, horses and horsemen, all of them clothed in full armor, a great company with buckler and shield, all of them handling swords;38:5 Persia, Cush, and Put  with them, all of them with shield and helmet;38:6 Gomer,  and all his hordes; the house of Togarmah in the uttermost parts of the north, and all his hordes; even many peoples with you.38:7 Be you prepared, yes, prepare yourself, you, and all your companies that are assembled to you, and be you a guard to them.38:8 After many days you shall be visited: in the latter years you shall come into the land that is brought back from the sword, that is gathered out of many peoples, upon the mountains of Israel, which have been a continual waste; but it is brought forth out of the peoples, and they shall dwell securely, all of them.38:9 And you shall ascend, you shall come like a storm, you shall be like a cloud to cover the land, you, and all your hordes, and many peoples with you.38:10 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: It shall come to pass in that day, that things shall come into your mind, and you shall devise an evil device:38:11 and you shall say, I will go up to the land of unwalled villages; I will go to them that are at rest, that dwell securely, all of them dwelling without walls, and having neither bars nor gates;38:12 to take the spoil and to take the prey; to turn your hand against the waste places that are now inhabited, and against the people that are gathered out of the nations, that have gotten cattle and goods, that dwell in the middle of the earth.38:13 Sheba, and Dedan, and the merchants of Tarshish, with all the young lions thereof, shall say to you, are you come to take the spoil?  have you assembled your company to take the prey?  to carry away silver and gold, to take away cattle and goods, to take great spoil?38:14 Therefore, son of man, prophesy, and say to Gog, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: In that day when my people Israel dwells securely, shall you not know it?38:15 And you shall come from your place out of the uttermost parts of the north, you, and many peoples with you, all of them riding upon horses, a great company and a mighty army;38:16 and you shall come up against my people Israel, as a cloud to cover the land: it shall come to pass in the latter days, that I will bring you against my land, that the nations may know me, when I shall be sanctified in you, O Gog, before their eyes.38:17 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Are you he of whom I spoke in old time by my servants the prophets of Israel, that prophesied in those days for many years that I would bring you against them?38:18 And it shall come to pass in that day, when Gog shall come against the land of Israel, says the Lord Yahweh, that my wrath shall come up into my nostrils.38:19 For in my jealousy and in the fire of my wrath have I spoken, Surely in that day there shall be a great shaking in the land of Israel;38:20 so that the fishes of the sea, and the birds of the heavens, and the beasts of the field, and all creeping things that creep upon the earth, and all the men that are upon the face of the earth, shall shake at my presence, and the mountains shall be thrown down, and the steep places shall fall, and every wall shall fall to the ground.38:21 And I will call for a sword against him to all my mountains, says the Lord Yahweh: every man's sword shall be against his brother.38:22 And with pestilence and with blood will I enter into judgment with him; and I will rain upon him, and upon his hordes, and upon the many peoples that are with him, an overflowing shower, and great hailstones, fire, and brimstone.38:23 And I will magnify myself, and sanctify myself, and I will make myself known in the eyes of many nations; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.39:1 And you, son of man, prophesy against Gog, and say, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Behold, I am against you, O Gog, prince of Rosh, Meshech, and Tubal:39:2 and I will turn you about, and will lead you on, and will cause you to come up from the uttermost parts of the north; and I will bring you upon the mountains of Israel;39:3 and I will smite your bow out of your left hand, and will cause your arrows to fall out of your right hand.39:4 You shall fall upon the mountains of Israel, you, and all your hordes, and the peoples that are with you: I will give you to the ravenous birds of every sort, and to the beasts of the field to be devoured.39:5 You shall fall upon the open field; for I have spoken it, says the Lord Yahweh.39:6 And I will send a fire on Magog, and on them that dwell securely in the isles; and they shall know that I am Yahweh.39:7 And my holy name will I make known in the midst of my people Israel; neither will I allow my holy name to be profaned any more: and the nations shall know that I am Yahweh, the Holy One in Israel.39:8 Behold, it comes, and it shall be done, says the Lord Yahweh; this is the day whereof I have spoken.39:9 And they that dwell in the cities of Israel shall go forth, and shall make fires of the weapons and burn them, both the shields and the bucklers, the bows and the arrows, and the handstaves, and the spears, and they shall make fires of them seven years;39:10 so that they shall take no wood out of the field, neither cut down any out of the forests; for they shall make fires of the weapons; and they shall plunder those that plundered them, and rob those that robbed them, says the Lord Yahweh.39:11 And it shall come to pass in that day, that I will give to Gog a place for burial in Israel, the valley of them that pass through on the east of the sea; and it shall stop them that pass through: and there shall they bury Gog and all his multitude; and they shall call it The valley of Hamon-gog.39:12 And seven months shall the house of Israel be burying them, that they may cleanse the land.39:13 Yes, all the people of the land shall bury them; and it shall be to them a renown in the day that I shall be glorified, says the Lord Yahweh.39:14 And they shall set apart men of continual employment, that shall pass through the land, and, with them that pass through, those that bury them that remain upon the face of the land, to cleanse it: after the end of seven months shall they search.39:15 And they that pass through the land shall pass through; and when any one sees a man's bone, then shall he set up a sign by it, till the buriers have buried it in the valley of Hamon-gog.39:16 And Hamonah shall also be the name of a city.  Thus shall they cleanse the land.39:17 And you, son of man, thus says the Lord Yahweh: Speak to the birds of every sort, and to every beast of the field, assemble yourselves, and come; gather yourselves on every side to my sacrifice that I do sacrifice for you, even a great sacrifice upon the mountains of Israel, that ye may eat flesh and drink blood.39:18 You shall eat the flesh of the mighty, and drink the blood of the princes of the earth, of rams, of lambs, and of goats, of bullocks, all of them fatlings of Bashan.39:19 And ye shall eat fat till ye be full, and drink blood till ye be drunken, of my sacrifice which I have sacrificed for you.39:20 And ye shall be filled at my table with horses and chariots, with mighty men, and with all men of war, says the Lord Yahweh.39:21 And I will set my glory among the nations; and all the nations shall see my judgment that I have executed, and my hand that I have laid upon them.39:22 So the house of Israel shall know that I am Yahweh their God, from that day and forward.39:23 And the nations shall know that the house of Israel went into captivity for their iniquity; because they trespassed against me, and I hid my face from them: so I gave them into the hand of their adversaries, and they fell all of them by the sword.39:24 According to their uncleanness and according to their transgressions did I to them; and I hid my face from them.39:25 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: Now will I bring back the captivity of Jacob, and have mercy upon the whole house of Israel; and I will be jealous for my holy name.39:26 And they shall bear their shame, and all their trespasses whereby they have trespassed against me, when they shall dwell securely in their land, and none shall make them afraid;39:27 when I have brought them back from the peoples, and gathered them out of their enemies' lands, and am sanctified in them in the sight of many nations.39:28 And they shall know that I am Yahweh their God, in that I caused them to go into captivity among the nations, and have gathered them to their own land; and I will leave none of them any more there;39:29 neither will I hide my face any more from them; for I have poured out my Spirit upon the house of Israel, says the Lord Yahweh.40:1 In the five and twentieth year of our captivity, in the beginning of the year, in the tenth day of the month, in the fourteenth year after that the city was smitten, in the selfsame day, the hand of Yahweh was upon me, and he brought me there.40:2 In the visions of God brought he me into the land of Israel, and set me down upon a very high mountain, whereon was as it were the frame of a city on the south.40:3 And he brought me there; and, behold, there was a man, whose appearance was like the appearance of brass, with a line of flax in his hand, and a measuring reed; and he stood in the gate.40:4 And the man said to me, Son of man, behold with your eyes, and hear with your ears, and set your heart upon all that I shall show you; for, to the intent that I may show them to you, are you brought here: declare all that you see to the house of Israel.40:5 And, behold, a wall on the outside of the house round about, and in the man's hand a measuring reed six cubits long, of a cubit and a handbreadth each: so he measured the thickness of the building, one reed; and the height, one reed.40:6 Then came he to the gate which looks toward the east, and went up the steps thereof: and he measured the threshold of the gate, one reed broad; and the other threshold, one reed broad.40:7 And every lodge was one reed long, and one reed broad; and the space between the lodges was five cubits; and the threshold of the gate by the porch of the gate toward the house was one reed.40:8 He measured also the porch of the gate toward the house, one reed.40:9 Then measured he the porch of the gate, eight cubits; and the posts thereof, two cubits; and the porch of the gate was toward the house.40:10 And the lodges of the gate eastward were three on this side, and three on that side; they three were of one measure: and the posts had one measure on this side and on that side.40:11 And he measured the breadth of the opening of the gate, ten cubits; and the length of the gate, thirteen cubits;40:12 and a border before the lodges, one cubit on this side, and a border, one cubit on that side; and the lodges, six cubits on this side, and six cubits on that side.40:13 And he measured the gate from the roof of the one lodge to the roof of the other, a breadth of five and twenty cubits; door against door.40:14 He made also posts, sixty cubits; and the court reached to the posts, round about the gate.40:15 And from the forefront of the gate at the entrance to the forefront of the inner porch of the gate were fifty cubits.40:16 And there were closed windows to the lodges, and to their posts within the gate round about, and likewise to the arches; and windows were round about inward; and upon each post were palm-trees.40:17 Then brought he me into the outer court; and, lo, there were chambers and a pavement, made for the court round about: thirty chambers were upon the pavement.40:18 And the pavement was by the side of the gates, answerable to the length of the gates, even the lower pavement.40:19 Then he measured the breadth from the forefront of the lower gate to the forefront of the inner court without, a hundred cubits, both on the east and on the north.40:20 And the gate of the outer court whose prospect is toward the north, he measured the length thereof and the breadth thereof.40:21 And the lodges thereof were three on this side and three on that side; and the posts thereof and the arches thereof were after the measure of the first gate: the length thereof was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits.40:22 And the windows thereof, and the arches thereof, and the palm-trees thereof, were after the measure of the gate whose prospect is toward the east; and they went up to it by seven steps; and the arches thereof were before them.40:23 And there was a gate to the inner court over against the other gate, both on the north and on the east; and he measured from gate to gate a hundred cubits.40:24 And he led me toward the south; and, behold, a gate toward the south: and he measured the posts thereof and the arches thereof according to these measures.40:25 And there were windows in it and in the arches thereof round about, like those windows: the length was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits.40:26 And there were seven steps to go up to it, and the arches thereof were before them; and it had palm-trees, one on this side, and another on that side, upon the posts thereof.40:27 And there was a gate to the inner court toward the south: and he measured from gate to gate toward the south a hundred cubits.40:28 Then he brought me to the inner court by the south gate: and he measured the south gate according to these measures;40:29 and the lodges thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, according to these measures: and there were windows in it and in the arches thereof round about; it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad.40:30 And there were arches round about, five and twenty cubits long, and five cubits broad.40:31 And the arches thereof were toward the outer court; and palm-trees were upon the posts thereof: and the ascent to it had eight steps.40:32 And he brought me into the inner court toward the east: and he measured the gate according to these measures;40:33 and the lodges thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, according to these measures: and there were windows therein and in the arches thereof round about; it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad.40:34 And the arches thereof were toward the outer court; and palm-trees were upon the posts thereof, on this side, and on that side: and the ascent to it had eight steps.40:35 And he brought me to the north gate: and he measured it according to these measures;40:36 the lodges thereof, the posts thereof, and the arches thereof: and there were windows therein round about; the length was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits.40:37 And the posts thereof were toward the outer court; and palm-trees were upon the posts thereof, on this side, and on that side: and the ascent to it had eight steps.40:38 And a chamber with the door thereof was by the posts at the gates; there they washed the burnt offering.40:39 And in the porch of the gate were two tables on this side, and two tables on that side, to slay upon it the burnt offering and the sin offering and the trespass offering.40:40 And on the one side without, as one goes up to the entry of the gate toward the north, were two tables; and on the other side, which belonged to the porch of the gate, were two tables.40:41 Four tables were on this side, and four tables on that side, by the side of the gate; eight tables, whereupon they slew the sacrifices.40:42 And there were four tables for the burnt offering, of hewn stone, a cubit and a half long, and a cubit and a half broad, and one cubit high; whereupon they laid the instruments with which they slew the burnt offering and the sacrifice.40:43 And the hooks, a handbreadth long, were fastened within round about: and upon the tables was the flesh of the oblation.40:44 And without the inner gate were chambers for the singers in the inner court, which was at the side of the north gate; and their prospect was toward the south; one at the side of the east gate having the prospect toward the north.40:45 And he said to me, This chamber, whose prospect is toward the south, is for the priests, the keepers of the charge of the house;40:46 and the chamber whose prospect is toward the north is for the priests, the keepers of the charge of the altar: these are the sons of Zadok, who from among the sons of Levi come near to Yahweh to minister to him.40:47 And he measured the court, a hundred cubits long, and a hundred cubits broad, foursquare; and the altar was before the house.40:48 Then he brought me to the porch of the house, and measured each post of the porch, five cubits on this side, and five cubits on that side: and the breadth of the gate was three cubits on this side, and three cubits on that side.40:49 The length of the porch was twenty cubits, and the breadth eleven cubits; even by the steps whereby they went up to it: and there were pillars by the posts, one on this side, and another on that side.41:1 And he brought me to the temple, and measured the posts, six cubits broad on the one side, and six cubits broad on the other side, which was the breadth of the tabernacle.41:2 And the breadth of the entrance was ten cubits; and the sides of the entrance were five cubits on the one side, and five cubits on the other side: and he measured the length thereof, forty cubits, and the breadth, twenty cubits.41:3 Then went he inward, and measured each post of the entrance, two cubits; and the entrance, six cubits; and the breadth of the entrance, seven cubits.41:4 And he measured the length thereof, twenty cubits, and the breadth, twenty cubits, before the temple: and he said to me, This is the most holy place.41:5 Then he measured the wall of the house, six cubits; and the breadth of every side-chamber, four cubits, round about the house on every side.41:6 And the side-chambers were in three stories, one over another, and thirty in order; and they entered into the wall which belonged to the house for the side-chambers round about, that they might have hold therein, and not have hold in the wall of the house.41:7 And the side-chambers were broader as they encompassed the house higher and higher; for the encompassing of the house went higher and higher round about the house: therefore the breadth of the house continued upward; and so one went up from the lowest chamber to the highest by the middle chamber.41:8 I saw also that the house had a raised basement round about: the foundations of the side-chambers were a full reed of six great cubits.41:9 The thickness of the wall, which was for the side-chambers, on the outside, was five cubits: and that which was left was the place of the side-chambers that belonged to the house.41:10 And between the chambers was a breadth of twenty cubits round about the house on every side.41:11 And the doors of the side-chambers were toward the place that was left, one door toward the north, and another door toward the south: and the breadth of the place that was left was five cubits round about.41:12 And the building that was before the separate place at the side toward the west was seventy cubits broad; and the wall of the building was five cubits thick round about, and the length thereof ninety cubits.41:13 So he measured the house, a hundred cubits long; and the separate place, and the building, with the walls thereof, a hundred cubits long;41:14 also the breadth of the face of the house, and of the separate place toward the east, a hundred cubits.41:15 And he measured the length of the building before the separate place which was at the back thereof, and the galleries thereof on the one side and on the other side, a hundred cubits; and the inner temple, and the porches of the court;41:16 the thresholds, and the closed windows, and the galleries round about on their three stories, over against the threshold, ceiled with wood round about, and from the ground up to the windows, (now the windows were covered),41:17 to the space above the door, even to the inner house, and without, and by all the wall round about within and without, by measure.41:18 And it was made with cherubim and palm-trees; and a palm-tree was between cherub and cherub, and every cherub had two faces;41:19 so that there was the face of a man toward the palm-tree on the one side, and the face of a young lion toward the palm-tree on the other side.  thus was it made through all the house round about:41:20 from the ground to above the door were cherubim and palm-trees made: thus was the wall of the temple.41:21 As for the temple, the door-posts were squared; and as for the face of the sanctuary, the appearance of it was as the appearance of the temple.41:22 The altar was of wood, three cubits high, and the length thereof two cubits; and the corners thereof, and the length thereof, and the walls thereof, were of wood: and he said to me, This is the table that is before Yahweh.41:23 And the temple and the sanctuary had two doors.41:24 And the doors had two leaves apiece, two turning leaves: two leaves for the one door, and two leaves for the other.41:25 And there were made on them, on the doors of the temple, cherubim and palm-trees, like as were made upon the walls; and there was a threshold of wood upon the face of the porch without.41:26 And there were closed windows and palm-trees on the one side and on the other side, on the sides of the porch: thus were the side-chambers of the house, and the thresholds.42:1 Then he brought me forth into the outer court, the way toward the north: and he brought me into the chamber that was over against the separate place, and which was over against the building toward the north.42:2 Before the length of a hundred cubits was the north door, and the breadth was fifty cubits.42:3 Over against the twenty cubits which belonged to the inner court, and over against the pavement which belonged to the outer court, was gallery against gallery in the third story.42:4 And before the chambers was a walk of ten cubits' breadth inward, a way of one cubit; and their doors were toward the north.42:5 Now the upper chambers were shorter; for the galleries took away from these, more than from the lower and the middlemost, in the building.42:6 For they were in three stories, and they had not pillars as the pillars of the courts: therefore the uppermost was straitened more than the lowest and the middlemost from the ground.42:7 And the wall that was without by the side of the chambers, toward the outer court before the chambers, the length thereof was fifty cubits.42:8 For the length of the chambers that were in the outer court was fifty cubits: and, lo, before the temple were a hundred cubits.42:9 And from under these chambers was the entry on the east side, as one goes into them from the outer court.42:10 In the thickness of the wall of the court toward the east, before the separate place, and before the building, there were chambers.42:11 And the way before them was like the appearance of the way of the chambers which were toward the north; according to their length so was their breadth: and all their egresses were both according to their fashions, and according to their doors.42:12 And according to the doors of the chambers that were toward the south was a door at the head of the way, even the way directly before the wall toward the east, as oneenters into them.42:13 Then said he to me, The north chambers and the south chambers, which are before the separate place, they are the holy chambers, where the priests that are near to Yahweh shall eat the most holy things: there shall they lay the most holy things, and the meal offering, and the sin offering, and the trespass offering; for the place is holy.42:14 When the priests enter in, then shall they not go out of the holy place into the outer court, but there they shall lay their garments in which they minister; for they are holy: and they shall put on other garments, and shall approach to that which pertains to the people.42:15 Now when he had made an end of measuring the inner house, he brought me forth by the way of the gate whose prospect is toward the east, and measured it round about.42:16 He measured on the east side with the measuring reed five hundred reeds, with the measuring reed round about.42:17 He measured on the north side five hundred reeds with the measuring reed round about.42:18 He measured on the south side five hundred reeds with the measuring reed.42:19 He turned about to the west side, and measured five hundred reeds with the measuring reed.42:20 He measured it on the four sides: it had a wall round about, the length five hundred, and the breadth five hundred, to make a separation between that which was holy and that which was common.43:1 Afterward he brought me to the gate, even the gate that looks toward the east.43:2 And, behold, the glory of the God of Israel came from the way of the east: and his voice was like the sound of many waters; and the earth shined with his glory.43:3 And it was according to the appearance of the vision which I saw, even according to the vision that I saw when I came to destroy the city; and the visions were like the vision that I saw by the river Chebar; and I fell upon my face.43:4 And the glory of Yahweh came into the house by the way of the gate whose prospect is toward the east.43:5 And the Spirit took me up, and brought me into the inner court; and, behold, the glory of Yahweh filled the house.43:6 And I heard one speaking to me out of the house; and a man stood by me.43:7 And he said to me, Son of man, this is the place of my throne, and the place of the soles of my feet, where I will dwell in the midst of the children of Israel for ever.  And the house of Israel shall no more defile my holy name, neither they, nor their kings, by their whoredom, and by the dead bodies of their kings in their high places;43:8 in their setting of their threshold by my threshold, and their door-post beside my door-post, and there was but the wall between me and them; and they have defiled my holy name by their abominations which they have committed: therefore I have consumed them in my anger.43:9 Now let them put away their whoredom, and the dead bodies of their kings, far from me; and I will dwell in the midst of them for ever.43:10 You, son of man, show the house to the house of Israel, that they may be ashamed of their iniquities; and let them measure the pattern.43:11 And if they be ashamed of all that they have done, make known to them the form of the house, and the fashion thereof, and the egresses thereof, and the entrances thereof, and all the forms thereof, and all the ordinances thereof, and all the forms thereof, and all the laws thereof; and write it in their sight; that they may keep the whole form thereof, and all the ordinances thereof, and do them.43:12 This is the law of the house: upon the top of the mountain the whole limit thereof round about shall be most holy.  Behold, this is the law of the house.43:13 And these are the measures of the altar by cubits (the cubit is a cubit and a handbreadth): the bottom shall be a cubit, and the breadth a cubit, and the border thereof by the edge thereof round about a span; and this shall be the base of the altar.43:14 And from the bottom upon the ground to the lower ledge shall be two cubits, and the breadth one cubit; and from the lesser ledge to the greater ledge shall be four cubits, and the breadth a cubit.43:15 And the upper altar shall be four cubits; and from the altar hearth and upward there shall be four horns.43:16 And the altar hearth shall be twelve cubits long by twelve broad, square in the four sides thereof.43:17 And the ledge shall be fourteen cubits long by fourteen broad in the four sides thereof; and the border about it shall be half a cubit; and the bottom thereof shall be a cubit round about; and the steps thereof shall look toward the east.43:18 And he said to me, Son of man, thus says the Lord Yahweh: These are the ordinances of the altar in the day when they shall make it, to offer burnt offerings upon it, and to sprinkle blood upon it.43:19 You shall give to the priests the Levites that are of the seed of Zadok, who are near to me, to minister to me, says the Lord Yahweh, a young bullock for a sin offering.43:20 And you shall take of the blood thereof, and put it on the four horns of it, and on the four corners of the ledge, and upon the border round about: thus shall you cleanse it and make atonement for it.43:21 You shall also take the bullock of the sin offering, and it shall be burnt in the appointed place of the house, without the sanctuary.43:22 And on the second day you shall offer a he-goat without blemish for a sin offering; and they shall cleanse the altar, as they did cleanse it with the bullock.43:23 When you have made an end of cleansing it, you shall offer a young bullock without blemish, and a ram out of the flock without blemish.43:24 And you shall bring them near before Yahweh, and the priests shall cast salt upon them, and they shall offer them up for a burnt offering to Yahweh.43:25 Seven days shall you prepare every day a goat for a sin offering: they shall also prepare a young bullock, and a ram out of the flock, without blemish.43:26 Seven days shall they make atonement for the altar and purify it; so shall they consecrate it.43:27 And when they have accomplished the days, it shall be that upon the eighth day, and forward, the priests shall make your burnt offerings upon the altar, and your peace offerings; and I will accept you, says the Lord Yahweh.44:1 Then he brought me back by the way of the outer gate of the sanctuary, which looks toward the east; and it was shut.44:2 And Yahweh said to me, This gate shall be shut; it shall not be opened, neither shall any man enter in by it; for Yahweh, the God of Israel, has entered in by it; therefore it shall be shut.44:3 As for the prince, he shall sit therein as prince to eat bread before Yahweh; he shall enter by the way of the porch of the gate, and shall go out by the way of the same.44:4 Then he brought me by the way of the north gate before the house; and I looked, and, behold, the glory of Yahweh filled the house of Yahweh: and I fell upon my face.44:5 And Yahweh said to me, Son of man, mark well, and behold with your eyes, and hear with your ears all that I say to you concerning all the ordinances of the house of Yahweh, and all the laws thereof; and mark well the entrance of the house, with every egress of the sanctuary.44:6 And you shall say to the rebellious, even to the house of Israel, Thus says the Lord Yahweh: O ye house of Israel, let it suffice you of all your abominations,44:7 in that ye have brought in foreigners, uncircumcised in heart and uncircumcised in flesh, to be in my sanctuary, to profane it, even my house, when ye offer my bread, the fat and the blood, and they have broken my covenant, to add to all your abominations.44:8 And ye have not kept the charge of my holy things; but ye have set keepers of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves.44:9 Thus says the Lord Yahweh, No foreigner, uncircumcised in heart and uncircumcised in flesh, shall enter into my sanctuary, of any foreigners that are among the children of Israel.44:10 But the Levites that went far from me, when Israel went astray, that went astray from me after their idols, they shall bear their iniquity.44:11 Yet they shall be ministers in my sanctuary, having oversight at the gates of the house, and ministering in the house: they shall slay the burnt offering and the sacrifice for the people, and they shall stand before them to minister to them.44:12 Because they ministered to them before their idols, and became a stumblingblock of iniquity to the house of Israel; therefore have I lifted up my hand against them, says the Lord Yahweh, and they shall bear their iniquity.44:13 And they shall not come near to me, to execute the office of priest to me, nor to come near to any of my holy things, to the things that are most holy; but they shall bear their shame, and their abominations which they have committed.44:14 Yet will I make them keepers of the charge of the house, for all the service thereof, and for all that shall be done therein.44:15 But the priests the Levites, the sons of Zadok, that kept the charge of my sanctuary when the children of Israel went astray from me, they shall come near to me to minister to me; and they shall stand before me to offer to me the fat and the blood, says the Lord Yahweh:44:16 they shall enter into my sanctuary, and they shall come near to my table, to minister to me, and they shall keep my charge.44:17 And it shall be that, when they enter in at the gates of the inner court, they shall be clothed with linen garments; and no wool shall come upon them, while they minister in the gates of the inner court, and within.44:18 They shall have linen tires upon their heads, and shall have linen breeches upon their loins; they shall not gird themselves with anything that causes sweat.44:19 And when they go forth into the outer court, even into the outer court to the people, they shall put off their garments in which they minister, and lay them in the holy chambers; and they shall put on other garments, that they sanctify not the people with their garments.44:20 Neither shall they shave their heads, nor allow their locks to grow long; they shall only cut off the hair of their heads.44:21 Neither shall any of the priests drink wine, when they enter into the inner court.44:22 Neither shall they take for their wives a widow, nor her that is put away; but they shall take virgins of the seed of the house of Israel, or a widow that is the widow of a priest.44:23 And they shall teach my people the difference between the holy and the common, and cause them to discern between the unclean and the clean.44:24 And in a controversy they shall stand to judge; according to my ordinances shall they judge it: and they shall keep my laws and my statutes in all my appointed feasts; and they shall hallow my sabbaths.44:25 And they shall go in to no dead person to defile themselves; but for father, or for mother, or for son, or for daughter, for brother, or for sister that has had no husband, they may defile themselves.44:26 And after he is cleansed, they shall reckon to him seven days.44:27 And in the day that he goes into the sanctuary, into the inner court, to minister in the sanctuary, he shall offer his sin offering, says the Lord Yahweh.44:28 And they shall have an inheritance: I am their inheritance; and ye shall give them no possession in Israel; I am their possession.44:29 They shall eat the meal offering, and the sin offering, and the trespass offering; and every devoted thing in Israel shall be theirs.44:30 And the first of all the first-fruits of every thing, and every oblation of everything, of all your oblations, shall be for the priest: ye shall also give to the priests the first of your dough, to cause a blessing to rest on your house.44:31 The priests shall not eat of anything that dies of itself, or is torn, whether it be bird or beast.45:1 Moreover, when ye shall divide by lot the land for inheritance, ye shall offer an oblation to Yahweh, a holy portion of the land; the length shall be the length of five and twenty thousand reeds, and the breadth shall be ten thousand: it shall be holy in all the border thereof round about.45:2 Of this there shall be for the holy place five hundred in length by five hundred in breadth, square round about; and fifty cubits for the suburbs thereof round about.45:3 And of this measure shall you measure a length of five and twenty thousand, and a breadth of ten thousand: and in it shall be the sanctuary, which is most holy.45:4 It is a holy portion of the land; it shall be for the priests, the ministers of the sanctuary, that come near to minister to Yahweh; and it shall be a place for their houses, and a holy place for the sanctuary.45:5 And five and twenty thousand in length, and ten thousand in breadth, shall be to the Levites, the ministers of the house, for a possession to themselves, for twenty chambers.45:6 And ye shall appoint the possession of the city five thousand broad, and five and twenty thousand long, side by side with the oblation of the holy portion: it shall be for the whole house of Israel.45:7 And whatsoever is for the prince shall be on the one side and on the other side of the holy oblation and of the possession of the city, in front of the holy oblation and in front of the possession of the city, on the west side westward, and on the east side eastward; and in length answerable to one of the portions, from the west border to the east border.45:8 In the land it shall be to him for a possession in Israel: and my princes shall no more oppress my people; but they shall give the land to the house of Israel according to their tribes.45:9 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: Let it suffice you, O princes of Israel: remove violence and spoil, and execute justice and righteousness; take away your exactions from my people, says the Lord Yahweh.45:10 You shall have just balances, and a just ephah, and a just bath.45:11 The ephah and the bath shall be of one measure, that the bath may contain the tenth part of a homer, and the ephah the tenth part of a homer: the measure thereof shall be after the homer.45:12 And the shekel shall be twenty gerahs; twenty shekels, five and twenty shekels, fifteen shekels, shall be your maneh.45:13 This is the oblation that ye shall offer: the sixth part of an ephah from a homer of wheat; and ye shall give the sixth part of an ephah from a homer of barley;45:14 and the set portion of oil, of the bath of oil, the tenth part of a bath out of the cor, which is ten baths, even a homer; (for ten baths are a homer;)45:15 and one lamb of the flock, out of two hundred, from the well-watered pastures of Israel; -for a meal offering, and for a burnt offering, and for peace offerings, to make atonement for them, says the Lord Yahweh.45:16 All the people of the land shall give to this oblation for the prince in Israel.45:17 And it shall be the prince's part to give the burnt offerings, and the meal offerings, and the drink offerings, in the feasts, and on the new moons, and on the sabbaths, in all the appointed feasts of the house of Israel: he shall prepare the sin offering, and the meal offering, and the burnt offering, and the peace offerings, to make atonement for the house of Israel.45:18 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: In the first month, in the first day of the month, you shall take a young bullock without blemish; and you shall cleanse the sanctuary.45:19 And the priest shall take of the blood of the sin offering, and put it upon the door-posts of the house, and upon the four corners of the ledge of the altar, and upon the posts of the gate of the inner court.45:20 And so you shall do on the seventh day of the month for every one that errs, and for him that is simple: so shall ye make atonement for the house.45:21 In the first month, in the fourteenth day of the month, ye shall have the passover, a feast of seven days; unleavened bread shall be eaten.45:22 And upon that day shall the prince prepare for himself and for all the people of the land a bullock for a sin offering.45:23 And the seven days of the feast he shall prepare a burnt offering to Yahweh, seven bullocks and seven rams without blemish daily the seven days; and a he-goat daily for a sin offering.45:24 And he shall prepare a meal offering, an ephah for a bullock, and an ephah for a ram, and a hin of oil to an ephah.45:25 In the seventh month, in the fifteenth day of the month, in the feast, shall he do the like the seven days; according to the sin offering, according to the burnt offering, and according to the meal offering, and according to the oil.46:1 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: The gate of the inner court that looks toward the east shall be shut the six working days; but on the sabbath day it shall be opened, and on the day of the new moon it shall be opened.46:2 And the prince shall enter by the way of the porch of the gate without, and shall stand by the post of the gate; and the priests shall prepare his burnt offering and his peace offerings, and he shall worship at the threshold of the gate: then he shall go forth; but the gate shall not be shut until the evening.46:3 And the people of the land shall worship at the door of that gate before Yahweh on the sabbaths and on the new moons.46:4 And the burnt offering that the prince shall offer to Yahweh shall be on the sabbath day six lambs without blemish and a ram without blemish;46:5 and the meal offering shall be an ephah for the ram, and the meal offering for the lambs as he is able to give, and a hin of oil to an ephah.46:6 And on the day of the new moon it shall be a young bullock without blemish, and six lambs, and a ram; they shall be without blemish:46:7 and he shall prepare a meal offering, an ephah for the bullock, and an ephah for the ram, and for the lambs according as he is able, and a hin of oil to an ephah.46:8 And when the prince shall enter, he shall go in by the way of the porch of the gate, and he shall go forth by the way thereof.46:9 But when the people of the land shall come before Yahweh in the appointed feasts, he thatenters by the way of the north gate to worship shall go forth by the way of the south gate; and he thatenters by the way of the south gate shall go forth by the way of the north gate: he shall not return by the way of the gate whereby he came in, but shall go forth straight before him.46:10 And the prince, when they go in, shall go in in the midst of them; and when they go forth, they shall go forth together.46:11 And in the feasts and in the solemnities the meal offering shall be an ephah for a bullock, and an ephah for a ram, and for the lambs as he is able to give, and a hin of oil to an ephah.46:12 And when the prince shall prepare a freewill-offering, a burnt offering or peace offerings as a freewill-offering to Yahweh, one shall open for him the gate that looks toward the east; and he shall prepare his burnt offering and his peace offerings, as he does on the sabbath day: then he shall go forth; and after his going forth one shall shut the gate.46:13 And you shall prepare a lamb a year old without blemish for a burnt offering to Yahweh daily: morning by morning shall you prepare it.46:14 And you shall prepare a meal offering with it morning by morning, the sixth part of an ephah, and the third part of a hin of oil, to moisten the fine flour; a meal offering to Yahweh continually by a perpetual ordinance.46:15 Thus shall they prepare the lamb, and the meal offering, and the oil, morning by morning, for a continual burnt offering.46:16 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: If the prince give a gift to any of his sons, it is his inheritance, it shall belong to his sons; it is their possession by inheritance.46:17 But if he give of his inheritance a gift to one of his servants, it shall be his to the year of liberty; then it shall return to the prince; but as for his inheritance, it shall be for his sons.46:18 Moreover the prince shall not take of the people's inheritance, to thrust them out of their possession; he shall give inheritance to his sons out of his own possession, that my people be not scattered every man from his possession.46:19 Then he brought me through the entry, which was at the side of the gate, into the holy chambers for the priests, which looked toward the north: and, behold, there was a place on the hinder part westward.46:20 And he said to me, This is the place where the priests shall boil the trespass offering and the sin offering, and where they shall bake the meal offering; that they bring them not forth into the outer court, to sanctify the people.46:21 Then he brought me forth into the outer court, and caused me to pass by the four corners of the court; and, behold, in every corner of the court there was a court.46:22 In the four corners of the court there were courts inclosed, forty cubits long and thirty broad: these four in the corners were of one measure.46:23 And there was a wall round about in them, round about the four, and boiling-places were made under the walls round about.46:24 Then said he to me, These are the boiling-houses, where the ministers of the house shall boil the sacrifice of the people.47:1 And he brought me back to the door of the house; and, behold, waters issued out from under the threshold of the house eastward; (for the forefront of the house was toward the east;) and the waters came down from under, from the right side of the house, on the south of the altar.47:2 Then he brought me out by the way of the gate northward, and led me round by the way without to the outer gate, by the way of the gate that looks toward the east; and, behold, there ran out waters on the right side.47:3 When the man went forth eastward with the line in his hand, he measured a thousand cubits, and he caused me to pass through the waters, waters that were to the ankles.47:4 Again he measured a thousand, and caused me to pass through the waters, waters that were to the knees.  Again he measured a thousand, and caused me to pass through the waters, waters that were to the loins.47:5 Afterward he measured a thousand; and it was a river that I could not pass through; for the waters were risen, waters to swim in, a river that could not be passed through.47:6 And he said to me, Son of man, have you seen this?  Then he brought me, and caused me to return to the bank of the river.47:7 Now when I had returned, behold, upon the bank of the river were very many trees on the one side and on the other.47:8 Then said he to me, These waters issue forth toward the eastern region, and shall go down into the Arabah; and they shall go toward the sea; into the sea shall the waters go which were made to issue forth; and the waters shall be healed.47:9 And it shall come to pass, that every living creature which swarms, in every place whither the rivers come, shall live; and there shall be a very great multitude of fish; for these waters are come there, and the waters of the sea shall be healed, and everything shall live wherever the river comes.47:10 And it shall come to pass, that fishers shall stand by it: from En-gedi even to En-eglaim shall be a place for the spreading of nets; their fish shall be after their kinds, as the fish of the great sea, exceedingly many.47:11 But the miry places thereof, and the marshes thereof, shall not be healed; they shall be given up to salt.47:12 And by the river upon the bank thereof, on this side and on that side, shall grow every tree for food, whose leaf shall not whither, neither shall the fruit thereof fail: it shall bring forth new fruit every month, because the waters thereof issue out of the sanctuary; and the fruit thereof shall be for food, and the leaf thereof for healing.47:13 Thus says the Lord Yahweh: This shall be the border, whereby ye shall divide the land for inheritance according to the twelve tribes of Israel: Joseph shall have two portions.47:14 And ye shall inherit it, one as well as another; for I swore to give it to your fathers: and this land shall fall to you for inheritance.47:15 And this shall be the border of the land: On the north side, from the great sea, by the way of Hethlon, to the entrance of Zedad;47:16 Hamath, Berothah, Sibraim, which is between the border of Damascus and the border of Hamath; Hazer-hatticon, which is by the border of Hauran.47:17 And the border from the sea, shall be Hazar-enon at the border of Damascus; and on the north northward is the border of Hamath.  This is the north side.47:18 And the east side, between Hauran and Damascus and Gilead, and the land of Israel, shall be the Jordan; from the north border to the east sea shall ye measure.  This is the east side.47:19 And the south side southward shall be from Tamar as far as the waters of Meriboth-kadesh, to the brook of Egypt, to the great sea.  This is the south side southward.47:20 And the west side shall be the great sea, from the south border as far as over against the entrance of Hamath.  This is the west side.47:21 So shall ye divide this land to you according to the tribes of Israel.47:22 And it shall come to pass, that ye shall divide it by lot for an inheritance to you and to the strangers that sojourn among you, who shall beget children among you; and they shall be to you as the home-born among the children of Israel; they shall have inheritance with you among the tribes of Israel.47:23 And it shall come to pass, that in what tribe the stranger sojourns, there shall ye give him his inheritance, says the Lord Yahweh.48:1 Now these are the names of the tribes: From the north end, beside the way of Hethlon to the entrance of Hamath, Hazar-enan at the border of Damascus, northward beside Hamath, (and they shall have their sides east and west,) Dan, one portion.48:2 And by the border of Dan, from the east side to the west side, asher, one portion.48:3 And by the border of Asher, from the east side even to the west side, Naphtali, one portion.48:4 And by the border of Naphtali, from the east side to the west side, Manasseh, one portion.48:5 And by the border of Manasseh, from the east side to the west side, Ephraim, one portion.48:6 And by the border of Ephraim, from the east side even to the west side, Reuben, one portion.48:7 And by the border of Reuben, from the east side to the west side, Judah, one portion.48:8 And by the border of Judah, from the east side to the west side, shall be the oblation which ye shall offer, five and twenty thousand reeds in breadth, and in length as one of the portions, from the east side to the west side: and the sanctuary shall be in the midst of it.48:9 The oblation that ye shall offer to Yahweh shall be five and twenty thousand reeds in length, and ten thousand in breadth.48:10 And for these, even for the priests, shall be the holy oblation: toward the north five and twenty thousand in length, and toward the west ten thousand in breadth, and toward the east ten thousand in breadth, and toward the south five and twenty thousand in length: and the sanctuary of Yahweh shall be in the midst thereof.48:11 It shall be for the priests that are sanctified of the sons of Zadok, that have kept my charge, that went not astray when the children of Israel went astray, as the Levites went astray.48:12 And it shall be to them an oblation from the oblation of the land, a thing most holy, by the border of the Levites.48:13 And answerable to the border of the priests, the Levites shall have five and twenty thousand in length, and ten thousand in breadth: all the length shall be five and twenty thousand, and the breadth ten thousand.48:14 And they shall sell none of it, nor exchange it, nor shall the first-fruits of the land be alienated; for it is holy to Yahweh.48:15 And the five thousand that are left in the breadth, in front of the five and twenty thousand, shall be for common use, for the city, for dwelling and for suburbs; and the city shall be in the midst thereof.48:16 And these shall be the measures thereof: the north side four thousand and five hundred, and the south side four thousand and five hundred, and on the east side four thousand and five hundred, and the west side four thousand and five hundred.48:17 And the city shall have suburbs: toward the north two hundred and fifty, and toward the south two hundred and fifty, and toward the east two hundred and fifty, and toward the west two hundred and fifty.48:18 And the residue in the length, answerable to the holy oblation, shall be ten thousand eastward, and ten thousand westward; and it shall be answerable to the holy oblation; and the increase thereof shall be for food to them that labor in the city.48:19 And they that labor in the city, out of all the tribes of Israel, shall till it.48:20 All the oblation shall be five and twenty thousand by five and twenty thousand: ye shall offer the holy oblation four-square, with the possession of the city.48:21 And the residue shall be for the prince, on the one side and on the other of the holy oblation and of the possession of the city; in front of the five and twenty thousand of the oblation toward the east border, and westward in front of the five and twenty thousand toward the west border, answerable to the portions, it shall be for the prince: and the holy oblation and the sanctuary of the house shall be in the midst thereof.48:22 Moreover from the possession of the Levites, and from the possession of the city, being in the midst of that which is the prince's, between the border of Judah and the border of Benjamin, it shall be for the prince.48:23 And as for the rest of the tribes: from the east side to the west side, Benjamin, one portion.48:24 And by the border of Benjamin, from the east side to the west side, Simeon, one portion.48:25 And by the border of Simeon, from the east side to the west side, Issachar, one portion.48:26 And by the border of Issachar, from the east side to the west side, Zebulun, one portion.48:27 And by the border of Zebulun, from the east side to the west side, Gad, one portion.48:28 And by the border of Gad, at the south side southward, the border shall be even from Tamar to the waters of Meribath-kadesh, to the brook of Egypt, to the great sea.48:29 This is the land which ye shall divide by lot to the tribes of Israel for inheritance, and these are their several portions, says the Lord Yahweh.48:30 And these are the egresses of the city: On the north side four thousand and five hundred reeds by measure;48:31 and the gates of the city shall be after the names of the tribes of Israel, three gates northward: the gate of Reuben, one; the gate of Judah, one; the gate of Levi, one.48:32 And at the east side four thousand and five hundred reeds, and three gates: even the gate of Joseph, one; the gate of Benjamin, one; the gate of Dan, one.48:33 And at the south side four thousand and five hundred reeds by measure, and three gates: the gate of Simeon, one; the gate of Issachar, one; the gate of Zebulun, one.48:34 At the west side four thousand and five hundred reeds, with their three gates: the gate of Gad, one; the gate of Asher, one; the gate of Naphtali, one.48:35 It shall be eighteen thousand reeds round about: and the name of the city from that day shall be, Yahweh is there.End of EzekielDaniel1:1 In the third year of the reign of Jehoiakim king of Judah came Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon to Jerusalem, and besieged it.1:2 And the Lord gave Jehoiakim king of Judah into his hand, along with part of the vessels of the house of God; and he carried them into the land of Shinar to the house of his god: and he brought the vessels into the treasure-house of his god.1:3 And the king spoke to Ashpenaz the master of his eunuchs, that he should bring in certain of the children of Israel, specifically of the royal seed and of the nobles;1:4 youths in whom was no blemish, but well-favored, and skilful in all wisdom, and endued with knowledge, and understanding science, and such as had ability to stand in the king's palace; and that he should teach them the learning and the language of the Chaldeans.1:5 And the king appointed for them a daily portion of the king's dainties, and of the wine which he drank, and that they should be nourished three years; that at the end of them they should stand before the king.1:6 Now among these were, of the children of Judah, Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah.1:7 And the prince of the eunuchs gave names to them: to Daniel he gave the name of Belteshazzar; and to Hananiah, the name Shadrach; and to Mishael, the name Meshach; and to Azariah, the name Abed-nego.1:8 But Daniel purposed in his heart that he would not defile himself with the king's dainties, nor with the wine which he drank: therefore he requested of the prince of the eunuchs that he might not defile himself.1:9 Now God caused Daniel to find kindness and compassion in the sight of the prince of the eunuchs.1:10 And the prince of the eunuchs said to Daniel, I fear my lord the king, who has appointed your food and your drink: for why should he see your faces worse looking than the youths that are of your own age?  so would ye endanger my head with the king.1:11 Then said Daniel to the steward whom the prince of the eunuchs had appointed over Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah:1:12 Prove your servants, I beseech you, ten days; and let them give us vegetables to eat, and water to drink.1:13 Then let our countenances be looked upon before you, and the countenance of the youths that eat of the king's dainties; and as you see, deal with your servants.1:14 So he listened to them in this matter, and proved them ten days.1:15 And at the end of ten days their countenances appeared fairer, and they were fatter in flesh, than all the youths that did eat of the king's dainties.1:16 So the steward took away their dainties, and the wine that they should drink, and gave them vegetables.1:17 Now as for these four youths, God gave them knowledge and skill in all learning and wisdom: and Daniel had understanding in all visions and dreams.1:18 And at the end of the days which the king had appointed for bringing them in, the prince of the eunuchs brought them in before Nebuchadnezzar.1:19 And the king communed with them; and among them all was found none like Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah: therefore stood they before the king.1:20 And in every matter of wisdom and understanding, concerning which the king inquired of them, he found them ten times better than all the magicians and enchanters that were in all his realm.1:21 And Daniel continued even to the first year of king Cyrus.2:1 And in the second year of the reign of Nebuchadnezzar, Nebuchadnezzar dreamed dreams; and his spirit was troubled, and his sleep went from him.2:2 Then the king commanded to call the magicians, and the enchanters, and the sorcerers, and the Chaldeans, to tell the king his dreams.  So they came in and stood before the king.2:3 And the king said to them, I have dreamed a dream, and my spirit is troubled to know the dream.2:4 Then spoke the Chaldeans to the king in the Syrian language, O king, live for ever: tell your servants the dream, and we will show the interpretation.2:5 The king answered and said to the Chaldeans, The thing is gone from me: if ye do not make known to me the dream and the interpretation of it, ye shall be cut in pieces, and your houses shall be made a dunghill.2:6 But if ye show the dream and the interpretation of it, ye shall receive from me gifts and rewards and great honor.  Therefore show me the dream and the interpretation of it.2:7 They answered the second time and said, Let the king tell his servants the dream, and we will show the interpretation.2:8 The king answered and said, I know of a certainty that ye are trying to gain time, because ye see the thing is gone from me.2:9 But if ye do not make known to me the dream, there is but one law for you; for ye have prepared lying and corrupt words to speak before me, till the time be changed: therefore tell me the dream; then I shall know that ye can show me the interpretation of it.2:10 The Chaldeans answered before the king, and said, There is not a man upon the earth that can show the king's matter, forasmuch as no king, lord, or ruler, has asked such a thing of any magician, or enchanter, or Chaldean.2:11 And it is a rare thing that the king is requiring, and there is no other that can show it before the king, except the gods, whose dwelling is not with flesh.2:12 Because of this the king was angry and very furious, and gave orders to destroy all the wise men of Babylon.2:13 So the decree went forth, and the wise men were to be slain; and they searched for Daniel and his companions, to be slain.2:14 Then Daniel returned answer with counsel and prudence to Arioch the captain of the king's guard, who was gone forth to slay the wise men of Babylon;2:15 he answered and said to Arioch the king's captain, Why is the decree so urgent from the king?  Then Arioch made the matter known to Daniel.2:16 And Daniel went in, and desired of the king that he would appoint him a time; then he would show the king the interpretation.2:17 Then Daniel went to his house, and made the thing known to Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah his companions:2:18 that they would desire mercies of the God of heaven concerning this secret; that Daniel and his companions should not perish with the rest of the wise men of Babylon.2:19 Then was the secret revealed to Daniel in a vision of the night.  Then Daniel blessed the God of heaven.2:20 Daniel answered and said, Blessed be the name of God for ever and ever; for wisdom and might are his.2:21 And he changes the times and the seasons; he removes kings, and sets up kings; he gives wisdom to the wise, and knowledge to them that have understanding;2:22 he reveals the deep and secret things; he knows what is in the darkness, and the light dwells with him.2:23 I thank you, and praise you, O you God of my fathers, who have given me wisdom and might, and have now made known to me what we desired of you; for you have made known to us the king's matter.2:24 Therefore Daniel went in to Arioch, whom the king had appointed to destroy the wise men of Babylon; he went and said thus to him: Destroy not the wise men of Babylon; bring me in before the king, and I will show to the king the interpretation.2:25 Then Arioch brought Daniel in before the king with haste, and said thus to him, I have found a man of the children of the captivity of Judah, that will make known to the king the interpretation.2:26 The king answered and said to Daniel, whose name was Belteshazzar, are you able to make known to me the dream which I have seen, and also the interpretation of it?2:27 Daniel answered before the king, and said, The secret which the king has demanded, no wise men, enchanters, magicians, nor soothsayers, can show to the king;2:28 but there is a God in heaven that reveals secrets, and he has made known to the king Nebuchadnezzar what shall be in the latter days.  Your dream, and the visions of your head upon your bed, are these:2:29 as for you, O king, your thoughts came into your mind upon your bed, what should come to pass hereafter; and he that reveals secrets has made known to you what shall come to pass.2:30 But as for me, this secret is not revealed to me for any wisdom that I have more than any living, but to the intent that the interpretation may be made known to the king, and that you may know the thoughts of your heart.2:31 You, O king, saw, and, behold, a great image.  This image, which was mighty, and whose brightness was excellent, stood before you; and the aspect thereof was terrible.2:32 As for this image, its head was of fine gold, its breast and its arms of silver, its belly and its thighs of brass,2:33 its legs of iron, its feet part of iron, and part of clay.2:34 You saw till that a stone was cut out without hands, which smote the image upon its feet that were of iron and clay, and broke them in pieces.2:35 Then was the iron, the clay, the brass, the silver, and the gold, broken in pieces together, and became like the chaff of the summer threshing-floors; and the wind carried them away, so that no place was found for them: and the stone that smote the image became a great mountain, and filled the whole earth.2:36 This is the dream; and we will tell the interpretation thereof before the king.2:37 You, O king, are king of kings, to whom the God of heaven has given the kingdom, the power, and the strength, and the glory;2:38 and wheresoever the children of men dwell, the beasts of the field and the birds of the heavens has he given into your hand, and has made you to rule over them all: you are the head of gold.2:39 And after you shall arise another kingdom inferior to you; and another third kingdom of brass, which shall bear rule over all the earth.2:40 And the fourth kingdom shall be strong as iron, forasmuch as iron breaks in pieces and subdues all things; and as iron that crushes all these, shall it break in pieces and crush.2:41 And whereas you saw the feet and toes, part of potters' clay, and part of iron, it shall be a divided kingdom; but there shall be in it of the strength of the iron, forasmuch as you saw the iron mixed with miry clay.2:42 And as the toes of the feet were part of iron, and part of clay, so the kingdom shall be partly strong, and partly broken.2:43 And whereas you saw the iron mixed with miry clay, they shall mingle themselves with the seed of men; but they shall not cleave one to another, even as iron does not mingle with clay.2:44 And in the days of those kings shall the God of heaven set up a kingdom which shall never be destroyed, nor shall the sovereignty thereof be left to another people; but it shall break in pieces and consume all these kingdoms, and it shall stand for ever.2:45 Forasmuch as you saw that a stone was cut out of the mountain without hands, and that it broke in pieces the iron, the brass, the clay, the silver, and the gold; the great God has made known to the king what shall come to pass hereafter: and the dream is certain, and the interpretation thereof sure.2:46 Then the king Nebuchadnezzar fell upon his face, and worshipped Daniel, and commanded that they should offer an oblation and sweet odors to him.2:47 The king answered to Daniel, and said, Of a truth your God is the God of gods, and the Lord of kings, and a revealer of secrets, seeing you have been able to reveal this secret.2:48 Then the king made Daniel great, and gave him many great gifts, and made him to rule over the whole province of Babylon, and to be chief governor over all the wise men of Babylon.2:49 And Daniel requested of the king, and he appointed Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego, over the affairs of the province of Babylon: but Daniel was in the gate of the king.3:1 Nebuchadnezzar the king made an image of gold, whose height was sixty cubits, and the breadth thereof six cubits: he set it up in the plain of Dura, in the province of Babylon.3:2 Then Nebuchadnezzar the king sent to gather together the satraps, the deputies, and the governors, the judges, the treasurers, the counsellors, the sheriffs, and all the rulers of the provinces, to come to the dedication of the image which Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up.3:3 Then the satraps, the deputies, and the governors, the judges, the treasurers, the counsellors, the sheriffs, and all the rulers of the provinces, were gathered together to the dedication of the image that Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up; and they stood before the image that Nebuchadnezzar had set up.3:4 Then the herald cried aloud, To you it is commanded, O peoples, nations, and languages,3:5 that at what time ye hear the sound of the horn, flute, zither, lyre, harp, bagpipes, and all kinds of music, ye fall down and worship the golden image that Nebuchadnezzar the king has set up;3:6 and whoever does not fall down and worship shall the same hour be cast into the midst of a burning fiery furnace.3:7 Therefore at that time, when all the peoples heard the sound of the horn, flute, zither, lyre, harp, and all kinds of music, all the peoples, the nations, and the languages, fell down and worshipped the golden image that Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up.3:8 Wherefore at that time certain Chaldeans came near, and brought accusation against the Jews.3:9 They answered and said to Nebuchadnezzar the king, O king, live for ever.3:10 You, O king, have made a decree, that every man that shall hear the sound of the horn, flute, zither, lyre, harp, and bagpipes, and all kinds of music, shall fall down and worship the golden image;3:11 and whoever does not fall down and worship, shall be cast into the midst of a burning fiery furnace.3:12 There are certain Jews whom you have appointed over the affairs of the province of Babylon: Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego; these men, O king, have not regarded you: they serve not your gods, nor worship the golden image which you have set up.3:13 Then Nebuchadnezzar in his rage and fury commanded to bring Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego.  Then they brought these men before the king.3:14 Nebuchadnezzar answered and said to them, Is it of purpose, O Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego, that ye serve not my god, nor worship the golden image which I have set up?3:15 Now if ye are ready so that at what time ye hear the sound of the horn, flute, zither, lyreharp, and bagpipes, and all kinds of music, ye fall down and worship the image which I have made, great: but if ye do not worship, ye shall be cast the same hour into the midst of a burning fiery furnace; and who is that god that shall deliver you out of my hands?3:16 Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego answered and said to the king, O Nebuchadnezzar, we have no need to answer you in this matter.3:17 If it be so, our God whom we serve is able to deliver us from the burning fiery furnace; and he will deliver us out of your hand, O king.3:18 But if not, be it known to you, O king, that we will not serve your gods, nor worship the golden image which you have set up.3:19 Then was Nebuchadnezzar full of fury, and the form of his visage was changed against Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego: therefore he spoke, and commanded that they should heat the furnace seven times more than it was wont to be heated.3:20 And he commanded certain mighty men that were in his army to bind Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego, and to cast them into the burning fiery furnace.3:21 Then these men were bound in their hosen, their tunics, and their mantles, and their other garments, and were cast into the midst of the burning fiery furnace.3:22 Therefore because the king's commandment was urgent, and the furnace exceedingly hot, the flame of the fire slew those men that took up Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego.3:23 And these three men, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego, fell down bound into the midst of the burning fiery furnace.3:24 Then Nebuchadnezzar the king was astonished, and rose up in haste: he spoke and said to his counsellors, Did not we cast three men bound into the midst of the fire?  They answered and said to the king, True, O king.3:25 He answered and said, Lo, I see four men loose, walking in the midst of the fire, and they have no hurt; and the aspect of the fourth is like a son of the gods.3:26 Then Nebuchadnezzar came near to the mouth of the burning fiery furnace: he spoke and said, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego, ye servants of the Most High God, come forth, and come here.  Then Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego came forth out of the midst of the fire.3:27 And the satraps, the deputies, and the governors, and the king's counsellors, being gathered together, saw these men, that the fire had no power upon their bodies, nor was the hair of their head singed, neither were their hosen changed, nor had the smell of fire passed on them.3:28 Nebuchadnezzar spoke and said, Blessed be the God of Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego, who has sent his angel, and delivered his servants that trusted in him, and have changed the king's word, and have yielded their bodies, that they might not serve nor worship any god, except their own God.3:29 Therefore I make a decree, that every people, nation, and language, which speak anything amiss against the God of Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego, shall be cut in pieces, and their houses shall be made a dunghill; because there is no other god that is able to deliver after this sort.3:30 Then the king promoted Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego in the province of Babylon.4:1 Nebuchadnezzar the king, to all the peoples, nations, and languages, that dwell in all the earth: Peace be multiplied to you.4:2 It has seemed good to me to show the signs and wonders that the Most High God has wrought toward me.4:3 How great are his signs! and how mighty are his wonders! his kingdom is an everlasting kingdom, and his dominion is from generation to generation.4:4 I, Nebuchadnezzar, was at rest in my house, and flourishing in my palace.4:5 I saw a dream which made me afraid; and the thoughts upon my bed and the visions of my head troubled me.4:6 Therefore made I a decree to bring in all the wise men of Babylon before me, that they might make known to me the interpretation of the dream.4:7 Then came in the magicians, the enchanters, the Chaldeans, and the soothsayers; and I told the dream before them; but they did not make known to me the interpretation thereof.4:8 But at the last Daniel came in before me, whose name was Belteshazzar, according to the name of my god, and in whom is the spirit of the holy gods: and I told the dream before him, saying,4:9 O Belteshazzar, master of the magicians, because I know that the spirit of the holy gods is in you, and no secret troubles you, tell me the visions of my dream that I have seen, and the interpretation thereof.4:10 Thus were the visions of my head upon my bed: I saw, and, behold, a tree in the midst of the earth; and the height thereof was great.4:11 The tree grew, and was strong, and the height thereof reached to heaven, and the sight thereof to the end of all the earth.4:12 The leaves thereof were fair, and the fruit thereof much, and in it was food for all: the beasts of the field had shadow under it, and the birds of the heavens dwelt in the branches thereof, and all flesh was fed from it.4:13 I saw in the visions of my head upon my bed, and, behold, a watcher and a holy one came down from heaven.4:14 He cried aloud, and said thus, Hew down the tree, and cut off its branches, shake off its leaves, and scatter its fruit: let the beasts get away from under it, and the fowls from its branches.4:15 Nevertheless leave the stump of its roots in the earth, even with a band of iron and brass, in the tender grass of the field; and let it be wet with the dew of heaven: and let his portion be with the beasts in the grass of the earth:4:16 let his heart be changed from man's, and let a beast's heart be given to him; and let seven times pass over him.4:17 The sentence is by the decree of the watchers, and the demand by the word of the holy ones; to the intent that the living may know that the Most High rules in the kingdom of men, and gives it to whomsoever he will, and sets up over it the lowest of men.4:18 This dream I, king Nebuchadnezzar, have seen; and you, O Belteshazzar, declare the interpretation, forasmuch as all the wise men of my kingdom are not able to make known to me the interpretation; but you are able; for the spirit of the holy gods is in you.4:19 Then Daniel, whose name was Belteshazzar, was stricken dumb for a while, and his thoughts troubled him.  The king answered and said, Belteshazzar, let not the dream, or the interpretation, trouble you.  Belteshazzar answered and said, My lord, the dream be to them that hate you, and the interpretation thereof to your adversaries.4:20 The tree that you saw, which grew, and was strong, whose height reached to heaven, and the sight thereof to all the earth;4:21 whose leaves were fair, and the fruit thereof much, and in it was food for all; under which the beasts of the field dwelt, and upon whose branches the birds of the heavens had their habitation:4:22 it is you, O king, that are grown and become strong; for your greatness is grown, and reaches to heaven, and your dominion to the end of the earth.4:23 And whereas the king saw a watcher and a holy one coming down from heaven, and saying, Hew down the tree, and destroy it; nevertheless leave the stump of the roots thereof in the earth, even with a band of iron and brass, in the tender grass of the field, and let it be wet with the dew of heaven: and let his portion be with the beasts of the field, till seven times pass over him;4:24 this is the interpretation, O king, and it is the decree of the Most High, which is come upon my lord the king:4:25 that you shall be driven from men, and your dwelling shall be with the beasts of the field, and you shall be made to eat grass as oxen, and shall be wet with the dew of heaven, and seven times shall pass over you; till you know that the Most High rules in the kingdom of men, and gives it to whomsoever he will.4:26 And whereas they commanded to leave the stump of the roots of the tree; your kingdom shall be sure to you, after that you shall have known that the heavens do rule.4:27 Wherefore, O king, let my counsel be acceptable to you, and break off your sins by righteousness, and your iniquities by showing mercy to the poor; if there may be a lengthening of your tranquillity.4:28 All this came upon the king Nebuchadnezzar.4:29 At the end of twelve months he was walking in the royal palace of Babylon.4:30 The king spoke and said, Is not this great Babylon, which I have built for the royal dwelling-place, by the might of my power and for the glory of my majesty?4:31 While the word was in the king's mouth, there fell a voice from heaven, saying, O king Nebuchadnezzar, to you it is spoken: The kingdom is departed from you:4:32 and you shall be driven from men; and they dwelling shall be with the beasts of the field; you shall be made to eat grass as oxen; and seven times shall pass over you; until you know that the Most High rules in the kingdom of men, and gives it to whomsoever he will.4:33 The same hour was the thing fulfilled upon Nebuchadnezzar: and he was driven from men, and did eat grass as oxen, and his body was wet with the dew of heaven, till his hair was grown like eagles' feathers, and his nails like birds' claws.4:34 And at the end of the days I, Nebuchadnezzar, lifted up my eyes to heaven, and my understanding returned to me, and I blessed the Most High, and I praised and honored him that lives for ever; for his dominion is an everlasting dominion, and his kingdom from generation to generation.4:35 And all the inhabitants of the earth are reputed as nothing; and he does according to his will in the army of heaven, and among the inhabitants of the earth; and none can stay his hand, or say to him, What do you?4:36 At the same time my understanding returned to me; and for the glory of my kingdom, my majesty and brightness returned to me; and my counsellors and my lords sought to me; and I was established in my kingdom, and excellent greatness was added to me.4:37 Now I, Nebuchadnezzar, praise and extol and honor the King of heaven; for all his works are truth, and his ways justice; and those that walk in pride he is able to abase.5:1 Belshazzar the king made a great feast to a thousand of his lords, and drank wine before the thousand.5:2 Belshazzar, while he tasted the wine, commanded to bring the golden and silver vessels which Nebuchadnezzar his father had taken out of the temple which was in Jerusalem; that the king and his lords, his wives and his concubines, might drink therefrom.5:3 Then they brought the golden vessels that were taken out of the temple of the house of God which was at Jerusalem; and the king and his lords, his wives and his concubines, drank from them.5:4 They drank wine, and praised the gods of gold, and of silver, of brass, of iron, of wood, and of stone.5:5 In the same hour came forth the fingers of a man's hand, and wrote over against the candlestick upon the plaster of the wall of the king's palace: and the king saw the part of the hand that wrote.5:6 Then the king's countenance was changed in him, and his thoughts troubled him; and the joints of his loins were loosed, and his knees knocked one against another.5:7 The king cried aloud to bring in the enchanters, the Chaldeans, and the soothsayers.  The king spoke and said to the wise men of Babylon, Whosoever shall read this writing, and show me the interpretation thereof, shall be clothed with purple, and have a chain of gold about his neck, and shall be the third ruler in the kingdom.5:8 Then came in all the king's wise men; but they could not read the writing, nor make known to the king the interpretation.5:9 Then was king Belshazzar greatly troubled, and his countenance was changed in him, and his lords were perplexed.5:10 Now the queen by reason of the words of the king and his lords came into the banquet house: the queen spoke and said, O king, live forever; let not your thoughts trouble you, nor let your countenance be changed.5:11 There is a man in your kingdom, in whom is the spirit of the holy gods; and in the days of your father light and understanding and wisdom, like the wisdom of the gods, were found in him; and the king Nebuchadnezzar your father, the king, I say, your father, made him master of the magicians, enchanters, Chaldeans, and soothsayers;5:12 forasmuch as an excellent spirit, and knowledge, and understanding, interpreting of dreams, and showing of dark sentences, and dissolving of doubts, were found in the same Daniel, whom the king named Belteshazzar.  Now let Daniel be called, and he will show the interpretation.5:13 Then was Daniel brought in before the king.  The king spoke and said to Daniel, are you that Daniel, who are of the children of the captivity of Judah, whom the king my father brought out of Judah?5:14 I have heard of you, that the spirit of the gods is in you, and that light and understanding and excellent wisdom are found in you.5:15 And now the wise men, the enchanters, have been brought in before me, that they should read this writing, and make known to me the interpretation thereof; but they could not show the interpretation of the thing.5:16 But I have heard of you, that you can give interpretations, and dissolve doubts; now if you can read the writing, and make known to me the interpretation thereof, you shall be clothed with purple, and have a chain of gold about your neck, and shall be the third ruler in the kingdom.5:17 Then Daniel answered and said before the king, Let your gifts be to yourself, and give your rewards to another; nevertheless I will read the writing to the king, and make known to him the interpretation.5:18 O you king, the Most High God gave Nebuchadnezzar your father the kingdom, and greatness, and glory, and majesty:5:19 and because of the greatness that he gave him, all the peoples, nations, and languages trembled and feared before him: whom he would he slew, and whom he would he kept alive; and whom he would he raised up, and whom he would he put down.5:20 But when his heart was lifted up, and his spirit was hardened so that he dealt proudly, he was deposed from his kingly throne, and they took his glory from him:5:21 and he was driven from the sons of men, and his heart was made like the beasts', and his dwelling was with the wild asses; he was fed with grass like oxen, and his body was wet with the dew of heaven; until he knew that the Most High God rules in the kingdom of men, and that he sets up over it whomsoever he will.5:22 And you his son, O Belshazzar, have not humbled your heart, though you knew all this,5:23 but have lifted up yourself against the Lord of heaven; and they have brought the vessels of his house before you, and you and your lords, your wives and your concubines, have drunk wine from them; and you have praised the gods of silver and gold, of brass, iron, wood, and stone, which see not, nor hear, nor know; and the God in whose hand your breath is, and whose are all your ways, have you not glorified.5:24 Then was the part of the hand sent from before him, and this writing was inscribed.5:25 And this is the writing that was inscribed: MENE, MENE, TEKEL, UPHARSIN.5:26 This is the interpretation of the thing: MENE; God has numbered your kingdom, and brought it to an end;5:27 TEKEL; you are weighed in the balances, and are found wanting.5:28 PERES; your kingdom is divided, and given to the Medes and Persians.5:29 Then commanded Belshazzar, and they clothed Daniel with purple, and put a chain of gold about his neck, and made proclamation concerning him, that he should be the third ruler in the kingdom.5:30 In that night Belshazzar the Chaldean King was slain.5:31 And Darius the Mede received the kingdom, being about sixty-two years old.6:1 It pleased Darius to set over the kingdom a hundred and twenty satraps, who should be throughout the whole kingdom;6:2 and over them three presidents, of whom Daniel was one; that these satraps might give account to them, and that the king should have no damage.6:3 Then this Daniel was distinguished above the presidents and the satraps, because an excellent spirit was in him; and the king thought to set him over the whole realm.6:4 Then the presidents and the satraps sought to find occasion against Daniel as touching the kingdom; but they could find no occasion nor fault, forasmuch as he was faithful, neither was there any error or fault found in him.6:5 Then said these men, We shall not find any occasion against this Daniel, except we find it against him concerning the law of his God.6:6 Then these presidents and satraps assembled together to the king, and said thus to him, King Darius, live for ever.6:7 All the presidents of the kingdom, the deputies and the satraps, the counsellors and the governors, have consulted together to establish a royal statute, and to make a strong interdict, that whosoever shall ask a petition of any god or man for thirty days, save of you, O king, he shall be cast into the den of lions.6:8 Now, O king, establish the interdict, and sign the writing, that it be not changed, according to the law of the Medes and Persians, which alters not.6:9 Wherefore king Darius signed the writing and the interdict.6:10 And when Daniel knew that the writing was signed, he went into his house (now his windows were open in his chamber toward Jerusalem) and he kneeled upon his knees three times a day, and prayed, and gave thanks before his God, as he did aforetime.6:11 Then these men assembled together, and found Daniel making petition and supplication before his God.6:12 Then they came near, and spoke before the king concerning the king's interdict: Have you not signed an interdict, that every man that shall make petition to any god or man within thirty days, save to you, O king, shall be cast into the den of lions?  The king answered and said, The thing is true, according to the law of the Medes and Persians, which alters not.6:13 Then answered they and said before the king, That Daniel, who is of the children of the captivity of Judah, regards not you, O king, nor the interdict that you have signed, but makes his petition three times a day.6:14 Then the king, when he heard these words, was sore displeased, and set his heart on Daniel to deliver him; and he labored till the going down of the sun to rescue him.6:15 Then these men assembled together to the king, and said to the king, Know, O king, that it is a law of the Medes and Persians, that no interdict nor statute which the king establishes may be changed.6:16 Then the king commanded, and they brought Daniel, and cast him into the den of lions.  Now the king spoke and said to Daniel, Your God whom you serve continually, he will deliver you.6:17 And a stone was brought, and laid upon the mouth of the den; and the king sealed it with his own signet, and with the signet of his lords; that nothing might be changed concerning Daniel.6:18 Then the king went to his palace, and passed the night fasting; neither were instruments of music brought before him: and his sleep fled from him.6:19 Then the king arose very early in the morning, and went in haste to the den of lions.6:20 And when he came near to the den to Daniel, he cried with a lamentable voice; the king spoke and said to Daniel, O Daniel, servant of the living God, is your God, whom you serve continually, able to deliver you from the lions?6:21 Then said Daniel to the king, O king, live for ever.6:22 My God has sent his angel, and has shut the lions' mouths, and they have not hurt me; forasmuch as before him innocency was found in me; and also before you, O king, have I done no hurt.6:23 Then was the king exceedingly glad, and commanded that they should take Daniel up out of the den.  So Daniel was taken up out of the den, and no manner of hurt was found upon him, because he had trusted in his God.6:24 And the king commanded, and they brought those men that had accused Daniel, and they cast them into the den of lions, them, their children, and their wives; and the lions had the mastery of them, and broke all their bones in pieces, before they came to the bottom of the den.6:25 Then king Darius wrote to all the peoples, nations, and languages, that dwell in all the earth: Peace be multiplied to you.6:26 I make a decree, that in all the dominion of my kingdom men tremble and fear before the God of Daniel; for he is the living God, and stedfast for ever, and his kingdom that which shall not be destroyed; and his dominion shall be even to the end.6:27 He delivers and rescues, and he works signs and wonders in heaven and in earth, who has delivered Daniel from the power of the lions.6:28 So this Daniel prospered in the reign of Darius, and in the reign of Cyrus the Persian.7:1 In the first year of Belshazzar king of Babylon Daniel had a dream and visions of his head upon his bed: then he wrote the dream and told the sum of the matters.7:2 Daniel spoke and said, I saw in my vision by night, and, behold, the four winds of heaven broke forth upon the great sea.7:3 And four great beasts came up from the sea, diverse one from another.7:4 The first was like a lion, and had eagle's wings: I beheld till the wings thereof were plucked, and it was lifted up from the earth, and made to stand upon two feet as a man; and a man's heart was given to it.7:5 And, behold, another beast, a second, like to a bear; and it was raised up on one side, and three ribs were in its mouth between its teeth: and they said thus to it, arise, devour much flesh.7:6 After this I beheld, and, lo, another, like a leopard, which had upon its back four wings of a bird; the beast had also four heads; and dominion was given to it.7:7 After this I saw in the night-visions, and, behold, a fourth beast, terrible and powerful, and strong exceedingly; and it had great iron teeth; it devoured and broke in pieces, and stamped the residue with its feet: and it was diverse from all the beasts that were before it; and it had ten horns.7:8 I considered the horns, and, behold, there came up among them another horn, a little one, before which three of the first horns were plucked up by the roots: and, behold, in this horn were eyes like the eyes of a man, and a mouth speaking great things.7:9 I beheld till thrones were placed, and one that was ancient of days did sit: his raiment was white as snow, and the hair of his head like pure wool; his throne was fiery flames, and the wheels thereof burning fire.7:10 A fiery stream issued and came forth from before him: thousands of thousands ministered to him, and ten thousand times ten thousand stood before him: the judgment was set, and the books were opened.7:11 I beheld at that time because of the voice of the great words which the horn spoke; I beheld even till the beast was slain, and its body destroyed, and it was given to be burned with fire.7:12 And as for the rest of the beasts, their dominion was taken away: yet their lives were prolonged for a season and a time.7:13 I saw in the night-visions, and, behold, there came with the clouds of heaven one like to a son of man, and he came even to the ancient of days, and they brought him near before him.7:14 And there was given him dominion, and glory, and a kingdom, that all the peoples, nations, and languages should serve him: his dominion is an everlasting dominion, which shall not pass away, and his kingdom that which shall not be destroyed.7:15 As for me, Daniel, my spirit was grieved in the midst of my body, and the visions of my head troubled me.7:16 I came near to one of them that stood by, and asked him the truth concerning all this.  So he told me, and made me know the interpretation of the things.7:17 These great beasts, which are four, are four kings, that shall arise out of the earth.7:18 But the saints of the Most High shall receive the kingdom, and possess the kingdom for ever, even for ever and ever.7:19 Then I desired to know the truth concerning the fourth beast, which was diverse from all of them, exceedingly terrible, whose teeth were of iron, and its nails of brass; which devoured, broke in pieces, and stamped the residue with its feet;7:20 and concerning the ten horns that were on its head, and the other horn which came up, and before which three fell, even that horn that had eyes, and a mouth that spoke great things, whose look was more stout than its fellows.7:21 I beheld, and the same horn made war with the saints, and prevailed against them;7:22 until the ancient of days came, and judgment was given to the saints of the Most High, and the time came that the saints possessed the kingdom.7:23 Thus he said, The fourth beast shall be a fourth kingdom upon earth, which shall be diverse from all the kingdoms, and shall devour the whole earth, and shall tread it down, and break it in pieces.7:24 And as for the ten horns, out of this kingdom shall ten kings arise: and another shall arise after them; and he shall be diverse from the former, and he shall put down three kings.7:25 And he shall speak words against the Most High, and shall wear out the saints of the Most High; and he shall think to change the times and the law; and they shall be given into his hand until a time and times and half a time.7:26 But the judgment shall be set, and they shall take away his dominion, to consume and to destroy it to the end.7:27 And the kingdom and the dominion, and the greatness of the kingdoms under the whole heaven, shall be given to the people of the saints of the Most High: his kingdom is an everlasting kingdom, and all dominions shall serve and obey him.7:28 Here is the end of the matter.  As for me, Daniel, my thoughts much troubled me, and my countenance was changed in me: but I kept the matter in my heart.8:1 In the third year of the reign of king Belshazzar a vision appeared to me, even to me, Daniel, after that which appeared to me at the first.8:2 And I saw in the vision; now it was so, that when I saw, I was in Shushan the palace, which is in the province of Elam; and I saw in the vision, and I was by the river Ulai.8:3 Then I lifted up my eyes, and saw, and, behold, there stood before the river a ram which had two horns: and the two horns were high; but one was higher than the other, and the higher came up last.8:4 I saw the ram pushing westward, and northward, and southward; and no beasts could stand before him, neither was there any that could deliver out of his hand; but he did according to his will, and magnified himself.8:5 And as I was considering, behold, a he-goat came from the west over the face of the whole earth, and touched not the ground: and the goat had a notable horn between his eyes.8:6 And he came to the ram that had the two horns, which I saw standing before the river, and ran upon him in the fury of his power.8:7 And I saw him come close to the ram, and he was moved with anger against him, and smote the ram, and broke his two horns; and there was no power in the ram to stand before him; but he cast him down to the ground, and trampled upon him; and there was none that could deliver the ram out of his hand.8:8 And the he-goat magnified himself exceedingly: and when he was strong, the great horn was broken; and instead of it there came up four notable horns toward the four winds of heaven.8:9 And out of one of them came forth a little horn, which grew to be exeedingly great, toward the south, and toward the east, and toward the glorious land.8:10 And it became great, even to the host of heaven; and some of the host and of the stars it cast down to the ground, and trampled upon them.8:11 Yes, it magnified itself, even to the prince of the host; and it took away from him the continual burnt offering, and the place of his sanctuary was cast down.8:12 And the host was given over to it together with the continual burnt offering through transgression; and it cast down truth to the ground, and it did its pleasure and prospered.8:13 Then I heard a holy one speaking; and another holy one said to that certain one who spoke, How long shall be the vision concerning the continual burnt offering, and the transgression that makes desolate, to give both the sanctuary and the host to be trodden under foot?8:14 And he said to me, To two thousand and three hundred evenings and mornings; then shall the sanctuary be cleansed.8:15 And it came to pass, when I, even I Daniel, had seen the vision, that I sought to understand it; and, behold, there stood before me as the appearance of a man.8:16 And I heard a man's voice between the banks of the Ulai, which called, and said, Gabriel, make this man to understand the vision.8:17 So he came near where I stood; and when he came, I was affrighted, and fell upon my face: but he said to me, Understand, O son of man; for the vision belongs to the time of the end.8:18 Now as he was speaking with me, I fell into a deep sleep with my face toward the ground; but he touched me, and set me upright.8:19 And he said, Behold, I will make you know what shall be in the latter time of the indignation; for it belongs to the appointed time of the end.8:20 The ram which you saw, that had the two horns, they are the kings of Media and Persia.8:21 And the rough he-goat is the king of Greece: and the great horn that is between his eyes is the first king.8:22 And as for that which was broken, in the place whereof four stood up, four kingdoms shall stand up out of the nation, but not with his power.8:23 And in the latter time of their kingdom, when the transgressors are come to the full, a king of fierce countenance, and understanding dark sentences, shall stand up.8:24 And his power shall be mighty, but not by his own power; and he shall destroy wonderfully, and shall prosper and do his pleasure; and he shall destroy the mighty ones and the holy people.8:25 And through his policy he shall cause craft to prosper in his hand; and he shall magnify himself in his heart, and in their security shall he destroy many: he shall also stand up against the prince of princes; but he shall be broken without hand.8:26 And the vision of the evenings and mornings which has been told is true: but shut you up the vision; for it belongs to many days to come.8:27 And I, Daniel, fainted, and was sick certain days; then I rose up, and did the king's business: and I wondered at the vision, but none understood it.9:1 In the first year of Darius the son of Ahasuerus, of the seed of the Medes, who was made king over the realm of the Chaldeans,9:2 in the first year of his reign I, Daniel, understood by the books the number of the years whereof the word of Yahweh came to Jeremiah the prophet, for the accomplishing of the desolations of Jerusalem, even seventy years.9:3 And I set my face to the Lord God, to seek by prayer and supplications, with fasting and sackcloth and ashes.9:4 And I prayed to Yahweh my God, and made confession, and said, Oh, Lord, the great and dreadful God, who keeps covenant and lovingkindness with them that love him and keep his commandments,9:5 we have sinned, and have dealt perversely, and have done wickedly, and have rebelled, even turning aside from your precepts and from your ordinances;9:6 neither have we hearkened to your servants the prophets, that spoke in your name to our kings, our princes, and our fathers, and to all the people of the land.9:7 O Lord, righteousness belongs to you, but to us confusion of face, as at this day; to the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and to all Israel, that are near, and that are far off, through all the countries whither you have driven them, because of their trespass that they have trespassed against you.9:8 O Lord, to us belongs confusion of face, to our kings, to our princes, and to our fathers, because we have sinned against you.9:9 To the Lord our God belong mercies and forgiveness; for we have rebelled against him;9:10 neither have we obeyed the voice of Yahweh our God, to walk in his laws, which he set before us by his servants the prophets.9:11 Yes, all Israel have transgressed your law, even turning aside, that they should not obey your voice: therefore has the curse been poured out upon us, and the oath that is written in the law of Moses the servant of God; for we have sinned against him.9:12 And he has confirmed his words, which he spoke against us, and against our judges that judged us, by bringing upon us a great evil; for under the whole heaven has not been done as has been done upon Jerusalem.9:13 As it is written in the law of Moses, all this evil is come upon us: yet have we not entreated the favor of Yahweh our God, that we should turn from our iniquities, and have discernment in your truth.9:14 Therefore has Yahweh watched over the evil, and brought it upon us; for Yahweh our God is righteous in all his works which he does, and we have not obeyed his voice.9:15 And now, O Lord our God, that have brought your people forth out of the land of Egypt with a mighty hand, and have gotten you renown, as at this day; we have sinned, we have done wickedly.9:16 O Lord, according to all your righteousness, let your anger and your wrath, I pray you, be turned away from your city Jerusalem, your holy mountain; because for our sins, and for the iniquities of our fathers, Jerusalem and your people are become a reproach to all that are round about us.9:17 Now therefore, O our God, hearken to the prayer of your servant, and to his supplications, and cause your face to shine upon your sanctuary that is desolate, for the Lord's sake.9:18 O my God, incline your ear, and hear; open your eyes, and behold our desolations, and the city which is called by your name: for we do not present our supplications before you for our righteousness, but for your great mercies' sake.9:19 O Lord, hear; O Lord, forgive; O Lord, hearken and do; defer not, for your own sake, O my God, because your city and your people are called by your name.9:20 And while I was speaking, and praying, and confessing my sin and the sin of my people Israel, and presenting my supplication before Yahweh my God for the holy mountain of my God;9:21 yes, while I was speaking in prayer, the man Gabriel, whom I had seen in the vision at the beginning, being caused to fly swiftly, touched me about the time of the evening oblation.9:22 And he instructed me, and talked with me, and said, O Daniel, I am now come forth to give you wisdom and understanding.9:23 At the beginning of your supplications the commandment went forth, and I am come to tell you; for you are greatly beloved: therefore consider the matter, and understand the vision.9:24 Seventy weeks are decreed upon your people and upon your holy city, to finish transgression, and to make an end of sins, and to make reconciliation for iniquity, and to bring in everlasting righteousness, and to seal up vision and prophecy, and to anoint the most holy.9:25 Know therefore and discern, that from the going forth of the commandment to restore and to build Jerusalem to the anointed one, the prince, shall be seven weeks, and sixty-two weeks: it shall be built again, with street and moat, even in troublous times.9:26 And after the sixty-two weeks the anointed one shall be cut off, but not for himself: and the people of the prince that shall come shall destroy the city and the sanctuary; and the end thereof shall be with a flood, and even to the end shall be war; desolations are determined.9:27 And he shall make a firm covenant with many for one week: and in the midst of the week he shall cause the sacrifice and the oblation to cease; and upon the wing of abominations shall come one that makes desolate; and even to the full end, and that determined, shall wrath be poured out upon the desolate.10:1 In the third year of Cyrus king of Persia a thing was revealed to Daniel, whose name was called Belteshazzar; and the thing was true, even a great warfare: and he understood the thing, and had understanding of the vision.10:2 In those days I, Daniel, was mourning three whole weeks.10:3 I ate no pleasant bread, neither came flesh nor wine into my mouth, neither did I anoint myself at all, till three whole weeks were fulfilled.10:4 And in the four and twentieth day of the first month, as I was by the side of the great river, which is Hiddekel,10:5 I lifted up my eyes, and looked, and, behold, a man clothed in linen, whose loins were girded with pure gold of Uphaz:10:6 his body also was like the beryl, and his face as the appearance of lightning, and his eyes as flaming torches, and his arms and his feet like to burnished brass, and the voice of his words like the voice of a multitude.10:7 And I, Daniel, alone saw the vision; for the men that were with me saw not the vision; but a great quaking fell upon them, and they fled to hide themselves.10:8 So I was left alone, and saw this great vision, and there remained no strength in me; for my comeliness was turned in me into corruption, and I retained no strength.10:9 Yet heard I the voice of his words; and when I heard the voice of his words, then was I fallen into a deep sleep on my face, with my face toward the ground.10:10 And, behold, a hand touched me, which set me upon my knees and upon the palms of my hands.10:11 And he said to me, O Daniel, you man greatly beloved, understand the words that I speak to you, and stand upright; for to you am I now sent.  And when he had spoken this word to me, I stood trembling.10:12 Then said he to me, Fear not, Daniel; for from the first day that you did set your heart to understand, and to humble yourself before your God, your words were heard: and I am come for your words' sake.10:13 But the prince of the kingdom of Persia withstood me one and twenty days; but, lo, Michael, one of the chief princes, came to help me: and I remained there with the kings of Persia.10:14 Now I am come to make you understand what shall befall your people in the latter days; for the vision is yet for many days:10:15 and when he had spoken to me according to these words, I set my face toward the ground, and was dumb.10:16 And, behold, one in the likeness of the sons of men touched my lips: then I opened my mouth, and spoke and said to him that stood before me, O my lord, by reason of the vision my sorrows are turned upon me, and I retain no strength.10:17 For how can the servant of this my lord talk with this my lord?  for as for me, straightway there remained no strength in me, neither was there breath left in me.10:18 Then there touched me again one like the appearance of a man, and he strengthened me.10:19 And he said, O man greatly beloved, fear not: peace be to you, be strong, yes, be strong.  And when he spoke to me, I was strengthened, and said, Let my lord speak; for you have strengthened me.10:20 Then said he, Know you why I am come to you?  and now will I return to fight with the prince of Persia: and when I go forth, lo, the prince of Greece shall come.10:21 But I will tell you that which is inscribed in the writing of truth: and there is none that holds with me against these, but Michael your prince.11:1 And as for me, in the first year of Darius the Mede, I stood up to confirm and strengthen him.11:2 And now will I show you the truth.  Behold, there shall stand up yet three kings in Persia; and the fourth shall be far richer than they all: and when he is become strong through his riches, he shall stir up all against the realm of Greece.11:3 And a mighty king shall stand up, that shall rule with great dominion, and do according to his will.11:4 And when he shall stand up, his kingdom shall be broken, and shall be divided toward the four winds of heaven, but not to his posterity, nor according to his dominion with which he ruled; for his kingdom shall be plucked up, even for others besides these.11:5 And the king of the south shall be strong, and one of his princes; and he shall be strong above him, and have dominion; his dominion shall be a great dominion.11:6 And at the end of years they shall join themselves together; and the daughter of the king of the south shall come to the king of the north to make an agreement: but she shall not retain the strength of her arm; neither shall he stand, nor his arm; but she shall be given up, and they that brought her, and he that begat her, and he that strengthened her in those times.11:7 But out of a shoot from her roots shall one stand up in his place, who shall come to the army, and shall enter into the fortress of the king of the north, and shall deal against them, and shall prevail.11:8 And also their gods, with their molten images, and with their precious vessels of silver and of gold, shall he carry captive into Egypt; and he shall refrain some years from the king of the north.11:9 And he shall come into the realm of the king of the south, but he shall return into his own land.11:10 And his sons shall war, and shall assemble a multitude of great forces, which shall come on, and overflow, and pass through; and they shall return and war, even to his fortress.11:11 And the king of the south shall be moved with anger, and shall come forth and fight with him, even with the king of the north; and he shall set forth a great multitude, and the multitude shall be given into his hand.11:12 And the multitude shall be lifted up, and his heart shall be exalted; and he shall cast down tens of thousands, but he shall not prevail.11:13 And the king of the north shall return, and shall set forth a multitude greater than the former; and he shall come on at the end of the times, even of years, with a great army and with much substance.11:14 And in those times there shall many stand up against the king of the south: also the children of the violent among your people shall lift themselves up to establish the vision; but they shall fall.11:15 So the king of the north shall come, and cast up a mound, and take a well-fortified city: and the forces of the south shall not stand, neither his chosen people, neither shall there be any strength to stand.11:16 But he that comes against him shall do according to his own will, and none shall stand before him; and he shall stand in the glorious land, and in his hand shall be destruction.11:17 And he shall set his face to come with the strength of his whole kingdom, and with him equitable conditions; and he shall perform them: and he shall give him the daughter of women, to corrupt her; but she shall not stand, neither be for him.11:18 After this shall he turn his face to the isles, and shall take many: but a prince shall cause the reproach offered by him to cease; yes, moreover, he shall cause his reproach to turn upon him.11:19 Then he shall turn his face toward the fortresses of his own land; but he shall stumble and fall, and shall not be found.11:20 Then shall stand up in his place one that shall cause an exactor to pass through the glory of the kingdom; but within few days he shall be destroyed, neither in anger, nor in battle.11:21 And in his place shall stand up a contemptible person, to whom they had not given the honor of the kingdom: but he shall come in time of security, and shall obtain the kingdom by flatteries.11:22 And the overwhelming forces shall be overwhelmed from before him, and shall be broken; yes, also the prince of the covenant.11:23 And after the league made with him he shall work deceitfully; for he shall come up, and shall become strong, with a small people.11:24 In time of security shall he come even upon the fattest places of the province; and he shall do that which his fathers have not done, nor his fathers' fathers; he shall scatter among them prey, and spoil, and substance: yes, he shall devise his devices against the strongholds, even for a time.11:25 And he shall stir up his power and his courage against the king of the south with a great army; and the king of the south shall war in battle with an exceedingly great and mighty army; but he shall not stand; for they shall devise devices against him.11:26 Yes, they that eat of his dainties shall destroy him, and his army shall overflow; and many shall fall down slain.11:27 And as for both these kings, their hearts shall be to do mischief, and they shall speak lies at one table: but it shall not prosper; for yet the end shall be at the time appointed.11:28 Then shall he return into his land with great substance; and his heart shall be against the holy covenant; and he shall do his pleasure, and return to his own land.11:29 At the time appointed he shall return, and come into the south; but it shall not be in the latter time as it was in the former.11:30 For ships of Kittim shall come against him; therefore he shall be grieved, and shall return, and have indignation against the holy covenant, and shall do his pleasure: he shall even return, and have regard to them that forsake the holy covenant.11:31 And forces shall stand on his part, and they shall profane the sanctuary, even the fortress, and shall take away the continual burnt offering, and they shall set up the abomination that makes desolate.11:32 And such as do wickedly against the covenant shall he pervert by flatteries; but the people that know their God shall be strong, and do exploits.11:33 And they that are wise among the people shall instruct many; yet they shall fall by the sword and by flame, by captivity and by spoil, many days.11:34 Now when they shall fall, they shall be helped with a little help; but many shall join themselves to them with flatteries.11:35 And some of them that are wise shall fall, to refine them, and to purify, and to make them white, even to the time of the end; because it is yet for the time appointed.11:36 And the king shall do according to his will; and he shall exalt himself, and magnify himself above every god, and shall speak marvellous things against the God of gods; and he shall prosper till the indignation be accomplished; for that which is determined shall be done.11:37 Neither shall he regard the gods of his fathers, nor the desire of women, nor regard any god; for he shall magnify himself above all.11:38 But in his place shall he honor the god of fortresses; and a god whom his fathers knew not shall he honor with gold, and silver, and with precious stones, and pleasant things.11:39 And he shall deal with the strongest fortresses by the help of a foreign god: whosoever acknowledges him he will increase with glory; and he shall cause them to rule over many, and shall divide the land for a price.11:40 And at the time of the end shall the king of the south contend with him; and the king of the north shall come against him like a whirlwind, with chariots, and with horsemen, and with many ships; and he shall enter into the countries, and shall overflow and pass through.11:41 He shall enter also into the glorious land, and many countries shall be overthrown; but these shall be delivered out of his hand: Edom, and Moab, and the chief of the children of Ammon.11:42 He shall stretch forth his hand also upon the countries; and the land of Egypt shall not escape.11:43 But he shall have power over the treasures of gold and of silver, and over all the precious things of Egypt; and the Libyans and the Ethiopians shall be at his steps.11:44 But tidings out of the east and out of the north shall trouble him; and he shall go forth with great fury to destroy and utterly to sweep away many.11:45 And he shall plant the tents of his palace between the sea and the glorious holy mountain; yet he shall come to his end, and none shall help him.12:1 And at that time shall Michael stand up, the great prince who stands for the children of your people; and there shall be a time of trouble, such as never was since there was a nation even to that same time: and at that time your people shall be delivered, every one that shall be found written in the book.12:2 And many of them that sleep in the dust of the earth shall awake, some to everlasting life, and some to shame and everlasting contempt.12:3 And they that are wise shall shine as the brightness of the firmament; and they that turn many to righteousness as the stars for ever and ever.12:4 But you, O Daniel, shut up the words, and seal the book, even to the time of the end: many shall run to and fro, and knowledge shall be increased.12:5 Then I, Daniel, looked, and, behold, there stood other two, the one on the brink of the river on this side, and the other on the brink of the river on that side.12:6 And one said to the man clothed in linen, who was above the waters of the river, How long shall it be to the end of these wonders?12:7 And I heard the man clothed in linen, who was above the waters of the river, when he held up his right hand and his left hand to heaven, and swore by him that lives for ever that it shall be for a time, times, and half a time; and when they have made an end of breaking in pieces the power of the holy people, all these things shall be finished.12:8 And I heard, but I understood not: then said I, O my lord, what shall be the issue of these things?12:9 And he said, Go your way, Daniel; for the words are shut up and sealed till the time of the end.12:10 Many shall purify themselves, and make themselves white, and be refined; but the wicked shall do wickedly; and none of the wicked shall understand; but they that are wise shall understand.12:11 And from the time that the continual burnt offering shall be taken away, and the abomination that makes desolate set up, there shall be a thousand and two hundred and ninety days.12:12 Blessed is he that waits, and comes to the thousand three hundred and five and thirty days.12:13 But you, you go your way till the end be; for you shall rest, and shall stand in your lot, at the end of the days.End of DanielHosea1:1 The word of Yahweh that came to Hosea the son of Beeri, in the days of Uzziah, Jotham, ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of Joash, king of Israel.1:2 When Yahweh spoke at the first by Hosea, Yahweh said to Hosea, Go, take to you a wife of whoredom and children of whoredom; for the land does commit great whoredom, departing from Yahweh.1:3 So he went and took Gomer the daughter of Diblaim; and she conceived, and bore him a son.1:4 And Yahweh said to him, Call his name Jezreel; for yet a little while, and I will avenge the blood of Jezreel upon the house of Jehu, and will cause the kingdom of the house of Israel to cease.1:5 And it shall come to pass at that day, that I will break the bow of Israel in the valley of Jezreel.1:6 And she conceived again, and bore a daughter.  And Yahweh said to him, Call her name Lo-ruhamah; for I will no more have mercy upon the house of Israel, that I should in any wise pardon them.1:7 But I will have mercy upon the house of Judah, and will save them by Yahweh their God, and will not save them by bow, nor by sword, nor by battle, by horses, nor by horsemen.1:8 Now when she had weaned Lo-ruhamah, she conceived, and bore a son.1:9 And Yahweh said, Call his name Lo-ammi; for ye are not my people, and I will not be your God.1:10 Yet the number of the children of Israel shall be as the sand of the sea, which cannot be measured nor numbered; and it shall come to pass that, in the place where it was said to them, You are not my people, it shall be said to them, You are the sons of the living God.1:11 And the children of Judah and the children of Israel shall be gathered together, and they shall appoint themselves one head, and shall go up from the land; for great shall be the day of Jezreel.2:1 Say ye to your brethren, ammi; and to your sisters, Ruhamah.2:2 Contend with your mother, contend; for she is not my wife, neither am I her husband; and let her put away her whoredoms from her face, and her adulteries from between her breasts;2:3 lest I strip her naked, and set her as in the day that she was born, and make her as a wilderness, and set her like a dry land, and slay her with thirst.2:4 Yes, upon her children will I have no mercy; for they are children of whoredom;2:5 for their mother has played the harlot; she that conceived them has done shamefully; for she said, I will go after my lovers, that give me my bread and my water, my wool and my flax, my oil and my drink.2:6 Therefore, behold, I will hedge up your way with thorns, and I will build a wall against her, that she shall not find her paths.2:7 And she shall follow after her lovers, but she shall not overtake them; and she shall seek them, but shall not find them: then shall she say, I will go and return to my first husband; for then was it better with me than now.2:8 For she did not know that I gave her the grain, and the new wine, and the oil, and multiplied to her silver and gold, which they used for Baal.2:9 Therefore will I take back my grain in the time thereof, and my new wine in the season thereof, and will pluck away my wool and my flax which should have covered her nakedness.2:10 And now will I uncover her lewdness in the sight of her lovers, and none shall deliver her out of my hand.2:11 I will also cause all her mirth to cease, her feasts, her new moons, and her sabbaths, and all her solemn assemblies.2:12 And I will lay waste her vines and her fig-trees, whereof she has said, These are my wages that my lovers have given me; and I will make them a forest, and the beasts of the field shall eat them.2:13 And I will visit upon her the days of the Baalim, to which she burned incense, when she decked herself with her earrings and her jewels, and went after her lovers, and forgat me, says Yahweh.2:14 Therefore, behold, I will allure her, and bring her into the wilderness, and speak comfortably to her.2:15 And I will give her her vineyards from there, and the valley of Achor for a door of hope; and she shall make answer there, as in the days of her youth, and as in the day when she came up out of the land of Egypt.2:16 And it shall be at that day, says Yahweh, that you shall call me Ishi, and shall call me no more Baali.2:17 For I will take away the names of the Baalim out of her mouth, and they shall no more be mentioned by their name.2:18 And in that day will I make a covenant for them with the beasts of the field, and with the birds of the heavens, and with the creeping things of the ground: and I will break the bow and the sword and the battle out of the land, and will make them to lie down safely.2:19 And I will betroth you to me for ever; yes, I will betroth you to me in righteousness, and in justice, and in lovingkindness, and in mercies.2:20 I will even betroth you to me in faithfulness; and you shall know Yahweh.2:21 And it shall come to pass in that day, I will answer, says Yahweh, I will answer the heavens, and they shall answer the earth;2:22 and the earth shall answer the grain, and the new wine, and the oil; and they shall answer Jezreel.2:23 And I will sow her to me in the earth; and I will have mercy upon her that had not obtained mercy; and I will say to them that were not my people, You are my people; and they shall say, You are my God.3:1 And Yahweh said to me, Go again, love a woman beloved of her friend, and an adulteress, even as Yahweh loves the children of Israel, though they turn to other gods, and love cakes of raisins.3:2 So I bought her to me for fifteen pieces of silver, and a homer of barley, and a half-homer of barley;3:3 and I said to her, You shall abide for me many days; you shall not play the harlot, and you shall not be any man's wife: so will I also be toward you.3:4 For the children of Israel shall abide many days without king, and without prince, and without sacrifice, and without pillar, and without ephod or teraphim:3:5 afterward shall the children of Israel return, and seek Yahweh their God, and David their king, and shall come with fear to Yahweh and to his goodness in the latter days.4:1 Hear the word of Yahweh, ye children of Israel; for Yahweh has a controversy with the inhabitants of the land, because there is no truth, nor goodness, nor knowledge of God in the land.4:2 There is nought but swearing and breaking faith, and killing, and stealing, and committing adultery; they break out, and blood touches blood.4:3 Therefore shall the land mourn, and every one that dwells therein shall languish, with the beasts of the field and the birds of the heavens; yes, the fishes of the sea also shall be taken away.4:4 Yet let no man strive, neither let any man reprove; for your people are as they that strive with the priest.4:5 And you shall stumble in the day, and the prophet also shall stumble with you in the night; and I will destroy your mother.4:6 My people are destroyed for lack of knowledge: because you have rejected knowledge, I will also reject you, that you shall be no priest to me: seeing you have forgotten the law of your God, I also will forget your children.4:7 As they were multiplied, so they sinned against me: I will change their glory into shame.4:8 They feed on the sin of my people, and set their heart on their iniquity.4:9 And it shall be, like people, like priest; and I will punish them for their ways, and will requite them their doings.4:10 And they shall eat, and not have enough; they shall play the harlot, and shall not increase; because they have left off taking heed to Yahweh.4:11 Whoredom and wine and new wine take away the understanding.4:12 My people ask counsel at their stock, and their staff declares to them; for the spirit of whoredom has caused them to err, and they have played the harlot, departing from under their God.4:13 They sacrifice upon the tops of the mountains, and burn incense upon the hills, under oaks and poplars and terebinths, because the shadow thereof is good: therefore your daughters play the harlot, and your brides commit adultery.4:14 I will not punish your daughters when they play the harlot, nor your brides when they commit adultery; for the men themselves go apart with harlots, and they sacrifice with the prostitutes; and the people that does not understand shall be overthrown.4:15 Though you, Israel, play the harlot, yet let not Judah offend; and come not ye to Gilgal, neither go ye up to Beth-aven, nor swear, as Yahweh lives.4:16 For Israel has behaved himself stubbornly, like a stubborn heifer: now will Yahweh feed them as a lamb in a large place.4:17 Ephraim is joined to idols; let him alone.4:18 Their drink is become sour; they play the harlot continually; her rulers dearly love shame.4:19 The wind has wrapped her up in its wings; and they shall be put to shame because of their sacrifices.5:1 Hear this, O ye priests, and hearken, O house of Israel, and give ear, O house of the king; for to you pertains the judgment; for ye have been a snare at Mizpah, and a net spread upon Tabor.5:2 And the revolters are gone deep in making slaughter; but I am a rebuker of them all.5:3 I know Ephraim, and Israel is not hid from me; for now, O Ephraim, you have played the harlot, Israel is defiled.5:4 Their doings will not allow them to turn to their God; for the spirit of whoredom is within them, and they know not Yahweh.5:5 And the pride of Israel does testify to his face: therefore Israel and Ephraim shall stumble in their iniquity; Judah also shall stumble with them.5:6 They shall go with their flocks and with their herds to seek Yahweh; but they shall not find him: he has withdrawn himself from them.5:7 They have dealt treacherously against Yahweh; for they have borne strange children: now shall the new moon devour them with their fields.5:8 Blow ye the cornet in Gibeah, and the trumpet in Ramah: sound an alarm at Beth-aven; behind you, O Benjamin.5:9 Ephraim shall become a desolation in the day of rebuke: among the tribes of Israel have I made known that which shall surely be.5:10 The princes of Judah are like them that remove the landmark: I will pour out my wrath upon them like water.5:11 Ephraim is oppressed, he is crushed in judgment; because he was content to walk after man's command.5:12 Therefore am I to Ephraim as a moth, and to the house of Judah as rottenness.5:13 When Ephraim saw his sickness, and Judah saw his wound, then went Ephraim to Assyria, and sent to king Jareb: but he is not able to heal you, neither will he cure you of your wound.5:14 For I will be to Ephraim as a lion, and as a young lion to the house of Judah: I, even I, will tear and go away; I will carry off, and there shall be none to deliver.5:15 I will go and return to my place, till they acknowledge their offence, and seek my face: in their affliction they will seek me earnestly.6:1 Come, and let us return to Yahweh; for he has torn, and he will heal us; he has smitten, and he will bind us up.6:2 After two days will he revive us: on the third day he will raise us up, and we shall live before him.6:3 And let us know, let us follow on to know Yahweh: his going forth is sure as the morning; and he will come to us as the rain, as the latter rain that waters the earth.6:4 O Ephraim, what shall I do to you?  O Judah, what shall I do to you?  for your goodness is as a morning cloud, and as the dew that goes early away.6:5 Therefore have I hewed them by the prophets; I have slain them by the words of my mouth: and your judgments are as the light that goes forth.6:6 For I desire goodness, and not sacrifice; and the knowledge of God more than burnt offerings.6:7 But they like Adam have transgressed the covenant: there have they dealt treacherously against me.6:8 Gilead is a city of them that work iniquity; it is stained with blood.6:9 And as troops of robbers wait for a man, so the company of priests murder in the way toward Shechem; yes, they have committed lewdness.6:10 In the house of Israel I have seen a horrible thing: there whoredom is found in Ephraim, Israel is defiled.6:11 Also, O Judah, there is a harvest appointed for you, when I bring back the captivity of my people.7:1 When I would heal Israel, then is the iniquity of Ephraim uncovered, and the wickedness of Samaria; for they commit falsehood, and the thiefenters in, and the troop of robbers ravages without.7:2 And they consider not in their hearts that I remember all their wickedness: now have their own doings beset them about; they are before my face.7:3 They make the king glad with their wickedness, and the princes with their lies.7:4 They are all adulterers; they are as an oven heated by the baker; he ceases to stir the fire, from the kneading of the dough, until it be leavened.7:5 On the day of our king the princes made themselves sick with the heat of wine; he stretched out his hand with scoffers.7:6 For they have made ready their heart like an oven, while they lie in wait: their baker sleeps all the night; in the morning it burns as a flaming fire.7:7 They are all hot as an oven, and devour their judges; all their kings are fallen: there is none among them that calls to me.7:8 Ephraim, he mixes himself among the peoples; Ephraim is a cake not turned.7:9 Strangers have devoured his strength, and he knows it not: yes, gray hairs are here and there upon him, and he knows it not.7:10 And the pride of Israel does testify to his face: yet they have not returned to Yahweh their God, nor sought him, for all this.7:11 And Ephraim is like a silly dove, without understanding: they call to Egypt, they go to Assyria.7:12 When they shall go, I will spread my net upon them; I will bring them down as the birds of the heavens; I will chastise them, as their congregation has heard.7:13 Woe to them! for they have wandered from me; destruction to them! for they have trespassed against me: though I would redeem them, yet they have spoken lies against me.7:14 And they have not cried to me with their heart, but they howl upon their beds: they assemble themselves for grain and new wine; they rebel against me.7:15 Though I have taught and strengthened their arms, yet do they devise mischief against me.7:16 They return, but not to him that is on high; they are like a deceitful bow; their princes shall fall by the sword for the rage of their tongue: this shall be their derision in the land of Egypt.8:1 Set the trumpet to your mouth.  As an eagle he comes against the house of Yahweh, because they have transgressed my covenant, and trespassed against my law.8:2 They shall cry to me, My God, we Israel know you.8:3 Israel has cast off that which is good: the enemy shall pursue him.8:4 They have set up kings, but not by me; they have made princes, and I knew it not: of their silver and their gold have they made them idols, that they may be cut off.8:5 He has cast off your calf, O Samaria; my anger is kindled against them: how long will it be until they attain to innocency?8:6 For from Israel is even this; the workman made it, and it is no God; yes, the calf of Samaria shall be broken in pieces.8:7 For they sow the wind, and they shall reap the whirlwind: he has no standing grain; the blade shall yield no meal; if so be it yields, strangers shall swallow it up.8:8 Israel is swallowed up: now are they among the nations as a vessel in which none delights.8:9 For they are gone up to Assyria, like a wild donkey alone by himself: Ephraim has hired lovers.8:10 Yes, though they hire allies among the nations, now will I gather them; and they begin to be diminished by reason of the burden of the tribute of the king of princes.8:11 Because Ephraim has multiplied altars for sinning, altars have been to him for sinning.8:12 I wrote for him the ten thousand things of my law; but they are counted as a strange thing.8:13 As for the sacrifices of my offerings, they sacrifice flesh and eat it; but Yahweh accepts them not: now will he remember their iniquity, and visit their sins; they shall return to Egypt.8:14 For Israel has forgotten his Maker, and built palaces; and Judah has multiplied fortified cities: but I will send a fire upon his cities, and it shall devour the castles thereof.9:1 Rejoice not, O Israel, for joy, like the peoples; for you have played the harlot, departing from your God; you have loved hire upon every threshing-floor.9:2 The threshing-floor and the winepress shall not feed them, and the new wine shall fail her.9:3 They shall not dwell in Yahweh's land; but Ephraim shall return to Egypt, and they shall eat unclean food in Assyria.9:4 They shall not pour out wine-offerings to Yahweh, neither shall they be pleasing to him: their sacrifices shall be to them as the bread of mourners; all that eat thereof shall be polluted; for their bread shall be for their appetite; it shall not come into the house of Yahweh.9:5 What will ye do in the day of solemn assembly, and in the day of the feast of Yahweh?9:6 For, lo, they are gone away from destruction; yet Egypt shall gather them up, Memphis shall bury them; their pleasant things of silver, nettles shall possess them; thorns shall be in their tents.9:7 The days of visitation are come, the days of recompense are come; Israel shall know it: the prophet is a fool, the man that has the spirit is mad, for the abundance of your iniquity, and because the enmity is great.9:8 Ephraim was a watchman with my God: as for the prophet, a fowler's snare is in all his ways, and enmity in the house of his God.9:9 They have deeply corrupted themselves, as in the days of Gibeah: he will remember their iniquity, he will visit their sins.9:10 I found Israel like grapes in the wilderness; I saw your fathers as the first-ripe in the fig-tree at its first season: but they came to Baal-peor, and consecrated themselves to the shameful thing, and became abominable like that which they loved.9:11 As for Ephraim, their glory shall fly away like a bird: there shall be no birth, and none with child, and no conception.9:12 Though they bring up their children, yet will I bereave them, so that not a man shall be left: yes, woe also to them when I depart from them!9:13 Ephraim, like as I have seen Tyre, is planted in a pleasant place: but Ephraim shall bring out his children to the slayer.9:14 Give them, O Yahweh-what will you give?  give them a miscarrying womb and dry breasts.9:15 All their wickedness is in Gilgal; for there I hated them: because of the wickedness of their doings I will drive them out of my house; I will love them no more; all their princes are revolters.9:16 Ephraim is smitten, their root is dried up, they shall bear no fruit: yes, though they bring forth, yet will I slay the beloved fruit of their womb.9:17 My God will cast them away, because they did not hearken to him; and they shall be wanderers among the nations.10:1 Israel is a luxuriant vine, that puts forth his fruit: according to the abundance of his fruit he has multiplied his altars; according to the goodness of their land they have made goodly pillars.10:2 Their heart is divided; now they shall be found guilty: he will strike their altars, he will destroy their pillars.10:3 Surely now shall they say, We have no king; for we fear not Yahweh; and the king, what can he do for us?10:4 They speak vain words, swearing falsely in making covenants: therefore judgment springs up as hemlock in the furrows of the field.10:5 The inhabitants of Samaria shall be in terror for the calves of Beth-aven; for the people thereof shall mourn over it, and the priests thereof that rejoiced over it, for the glory thereof, because it is departed from it.10:6 It also shall be carried to Assyria for a present to king Jareb: Ephraim shall receive shame, and Israel shall be ashamed of his own counsel.10:7 As for Samaria, her king is cut off, as foam upon the water.10:8 The high places also of Aven, the sin of Israel, shall be destroyed: the thorn and the thistle shall come up on their altars; and they shall say to the mountains, Cover us; and to the hills, Fall on us.10:9 O Israel, you have sinned from the days of Gibeah: there they stood; the battle against the children of iniquity does not overtake them in Gibeah.10:10 When it is my desire, I will chastise them; and the peoples shall be gathered against them, when they are bound to their two transgressions.10:11 And Ephraim is a heifer that is taught, that loves to tread out the grain; but I have passed over upon her fair neck: I will set a rider on Ephraim; Judah shall plow, Jacob shall break his clods.10:12 Sow to yourselves in righteousness, reap according to kindness; break up your fallow ground; for it is time to seek Yahweh, till he come and rain righteousness upon you.10:13 You have plowed wickedness, ye have reaped iniquity; ye have eaten the fruit of lies; for you did trust in your way, in the multitude of your mighty men.10:14 Therefore shall a tumult arise among your people, and all your fortresses shall be destroyed, as Shalman destroyed Beth-arbel in the day of battle: the mother was dashed in pieces with her children.10:15 So shall Beth-el do to you because of your great wickedness: at daybreak shall the king of Israel be utterly cut off.11:1 When Israel was a child, then I loved him, and called my son out of Egypt.11:2 The more the prophets called them, the more they went from them: they sacrificed to the Baalim, and burned incense to graven images.11:3 Yet I taught Ephraim to walk; I took them on my arms; but they knew not that I healed them.11:4 I drew them with cords of a man, with bands of love; and I was to them as they that lift up the yoke on their jaws; and I laid food before them.11:5 They shall not return into the land of Egypt; but the Assyrian shall be their king, because they refused to return to me.11:6 And the sword shall fall upon their cities, and shall consume their bars, and devour them, because of their own counsels.11:7 And my people are bent on backsliding from me: though they call them to him that is on high, none at all will exalt him.11:8 How shall I give you up, Ephraim?  how shall I cast you off, Israel?  how shall I make you as Admah?  how shall I set you as Zeboiim?  my heart is turned within me, my compassions are kindled together.11:9 I will not execute the fierceness of my anger, I will not return to destroy Ephraim: for I am God, and not man; the Holy One in the midst of you; and I will not come in wrath.11:10 They shall walk after Yahweh, who will roar like a lion; for he will roar, and the children shall come trembling from the west.11:11 They shall come trembling as a bird out of Egypt, and as a dove out of the land of Assyria; and I will make them to dwell in their houses, says Yahweh.11:12 Ephraim compasses me about with falsehood, and the house of Israel with deceit; but Judah yet rules with God, and is faithful with the Holy One.12:1 Ephraim feeds on wind, and follows after the east wind: he continually multiplies lies and desolation; and they make a covenant with Assyria, and oil is carried into Egypt.12:2 Yahweh has also a controversy with Judah, and will punish Jacob according to his ways; according to his doings will he recompense him.12:3 In the womb he took his brother by the heel; and in his manhood he had power with God:12:4 yes, he had power over the angel, and prevailed; he wept, and made supplication to him: he found him at Beth-el, and there he spoke with us,12:5 even Yahweh, the God of hosts; Yahweh is his memorial name.12:6 Therefore turn you to your God: keep kindness and justice, and wait for your God continually.12:7 He is a trafficker, the balances of deceit are in his hand: he loves to oppress.12:8 And Ephraim said, Surely I am become rich, I have found me wealth: in all my labors they shall find in me no iniquity that were sin.12:9 But I am Yahweh your God from the land of Egypt; I will yet again make you to dwell in tents, as in the days of the solemn feast.12:10 I have also spoken to the prophets, and I have multiplied visions; and by the ministry of the prophets have I used similitudes.12:11 Is Gilead iniquity?  they are altogether false; in Gilgal they sacrifice bullocks; yes, their altars are as heaps in the furrows of the field.12:12 And Jacob fled into the field of Aram, and Israel served for a wife, and for a wife he kept sheep.12:13 And by a prophet Yahweh brought Israel up out of Egypt, and by a prophet was he preserved.12:14 Ephraim has provoked to anger most bitterly: therefore shall his blood be left upon him, and his reproach shall his Lord return to him.13:1 When Ephraim spoke, there was trembling; he exalted himself in Israel; but when he offended in Baal, he died.13:2 And now they sin more and more, and have made them molten images of their silver, even idols according to their own understanding, all of them the work of the craftsmen: they say of them, Let the men that sacrifice kiss the calves.13:3 Therefore they shall be as the morning cloud, and as the dew that passes early away, as the chaff that is driven with the whirlwind out of the threshing-floor, and as the smoke out of the chimney.13:4 Yet I am Yahweh your God from the land of Egypt; and you shall know no god but me, and besides me there is no saviour.13:5 I knew you in the wilderness, in the land of great drought.13:6 According to their pasture, so were they filled; they were filled, and their heart was exalted: therefore have they forgotten me.13:7 Therefore I am to them as a lion; as a leopard I will watch by the way;13:8 I will meet them as a bear that is bereaved of her whelps, and will rend the lobe of their heart; and there will I devour them like a lioness; the wild beast shall tear them.13:9 It is your destruction, O Israel, that you are against me, against your help.13:10 Where now is your king, that he may save you in all your cities?  and your judges, of whom you said, Give me a king and princes?13:11 I have given you a king in my anger, and have taken him away in my wrath.13:12 The iniquity of Ephraim is bound up; his sin is laid up in store.13:13 The sorrows of a travailing woman shall come upon him: he is an unwise son; for it is time he should not tarry in the place of the breaking forth of children.13:14 Shall I ransom them from the power of Sheol?  Shall I redeem them from death?  O death, where are your plagues?  O Sheol, where is your destruction?  repentance shall be hid from my eyes.13:15 Though he be fruitful among his brethren, an east wind shall come, the breath of Yahweh coming up from the wilderness; and his spring shall become dry, and his fountain shall be dried up: he shall make spoil of the treasure of all goodly vessels.13:16 Samaria shall bear her guilt; for she has rebelled against her God: they shall fall by the sword; their infants shall be dashed in pieces, and their women with child shall be ripped up.14:1 O Israel, return to Yahweh your God; for you have fallen by your iniquity.14:2 Take with you words, and return to Yahweh: say to him, Take away all iniquity, and accept that which is good: so will we render as bullocks the offering of our lips.14:3 Assyria shall not save us; we will not ride upon horses; neither will we say any more to the work of our hands, You are our gods; for in you the fatherless finds mercy.14:4 I will heal their backsliding, I will love them freely; for my anger is turned away from him.14:5 I will be as the dew to Israel; he shall blossom as the lily, and cast forth his roots as Lebanon.14:6 His branches shall spread, and his beauty shall be as the olive-tree, and his smell as Lebanon.14:7 They that dwell under his shadow shall return; they shall revive as the grain, and blossom as the vine: the scent thereof shall be as the wine of Lebanon.14:8 Ephraim shall say, What have I to do any more with idols?  I have answered, and will regard him: I am like a green fir-tree; from me is your fruit found.14:9 Who is wise, that he may understand these things?  prudent, that he may know them?  for the ways of Yahweh are right, and the just shall walk in them; but transgressors shall fall therein.End of HoseaJoel1:1 The word of Yahweh that came to Joel the son of Pethuel.1:2 Hear this, ye old men, and give ear, all ye inhabitants of the land.  Has this been in your days, or in the days of your fathers?1:3 Tell ye your children of it, and let your children tell their children, and their children another generation.1:4 That which the palmer-worm has left has the locust eaten; and that which the locust has left has the canker-worm eaten; and that which the canker-worm has left has the caterpillar eaten.1:5 Awake, ye drunkards, and weep; and wail, all ye drinkers of wine, because of the sweet wine; for it is cut off from your mouth.1:6 For a nation is come up upon my land, strong, and without number; his teeth are the teeth of a lion, and he has the jaw-teeth of a lioness.1:7 He has laid my vine waste, and barked my fig-tree: he has made it clean bare, and cast it away; the branches thereof are made white.1:8 Lament like a virgin girded with sackcloth for the husband of her youth.1:9 The meal offering and the drink offering are cut off from the house of Yahweh; the priests, Yahweh's ministers, mourn.1:10 The field is laid waste, the land mourns; for the grain is destroyed, the new wine is dried up, the oil languishes.1:11 Be confounded, O ye husbandmen, wail, O ye vinedressers, for the wheat and for the barley; for the harvest of the field is perished.1:12 The vine is withered, and the fig-tree languishes; the pomegranate-tree, the palm-tree also, and the apple-tree, even all the trees of the field are withered: for joy is withered away from the sons of men.1:13 Gird yourselves with sackcloth, and lament, ye priests; wail, ye ministers of the altar; come, lie all night in sackcloth, ye ministers of my God: for the meal offering and the drink offering are withholden from the house of your God.1:14 Sanctify a fast, call a solemn assembly, gather the old men and all the inhabitants of the land to the house of Yahweh your God, and cry to Yahweh.1:15 Alas for the day! for the day of Yahweh is at hand, and as destruction from the Almighty shall it come.1:16 Is not the food cut off before our eyes, yes, joy and gladness from the house of our God?1:17 The seeds rot under their clods; the garners are laid desolate, the barns are broken down; for the grain is withered.1:18 How do the beasts groan! the herds of cattle are perplexed, because they have no pasture; yes, the flocks of sheep are made desolate.1:19 O Yahweh, to you do I cry; for the fire has devoured the pastures of the wilderness, and the flame has burned all the trees of the field.1:20 Yes, the beasts of the field pant to you; for the water brooks are dried up, and the fire has devoured the pastures of the wilderness.2:1 Blow ye the trumpet in Zion, and sound an alarm in my holy mountain; let all the inhabitants of the land tremble: for the day of Yahweh comes, for it is near at hand;2:2 a day of darkness and gloominess, a day of clouds and thick darkness, as the dawn spread upon the mountains; a great people and a strong; there has not been ever the like, neither shall be any more after them, even to the years of many generations.2:3 A fire devours before them; and behind them a flame burns: the land is as the garden of Eden before them, and behind them a desolate wilderness; yes, and none has escaped them.2:4 The appearance of them is as the appearance of horses; and as horsemen, so do they run.2:5 Like the noise of chariots on the tops of the mountains do they leap, like the noise of a flame of fire that devours the stubble, as a strong people set in battle array.2:6 At their presence the peoples are in anguish; all faces are grown pale.2:7 They run like mighty men; they climb the wall like men of war; and they march every one on his ways, and they break not their ranks.2:8 Neither does one thrust another; they march every one in his path; and they burst through the weapons, and break not off their course.2:9 They leap upon the city; they run upon the wall; they climb up into the houses; they enter in at the windows like a thief.2:10 The earth quakes before them; the heavens tremble; the sun and the moon are darkened, and the stars withdraw their shining.2:11 And Yahweh utters his voice before his army; for his camp is very great; for he is strong that executes his word; for the day of Yahweh is great and very terrible; and who can abide it?2:12 Yet even now, says Yahweh, turn ye to me with all your heart, and with fasting, and with weeping, and with mourning:2:13 and rend your heart, and not your garments, and turn to Yahweh your God; for he is gracious and merciful, slow to anger, and abundant in lovingkindness, and repents him of the evil.2:14 Who knows whether he will not turn and repent, and leave a blessing behind him, even a meal offering and a drink offering to Yahweh your God?2:15 Blow the trumpet in Zion, sanctify a fast, call a solemn assembly;2:16 gather the people, sanctify the assembly, assemble the old men, gather the children, and those that suck the breasts; let the bridegroom go forth from his chamber, and the bride out of her closet.2:17 Let the priests, the ministers of Yahweh, weep between the porch and the altar, and let them say, Spare your people, O Yahweh, and give not your heritage to reproach, that the nations should rule over them: why should they say among the peoples, Where is their God?2:18 Then was Yahweh jealous for his land, and had pity on his people.2:19 And Yahweh answered and said to his people, Behold, I will send you grain, and new wine, and oil, and ye shall be satisfied with it; and I will no more make you a reproach among the nations;2:20 but I will remove far off from you the northern army, and will drive it into a land barren and desolate, its forepart into the eastern sea, and its hinder part into the western sea; and its stench shall come up, and its ill savor shall come up, because it has done great things.2:21 Fear not, O land, be glad and rejoice; for Yahweh has done great things.2:22 Be not afraid, ye beasts of the field; for the pastures of the wilderness do spring, for the tree bears its fruit, the fig-tree and the vine do yield their strength.2:23 Be glad then, ye children of Zion, and rejoice in Yahweh your God; for he gives you the former rain in just measure, and he causes to come down for you the rain, the former rain and the latter rain, in the first month.2:24 And the floors shall be full of wheat, and the vats shall overflow with new wine and oil.2:25 And I will restore to you the years that the locust has eaten, the canker-worm, and the caterpillar, and the palmer-worm, my great army which I sent among you.2:26 And ye shall eat in plenty and be satisfied, and shall praise the name of Yahweh your God, that has dealt wondrously with you; and my people shall never be put to shame.2:27 And ye shall know that I am in the midst of Israel, and that I am Yahweh your God, and there is none else; and my people shall never be put to shame.2:28 And it shall come to pass afterward, that I will pour out my Spirit upon all flesh; and your sons and your daughters shall prophesy, your old men shall dream dreams, your young men shall see visions:2:29 and also upon the servants and upon the handmaids in those days will I pour out my Spirit.2:30 And I will show wonders in the heavens and in the earth: blood, and fire, and pillars of smoke.2:31 The sun shall be turned into darkness, and the moon into blood, before the great and terrible day of Yahweh comes.2:32 And it shall come to pass, that whosoever shall call on the name of Yahweh shall be delivered; for in mount Zion and in Jerusalem there shall be those that escape, as Yahweh has said, and among the remnant those whom Yahweh does call.3:1 For, behold, in those days, and in that time, when I shall bring back the captivity of Judah and Jerusalem,3:2 I will gather all nations, and will bring them down into the valley of Jehoshaphat; and I will execute judgment upon them there for my people and for my heritage Israel, whom they have scattered among the nations: and they have parted my land,3:3 and have cast lots for my people, and have given a boy for a harlot, and sold a girl for wine, that they may drink.3:4 Yes, and what are ye to me, O Tyre, and Sidon, and all the regions of Philistia?   will ye render me a recompense?  and if ye recompense me, swiftly and speedily will I return your recompense upon your own head.3:5 Forasmuch as ye have taken my silver and my gold, and have carried into your temples my goodly precious things,3:6 and have sold the children of Judah and the children of Jerusalem to the sons of the Grecians, that ye may remove them far from their border;3:7 behold, I will stir them up out of the place whither ye have sold them, and will return your recompense upon your own head;3:8 and I will sell your sons and your daughters into the hand of the children of Judah, and they shall sell them to the men of Sheba, to a nation far off: for Yahweh has spoken it.3:9 Proclaim ye this among the nations; prepare war; stir up the mighty men; let all the men of war draw near, let them come up.3:10 Beat your plowshares into swords, and your pruning-hooks into spears: let the weak say, I am strong.3:11 Hasten, and come, all ye nations round about, and gather yourselves together: there cause your mighty ones to come down, O Yahweh.3:12 Let the nations bestir themselves, and come up to the valley of Jehoshaphat; for there will I sit to judge all the nations round about.3:13 Put ye in the sickle; for the harvest is ripe: come, tread ye; for the winepress is full, the vats overflow; for their wickedness is great.3:14 Multitudes, multitudes in the valley of decision! for the day of Yahweh is near in the valley of decision.3:15 The sun and the moon are darkened, and the stars withdraw their shining.3:16 And Yahweh will roar from Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the heavens and the earth shall shake: but Yahweh will be a refuge to his people, and a stronghold to the children of Israel.3:17 So shall ye know that I am Yahweh your God, dwelling in Zion my holy mountain: then shall Jerusalem be holy, and there shall no strangers pass through her any more.3:18 And it shall come to pass in that day, that the mountains shall drop down sweet wine, and the hills shall flow with milk, and all the brooks of Judah shall flow with waters; and a fountain shall come forth from the house of Yahweh, and shall water the valley of Shittim.3:19 Egypt shall be a desolation, and Edom shall be a desolate wilderness, for the violence done to the children of Judah, because they have shed innocent blood in their land.3:20 But Judah shall abide for ever, and Jerusalem from generation to generation.3:21 And I will cleanse their blood, that I have not cleansed: for Yahweh dwells in Zion.End of JoelAmos1:1 The words of Amos, who was among the herdsmen of Tekoa, which he saw concerning Israel in the days of Uzziah king of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of Joash king of Israel, two years before the earthquake.1:2 And he said, Yahweh will roar from Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the pastures of the shepherds shall mourn, and the top of Carmel shall wither.1:3 Thus says Yahweh: For three transgressions of Damascus, yes, for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have threshed Gilead with threshing instruments of iron:1:4 but I will send a fire into the house of Hazael, and it shall devour the palaces of Ben-hadad.1:5 And I will break the bar of Damascus, and cut off the inhabitant from the valley of Aven, and him that holds the sceptre from the house of Eden; and the people of Syria shall go into captivity to Kir, says Yahweh.1:6 Thus says Yahweh: For three transgressions of Gaza, yes, for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they carried away captive the whole people, to deliver them up to Edom:1:7 but I will send a fire on the wall of Gaza, and it shall devour the palaces thereof.1:8 And I will cut off the inhabitant from Ashdod, and him that holds the sceptre from Ashkelon; and I will turn my hand against Ekron; and the remnant of the Philistines shall perish, says the Lord Yahweh.1:9 Thus says Yahweh: For three transgressions of Tyre, yes, for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they delivered up the whole people to Edom, and remembered not the brotherly covenant:1:10 but I will send a fire on the wall of Tyre, and it shall devour the palaces thereof.1:11 Thus says Yahweh: For three transgressions of Edom, yes, for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because he did pursue his brother with the sword, and did cast off all pity, and his anger did tear perpetually, and he kept his wrath for ever:1:12 but I will send a fire upon Teman, and it shall devour the palaces of Bozrah.1:13 Thus says Yahweh: For three transgressions of the children of Ammon, yes, for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have ripped up the women with child of Gilead, that they may enlarge their border.1:14 But I will kindle a fire in the wall of Rabbah, and it shall devour the palaces thereof, with shouting in the day of battle, with a tempest in the day of the whirlwind;1:15 and their king shall go into captivity, he and his princes together, says Yahweh.2:1 Thus says Yahweh: For three transgressions of Moab, yes, for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because he burned the bones of the king of Edom into lime:2:2 but I will send a fire upon Moab, and it shall devour the palaces of Kerioth; and Moab shall die with tumult, with shouting, and with the sound of the trumpet;2:3 and I will cut off the judge from the midst thereof, and will slay all the princes thereof with him, says Yahweh.2:4 Thus says Yahweh: For three transgressions of Judah, yes, for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have rejected the law of Yahweh, and have not kept his statutes, and their lies have caused them to err, after which their fathers did walk:2:5 but I will send a fire upon Judah, and it shall devour the palaces of Jerusalem.2:6 Thus says Yahweh: For three transgressions of Israel, yes, for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have sold the righteous for silver, and the needy for a pair of shoes-2:7 they that pant after the dust of the earth on the head of the poor, and turn aside the way of the meek: and a man and his father go to the same maiden, to profane my holy name:2:8 and they lay themselves down beside every altar upon clothes taken in pledge; and in the house of their God they drink the wine of such as have been fined.2:9 Yet destroyed I the Amorite before them, whose height was like the height of the cedars, and he was strong as the oaks; yet I destroyed his fruit from above, and his roots from beneath.2:10 Also I brought you up out of the land of Egypt, and led you forty years in the wilderness, to possess the land of the Amorite.2:11 And I raised up of your sons for prophets, and of your young men for Nazirites.  Is it not even thus, O ye children of Israel?  says Yahweh.2:12 But ye gave the Nazirites wine to drink, and commanded the prophets, saying, Prophesy not.2:13 Behold, I will press you in your place, as a cart presses that is full of sheaves.2:14 And flight shall perish from the swift; and the strong shall not strengthen his force; neither shall the mighty deliver himself;2:15 neither shall he stand that handles the bow; and he that is swift of foot shall not deliver himself; neither shall he that rides the horse deliver himself;2:16 and he that is courageous among the mighty shall flee away naked in that day, says Yahweh.3:1 Hear this word that Yahweh has spoken against you, O children of Israel, against the whole family which I brought up out of the land of Egypt, saying,3:2 You only have I known of all the families of the earth: therefore I will visit upon you all your iniquities.3:3 Shall two walk together, except they have agreed?3:4 Will a lion roar in the forest, when he has no prey?  will a young lion cry out of his den, if he have taken nothing?3:5 Can a bird fall in a snare upon the earth, where no gin is set for him?  shall a snare spring up from the ground, and have taken nothing at all?3:6 Shall the trumpet be blown in a city, and the people not be afraid?  shall evil befall a city, and Yahweh has not done it?3:7 Surely the Lord Yahweh will do nothing, except he reveal his secret to his servants the prophets.3:8 The lion has roared; who will not fear?  The Lord Yahweh has spoken; who can but prophesy?3:9 Publish ye in the palaces at Ashdod, and in the palaces in the land of Egypt, and say, assemble yourselves upon the mountains of Samaria, and behold what great tumults are therein, and what oppressions in the midst thereof.3:10 For they know not to do right, says Yahweh, who store up violence and robbery in their palaces.3:11 Therefore thus says the Lord Yahweh: An adversary there shall be, even round about the land; and he shall bring down your strength from you, and your palaces shall be plundered.3:12 Thus says Yahweh: As the shepherd rescues out of the mouth of the lion two legs, or a piece of an ear, so shall the children of Israel be rescued that sit in Samaria in the corner of a couch, and on the silken cushions of a bed.3:13 Hear ye, and testify against the house of Jacob, says the Lord Yahweh, the God of hosts.3:14 For in the day that I shall visit the transgressions of Israel upon him, I will also visit the altars of Beth-el; and the horns of the altar shall be cut off, and fall to the ground.3:15 And I will strike the winter-house along with the summer-house; and the houses of ivory shall perish, and the great houses shall have an end, says Yahweh.4:1 Hear this word, ye kine of Bashan, that are in the mountain of Samaria, that oppress the poor, that crush the needy, that say to their lords, Bring, and let us drink.4:2 The Lord Yahweh has sworn by his holiness, that, lo, the days shall come upon you, that they shall take you away with hooks, and your residue with fish-hooks.4:3 And ye shall go out at the breaches, every one straight before her; and ye shall cast yourselves into Harmon, says Yahweh.4:4 Come to Beth-el, and transgress; to Gilgal, and multiply transgression; and bring your sacrifices every morning, and your tithes every three days;4:5 and offer a sacrifice of thanksgiving of that which is leavened, and proclaim freewill-offerings and publish them: for this pleases you, O ye children of Israel, says the Lord Yahweh.4:6 And I also have given you cleanness of teeth in all your cities, and want of bread in all your places; yet have ye not returned to me, says Yahweh.4:7 And I also have withholden the rain from you, when there were yet three months to the harvest; and I caused it to rain upon one city, and caused it not to rain upon another city: one piece was rained upon, and the piece whereupon it rained not withered.4:8 So two or three cities wandered to one city to drink water, and were not satisfied: yet have ye not returned to me, says Yahweh.4:9 I have smitten you with blasting and mildew: the multitude of your gardens and your vineyards and your fig-trees and your olive-trees has the palmer-worm devoured: yet have ye not returned to me, says Yahweh.4:10 I have sent among you the pestilence after the manner of Egypt: your young men have I slain with the sword, and have carried away your horses; and I have made the stench of your camp to come up even into your nostrils: yet have ye not returned to me, says Yahweh.4:11 I have overthrown cities among you, as when God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah, and ye were as a brand plucked out of the burning: yet have ye not returned to me, says Yahweh.4:12 Therefore thus will I do to you, O Israel; and because I will do this to you, prepare to meet your God, O Israel.4:13 For, lo, he that forms the mountains, and creates the wind, and declares to man what is his thought; that makes the morning darkness, and treads upon the high places of the Earth-Yahweh, the God of hosts, is his name.5:1 Hear ye this word which I take up for a lamentation over you, O house of Israel.5:2 The virgin of Israel is fallen; she shall no more rise: she is cast down upon her land; there is none to raise her up.5:3 For thus says the Lord Yahweh: The city that went forth a thousand shall have a hundred left, and that which went forth a hundred shall have ten left, to the house of Israel.5:4 For thus says Yahweh to the house of Israel, Seek ye me, and ye shall live;5:5 but seek not Beth-el, nor enter into Gilgal, and pass not to Beer-sheba: for Gilgal shall surely go into captivity, and Beth-el shall come to nought.5:6 Seek Yahweh, and ye shall live; lest he break out like fire in the house of Joseph, and it devour, and there be none to quench it in Beth-el.5:7 You who turn justice to wormwood, and cast down righteousness to the earth,5:8 seek him that makes the Pleiades and Orion, and turns the shadow of death into the morning, and makes the day dark with night; that calls for the waters of the sea, and pours them out upon the face of the earth (Yahweh is his name);5:9 that brings sudden destruction upon the strong, so that destruction comes upon the fortress.5:10 They hate him that reproves in the gate, and they abhor him that speaks uprightly.5:11 Forasmuch therefore as ye trample upon the poor, and take exactions from him of wheat: ye have built houses of hewn stone, but ye shall not dwell in them; ye have planted pleasant vineyards, but ye shall not drink the wine thereof.5:12 For I know how manifold are your transgressions, and how mighty are your sins-ye that afflict the just, that take a bribe, and that turn aside the needy in the gate from their right.5:13 Therefore he that is prudent shall keep silence in such a time; for it is an evil time.5:14 Seek good, and not evil, that ye may live; and so Yahweh, the God of hosts, will be with you, as ye say.5:15 Hate the evil, and love the good, and establish justice in the gate: it may be that Yahweh, the God of hosts, will be gracious to the remnant of Joseph.5:16 Therefore thus says Yahweh, the God of hosts, the Lord: Wailing shall be in all the broad ways; and they shall say in all the streets, alas! Alas! and they shall call the husbandman to mourning, and such as are skilful in lamentation to wailing.5:17 And in all vineyards shall be wailing; for I will pass through the midst of you, says Yahweh.5:18 Woe to you that desire the day of Yahweh! Why would ye have the day of Yahweh?  It is darkness, and not light.5:19 As if a man did flee from a lion, and a bear met him; or went into the house and leaned his hand on the wall, and a serpent bit him.5:20 Shall not the day of Yahweh be darkness, and not light?  even very dark, and no brightness in it?5:21 I hate, I despise your feasts, and I will take no delight in your solemn assemblies.5:22 Yes, though ye offer me your burnt offerings and meal offerings, I will not accept them; neither will I regard the peace offerings of your fat beasts.5:23 Take you away from me the noise of your songs; for I will not hear the melody of your viols.5:24 But let justice roll down as waters, and righteousness as a mighty stream.5:25 Did ye bring to me sacrifices and offerings in the wilderness forty years, O house of Israel?5:26 Yes, ye have carried along the tent of Moloch, and the star of your god Saturn,  which ye made for yourselves.5:27 Therefore will I cause you to go into captivity beyond Damascus, says Yahweh, whose name is the God of hosts.6:1 Woe to them that are at ease in Zion, and to them that are secure in the mountain of Samaria, the notable men of the chief of the nations, to whom the house of Israel come!6:2 Pass ye to Calneh, and see; and from there go ye to Hamath the great; then go down to Gath of the Philistines: are they better than these kingdoms?  or is their border greater than your border?6:3 -ye that put far away the evil day, and cause the seat of violence to come near;6:4 that lie upon beds of ivory, and stretch themselves upon their couches, and eat the lambs out of the flock, and the calves out of the midst of the stall;6:5 that sing idle songs to the sound of the viol; that invent for themselves instruments of music, like David;6:6 that drink wine in bowls, and anoint themselves with the chief oils; but they are not grieved for the affliction of Joseph.6:7 Therefore shall they now go captive with the first that go captive; and the revelry of them that stretched themselves shall pass away.6:8 The Lord Yahweh has sworn by himself, says Yahweh, the God of hosts: I abhor the excellency of Jacob, and hate his palaces; therefore will I deliver up the city with all that is therein.6:9 And it shall come to pass, if there remain ten men in one house, that they shall die.6:10 And when a man's uncle shall take him up, even he that burns him, to bring out the bones out of the house, and shall say to him that is in the innermost parts of the house, Is there yet any with you?  and he shall say, No; then shall he say, Hold your peace; for we may not make mention of the name of Yahweh.6:11 For, behold, Yahweh commands, and the great house shall be smitten with breaches, and the little house with clefts.6:12 Shall horses run upon the rock?  will one plow there with oxen?  that ye have turned justice into gall, and the fruit of righteousness into wormwood;6:13 ye that rejoice in a thing of nought, that say, Have we not taken to us horns by our own strength?6:14 For, behold, I will raise up against you a nation, O house of Israel, says Yahweh, the God of hosts; and they shall afflict you from the entrance of Hamath to the brook of the Arabah.7:1 Thus the Lord Yahweh showed me: and, behold, he formed locusts in the beginning of the shooting up of the latter growth; and, lo, it was the latter growth after the king's mowings.7:2 And it came to pass that, when they made an end of eating the grass of the land, then I said, O Lord Yahweh, forgive, I beseech you: how shall Jacob stand?  for he is small.7:3 Yahweh repented concerning this: It shall not be, says Yahweh.7:4 Thus the Lord Yahweh showed me: and, behold, the Lord Yahweh called to content by fire; and it devoured the great deep, and would have eaten up the land.7:5 Then said I, O Lord Yahweh, cease, I beseech you: how shall Jacob stand?  for he is small.7:6 Yahweh repented concerning this: this also shall not be, says the Lord Yahweh.7:7 Thus he showed me: and, behold, the Lord stood beside a wall made by a plumb-line, with a plumb-line in his hand.7:8 And Yahweh said to me, amos, what see you?  And I said, a plumb-line.  Then said the Lord, Behold, I will set a plumb-line in the midst of my people Israel; I will not again pass by them any more;7:9 and the high places of Isaac shall be desolate, and the sanctuaries of Israel shall be laid waste; and I will rise against the house of Jeroboam with the sword.7:10 Then Amaziah the priest of Beth-el sent to Jeroboam king of Israel, saying, amos has conspired against you in the midst of the house of Israel: the land is not able to bear all his words.7:11 For thus Amos says, Jeroboam shall die by the sword, and Israel shall surely be led away captive out of his land.7:12 Also Amaziah said to Amos, O you seer, go, flee away into the land of Judah, and there eat bread, and prophesy there:7:13 but prophesy not again any more at Beth-el; for it is the king's sanctuary, and it is a royal house.7:14 Then answered Amos, and said to Amaziah, I was no prophet, neither was I a prophet's son; but I was a herdsman, and a dresser of sycomore-trees:7:15 and Yahweh took me from following the flock, and Yahweh said to me, Go, prophesy to my people Israel.7:16 Now therefore hear you the word of Yahweh: You say, Prophesy not against Israel, and drop not your word against the house of Isaac;7:17 therefore thus says Yahweh: Your wife shall be a harlot in the city, and your sons and your daughters shall fall by the sword, and your land shall be divided by line; and you yourself shall die in a land that is unclean, and Israel shall surely be led away captive out of his land.8:1 Thus the Lord Yahweh showed me: and, behold, a basket of summer fruit.8:2 And he said, amos, what do you see?  And I said, a basket of summer fruit.  Then said Yahweh to me, The end is come upon my people Israel; I will not again pass by them any more.8:3 And the songs of the temple shall be wailings in that day, says the Lord Yahweh: the dead bodies shall be many: in every place shall they cast them forth with silence.8:4 Hear this, O ye that would swallow up the needy, and cause the poor of the land to fail,8:5 saying, When will the new moon be gone, that we may sell grain?  and the sabbath, that we may set forth wheat, making the ephah small, and the shekel great, and dealing falsely with balances of deceit;8:6 that we may buy the poor for silver, and the needy for a pair of shoes, and sell the refuse of the wheat?8:7 Yahweh has sworn by the excellency of Jacob, Surely I will never forget any of their works.8:8 Shall not the land tremble for this, and every one mourn that dwells therein?  yes, it shall rise up wholly like the River; and it shall be troubled and sink again, like the River of Egypt.8:9 And it shall come to pass in that day, says the Lord Yahweh, that I will cause the sun to go down at noon, and I will darken the earth in the clear day.8:10 And I will turn your feasts into mourning, and all your songs into lamentation; and I will bring sackcloth upon all loins, and baldness upon every head; and I will make it as the mourning for an only son, and the end thereof as a bitter day.8:11 Behold, the days come, says the Lord Yahweh, that I will send a famine in the land, not a famine of bread, nor a thirst for water, but of hearing the words of Yahweh.8:12 And they shall wander from sea to sea, and from the north even to the east; they shall run to and fro to seek the word of Yahweh, and shall not find it.8:13 In that day shall the fair virgins and the young men faint for thirst.8:14 They that swear by the sin of Samaria, and say, as your god, O Dan, lives; and, as the way of Beer-sheba lives; they shall fall, and never rise up again.9:1 I saw the Lord standing beside the altar: and he said, Smite the capitals, that the thresholds may shake; and break them in pieces on the head of all of them; and I will slay the last of them with the sword: there shall not one of them flee away, and there shall not one of them escape.9:2 Though they dig into Sheol, there shall my hand take them; and though they climb up to heaven, there will I bring them down.9:3 And though they hide themselves in the top of Carmel, I will search and take them out there; and though they be hid from my sight in the bottom of the sea, there will I command the serpent, and it shall bite them.9:4 And though they go into captivity before their enemies, there will I command the sword, and it shall slay them: and I will set my eyes upon them for evil, and not for good.9:5 For the Lord, Yahweh of hosts, is he that touches the land and it melts, and all that dwell therein shall mourn; and it shall rise up wholly like the River, and shall sink again, like the River of Egypt;9:6 it is he that builds his chambers in the heavens, and has founded his vault upon the earth; he that calls for the waters of the sea, and pours them out upon the face of the earth; Yahweh is his name.9:7 Are ye not as the children of the Ethiopians to me, O children of Israel?  says Yahweh.  Have not I brought up Israel out of the land of Egypt, and the Philistines from Caphtor, and the Syrians from Kir?9:8 Behold, the eyes of the Lord Yahweh are upon the sinful kingdom, and I will destroy it from off the face of the earth; save that I will not utterly destroy the house of Jacob, says Yahweh.9:9 For, lo, I will command, and I will sift the house of Israel among all the nations, like as grain is sifted in a sieve, yet shall not the least kernel fall upon the earth.9:10 All the sinners of my people shall die by the sword, who say, The evil shall not overtake nor meet us.9:11 In that day will I raise up the tabernacle of David that is fallen, and close up the breaches thereof; and I will raise up its ruins, and I will build it as in the days of old;9:12 that they may possess the remnant of Edom, and all the nations that are called by my name, says Yahweh that does this.9:13 Behold, the days come, says Yahweh, that the plowman shall overtake the reaper, and the treader of grapes him that sows seed; and the mountains shall drop sweet wine, and all the hills shall melt.9:14 And I will bring back the captivity of my people Israel, and they shall build the waste cities, and inhabit them; and they shall plant vineyards, and drink the wine thereof; they shall also make gardens, and eat the fruit of them.9:15 And I will plant them upon their land, and they shall no more be plucked up out of their land which I have given them, says Yahweh your God.End of AmosObadiah1:1 The vision of Obadiah.  Thus says the Lord Yahweh concerning Edom: We have heard tidings from Yahweh, and an ambassador is sent among the nations, saying, arise ye, and let us rise up against her in battle.1:2 Behold, I have made you small among the nations: you are greatly despised.1:3 The pride of your heart has deceived you, O you that dwell in the clefts of the rock, whose habitation is high; that says in his heart, Who shall bring me down to the ground?1:4 Though you mount on high like the eagle, and though your nest be set among the stars, I will bring you down from there, says Yahweh.1:5 If thieves came to you, if robbers by night (how are you cut off!), would they not steal only till they had enough?  if grape-gatherers came to you, would they not leave some gleaning grapes?1:6 How are the things of Esau searched! how are his hidden treasures sought out!1:7 All the men of your confederacy have brought you on your way, even to the border: the men that were at peace with you have deceived you, and prevailed against you; they that eat your bread lay a snare under you: there is no understanding in him.1:8 Shall I not in that day, says Yahweh, destroy the wise men out of Edom, and understanding out of the mount of Esau?1:9 And your mighty men, O Teman, shall be dismayed, to the end that every one may be cut off from the mount of Esau by slaughter.1:10 For the violence done to your brother Jacob, shame shall cover you, and you shall be cut off for ever.1:11 In the day that you stood on the other side, in the day that strangers carried away his substance, and foreigners entered into his gates, and cast lots upon Jerusalem, even you were as one of them.1:12 But look not on the day of your brother in the day of his disaster, and rejoice not over the children of Judah in the day of their destruction; neither speak proudly in the day of distress.1:13 Enter not into the gate of my people in the day of their calamity; yes, look not you on their affliction in the day of their calamity, neither lay ye hands on their substance in the day of their calamity.1:14 And stand not in the crossway, to cut off those of his that escape; and deliver not up those of his that remain in the day of distress.1:15 For the day of Yahweh is near upon all the nations: as you have done, it shall be done to you; your dealing shall return upon your own head.1:16 For as ye have drunk upon my holy mountain, so shall all the nations drink continually; yes, they shall drink, and swallow down, and shall be as though they had not been.1:17 But in mount Zion there shall be those that escape, and it shall be holy; and the house of Jacob shall possess their possessions.1:18 And the house of Jacob shall be a fire, and the house of Joseph a flame, and the house of Esau for stubble, and they shall burn among them, and devour them; and there shall not be any remaining to the house of Esau; for Yahweh has spoken it.1:19 And they of the South shall possess the mount of Esau, and they of the lowland the Philistines; and they shall possess the field of Ephraim, and the field of Samaria; and Benjamin shall possess Gilead.1:20 And the captives of this host of the children of Israel, that are among the Canaanites, shall possess even to Zarephath; and the captives of Jerusalem, that are in Sepharad, shall possess the cities of the South.1:21 And saviours shall come up on mount Zion to judge the mount of Esau; and the kingdom shall be Yahweh's.End of ObadiahJonah1:1 Now the word of Yahweh came to Jonah the son of Amittai, as follows:1:2 "Get up, go to Nineveh, that great city, and cry against it; for their wickedness is come up before me."1:3 But Jonah got up to flee to Tarshish, away from the presence of Yahweh; and he went down to Joppa, and found a ship going to Tarshish.  So he paid the fare for it, and got down into it to go with them to Tarshish, away from the presence of Yahweh.1:4 But Yahweh sent out a great wind upon the sea, and there was a mighty storm upon the sea, such that the ship was likely to be wrecked.1:5 Then the mariners were afraid, and they cried every man to his god.  And they threw off the wares that were in the ship into the sea, to lighten it for them.  But Jonah had since gone down into the far interior parts of the ship; and he laid down, and was fast asleep.1:6 So the shipmaster came to him, and said to him, "What do you mean, O sleeper?  Arise, call upon your God, if so be that God will think upon us, that we perish not."1:7 And they said every one to his fellow, "Come, and let us cast lots, that we may know for whose cause this evil is upon us."  So they cast lots, and the lot fell upon Jonah.1:8 Then they were saying to him, "Please tell us, we ask of you, for whose cause is this evil upon us?  What is your occupation?  And where do you come from?  What is your country?  And of what people are you?"1:9 And he said to them, "I am a Hebrew; and I fear Yahweh, the God of heaven, who has made the sea and the dry land."1:10 Then were the men exceedingly afraid, and said to him, "What is this that you have done?"  (You see, the men knew that he was fleeing from the presence of Yahweh, because he had told them so.)1:11 Then they said to him, "What shall we do to you, so that the sea will be calm for us?"  For the sea grew more and more tempestuous.1:12 And he said to them, "Take me up, and throw me out into the sea, and that way the sea will be calm for you.  For I know it is for my sake that this great storm is upon you."1:13 Nevertheless the men rowed hard to get them back to the land.  But they could not, because the sea grew more and more tempestuous against them.1:14 Wherefore they cried out to Yahweh, and said, "We beseech you, O Yahweh, we beseech you, do not let us perish for this man's life, and do not lay upon us innocent blood.  For you, O Yahweh, have done as it pleased you."1:15 So they took Jonah up, and threw him out into the sea.  And the sea ceased from its raging.1:16 Then the men feared Yahweh exceedingly; and they offered a sacrifice to Yahweh, and made vows.1:17 And Yahweh prepared a great fish to swallow up Jonah; and Jonah was in the belly of the fish three days and three nights.2:1 Then Jonah prayed to Yahweh his God out of the fish's belly.2:2 And he said, "I called by reason of my affliction to Yahweh, and he answered me.  Out of the belly of Sheol cried I, and you heard my voice.2:3 For you did cast me into the depth, in the heart of the seas, and the flood was round about me; All your waves and your billows passed over me.2:4 And I said, I am cast out from before your eyes; Yet I will look again toward your holy temple.2:5 The waters compassed me about, even to the soul; The deep was round about me; The weeds were wrapped about my head.2:6 I went down to the bottoms of the mountains; The earth with its bars closed upon me for ever: Yet have you brought up my life from the pit, O Yahweh my God.2:7 When my soul fainted within me, I remembered Yahweh; And my prayer came in toward you, into your holy temple.2:8 They that regard lying vanities forsake their own mercy.2:9 But I will sacrifice to you with the voice of thanksgiving; I will pay that which I have vowed.  Salvation is of Yahweh."2:10 And Yahweh spoke to the fish, and it vomited out Jonah upon the dry land.3:1 And the word of Yahweh came to Jonah the second time, as follows:3:2 "Arise, go to Nineveh, that great city, and preach to it the preaching that I bid you."3:3 So Jonah arose, and went to Nineveh, according to the word of Yahweh.  Now Nineveh was an exceedingly great city, three days' journey across.3:4 And Jonah began to enter into the city a day's journey, and he cried, and said, "Yet forty days, and Nineveh shall be overthrown."3:5 And the people of Nineveh believed God; and they proclaimed a fast, and put on sackcloth, from the greatest of them even to the least of them.3:6 And the reports reached the king of Nineveh, and he arose from his throne, and laid his robe from him, and covered himself with sackcloth, and sat in ashes.3:7 And he made proclamation and published through Nineveh by the decree of the king and his nobles, saying, "Let neither man nor beast, herd nor flock, taste anything; let them not feed, nor drink water;3:8 but let them be covered with sackcloth, both man and beast, and let them cry mightily to God: yes, let them turn every one from his evil way, and from the violence that is in his hands.3:9 Who knows whether God will not turn and repent, and turn away from his fierce anger, so that we perish not?"3:10 And God saw their works, that they turned from their evil way; and God repented of the evil which he said he would do to them; and he did not do it.4:1 But it displeased Jonah exceedingly, and he was angry.4:2 And he prayed to Yahweh, and said, "I pray you, O Yahweh, was not this my saying, when I was yet in my country?  Therefore I hastened to flee to Tarshish; for I knew that you are a gracious God, and merciful, slow to anger, and abundant in lovingkindness, and you repent of the evil.4:3 Therefore now, O Yahweh, take, I beseech you, my life from me; for it is better for me to die than to live."4:4 And Yahweh said, "Do you do well to be angry?"4:5 Then Jonah went out of the city, and sat on the east side of the city, and there made him a booth, and sat under it in the shade, till he might see what would become of the city.4:6 And Yahweh God prepared a gourd, and made it to come up over Jonah, that it might be a shade over his head, to deliver him from his evil situation.  So Jonah was exceedingly glad because of the gourd.4:7 But God prepared a worm when the morning rose the next day, and it struck the gourd, such that it withered.4:8 And it came to pass, when the sun arose, that God prepared a sultry east wind; and the sun beat upon the head of Jonah, such that he fainted, and requested for himself that he might die, and said, "It is better for me to die than to live."4:9 And God said to Jonah, "Do you do well to be angry for the gourd?" And he said, "I do well to be angry, even to death."4:10 And Yahweh said, "You have had regard for the gourd, for which you have not labored, neither made it grow; which came up in a night, and perished in a night:4:11 and I should not have regard for Nineveh, that great city, in which are more than 120,000 persons that cannot discern between their right hand and their left hand; and also much cattle?"End of JonahMicah1:1 The word of Yahweh that came to Micah the Morashtite in the days of Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah, which he saw concerning Samaria and Jerusalem.1:2 Hear, ye peoples, all of you: hearken, O earth, and all that therein is: and let the Lord Yahweh be witness against you, the Lord from his holy temple.1:3 For, behold, Yahweh comes forth out of his place, and will come down, and tread upon the high places of the earth.1:4 And the mountains shall be melted under him, and the valleys shall be cleft, as wax before the fire, as waters that are poured down a steep place.1:5 For the transgression of Jacob is all this, and for the sins of the house of Israel.  What is the transgression of Jacob?  is it not Samaria?  and what are the high places of Judah?  are they not Jerusalem?1:6 Therefore I will make Samaria as a heap of the field, and as places for planting vineyards; and I will pour down the stones thereof into the valley, and I will uncover the foundations thereof.1:7 And all her graven images shall be beaten to pieces, and all her wages shall be burned with fire, and all her idols will I lay desolate; for from the fee of a harlot has she gathered them, and to the fee of a harlot shall they return.1:8 For this will I lament and wail; I will go stripped and naked; I will make a wailing like the jackals, and a lamentation like the ostriches.1:9 For her wounds are incurable; for it is come even to Judah; it reaches to the gate of my people, even to Jerusalem.1:10 Tell it not in Gath, weep not at all: at Beth-le-aphrah have I rolled myself in the dust.1:11 Pass away, O inhabitant of Shaphir, in nakedness and shame: the inhabitant of Zaanan is not come forth; the wailing of Beth-ezel shall take from you the stay thereof.1:12 For the inhabitant of Maroth waits anxiously for good, because evil is come down from Yahweh to the gate of Jerusalem.1:13 Bind the chariot to the swift steed, O inhabitant of Lachish: she was the beginning of sin to the daughter of Zion; for the transgressions of Israel were found in you.1:14 Therefore shall you give a parting gift to Moresheth-gath: the houses of Achzib shall be a deceitful thing to the kings of Israel.1:15 I will yet bring to you, O inhabitant of Mareshah, him that shall possess you: the glory of Israel shall come even to Adullam.1:16 Make you bald, and cut off your hair for the children of your delight: enlarge your baldness as the eagle; for they are gone into captivity from you.2:1 Woe to them that devise iniquity and work evil upon their beds! when the morning is light, they practise it, because it is in the power of their hand.2:2 And they covet fields, and seize them; and houses, and take them away: and they oppress a man and his house, even a man and his heritage.2:3 Therefore thus says Yahweh: Behold, against this family do I devise an evil, from which ye shall not remove your necks, neither shall ye walk haughtily; for it is an evil time.2:4 In that day shall they take up a parable against you, and lament with a doleful lamentation, and say, We are utterly ruined: he changes the portion of my people: how does he remove it from me! to the rebellious he divides our fields.2:5 Therefore you shall have none that shall cast the line by lot in the assembly of Yahweh.2:6 Prophesy ye not, thus they prophesy.  They shall not prophesy to these: reproaches shall not depart.2:7 Shall it be said, O house of Jacob, "Is the Spirit of Yahweh impatient?  are these his doings?  Do not my words do good to him that walks uprightly?"2:8 But of late my people is risen up as an enemy: ye strip the robe from off the garment from them that pass by securely as men averse from war.2:9 The women of my people ye cast out from their pleasant houses; from their young children ye take away my glory for ever.2:10 Arise ye, and depart; for this is not your resting place; because of uncleanness that destroys, even with a grievous destruction.2:11 If a man walking in a spirit of falsehood do lie, saying, I will prophesy to you of wine and of strong drink; he shall even be the prophet of this people.2:12 I will surely assemble, O Jacob, all of you; I will surely gather the remnant of Israel; I will put them together as the sheep of Bozrah, as a flock in the midst of their pasture; they shall make great noise by reason of the multitude men.2:13 The breaker is gone up before them: they have broken forth and passed on to the gate, and are gone out thereat; and their king is passed on before them, and Yahweh at the head of them.3:1 And I said, Hear, I pray you, ye heads of Jacob, and rulers of the house of Israel: is it not for you to know justice?3:2 ye who hate the good, and love the evil; who pluck off their skin from off them, and their flesh from off their bones;3:3 who also eat the flesh of my people, and flay their skin from off them, and break their bones, and chop them in pieces, as for the pot, and as flesh within the caldron.3:4 Then shall they cry to Yahweh, but he will not answer them; yes, he will hide his face from them at that time, according as they have wrought evil in their doings.3:5 Thus says Yahweh concerning the prophets that make my people to err; that bite with their teeth, and cry, Peace; and whoso puts not into their mouths, they even prepare war against him:3:6 Therefore it shall be night to you, that ye shall have no vision; and it shall be dark to you, that ye shall not divine; and the sun shall go down upon the prophets, and the day shall be black over them.3:7 And the seers shall be put to shame, and the diviners confounded; yes, they shall all cover their lips; for there is no answer of God.3:8 But as for me, I am full of power by the Spirit of Yahweh, and of judgment, and of might, to declare to Jacob his transgression, and to Israel his sin.3:9 Hear this, I pray you, ye heads of the house of Jacob, and rulers of the house of Israel, that abhor justice, and pervert all equity.3:10 They build up Zion with blood, and Jerusalem with iniquity.3:11 The heads thereof judge for reward, and the priests thereof teach for hire, and the prophets thereof divine for money: yet they lean upon Yahweh, and say, Is not Yahweh in the midst of us?  no evil shall come upon us.3:12 Therefore shall Zion for your sake be plowed as a field, and Jerusalem shall become heaps, and the mountain of the house as the high places of a forest.4:1 But in the latter days it shall come to pass, that the mountain of Yahweh's house shall be established on the top of the mountains, and it shall be exalted above the hills; and peoples shall flow to it.4:2 And many nations shall go and say, Come ye, and let us go up to the mountain of Yahweh, and to the house of the God of Jacob; and he will teach us of his ways, and we will walk in his paths.  For out of Zion shall go forth the law, and the word of Yahweh from Jerusalem;4:3 and he will judge between many peoples, and will decide concerning strong nations afar off: and they shall beat their swords into plowshares, and their spears into pruning-hooks; nation shall not lift up sword against nation, neither shall they learn war any more.4:4 But they shall sit every man under his vine and under his fig-tree; and none shall make them afraid: for the mouth of Yahweh of hosts has spoken it.4:5 For all the peoples walk every one in the name of his god; and we will walk in the name of Yahweh our God for ever and ever.4:6 In that day, says Yahweh, will I assemble that which is lame, and I will gather that which is driven away, and that which I have afflicted;4:7 and I will make that which was lame a remnant, and that which was cast far off a strong nation: and Yahweh will reign over them in mount Zion from from now on even for ever.4:8 And you, O tower of the flock, the hill of the daughter of Zion, to you shall it come, yes, the former dominion shall come, the kingdom of the daughter of Jerusalem.4:9 Now why do you cry out aloud?  Is there no king in you, is your counsellor perished, that pangs have taken hold of you as of a woman in travail?4:10 Be in pain, and labor to bring forth, O daughter of Zion, like a woman in travail; for now shall you go forth out of the city, and shall dwell in the field, and shall come even to Babylon: there shall you be rescued; there will Yahweh redeem you from the hand of your enemies.4:11 And now many nations are assembled against you, that say, Let her be defiled, and let our eye see our desire upon Zion.4:12 But they know not the thoughts of Yahweh, neither understand they his counsel; for he has gathered them as the sheaves to the threshing-floor.4:13 Arise and thresh, O daughter of Zion; for I will make your horn iron, and I will make your hoofs brass; and you shall beat in pieces many peoples: and I will devote their gain to Yahweh, and their substance to the Lord of the whole earth.5:1 Now shall you gather yourself in troops, O daughter of troops: he has laid siege against us; they shall strike the judge of Israel with a rod upon the cheek.5:2 But you, Beth-lehem Ephrathah, which are little to be among the thousands of Judah, out of you shall one come forth to me that is to be ruler in Israel; whose goings forth are from of old, from everlasting.5:3 Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she who travails has brought forth: then the residue of his brethren shall return to the children of Israel.5:4 And he shall stand, and shall feed his flock in the strength of Yahweh, in the majesty of the name of Yahweh his God: and they shall abide; for now shall he be great to the ends of the earth.5:5 And this man shall be our peace.  When the Assyrian shall come into our land, and when he shall tread in our palaces, then shall we raise against him seven shepherds, and eight principal men.5:6 And they shall waste the land of Assyria with the sword, and the land of Nimrod in the entrances thereof: and he shall deliver us from the Assyrian, when he comes into our land, and when he treads within our border.5:7 And the remnant of Jacob shall be in the midst of many peoples as dew from Yahweh, as showers upon the grass, that tarry not for man, nor wait for the sons of men.5:8 And the remnant of Jacob shall be among the nations, in the midst of many peoples, as a lion among the beasts of the forest, as a young lion among the flocks of sheep; who, if he go through, treads down and tears in pieces, and there is none to deliver.5:9 Let your hand be lifted up above your adversaries, and let all your enemies be cut off.5:10 And it shall come to pass in that day, says Yahweh, that I will cut off your horses out of the midst of you, and will destroy your chariots:5:11 and I will cut off the cities of your land, and will throw down all your strongholds.5:12 And I will cut off witchcrafts out of your hand; and you shall have no more soothsayers:5:13 and I will cut off your graven images and your pillars out of the midst of you; and you shall no more worship the work of your hands;5:14 and I will pluck up your Asherim out of the midst of you; and I will destroy your cities.5:15 And I will execute vengeance in anger and wrath upon the nations which hearkened not.6:1 Hear ye now what Yahweh says: Arise, contend you before the mountains, and let the hills hear your voice.6:2 Hear, O ye mountains, Yahweh's controversy, and ye enduring foundations of the earth; for Yahweh has a controversy with his people, and he will contend with Israel.6:3 O my people, what have I done to you?  and in what way have I wearied you?  testify against me.6:4 For I brought you up out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed you out of the house of bondage; and I sent before you Moses, aaron, and Miriam.6:5 O my people, remember now what Balak king of Moab devised, and what Balaam the son of Beor answered him; remember from Shittim to Gilgal, that ye may know the righteous acts of Yahweh.6:6 With which shall I come before Yahweh, and bow myself before the high God?  shall I come before him with burnt offerings, with calves a year old?6:7 will Yahweh be pleased with thousands of rams, or with ten thousands of rivers of oil?  shall I give my first-born for my transgression, the fruit of my body for the sin of my soul?6:8 He has shown you, O man, what is good.  And what does Yahweh require of you, but to do justly, and to love kindness, and to walk humbly with your God?6:9 The voice of Yahweh cries to the city, and the man of wisdom will see your name: hear ye the rod, and who has appointed it.6:10 Are there yet treasures of wickedness in the house of the wicked, and a scant measure that is abominable?6:11 Shall I be pure with wicked balances, and with a bag of deceitful weights?6:12 For the rich men thereof are full of violence, and the inhabitants thereof have spoken lies, and their tongue is deceitful in their mouth.6:13 Therefore I also have smitten you with a grievous wound; I have made you desolate because of your sins.6:14 You shall eat, but not be satisfied; and your humiliation shall be in the midst of you: and you shall put away, but shall not save; and that which you save will I give up to the sword.6:15 You shall sow, but shall not reap; you shall tread the olives, but shall not anoint you with oil; and the vintage, but shall not drink the wine.6:16 For the statutes of Omri are kept, and all the works of the house of Ahab, and ye walk in their counsels; that I may make you a desolation, and the inhabitants thereof a hissing: and ye shall bear the reproach of my people.7:1 Woe is me! for I am as when they have gathered the summer fruits, as the grape gleanings of the vintage: there is no cluster to eat; my soul desires the first-ripe fig.7:2 The godly man is perished out of the earth, and there is none upright among men: they all lie in wait for blood; they hunt every man his brother with a net.7:3 Their hands are upon that which is evil to do it diligently; the prince asks, and the judge is ready for a reward; and the great man, he utters the evil desire of his soul: thus they weave it together.7:4 The best of them is as a brier; the most upright is worse than a thorn hedge: the day of your watchmen, even your visitation, is come; now shall be their perplexity.7:5 Trust ye not in a neighbor; put ye not confidence in a friend; keep the doors of your mouth from her that lies in your bosom.7:6 For the son dishonors the father, the daughter rises up against her mother, the daughter-in-law against her mother-in-law; a man's enemies are the men of his own house.7:7 But as for me, I will look to Yahweh; I will wait for the God of my salvation: my God will hear me.7:8 Rejoice not against me, O my enemy: when I fall, I shall arise; when I sit in darkness, Yahweh will be a light to me.7:9 I will bear the indignation of Yahweh, because I have sinned against him, until he plead my cause, and execute judgment for me: he will bring me forth to the light, and I shall behold his righteousness.7:10 Then my enemy shall see it, and shame shall cover her who said to me, Where is Yahweh your God?  Mine eyes shall see my desire upon her; now shall she be trodden down as the mire of the streets.7:11 A day for building your walls! in that day shall the decree be far removed.7:12 In that day shall they come to you from Assyria and the cities of Egypt, and from Egypt even to the River, and from sea to sea, and from mountain to mountain.7:13 Yet shall the land be desolate because of them that dwell therein, for the fruit of their doings.7:14 Feed your people with your rod, the flock of your heritage, which dwell solitarily, in the forest in the midst of Carmel: let them feed in Bashan and Gilead, as in the days of old.7:15 As in the days of your coming forth out of the land of Egypt will I show to them marvellous things.7:16 The nations shall see and be ashamed of all their might; they shall lay their hand upon their mouth; their ears shall be deaf.7:17 They shall lick the dust like a serpent; like crawling things of the earth they shall come trembling out of their close places; they shall come with fear to Yahweh our God, and shall be afraid because of you.7:18 Who is a God like to you, that pardons iniquity, and passes over the transgression of the remnant of his heritage?  he retains not his anger for ever, because he delights in lovingkindness.7:19 He will again have compassion upon us; he will tread our iniquities under foot; and you will cast all their sins into the depths of the sea.7:20 You will perform the truth to Jacob, and the lovingkindness to Abraham, which you have sworn to our fathers from the days of old.End of MicahNahum1:1 The burden concerning Nineveh.  The book of the vision of Nahum the Elkoshite.1:2 Yahweh is a jealous God and avenges; Yahweh avenges and is full of wrath; Yahweh takes vengeance on his adversaries, and he reserves wrath for his enemies.1:3 Yahweh is slow to anger, and great in power, and will by no means clear the guilty: Yahweh has his way in the whirlwind and in the storm, and the clouds are the dust of his feet.1:4 He rebukes the sea, and makes it dry, and dries up all the rivers: Bashan languishes, and Carmel; and the flower of Lebanon languishes.1:5 The mountains quake at him, and the hills melt; and the earth is upheaved at his presence, yes, the world, and all that dwell therein.1:6 Who can stand before his indignation?  and who can abide in the fierceness of his anger?  his wrath is poured out like fire, and the rocks are broken asunder by him.1:7 Yahweh is good, a stronghold in the day of trouble; and he knows them that take refuge in him.1:8 But with an over-running flood he will make a full end of her place, and will pursue his enemies into darkness.1:9 What do ye devise against Yahweh?  he will make a full end; affliction shall not rise up the second time.1:10 For entangled like thorns, and drunken as with their drink, they are consumed utterly as dry stubble.1:11 There is one gone forth out of you, that devises evil against Yahweh, that counsels wickedness.1:12 Thus says Yahweh: Though they be in full strength, and likewise many, even so shall they be cut down, and he shall pass away.  Though I have afflicted you, I will afflict you no more.1:13 And now will I break his yoke from off you, and will burst your bonds in sunder.1:14 And Yahweh has given commandment concerning you, that no more of your name be sown: out of the house of your gods will I cut off the graven image and the molten image; I will make your grave; for you are vile.1:15 Behold, upon the mountains the feet of him that brings good tidings, that publishes peace! Keep your feasts, O Judah, perform your vows; for the wicked one shall no more pass through you; he is utterly cut off.2:1 He that dashes in pieces is come up against you: keep the fortress, watch the way, make your loins strong, fortify your power mightily.2:2 For Yahweh restores the excellency of Jacob, as the excellency of Israel; for the emptiers have emptied them out, and destroyed their vine-branches.2:3 The shield of his mighty men is made red, the valiant men are in scarlet: the chariots flash with steel in the day of his preparation, and the cypress spears are brandished.2:4 The chariots rage in the streets; they rush to and fro in the broad ways: the appearance of them is like torches; they run like the lightnings.2:5 He remembers his nobles: they stumble in their march; they make haste to the wall thereof, and the mantelet is prepared.2:6 The gates of the rivers are opened, and the palace is dissolved.2:7 And it is decreed: she is uncovered, she is carried away; and her handmaids moan as with the voice of doves, beating upon their breasts.2:8 But Nineveh has been from of old like a pool of water: yet they flee away.  Stand, stand, they cry; but no one is looking back.2:9 Take ye the spoil of silver, take the spoil of gold; for there is no end of the store, the glory of all goodly furniture.2:10 She is empty, and void, and waste; and the heart melts, and the knees knock together, and anguish is in all loins, and the faces of them all are grown pale.2:11 Where is the den of the lions, and the feeding-place of the young lions, where the lion and the lioness walked, the lion's whelp, and none made them afraid?2:12 The lion did tear in pieces enough for his whelps, and strangled for his lionesses, and filled his caves with prey, and his dens with ravin.2:13 Behold, I am against you, says Yahweh of hosts, and I will burn her chariots in the smoke, and the sword shall devour your young lions; and I will cut off your prey from the earth, and the voice of your messengers shall no more be heard.3:1 Woe to the bloody city! it is all full of lies and rapine; the prey departs not.3:2 The noise of the whip, and the noise of the rattling of wheels, and prancing horses, and bounding chariots,3:3 the horseman mounting, and the flashing sword, and the glittering spear, and a multitude of slain, and a great heap of corpses, and there is no end of the bodies; they stumble upon their bodies;-3:4 because of the multitude of the whoredoms of the well-favored harlot, the mistress of witchcrafts, that sells nations through her whoredoms, and families through her witchcrafts.3:5 Behold, I am against you, says Yahweh of hosts, and I will uncover your skirts upon your face; and I will show the nations your nakedness, and the kingdoms your shame.3:6 And I will cast abominable filth upon you, and make you vile, and will set you as a gazing-stock.3:7 And it shall come to pass, that all they that look upon you shall flee from you, and say, Nineveh is laid waste: who will bemoan her?  where shall I seek comforters for you?3:8 Are you better than No-amon, that was situate among the rivers, that had the waters round about her; whose rampart was the sea, and her wall was of the sea?3:9 Ethiopia and Egypt were her strength, and it was infinite; Put and Lubim were your helpers.3:10 Yet was she carried away, she went into captivity; her young children also were dashed in pieces at the head of all the streets; and they cast lots for her honorable men, and all her great men were bound in chains.3:11 You also shall be drunken; you shall be hid; you also shall seek a stronghold because of the enemy.3:12 All your fortresses shall be like fig-trees with the first-ripe figs: if they be shaken, they fall into the mouth of the eater.3:13 Behold, your people in the midst of you are women; the gates of your land are set wide open to your enemies: the fire has devoured your bars.3:14 Draw you water for the siege; strengthen your fortresses; go into the clay, and tread the mortar; make strong the brickkiln.3:15 There shall the fire devour you; the sword shall cut you off; it shall devour you like the canker-worm: make yourself many as the canker-worm; make yourself many as the locust.3:16 You have multiplied your merchants above the stars of heaven: the canker-worm ravages, and flees away.3:17 Your princes are as the locusts, and your marshals as the swarms of grasshoppers, which encamp in the hedges in the cold day, but when the sun arises they flee away, and their place is not known where they are.3:18 Your shepherds slumber, O king of Assyria; your nobles are at rest; your people are scattered upon the mountains, and there is none to gather them.3:19 There is no assuaging of your hurt: your wound is grievous: all that hear the report of you clap their hands over you; for upon whom has not your wickedness passed continually?End of NahumHabakkuk1:1 The burden which Habakkuk the prophet did see.1:2 O Yahweh, how long shall I cry, and you will not hear?  I cry out to you of violence, and you will not save.1:3 Why do you show me iniquity, and look upon perverseness?  for destruction and violence are before me; and there is strife, and contention rises up.1:4 Therefore the law is slacked, and justice does never go forth; for the wicked does compass about the righteous; therefore justice goes forth perverted.1:5 Behold ye among the nations, and look, and wonder marvellously; for I am working a work in your days, which ye will not believe though it be told you.1:6 For, lo, I raise up the Chaldeans, that bitter and hasty nation, that march through the breadth of the earth, to possess dwelling-places that are not theirs.1:7 They are terrible and dreadful; their judgment and their dignity proceed from themselves.1:8 Their horses also are swifter than leopards, and are more fierce than the evening wolves; and their horsemen press proudly on: yes, their horsemen come from far; they fly as an eagle that hastens to devour.1:9 They come all of them for violence; the set of their faces is forward; and they gather captives as the sand.1:10 Yes, he scoffs at kings, and princes are a derision to him; he derides every stronghold; for he heaps up dust, and takes it.1:11 Then shall he sweep by like a wind and pass over, and be guilty, whose own might is his god.1:12 Are you not from everlasting, O Yahweh my God, my Holy One?  we shall not die.  O Yahweh, you have ordained him for judgment; and you, O Rock, have established him for correction.1:13 You that are of purer eyes than to behold evil, and who cannot look on perverseness, why do you look upon them that deal treacherously, and hold your peace when the wicked swallows up the man that is more righteous than he;1:14 and make men as the fishes of the sea, as the creeping things, that have no ruler over them?1:15 He takes up all of them with the angle, he catches them in his net, and gathers them in his drag: therefore he rejoices and is glad.1:16 Therefore he sacrifices to his net, and burns incense to his drag; because by them his portion is fat, and his food plenteous.1:17 Shall he therefore empty his net, and spare not to slay the nations continually?2:1 I will stand upon my watch, and set me upon the tower, and will look forth to see what he will speak with me, and what I shall answer concerning my complaint.2:2 And Yahweh answered me, and said, Write the vision, and make it plain upon tablets, that he may run that reads it.2:3 For still the vision anticipates its appointed time, and hastens toward the end, and shall not lie.  Though it tarry, wait for it; because it will surely come, it will not delay.2:4 Behold, his soul is puffed up, it is not upright in him; but the righteous shall live by his faith.2:5 Yes, moreover, wine is treacherous, a haughty man, that keeps not at home; who enlarges his desire as Sheol, and he is as death, and cannot be satisfied, but gathers to him all nations, and heaps to him all peoples.2:6 Shall not all these take up a parable against him, and a taunting proverb against him, and say, Woe to him that increases that which is not his! how long?  and that loads himself with pledges!2:7 Shall they not rise up suddenly that shall bite you, and awake that shall vex you, and you shall be for booty to them?2:8 Because you have plundered many nations, all the remnant of the peoples shall plunder you, because of men's blood, and for the violence done to the land, to the city and to all that dwell therein.2:9 Woe to him that gets an evil gain for his house, that he may set his nest on high, that he may be delivered from the hand of evil!2:10 You have devised shame to your house, by cutting off many peoples, and have sinned against your soul.2:11 For the stone shall cry out of the wall, and the beam out of the timber shall answer it.2:12 Woe to him that builds a town with blood, and establishes a city by iniquity!2:13 Behold, is it not from Yahweh of hosts that the peoples labor for the fire, and the nations weary themselves for vanity?2:14 For the earth shall be filled with the knowledge of the glory of Yahweh, as the waters cover the sea.2:15 Woe to him that gives his neighbor drink, to you that add your venom, and make him drunken also, that you may look on their nakedness!2:16 You are filled with shame, and not glory: drink you also, and be as one uncircumcised; the cup of Yahweh's right hand shall come round to you, and foul shame shall be upon your glory.2:17 For the violence done to Lebanon shall cover you, and the destruction of the beasts, which made them afraid; because of men's blood, and for the violence done to the land, to the city and to all that dwell therein.2:18 What profits the graven image, that the maker thereof has graven it; the molten image, even the teacher of lies, that he that fashions its form trusts in it, to make dumb idols?2:19 Woe to him that says to the wood, awake; to the dumb stone, arise! Shall this teach?  Behold, it is overlaid with gold and silver, and there is no breath at all in the midst of it.2:20 But Yahweh is in his holy temple: let all the earth keep silence before him.3:1 A prayer of Habakkuk the prophet, set to Shigionoth.3:2 O Yahweh, I have heard the report of you, and am afraid: O Yahweh, revive your work in the midst of the years; In the midst of the years make it known; In wrath remember mercy.3:3 God came from Teman,  and the Holy One from Mount Paran.   Selah.  His glory covered the heavens, and the earth was full of his praise.3:4 And his brightness was as the light; He had rays coming forth from his hand; And there was his power hidden.3:5 Before him went the pestilence, and fiery bolts went forth at his feet.3:6 He stood, and measured the earth; He beheld, and drove asunder the nations; And the eternal mountains were scattered; The everlasting hills did bow; His goings were as of old.3:7 I saw the tents of Cushan  in distress; the tent curtains of the land of Midian  trembling.3:8 Was Yahweh displeased with the rivers?  Was your anger against the rivers, Or your wrath against the sea, That you did ride upon your horses, Upon your chariots of salvation?3:9 Your bow was made quite bare; The oaths to the tribes were a sure word.  Selah.  You did divide the earth with rivers.3:10 The mountains saw you, and were afraid; The tempest of waters passed by; The deep uttered its voice, and lifted up its hands on high.3:11 The sun and moon stood still in their habitation, at the light of your arrows they went away, at the shining of your glittering spear.3:12 You did march though the land in indignation; You did thresh the nations in anger.3:13 You went forth for the salvation of your people, For the salvation of your anointed; You wound the head out of the house of the wicked man, Laying bare the foundation even to the neck.  Selah.3:14 You did pierce with his own staves the head of his warriors: They came as a whirlwind to scatter me; Their rejoicing was as to devour the poor secretly.3:15 You did tread the sea with your horses, The heap of mighty waters.3:16 I heard, and my body trembled, My lips quivered at the voice; Rottennessenters into my bones, and I tremble in my place; Because I must wait quietly for the day of trouble, For the coming up of the people that invades us.3:17 For though the fig-tree shall not flourish, Neither shall fruit be in the vines; The labor of the olive shall fail, and the fields shall yield no food; The flock shall be cut off from the fold, and there shall be no herd in the stalls:3:18 Yet I will rejoice in Yahweh, I will joy in the God of my salvation.3:19 Yahweh, the Lord, is my strength; And he makes my feet like hinds' feet, and will make me to walk upon my high places.End of HabbakukZephaniah1:1 The word of Yahweh which came to Zephaniah the son of Cushi, the son of Gedaliah, the son of Amariah, the son of Hezekiah, in the days of Josiah the son of Amon, king of Judah.1:2 I will utterly consume all things from off the face of the ground, says Yahweh.1:3 I will consume man and beast; I will consume the birds of the heavens, and the fishes of the sea, and the stumblingblocks with the wicked; and I will cut off man from off the face of the ground, says Yahweh.1:4 And I will stretch out my hand upon Judah, and upon all the inhabitants of Jerusalem; and I will cut off the remnant of Baal from this place, and the name of the Chemarim with the priests;1:5 and them that worship the host of heaven upon the housetops; and them that worship, that swear to Yahweh and swear by Malcam;1:6 and them that are turned back from following Yahweh; and those that have not sought Yahweh, nor inquired after him.1:7 Hold your peace at the presence of the Lord Yahweh; for the day of Yahweh is at hand: for Yahweh has prepared a sacrifice, he has consecrated his guests.1:8 And it shall come to pass in the day of Yahweh's sacrifice, that I will punish the princes, and the king's sons, and all such as are clothed with foreign apparel.1:9 And in that day I will punish all those that leap over the threshold, that fill their master's house with violence and deceit.1:10 And in that day, says Yahweh, there shall be the noise of a cry from the fish gate, and a wailing from the second quarter, and a great crashing from the hills.1:11 Wail, ye inhabitants of Maktesh; for all the people of Canaan are undone; all they that were laden with silver are cut off.1:12 And it shall come to pass at that time, that I will search Jerusalem with lamps; and I will punish the men that are settled on their lees, that say in their heart, Yahweh will not do good, neither will he do evil.1:13 And their wealth shall become a spoil, and their houses a desolation: yes, they shall build houses, but shall not inhabit them; and they shall plant vineyards, but shall not drink the wine thereof.1:14 The great day of Yahweh is near, it is near and hastens greatly, even the voice of the day of Yahweh; the mighty man cries there bitterly.1:15 That day is a day of wrath, a day of trouble and distress, a day of wasteness and desolation, a day of darkness and gloominess, a day of clouds and thick darkness,1:16 a day of the trumpet and alarm, against the fortified cities, and against the high battlements.1:17 And I will bring distress upon men, that they shall walk like blind men, because they have sinned against Yahweh; and their blood shall be poured out as dust, and their flesh as dung.1:18 Neither their silver nor their gold shall be able to deliver them in the day of Yahweh's wrath; but the whole land shall be devoured by the fire of his jealousy: for he will make an end, yes, a terrible end, of all them that dwell in the land.2:1 Gather yourselves together, yes, gather together, O nation that has no shame;2:2 before the decree bring forth, before the day pass as the chaff, before the fierce anger of Yahweh come upon you, before the day of Yahweh's anger come upon you.2:3 Seek ye Yahweh, all ye meek of the earth, that have kept his ordinances; seek righteousness, seek meekness: it may be ye will be hid in the day of Yahweh's anger.2:4 For Gaza shall be forsaken, and Ashkelon a desolation; they shall drive out Ashdod at noonday, and Ekron shall be rooted up.2:5 Woe to the inhabitants of the sea-coast, the nation of the Cherethites! The word of Yahweh is against you, O Canaan, the land of the Philistines; I will destroy you, that there shall be no inhabitant.2:6 And the sea-coast shall be pastures, with cottages for shepherds and folds for flocks.2:7 And the coast shall be for the remnant of the house of Judah; they shall feed their flocks thereupon; in the houses of Ashkelon shall they lie down in the evening; for Yahweh their God will visit them, and bring back their captivity.2:8 I have heard the reproach of Moab, and the revilings of the children of Ammon, with which they have reproached my people, and magnified themselves against their border.2:9 Therefore as I live, says Yahweh of hosts, the God of Israel, Surely Moab shall be as Sodom, and the children of Ammon as Gomorrah, a possession of nettles, and saltpits, and a perpetual desolation: the residue of my people shall make a prey of them, and the remnant of my nation shall inherit them.2:10 This shall they have for their pride, because they have reproached and magnified themselves against the people of Yahweh of hosts.2:11 Yahweh will be terrible to them; for he will famish all the gods of the earth; and men shall worship him, every one from his place, even all the isles of the nations.2:12 You Ethiopians also, ye shall be slain by my sword.2:13 And he will stretch out his hand against the north, and destroy Assyria, and will make Nineveh a desolation, and dry like the wilderness.2:14 And herds shall lie down in the midst of her, all the beasts of the nations: both the pelican and the porcupine shall lodge in the capitals thereof; their voice shall sing in the windows; desolation shall be in the thresholds: for he has laid bare the cedar-work.2:15 This is the joyous city that dwelt carelessly, that said in her heart, I am, and there is none besides me: how is she become a desolation, a place for beasts to lie down in! every one that passes by her shall hiss, and wag his hand.3:1 Woe to her that is rebellious and polluted! to the oppressing city!3:2 She obeyed not the voice; she received not correction; she trusted not in Yahweh; she drew not near to her God.3:3 Her princes in the midst of her are roaring lions; her judges are evening wolves; they leave nothing till the morrow.3:4 Her prophets are light and treacherous persons; her priests have profaned the sanctuary, they have done violence to the law.3:5 Yahweh in the midst of her is righteous; he will not do iniquity; every morning does he bring his justice to light, he fails not; but the unjust knows no shame.3:6 I have cut off nations; their battlements are desolate; I have made their streets waste, so that none passes by; their cities are destroyed, so that there is no man, so that there is no inhabitant.3:7 I said, Only fear you me; receive correction; so her dwelling shall not be cut off, according to all that I have appointed concerning her: but they rose early and corrupted all their doings.3:8 Therefore wait ye for me, says Yahweh, until the day that I rise up to the prey; for my determination is to gather the nations, that I may assemble the kingdoms, to pour upon them my indignation, even all my fierce anger; for all the earth shall be devoured with the fire of my jealousy.3:9 For then will I turn to the peoples of a pure language, that they may all call upon the name of Yahweh, to serve him with one consent.3:10 From beyond the rivers of Ethiopia my suppliants, even the daughter of my dispersed, shall bring my offering.3:11 In that day shall you not be put to shame for all your doings, in which you have transgressed against me; for then I will take away out of the midst of you your proudly exulting ones, and you shall no more be haughty in my holy mountain.3:12 But I will leave in the midst of you an afflicted and poor people, and they shall take refuge in the name of Yahweh.3:13 The remnant of Israel shall not do iniquity, nor speak lies; neither shall a deceitful tongue be found in their mouth; for they shall feed and lie down, and none shall make them afraid.3:14 Sing, O daughter of Zion; shout, O Israel; be glad and rejoice with all the heart, O daughter of Jerusalem.3:15 Yahweh has taken away your judgments, he has cast out your enemy: the King of Israel, even Yahweh, is in the midst of you; you shall not fear evil any more.3:16 In that day it shall be said to Jerusalem, Fear you not; O Zion, let not your hands be slack.3:17 Yahweh your God is in the midst of you, a mighty one who will save; he will rejoice over you with joy; he will rest in his love; he will joy over you with singing.3:18 I will gather them that sorrow for the solemn assembly, who were of you; to whom the burden upon her was a reproach.3:19 Behold, at that time I will deal with all them that afflict you; and I will save that which is lame, and gather that which was driven away; and I will make them a praise and a name, whose shame has been in all the earth.3:20 At that time will I bring you in, and at that time will I gather you; for I will make you a name and a praise among all the peoples of the earth, when I bring back your captivity before your eyes, says Yahweh.End of ZephaniahHaggai1:1 In the second year of Darius the king, in the sixth month, in the first day of the month, came the word of Yahweh by Haggai the prophet to Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, governor of Judah, and to Joshua the son of Jehozadak, the high priest, saying,1:2 Thus speaks Yahweh of hosts, saying, This people say, It is not the time for us to come, the time for Yahweh's house to be built.1:3 Then came the word of Yahweh by Haggai the prophet, saying,1:4 Is it a time for you yourselves to dwell in your ceiled houses, while this house lies waste?1:5 Now therefore thus says Yahweh of hosts: Consider your ways.1:6 You have sown much, and bring in little; ye eat, but ye have not enough; ye drink, but ye are not filled with drink; ye clothe you, but there is none warm; and he that earns wages earns wages to put it into a bag with holes.1:7 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Consider your ways.1:8 Go up to the mountain, and bring wood, and build the house; and I will take pleasure in it, and I will be glorified, says Yahweh.1:9 You looked for much, and, lo, it came to little; and when ye brought it home, I did blow upon it.  Why?  says Yahweh of hosts.  Because of my house that lies waste, while ye run every man to his own house.1:10 Therefore for your sake the heavens withhold the dew, and the earth withholds its fruit.1:11 And I called for a drought upon the land, and upon the mountains, and upon the grain, and upon the new wine, and upon the oil, and upon that which the ground brings forth, and upon men, and upon cattle, and upon all the labor of the hands.1:12 Then Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Joshua the son of Jehozadak, the high priest, with all the remnant of the people, obeyed the voice of Yahweh their God, and the words of Haggai the prophet, as Yahweh their God had sent him; and the people did fear before Yahweh.1:13 Then spoke Haggai Yahweh's messenger in Yahweh's message to the people, saying, I am with you, says Yahweh.1:14 And Yahweh stirred up the spirit of Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, governor of Judah, and the spirit of Joshua the son of Jehozadak, the high priest, and the spirit of all the remnant of the people; and they came and did work on the house of Yahweh of hosts, their God,1:15 in the four and twentieth day of the month, in the sixth month, in the second year of Darius the king.2:1 In the seventh month, in the one and twentieth day of the month, came the word of Yahweh by Haggai the prophet, saying,2:2 Speak now to Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, governor of Judah, and to Joshua the son of Jehozadak, the high priest, and to the remnant of the people, saying,2:3 Who is left among you that saw this house in its former glory?  and how do ye see it now?  is it not in your eyes as nothing?2:4 Yet now be strong, O Zerubbabel, says Yahweh; and be strong, O Joshua, son of Jehozadak, the high priest; and be strong, all ye people of the land, says Yahweh, and work: for I am with you, says Yahweh of hosts,2:5 according to the word that I covenanted with you when ye came out of Egypt, and my Spirit abode among you: fear ye not.2:6 For thus says Yahweh of hosts: Yet once, it is a little while, and I will shake the heavens, and the earth, and the sea, and the dry land;2:7 and I will shake all nations; and the precious things of all nations shall come; and I will fill this house with glory, says Yahweh of hosts.2:8 The silver is mine, and the gold is mine, says Yahweh of hosts.2:9 The latter glory of this house shall be greater than the former, says Yahweh of hosts; and in this place will I give peace, says Yahweh of hosts.2:10 In the four and twentieth day of the ninth month, in the second year of Darius, came the word of Yahweh by Haggai the prophet, saying,2:11 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Ask now the priests concerning the law, saying,2:12 If one bear holy flesh in the skirt of his garment, and with his skirt do touch bread, or pottage, or wine, or oil, or any food, shall it become holy?  And the priests answered and said, No.2:13 Then said Haggai, If one that is unclean by reason of a dead body touch any of these, shall it be unclean?  And the priests answered and said, It shall be unclean.2:14 Then answered Haggai and said, So is this people, and so is this nation before me, says Yahweh; and so is every work of their hands; and that which they offer there is unclean.2:15 And now, I pray you, consider from this day and backward, before a stone was laid upon a stone in the temple of Yahweh.2:16 Through all that time, when one came to a heap of twenty measures, there were but ten; when one came to the winevat to draw out fifty vessels, there were but twenty.2:17 I smote you with blasting and with mildew and with hail in all the work of your hands; yet ye turned not to me, says Yahweh.2:18 Consider, I pray you, from this day and backward, from the four and twentieth day of the ninth month, since the day that the foundation of Yahweh's temple was laid, consider it.2:19 Is the seed yet in the barn?  yes, the vine, and the fig-tree, and the pomegranate, and the olive-tree have not brought forth; from this day will I bless you.2:20 And the word of Yahweh came the second time to Haggai in the four and twentieth day of the month, saying,2:21 Speak to Zerubbabel, governor of Judah, saying, I will shake the heavens and the earth;2:22 and I will overthrow the throne of kingdoms; and I will destroy the strength of the kingdoms of the nations; and I will overthrow the chariots, and those that ride in them; and the horses and their riders shall come down, every one by the sword of his brother.2:23 In that day, says Yahweh of hosts, will I take you, O Zerubbabel, my servant, the son of Shealtiel, says Yahweh, and will make you as a signet; for I have chosen you, says Yahweh of hosts.End of HaggaiZechariah1:1 In the eighth month, in the second year of Darius, came the word of Yahweh to Zechariah the son of Berechiah, the son of Iddo, the prophet, saying,1:2 Yahweh was sore displeased with your fathers.1:3 Therefore say you to them, Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Return to me, says Yahweh of hosts, and I will return to you, says Yahweh of hosts.1:4 Be ye not as your fathers, to whom the former prophets cried, saying, Thus says Yahweh of hosts, Return ye now from your evil ways, and from your evil doings: but they did not hear, nor hearken to me, says Yahweh.1:5 Your fathers, where are they?  and the prophets, do they live for ever?1:6 But my words and my statutes, which I commanded my servants the prophets, did they not overtake your fathers?  and they turned and said, Like as Yahweh of hosts thought to do to us, according to our ways, and according to our doings, so has he dealt with us.1:7 Upon the four and twentieth day of the eleventh month, which is the month Shebat, in the second year of Darius, came the word of Yahweh to Zechariah the son of Berechiah, the son of Iddo, the prophet, saying,1:8 I saw in the night, and, behold, a man riding upon a red horse, and he stood among the myrtle-trees that were in the bottom; and behind him there were horses, red, sorrel, and white.1:9 Then said I, O my lord, what are these?  And the angel that talked with me said to me, I will show you what these are.1:10 And the man that stood among the myrtle-trees answered and said, These are they whom Yahweh has sent to walk to and fro through the earth.1:11 And they answered the angel of Yahweh that stood among the myrtle-trees, and said, We have walked to and fro through the earth, and, behold, all the earth sits still, and is at rest.1:12 Then the angel of Yahweh answered and said, O Yahweh of hosts, how long will you not have mercy on Jerusalem and on the cities of Judah, against which you have had indignation these seventy years?1:13 And Yahweh answered the angel that talked with me with good words, even comfortable words.1:14 So the angel that talked with me said to me, Cry, saying, Thus says Yahweh of hosts: I am jealous for Jerusalem and for Zion with a great jealousy.1:15 And I am very sore displeased with the nations that are at ease; for I was but a little displeased, and they helped forward the affliction.1:16 Therefore thus says Yahweh: I am returned to Jerusalem with mercies; my house shall be built in it, says Yahweh of hosts, and a line shall be stretched forth over Jerusalem.1:17 Cry yet again, saying, Thus says Yahweh of hosts: My cities shall yet overflow with prosperity; and Yahweh shall yet comfort Zion, and shall yet choose Jerusalem.1:18 And I lifted up my eyes, and saw, and, behold, four horns.1:19 And I said to the angel that talked with me, What are these?  And he answered me, These are the horns which have scattered Judah, Israel, and Jerusalem.1:20 And Yahweh showed me four smiths.1:21 Then said I, What come these to do?  And he spoke, saying, These are the horns which scattered Judah, so that no man did lift up his head; but these are come to terrify them, to cast down the horns of the nations, which lifted up their horn against the land of Judah to scatter it.2:1 And I lifted up my eyes, and saw, and, behold, a man with a measuring line in his hand.2:2 Then said I, Whither go you?  And he said to me, To measure Jerusalem, to see what is the breadth thereof, and what is the length thereof.2:3 And, behold, the angel that talked with me went forth, and another angel went out to meet him,2:4 and said to him, Run, speak to this young man, saying, Jerusalem shall be inhabited as villages without walls, by reason of the multitude of men and cattle therein.2:5 For I, says Yahweh, will be to her a wall of fire round about, and I will be the glory in the midst of her.2:6 Ho, ho, flee from the land of the north, says Yahweh; for I have spread you abroad as the four winds of the heavens, says Yahweh.2:7 Ho Zion, escape, you that dwell with the daughter of Babylon.2:8 For thus says Yahweh of hosts: After glory has he sent me to the nations which plundered you; for he that touches you touches the apple of his eye.2:9 For, behold, I will shake my hand over them, and they shall be a spoil to those that served them; and ye shall know that Yahweh of hosts has sent me.2:10 Sing and rejoice, O daughter of Zion; for, lo, I come, and I will dwell in the midst of you, says Yahweh.2:11 And many nations shall join themselves to Yahweh in that day, and shall be my people; and I will dwell in the midst of you, and you shall know that Yahweh of hosts has sent me to you.2:12 And Yahweh shall inherit Judah as his portion in the holy land, and shall yet choose Jerusalem.2:13 Be silent, all flesh, before Yahweh; for he is waked up out of his holy habitation.3:1 And he showed me Joshua the high priest standing before the angel of Yahweh, and Satan standing at his right hand to be his adversary.3:2 And Yahweh said to Satan, Yahweh rebuke you, O Satan; yes, Yahweh that has chosen Jerusalem rebuke you: is not this a brand plucked out of the fire?3:3 Now Joshua was clothed with filthy garments, and was standing before the angel.3:4 And he answered and spoke to those that stood before him, saying, Take the filthy garments from off him.  And to him he said, Behold, I have caused your iniquity to pass from you, and I will clothe you with rich apparel.3:5 And I said, Let them set a clean mitre upon his head.  So they set a clean mitre upon his head, and clothed him with garments; and the angel of Yahweh was standing by.3:6 And the angel of Yahweh protested to Joshua, saying,3:7 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: If you will walk in my ways, and if you will keep my charge, then you also shall judge my house, and shall also keep my courts, and I will give you a place of access among these that stand by.3:8 Hear now, O Joshua the high priest, you and your fellows that sit before you; for they are men that are a sign: for, behold, I will bring forth my servant the Branch.3:9 For, behold, the stone that I have set before Joshua; upon one stone are seven eyes: behold, I will engrave the graving thereof, says Yahweh of hosts, and I will remove the iniquity of that land in one day.3:10 In that day, says Yahweh of hosts, shall ye invite every man his neighbor under the vine and under the fig-tree.4:1 And the angel that talked with me came again, and waked me, as a man that is wakened out of his sleep.4:2 And he said to me, What see you?  And I said, I have seen, and, behold, a candlestick all of gold, with its bowl upon the top of it, and its seven lamps upon it; there are seven pipes to each of the lamps, which are upon the top thereof;4:3 and two olive-trees by it, one upon the right side of the bowl, and the other upon the left side thereof.4:4 And I answered and spoke to the angel that talked with me, saying, What are these, my lord?4:5 Then the angel that talked with me answered and said to me, Know you not what these are?  And I said, No, my lord.4:6 Then he answered and spoke to me, saying, This is the word of Yahweh to Zerubbabel, saying, Not by might, nor by power, but by my Spirit, says Yahweh of hosts.4:7 Who are you, O great mountain?  before Zerubbabel you shall become a plain; and he shall bring forth the top stone with shoutings of Grace, grace, to it.4:8 Moreover the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,4:9 The hands of Zerubbabel have laid the foundation of this house; his hands shall also finish it; and you shall know that Yahweh of hosts has sent me to you.4:10 For who has despised the day of small things?  for these seven shall rejoice, and shall see the plummet in the hand of Zerubbabel; these are the eyes of Yahweh, which run to and fro through the whole earth.4:11 Then answered I, and said to him, What are these two olive-trees upon the right side of the candlestick and upon the left side thereof?4:12 And I answered the second time, and said to him, What are these two olive-branches, which are beside the two golden spouts, that empty the golden oil out of themselves?4:13 And he answered me and said, Know you not what these are?  And I said, No, my lord.4:14 Then said he, These are the two anointed ones, that stand by the Lord of the whole earth.5:1 Then again I lifted up my eyes, and saw, and, behold, a flying roll.5:2 And he said to me, What see you?  And I answered, I see a flying roll; the length thereof is twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof ten cubits.5:3 Then said he to me, This is the curse that goes forth over the face of the whole land: for every one that steals shall be cut off on the one side according to it; and every one that swears shall be cut off on the other side according to it.5:4 I will cause it to go forth, says Yahweh of hosts, and it shall enter into the house of the thief, and into the house of him that swears falsely by my name; and it shall abide in the midst of his house, and shall consume it with the timber thereof and the stones thereof.5:5 Then the angel that talked with me went forth, and said to me, Lift up now your eyes, and see what is this that goes forth.5:6 And I said, What is it?  And he said, This is the ephah that goes forth.  He said moreover, This is their appearance in all the land5:7 (and, behold, there was lifted up a talent of lead); and this is a woman sitting in the midst of the ephah.5:8 And he said, This is Wickedness: and he cast her down into the midst of the ephah; and he cast the weight of lead upon the mouth thereof.5:9 Then lifted I up my eyes, and saw, and, behold, there came forth two women, and the wind was in their wings; now they had wings like the wings of a stork; and they lifted up the ephah between earth and heaven.5:10 Then said I to the angel that talked with me, Whither do these bear the ephah?5:11 And he said to me, To build her a house in the land of Shinar: and when it is prepared, she shall be set there in her own place.6:1 And again I lifted up my eyes, and saw, and, behold, there came four chariots out from between two mountains; and the mountains were mountains of brass.6:2 In the first chariot were red horses; and in the second chariot black horses;6:3 and in the third chariot white horses; and in the fourth chariot grizzled strong horses.6:4 Then I answered and said to the angel that talked with me, What are these, my lord?6:5 And the angel answered and said to me, These are the four winds of heaven, which go forth from standing before the Lord of all the earth.6:6 The chariot in which are the black horses goes forth toward the north country; and the white went forth after them; and the grizzled went forth toward the south country.6:7 And the strong went forth, and sought to go that they might walk to and fro through the earth: and he said, Get you away from here, walk to and fro through the earth.  So they walked to and fro through the earth.6:8 Then cried he to me, and spoke to me, saying, Behold, they that go toward the north country have quieted my spirit in the north country.6:9 And the word of Yahweh came to me, saying,6:10 Take of them from the captivity, even of Heldai, of Tobijah, and of Jedaiah; and come you the same day, and go into the house of Josiah the son of Zephaniah, whither they are come from Babylon;6:11 yes, take from them silver and gold, and make crowns, and set them upon the head of Joshua the son of Jehozadak, the high priest;6:12 and speak to him, saying, Thus speaks Yahweh of hosts, saying, Behold, the man whose name is the Branch: and he shall grow up out of his place; and he shall build the temple of Yahweh;6:13 even he shall build the temple of Yahweh; and he shall bear the glory, and shall sit and rule upon his throne; and he shall be a priest upon his throne; and the counsel of peace shall be between them both.6:14 And the crowns shall be to Helem, and to Tobijah, and to Jedaiah, and to Hen the son of Zephaniah, for a memorial in the temple of Yahweh.6:15 And they that are far off shall come and build in the temple of Yahweh; and ye shall know that Yahweh of hosts has sent me to you.  And this shall come to pass, if ye will diligently obey the voice of Yahweh your God.7:1 And it came to pass in the fourth year of king Darius, that the word of Yahweh came to Zechariah in the fourth day of the ninth month, that is, Chislev.7:2 Now they of Beth-el had sent Sharezer and Regem-melech, and their men, to entreat the favor of Yahweh,7:3 and to speak to the priests of the house of Yahweh of hosts, and to the prophets, saying, Should I weep in the fifth month, separating myself, as I have done these so many years?7:4 Then came the word of Yahweh of hosts to me, saying,7:5 Speak to all the people of the land, and to the priests, saying, When ye fasted and mourned in the fifth and in the seventh month, even these seventy years, did ye at all fast to me, even to me?7:6 And when ye eat, and when ye drink, do not ye eat for yourselves, and drink for yourselves?7:7 Should ye not hear the words which Yahweh cried by the former prophets, when Jerusalem was inhabited and in prosperity, and the cities thereof round about her, and the South and the lowland were inhabited?7:8 And the word of Yahweh came to Zechariah, saying,7:9 Thus has Yahweh of hosts spoken, saying, Execute true judgment, and show kindness and compassion every man to his brother;7:10 and oppress not the widow, nor the fatherless, the sojourner, nor the poor; and let none of you devise evil against his brother in your heart.7:11 But they refused to hearken, and pulled away the shoulder, and stopped their ears, that they might not hear.7:12 Yes, they made their hearts as an adamant stone, lest they should hear the law, and the words which Yahweh of hosts had sent by his Spirit by the former prophets: therefore there came great wrath from Yahweh of hosts.7:13 And it is come to pass that, as he cried, and they would not hear, so they shall cry, and I will not hear, said Yahweh of hosts;7:14 but I will scatter them with a whirlwind among all the nations which they have not known.  Thus the land was desolate after them, so that no man passed through nor returned: for they laid the pleasant land desolate.8:1 And the word of Yahweh of hosts came to me, saying,8:2 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: I am jealous for Zion with great jealousy, and I am jealous for her with great wrath.8:3 Thus says Yahweh: I am returned to Zion, and will dwell in the midst of Jerusalem: and Jerusalem shall be called The city of truth; and the mountain of Yahweh of hosts, The holy mountain.8:4 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: There shall yet old men and old women dwell in the streets of Jerusalem, every man with his staff in his hand for very age.8:5 And the streets of the city shall be full of boys and girls playing in the streets thereof.8:6 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: If it be marvellous in the eyes of the remnant of this people in those days, should it also be marvellous in my eyes?  says Yahweh of hosts.8:7 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Behold, I will save my people from the east country, and from the west country;8:8 and I will bring them, and they shall dwell in the midst of Jerusalem; and they shall be my people, and I will be their God, in truth and in righteousness.8:9 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: Let your hands be strong, ye that hear in these days these words from the mouth of the prophets that were in the day that the foundation of the house of Yahweh of hosts was laid, even the temple, that it might be built.8:10 For before those days there was no wage for a man, nor any wage for beast; neither was there any peace to him that went out or came in, because of the adversary: for I set all men every one against his neighbor.8:11 But now I will not be to the remnant of this people as in the former days, says Yahweh of hosts.8:12 For there shall be the seed of peace; the vine shall give its fruit, and the ground shall give its increase, and the heavens shall give their dew; and I will cause the remnant of this people to inherit all these things.8:13 And it shall come to pass that, as ye were a curse among the nations, O house of Judah and house of Israel, so will I save you, and ye shall be a blessing.  Fear not, but let your hands be strong.8:14 For thus says Yahweh of hosts: As I thought to do evil to you, when your fathers provoked me to wrath, says Yahweh of hosts, and I repented not;8:15 so again have I thought in these days to do good to Jerusalem and to the house of Judah: fear ye not.8:16 These are the things that ye shall do: speak ye every man the truth with his neighbor; execute the judgment of truth and peace in your gates;8:17 and let none of you devise evil in your hearts against his neighbor; and love no false oath: for all these are things that I hate, says Yahweh.8:18 And the word of Yahweh of hosts came to me, saying,8:19 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: The fast of the fourth month, and the fast of the fifth, and the fast of the seventh, and the fast of the tenth, shall be to the house of Judah joy and gladness, and cheerful feasts; therefore love truth and peace.8:20 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: It shall yet come to pass, that there shall come peoples, and the inhabitants of many cities;8:21 and the inhabitants of one city shall go to another, saying, Let us go speedily to entreat the favor of Yahweh, and to seek Yahweh of hosts: I will go also.8:22 Yes, many peoples and strong nations shall come to seek Yahweh of hosts in Jerusalem, and to entreat the favor of Yahweh.8:23 Thus says Yahweh of hosts: In those days it shall come to pass, that ten men shall take hold, out of all the languages of the nations, they shall take hold of the skirt of him that is a Jew, saying, We will go with you, for we have heard that God is with you.9:1 The burden of the word of Yahweh upon the land of Hadrach, and Damascus shall be its resting-place (for the eye of man and of all the tribes of Israel is toward Yahweh);9:2 and Hamath, also, which borders upon it; Tyre and Sidon, because they are very wise.9:3 And Tyre did build herself a stronghold, and heaped up silver as the dust, and fine gold as the mire of the streets.9:4 Behold, the Lord will dispossess her, and he will strike her power in the sea; and she shall be devoured with fire.9:5 Ashkelon shall see it, and fear; Gaza also, and shall be sore pained; and Ekron, for her expectation shall be put to shame; and the king shall perish from Gaza, and Ashkelon shall not be inhabited.9:6 And a bastard shall dwell in Ashdod, and I will cut off the pride of the Philistines.9:7 And I will take away his blood out of his mouth, and his abominations from between his teeth; and he also shall be a remnant for our God; and he shall be as a chieftain in Judah, and Ekron as a Jebusite.9:8 And I will encamp about my house against the army, that none pass through or return; and no oppressor shall pass through them any more: for now have I seen with my eyes.9:9 Rejoice greatly, O daughter of Zion; shout, O daughter of Jerusalem: behold, your king comes to you; he is just, and having salvation; lowly, and riding upon a donkey, even upon a colt the foal of a donkey.9:10 And I will cut off the chariot from Ephraim, and the horse from Jerusalem; and the battle bow shall be cut off; and he shall speak peace to the nations: and his dominion shall be from sea to sea, and from the River to the ends of the earth.9:11 As for you also, because of the blood of your covenant I have set free your prisoners from the pit in which is no water.9:12 Turn you to the stronghold, ye prisoners of hope: even today do I declare that I will render double to you.9:13 For I have bent Judah for me, I have filled the bow with Ephraim; and I will stir up your sons, O Zion, against your sons, O Greece, and will make you as the sword of a mighty man.9:14 And Yahweh shall be seen over them; and his arrow shall go forth as the lightning; and the Lord Yahweh will blow the trumpet, and will go with whirlwinds of the south.9:15 Yahweh of hosts will defend them; and they shall devour, and shall tread down the sling-stones; and they shall drink, and make a noise as through wine; and they shall be filled like bowls, like the corners of the altar.9:16 And Yahweh their God will save them in that day as the flock of his people; for they shall be as the stones of a crown, lifted on high over his land.9:17 For how great is his goodness, and how great is his beauty! grain shall make the young men flourish, and new wine the virgins.10:1 Ask ye of Yahweh rain in the time of the latter rain, even of Yahweh that makes lightnings; and he will give them showers of rain, to every one grass in the field.10:2 For the teraphim have spoken vanity, and the diviners have seen a lie; and they have told false dreams, they comfort in vain: therefore they go their way like sheep, they are afflicted, because there is no shepherd.10:3 Mine anger is kindled against the shepherds, and I will punish the he-goats; for Yahweh of hosts has visited his flock, the house of Judah, and will make them as his goodly horse in the battle.10:4 From him shall come forth the corner-stone, from him the nail, from him the battle bow, from him every ruler together.10:5 And they shall be as mighty men, treading down their enemies in the mire of the streets in the battle; and they shall fight, because Yahweh is with them; and the riders on horses shall be confounded.10:6 And I will strengthen the house of Judah, and I will save the house of Joseph, and I will bring them back; for I have mercy upon them; and they shall be as though I had not cast them off: for I am Yahweh their God, and I will hear them.10:7 And they of Ephraim shall be like a mighty man, and their heart shall rejoice as through wine; yes, their children shall see it, and rejoice; their heart shall be glad in Yahweh.10:8 I will hiss for them, and gather them; for I have redeemed them; and they shall increase as they have increased.10:9 And I will sow them among the peoples; and they shall remember me in far countries; and they shall live with their children, and shall return.10:10 I will bring them again also out of the land of Egypt, and gather them out of Assyria; and I will bring them into the land of Gilead and Lebanon; and place shall not be found for them.10:11 And he will pass through the sea of affliction, and will strike the waves in the sea, and all the depths of the Nile shall dry up; and the pride of Assyria shall be brought down, and the sceptre of Egypt shall depart.10:12 And I will strengthen them in Yahweh; and they shall walk up and down in his name, says Yahweh.11:1 Open your doors, O Lebanon, that the fire may devour your cedars.11:2 Wail, O fir-tree, for the cedar is fallen, because the goodly ones are destroyed: wail, O ye oaks of Bashan, for the strong forest is come down.11:3 A voice of the wailing of the shepherds! for their glory is destroyed: a voice of the roaring of young lions! for the pride of the Jordan is laid waste.11:4 Thus said Yahweh my God: Feed the flock of slaughter;11:5 whose possessors slay them, and hold themselves not guilty; and they that sell them say, Blessed be Yahweh, for I am rich; and their own shepherds pity them not.11:6 For I will no longer pity the inhabitants of the land, says Yahweh; but, lo, I will deliver the men every one into his neighbor's hand, and into the hand of his king; and they shall smite the land, and out of their hand I will not deliver them.11:7 So I fed the flock of slaughter, verily the poor of the flock.  And I took to me two staves; the one I called Beauty, and the other I called Bands; and I fed the flock.11:8 And I cut off the three shepherds in one month; for my soul was weary of them, and their soul also loathed me.11:9 Then said I, I will not feed you: that which dies, let it die; and that which is to be cut off, let it be cut off; and let them that are left eat every one the flesh of another.11:10 And I took my staff Beauty, and cut it asunder, that I might break my covenant which I had made with all the peoples.11:11 And it was broken in that day; and thus the poor of the flock that gave heed to me knew that it was the word of Yahweh.11:12 And I said to them, If ye think good, give me my fee; and if not, forbear.  So they weighed for my payment thirty pieces of silver.11:13 And Yahweh said to me, Cast it to the potter, that maginificent price at which I was prized by them.  And I took the thirty pieces of silver, and threw them to the potter, in the house of Yahweh.11:14 Then I cut asunder my other staff, even Bands, that I might break the brotherhood between Judah and Israel.11:15 And Yahweh said to me, Take to you yet again the instruments of a foolish shepherd.11:16 For, lo, I will raise up a shepherd in the land, who will not visit those that are cut off, neither will seek those that are scattered, nor heal that which is broken, nor feed that which is sound; but he will eat the flesh of the fat sheep, and will tear their hoofs in pieces.11:17 Woe to the worthless shepherd that leaves the flock! the sword shall be upon his arm, and upon his right eye: his arm shall be clean dried up, and his right eye shall be utterly darkened.12:1 The burden of the word of Yahweh concerning Israel.  Thus says Yahweh, who stretches forth the heavens, and lays the foundation of the earth, and forms the spirit of man within him:12:2 behold, I will make Jerusalem a cup of reeling to all the peoples round about, and upon Judah also shall it be in the siege against Jerusalem.12:3 And it shall come to pass in that day, that I will make Jerusalem a burdensome stone for all the peoples; all that burden themselves with it shall be sore wounded; and all the nations of the earth shall be gathered together against it.12:4 In that day, says Yahweh, I will smite every horse with terror, and his rider with madness; and I will open my eyes upon the house of Judah, and will smite every horse of the peoples with blindness.12:5 And the chieftains of Judah shall say in their heart, The inhabitants of Jerusalem are my strength in Yahweh of hosts their God.12:6 In that day will I make the chieftains of Judah like a pan of fire among wood, and like a flaming torch among sheaves; and they shall devour all the peoples round about, on the right hand and on the left; and they of Jerusalem shall yet again dwell in their own place, even in Jerusalem.12:7 Yahweh also shall save the tents of Judah first, that the glory of the house of David and the glory of the inhabitants of Jerusalem be not magnified above Judah.12:8 In that day shall Yahweh defend the inhabitants of Jerusalem: and he that is feeble among them at that day shall be as David; and the house of David shall be as God, as the angel of Yahweh before them.12:9 And it shall come to pass in that day, that I will seek to destroy all the nations that come against Jerusalem.12:10 And I will pour upon the house of David, and upon the inhabitants of Jerusalem, the spirit of grace and of supplication; and they shall look to me whom they have pierced; and they shall mourn for him, as one mourns for his only son, and shall be in bitterness for him, as one that is in bitterness for his first-born.12:11 In that day shall there be a great mourning in Jerusalem, as the mourning of Hadadrimmon in the valley of Megiddon.12:12 And the land shall mourn, every family apart; the family of the house of David apart, and their wives apart; the family of the house of Nathan apart, and their wives apart;12:13 the family of the house of Levi apart, and their wives apart; the family of the Shimeites apart, and their wives apart;12:14 all the families that remain, every family apart, and their wives apart.13:1 In that day there shall be a fountain opened to the house of David and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, for sin and for uncleanness.13:2 And it shall come to pass in that day, says Yahweh of hosts, that I will cut off the names of the idols out of the land, and they shall no more be remembered; and also I will cause the prophets and the unclean spirit to pass out of the land.13:3 And it shall come to pass that, when any shall yet prophesy, then his father and his mother that begat him shall say to him, You shall not live; for you speak lies in the name of Yahweh; and his father and his mother that begat him shall thrust him through when he prophesies.13:4 And it shall come to pass in that day, that the prophets shall be ashamed every one of his vision, when he prophesies; neither shall they wear a hairy mantle to deceive:13:5 but he shall say, I am no prophet, I am a tiller of the ground; for I have been made a bondman from my youth.13:6 And one shall say to him, What are these wounds between your arms?  Then he shall answer, Those with which I was wounded in the house of my friends.13:7 Awake, O sword, against my shepherd, and against the man that is my fellow, says Yahweh of hosts: strike the shepherd, and the sheep shall be scattered; and I will turn my hand upon the little ones.13:8 And it shall come to pass, that in all the land, says Yahweh, two parts therein shall be cut off and die; but the third shall be left therein.13:9 And I will bring the third part into the fire, and will refine them as silver is refined, and will try them as gold is tried.  They shall call on my name, and I will hear them: I will say, It is my people; and they shall say, Yahweh is my God.14:1 Behold, a day of Yahweh comes, when your spoil shall be divided in the midst of you.14:2 For I will gather all nations against Jerusalem to battle; and the city shall be taken, and the houses rifled, and the women ravished; and half of the city shall go forth into captivity, and the residue of the people shall not be cut off from the city.14:3 Then shall Yahweh go forth, and fight against those nations, as when he fought in the day of battle.14:4 And his feet shall stand in that day upon the mount of Olives, which is before Jerusalem on the east; and the mount of Olives shall be cleft in the midst thereof toward the east and toward the west, and there shall be a very great valley; and half of the mountain shall remove toward the north, and half of it toward the south.14:5 And ye shall flee by the valley of my mountains; for the valley of the mountains shall reach to Azel; yes, ye shall flee, like as ye fled from before the earthquake in the days of Uzziah king of Judah; and Yahweh my God shall come, and all the holy ones with you.14:6 And it shall come to pass in that day, that there shall not be light; the bright ones shall withdraw themselves:14:7 but it shall be one day which is known to Yahweh; not day, and not night; but it shall come to pass, that at evening time there shall be light.14:8 And it shall come to pass in that day, that living waters shall go out from Jerusalem; half of them toward the eastern sea, and half of them toward the western sea: in summer and in winter shall it be.14:9 And Yahweh shall be King over all the earth: in that day shall Yahweh be one, and his name one.14:10 All the land shall be made like the Arabah, from Geba to Rimmon south of Jerusalem; and she shall be lifted up, and shall dwell in her place, from Benjamin's gate to the place of the first gate, to the corner gate, and from the tower of Hananel to the king's wine-presses.14:11 And men shall dwell therein, and there shall be no more curse; but Jerusalem shall dwell safely.14:12 And this shall be the plague with which Yahweh will smite all the peoples that have warred against Jerusalem: their flesh shall consume away while they stand upon their feet, and their eyes shall consume away in their sockets, and their tongue shall consume away in their mouth.14:13 And it shall come to pass in that day, that a great tumult from Yahweh shall be among them; and they shall lay hold every one on the hand of his neighbor, and his hand shall rise up against the hand of his neighbor.14:14 And Judah also shall fight at Jerusalem; and the wealth of all the nations round about shall be gathered together, gold, and silver, and apparel, in great abundance.14:15 And so shall be the plague of the horse, of the mule, of the camel, and of the donkey, and of all the beasts that shall be in those camps, as that plague.14:16 And it shall come to pass, that every one that is left of all the nations that came against Jerusalem shall go up from year to year to worship the King, Yahweh of hosts, and to keep the feast of tabernacles.14:17 And it shall be, that whoso of all the families of the earth goes not up to Jerusalem to worship the King, Yahweh of hosts, upon them there shall be no rain.14:18 And if the family of Egypt go not up, and come not, neither shall it be upon them; there shall be the plague with which Yahweh will smite the nations that go not up to keep the feast of tabernacles.14:19 This shall be the punishment of Egypt, and the punishment of all the nations that go not up to keep the feast of tabernacles.14:20 In that day shall there be upon the bells of the horses, HOLY UNTO YAHWEH; and the pots in Yahweh's house shall be like the bowls before the altar.14:21 Yes, every pot in Jerusalem and in Judah shall be holy unto Yahweh of hosts; and all they that sacrifice shall come and take of them, and boil therein: and in that day there shall be no more a Canaanite in the house of Yahweh of hosts.End of ZechariahMalachi1:1 The burden of the word of Yahweh to Israel by Malachi.1:2 I have loved you, says Yahweh.  Yet ye say, In what way have you loved us?  Was not Esau Jacob's brother, says Yahweh: yet I loved Jacob;1:3 but Esau I hated, and made his mountains a desolation, and gave his heritage to the jackals of the wilderness.1:4 Whereas Edom says, We are beaten down, but we will return and build the waste places; thus says Yahweh of hosts, They shall build, but I will throw down; and men shall call them The border of wickedness, and The people against whom Yahweh has indignation for ever.1:5 And your eyes shall see, and ye shall say, Yahweh be magnified beyond the border of Israel.1:6 A son honors his father, and a servant his master: if then I am a father, where is my honor?  and if I am a master, where is my fear?  says Yahweh of hosts to you, O priests, that despise my name.  And ye say, In what way have we despised your name?1:7 You offer polluted bread upon my altar.  And ye say, How have we polluted you?  In that ye say, The table of Yahweh is contemptible.1:8 And when ye offer the blind for sacrifice, it is no evil! and when ye offer the lame and sick, it is no evil! Present it now to your governor; will he be pleased with you?  or will he accept your person?  says Yahweh of hosts.1:9 And now, I pray you, entreat the favor of God, that he may be gracious to us: this has been by your means: will he accept any of your persons?  says Yahweh of hosts.1:10 Oh that there were one among you that would shut the doors, that ye might not kindle fire on my altar in vain! I have no pleasure in you, says Yahweh of hosts, neither will I accept an offering at your hand.1:11 For from the rising of the sun even to the going down of the same my name shall be great among the Gentiles; and in every place incense shall be offered to my name, and a pure offering: for my name shall be great among the Gentiles, says Yahweh of hosts.1:12 But ye profane it, in that ye say, The table of Yahweh is polluted, and the fruit thereof, even its food, is contemptible.1:13 You say also, Behold, what a weariness is it! and ye have snuffed at it, says Yahweh of hosts; and ye have brought that which was taken by violence, and the lame, and the sick; thus ye bring the offering: should I accept this at your hand?  says Yahweh.1:14 But cursed be the deceiver, who has in his flock a male, and vows, and sacrifices to the Lord a blemished thing; for I am a great King, says Yahweh of hosts, and my name is terrible among the Gentiles.2:1 And now, O ye priests, this commandment is for you.2:2 If ye will not hear, and if ye will not lay it to heart, to give glory to my name, says Yahweh of hosts, then will I send the curse upon you, and I will curse your blessings; yes, I have cursed them already, because ye do not lay it to heart.2:3 Behold, I will rebuke your seed, and will spread dung upon your faces, even the dung of your feasts; and ye shall be taken away with it.2:4 And ye shall know that I have sent this commandment to you, that my covenant may be with Levi, says Yahweh of hosts.2:5 My covenant was with him of life and peace; and I gave them to him that he might fear; and he feared me, and stood in awe of my name.2:6 The law of truth was in his mouth, and unrighteousness was not found in his lips: he walked with me in peace and uprightness, and turned many away from iniquity.2:7 For the priest's lips should keep knowledge, and they should seek the law at his mouth; for he is the messenger of Yahweh of hosts.2:8 But ye are turned aside out of the way; ye have caused many to stumble in the law; ye have corrupted the covenant of Levi, says Yahweh of hosts.2:9 Therefore have I also made you contemptible and base before all the people, according as ye have not kept my ways, but have had respect of persons in the law.2:10 Have we not all one father?  has not one God created us?  why do we deal treacherously every man against his brother, profaning the covenant of our fathers?2:11 Judah has dealt treacherously, and an abomination is committed in Israel and in Jerusalem; for Judah has profaned the holiness of Yahweh which he loves, and has married the daughter of a foreign god.2:12 Yahweh will cut off, to the man that does this, him that wakes and him that answers, out of the tents of Jacob, and him that offers an offering to Yahweh of hosts.2:13 And this again ye do: ye cover the altar of Yahweh with tears, with weeping, and with sighing, insomuch that he regards not the offering any more, neither receives it with good will at your hand.2:14 Yet ye say, Why does he not?  It is because Yahweh has been witness between you and the wife of your youth, against whom you have dealt treacherously, though she is your partner, and the wife of your covenant.2:15 And did he not make them one, and it had the residue of the Spirit?  And why did he make them one?  He sought a godly seed.  Therefore take heed to your spirit, and let none deal treacherously against the wife of his youth.2:16 For I hate divorce, says Yahweh, the God of Israel, and him that covers his garment with violence, says Yahweh of hosts: therefore take heed to your spirit, that ye deal not treacherously.2:17 You have wearied Yahweh with your words.  Yet ye say, In what way have we wearied him?  In that ye say, Every one that does evil is good in the sight of Yahweh, and he delights in them; or where is the God of justice?3:1 Behold, I send my messenger, and he shall prepare the way before me: and the Lord, whom ye seek, will suddenly come to his temple; and the messenger of the covenant, whom ye desire, behold, he comes, says Yahweh of hosts.3:2 But who can abide the day of his coming?  and who shall stand when he appears?  for he is like a refiner's fire, and like fuller's soap:3:3 and he will sit as a refiner and purifier of silver, and he will purify the sons of Levi, and refine them as gold and silver; and they shall offer to Yahweh offerings in righteousness.3:4 Then shall the offering of Judah and Jerusalem be pleasant to Yahweh, as in the days of old, and as in ancient years.3:5 And I will come near to you to judgment; and I will be a swift witness against the sorcerers, and against the adulterers, and against the false swearers, and against those that oppress the hireling in his wages, the widow, and the fatherless, and that turn aside the sojourner from his right, and fear not me, says Yahweh of hosts.3:6 For I, Yahweh, change not; therefore ye, O sons of Jacob, are not consumed.3:7 From the days of your fathers ye have turned aside from my ordinances, and have not kept them.  Return to me, and I will return to you, says Yahweh of hosts.  But ye say, In what way shall we return?3:8 Will a man rob God?  yet ye rob me.  But ye say, In what manner have we robbed you?  In tithes and offerings.3:9 You are cursed with the curse; for ye rob me, even this whole nation.3:10 Bring ye the whole tithe into the store-house, that there may be food in my house, and prove me now herewith, says Yahweh of hosts, if I will not open you the windows of heaven, and pour you out a blessing, that there shall not be room enough to receive it.3:11 And I will rebuke the devourer for your sakes, and he shall not destroy the fruits of your ground; neither shall your vine cast its fruit before the time in the field, says Yahweh of hosts.3:12 And all nations shall call you happy; for ye shall be a delightsome land, says Yahweh of hosts.3:13 Your words have been stout against me, says Yahweh.  Yet ye say, What have we spoken against you?3:14 You have said, It is vain to serve God; and what profit is it that we have kept his charge, and that we have walked mournfully before Yahweh of hosts?3:15 And now we call the proud happy; yes, they that work wickedness are built up; yes, they tempt God, and escape.3:16 Then they that feared Yahweh spoke one with another; and Yahweh hearkened, and heard, and a book of remembrance was written before him, for them that feared Yahweh, and that thought upon his name.3:17 And they shall be mine, says Yahweh of hosts, even my own possession, in the day that I make; and I will spare them, as a man spares his own son that serves him.3:18 Then shall ye return and discern between the righteous and the wicked, between him that serves God and him that serves him not.4:1 For, behold, the day comes, it burns as a furnace; and all the proud, and all that work wickedness, shall be stubble; and the day that comes shall burn them up, says Yahweh of hosts, that it shall leave them neither root nor branch.4:2 But to you that fear my name the sun of righteousness shall arise with healing in his wings;  and ye shall go forth, and gambol as calves from the stall.4:3 And ye shall tread down the wicked; for they shall be ashes under the soles of your feet in the day that I make, says Yahweh of hosts.4:4 Remember ye the law of Moses my servant, which I commanded to him in Horeb for all Israel, even statutes and ordinances.4:5 Behold, I will send you Elijah the prophet before the great and terrible day of Yahweh come.4:6 And he shall turn the heart of the fathers to the children, and the heart of the children to their fathers; lest I come and smite the earth with a curse.End of Malachi